
 
 
 
 Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Cori Samuel and the PG Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team.
 
 
 
 
 
 THE SUPPRESSED POEMS
 
 OF
 
 ALFRED LORD TENNYSON
 
 1830-1868
 
 
 Edited By J.C. Thomson
 
 
 
 
 Contents
 
 
 EDITOR'S NOTE
 
 
 TIMBUCTOO
 
 
 POEMS CHIEFLY LYRICAL
 
     i. The How and the Why
    ii. The Burial of Love
   iii. To ----
    iv. Song _'I' the gloaming light'_
     v. Song _'Every day hath its night'_
    vi. Hero to Leander
   vii. The Mystic
  viii. The Grasshopper
    ix. Love, Pride and Forgetfulness
     x. Chorus _'The varied earth, the moving heaven'_
    xi. Lost Hope
   xii. The Tears of Heaven
  xiii. Love and Sorrow
   xiv. To a Lady sleeping
    xv. Sonnet _'Could I outwear my present state of woe'_
   xvi. Sonnet _'Though night hath climbed'_
  xvii. Sonnet _'Shall the hag Evil die'_
 xviii. Sonnet _'The pallid thunder stricken sigh for gain'_
   xix. Love
    xx. English War Song
   xxi. National Song
  xxii. Dualisms
 xxiii. [Greek: ohi rheontes]
  xxiv. Song _'The lintwhite and the throstlecock'_
 
 
 CONTRIBUTIONS TO PERIODICALS, 1831-32
 
    xxv. A Fragment
   xxvi. Anacreontics
  xxvii. _'O sad no more! O sweet no more'_
 xxviii. Sonnet _'Check every outflash, every ruder sally'_
   xxix. Sonnet _'Me my own fate to lasting sorrow doometh'_
    xxx. Sonnet _'There are three things that fill my heart with sighs'_
 
 
 POEMS, 1833
 
    xxxi. Sonnet _'Oh beauty, passing beauty'_
   xxxii. The Hesperides
  xxxiii. Rosalind
   xxxiv. Song _'Who can say'_
    xxxv. Sonnet _'Blow ye the trumpet, gather from afar'_
   xxxvi. O Darling Room
  xxxvii. To Christopher North
 xxxviii. The Lotos-Eaters
   xxxix. A Dream of Fair Women
 
 
 MISCELLANEOUS POEMS AND CONTRIBUTIONS TO PERIODICALS, 1833-68
 
     xl. Cambridge
    xli. The Germ of 'Maud'
   xlii. _'A gate and afield half ploughed'_
  xliii. The Skipping-Rope
   xliv. The New Timon and the Poets
    xlv. Mablethorpe
   xlvi. _'What time I wasted youthful hours'_
  xlvii. Britons, guard your own
 xlviii. Hands all round
   xlix. Suggested by reading an article in a newspaper
      l. _'God bless our Prince and Bride'_
     li. The Ringlet
    lii. Song _'Home they brought him slain with spears'_
   liii. 1865-1866
 
 
 THE LOVER'S TALE, 1833.
 
 
 INDEX OF FIRST LINES
 
 
 
 
 _Note_
 
 _To those unacquainted with Tennyson's conscientious methods, it may
 seem strange that a volume of 160 pages is necessary to contain those
 poems written and published by him during his active literary career,
 and ultimately rejected as unsatisfactory. Of this considerable body
 of verse, a great part was written, not in youth or old age, but while
 Tennyson's powers were at their greatest. Whatever reasons may once
 have existed for suppressing the poems that follow, the student of
 English literature is entitled to demand that the whole body of
 Tennyson's work should now be open, without restriction or impediment,
 to the critical study to which the works of his compeers are
 subjected._
 
 _The bibliographical notes prefixed to the various poems give, in every
 case, the date and medium of first publication._
 
 _J.C.T._
 
 
 
 
 =Timbuctoo=
 
 A Poem Which Obtained The Chancellor's Medal At The
 _Cambridge Commencement_  MDCCCXXIX
 
 By
 A. Tennyson
 Of Trinity College
 
 [Printed in Cambridge _Chronicle and Journal_ of Friday, July 10,
 1829, and at the University Press by James Smith, among the
 _Prolusiones Academicae Praemiis annuis dignatae et in Curia
 Cantabrigiensi Recitatae Comitiis Maximis_, MDCCCXXIX. Republished in
 _Cambridge Prize Poems_, 1813 to 1858, by Messrs. Macmillan in 1859,
 without alteration; and in 1893 in the appendix to a reprint of _Poems
 by Two Brothers_].
 
 
 =Timbuctoo=
 
     Deep in that lion-haunted inland lies
     A mystic city, goal of high Emprize.[A]
       --CHAPMAN.
 
   I stood upon the Mountain which o'erlooks
   The narrow seas, whose rapid interval
   Parts Afric from green Europe, when the Sun
   Had fall'n below th' Atlantick, and above
   The silent Heavens were blench'd with faery light,
   Uncertain whether faery light or cloud,
   Flowing Southward, and the chasms of deep, deep blue
   Slumber'd unfathomable, and the stars
   Were flooded over with clear glory and pale.
   I gaz'd upon the sheeny coast beyond,
   There where the Giant of old Time infixed
   The limits of his prowess, pillars high
   Long time eras'd from Earth: even as the sea
   When weary of wild inroad buildeth up
   Huge mounds whereby to stay his yeasty waves.
   And much I mus'd on legends quaint and old
   Which whilome won the hearts of all on Earth
   Toward their brightness, ev'n as flame draws air;
   But had their being in the heart of Man
   As air is th' life of flame: and thou wert then
   A center'd glory-circled Memory,
   Divinest Atalantis, whom the waves
   Have buried deep, and thou of later name
   Imperial Eldorado root'd with gold:
   Shadows to which, despite all shocks of Change,
   All on-set of capricious Accident,
   Men clung with yearning Hope which would not die.
   As when in some great City where the walls
   Shake, and the streets with ghastly faces throng'd
   Do utter forth a subterranean voice,
   Among the inner columns far retir'd
   At midnight, in the lone Acropolis.
   Before the awful Genius of the place
   Kneels the pale Priestess in deep faith, the while
   Above her head the weak lamp dips and winks
   Unto the fearful summoning without:
   Nathless she ever clasps the marble knees,
   Bathes the cold hand with tears, and gazeth on
   Those eyes which wear no light but that wherewith
   Her phantasy informs them.
 
                    Where are ye
   Thrones of the Western wave, fair Islands green?
   Where are your moonlight halls, your cedarn glooms,
   The blossoming abysses of your hills?
   Your flowering Capes and your gold-sanded bays
   Blown round with happy airs of odorous winds?
   Where are the infinite ways which, Seraphtrod,
   Wound thro' your great Elysian solitudes,
   Whose lowest depths were, as with visible love,
   Fill'd with Divine effulgence, circumfus'd,
   Flowing between the clear and polish'd stems,
   And ever circling round their emerald cones
   In coronals and glories, such as gird
   The unfading foreheads of the Saints in Heaven?
   For nothing visible, they say, had birth
   In that blest ground but it was play'd about
   With its peculiar glory. Then I rais'd
   My voice and cried 'Wide Afric, doth thy Sun
   Lighten, thy hills enfold a City as fair
   As those which starr'd the night o' the Elder World?
   Or is the rumour of thy Timbuctoo
   A dream as frail as those of ancient Time?'
 
   A curve of whitening, flashing, ebbing light!
   A rustling of white wings! The bright descent
   Of a young Seraph! and he stood beside me
   There on the ridge, and look'd into my face
   With his unutterable, shining orbs,
   So that with hasty motion I did veil
   My vision with both hands, and saw before me
   Such colour'd spots as dance athwart the eyes
   Of those that gaze upon the noonday Sun.
   Girt with a Zone of flashing gold beneath
   His breast, and compass'd round about his brow
   With triple arch of everchanging bows,
   And circled with the glory of living light
   And alternations of all hues, he stood.
   'O child of man, why muse you here alone
   Upon the Mountain, on the dreams of old
   Which fill'd the Earth with passing loveliness,
   Which flung strange music on the howling winds,
   And odours rapt from remote Paradise?
   Thy sense is clogg'd with dull mortality,
   Thy spirit fetter'd with the bond of clay:
   Open thine eye and see.'
 
                     I look'd, but not
   Upon his face, for it was wonderful
   With its exceeding brightness, and the light
   Of the great angel mind which look'd from out
   The starry glowing of his restless eyes.
   I felt my soul grow mighty, and my spirit
   With supernatural excitation bound
   Within me, and my mental eye grew large
   With such a vast circumference of thought,
   That in my vanity I seem'd to stand
   Upon the outward verge and bound alone
   Of full beatitude. Each failing sense
   As with a momentary flash of light
   Grew thrillingly distinct and keen. I saw
   The smallest grain that dappled the dark Earth,
   The indistinctest atom in deep air,
   The Moon's white cities, and the opal width
   Of her small glowing lakes, her silver heights
   Unvisited with dew of vagrant cloud,
   And the unsounded, undescended depth
   Of her black hollows. The clear Galaxy
   Shorn of its hoary lustre, wonderful,
   Distinct and vivid with sharp points of light
   Blaze within blaze, an unimagin'd depth
   And harmony of planet-girded Suns
   And moon-encircled planets, wheel in wheel,
   Arch'd the wan Sapphire. Nay, the hum of men,
   Or other things talking in unknown tongues,
   And notes of busy life in distant worlds
   Beat like a far wave on my anxious ear.
 
   A maze of piercing, trackless, thrilling thoughts
   Involving and embracing each with each
   Rapid as fire, inextricably link'd,
   Expanding momently with every sight
   And sound which struck the palpitating sense,
   The issue of strong impulse, hurried through
   The riv'n rapt brain: as when in some large lake
   From pressure of descendant crags, which lapse
   Disjointed, crumbling from their parent slope
   At slender interval, the level calm
   Is ridg'd with restless and increasing spheres
   Which break upon each other, each th' effect
   Of separate impulse, but more fleet and strong
   Than its precursor, till the eyes in vain
   Amid the wild unrest of swimming shade
   Dappled with hollow and alternate rise
   Of interpenetrated arc, would scan
   Definite round.
                    I know not if I shape
   These things with accurate similitude
   From visible objects, for but dimly now,
   Less vivid than a half-forgotten dream,
   The memory of that mental excellence
   Comes o'er me, and it may be I entwine
   The indecision of my present mind
   With its past clearness, yet it seems to me
   As even then the torrent of quick thought
   Absorbed me from the nature of itself
   With its own fleetness. Where is he that, borne
   Adown the sloping of an arrowy stream,
   Could link his shallop to the fleeting edge,
   And muse midway with philosophic calm
   Upon the wondrous laws which regulate
   The fierceness of the bounding element?
   My thoughts which long had grovell'd in the slime
   Of this dull world, like dusky worms which house
   Beneath unshaken waters, but at once
   Upon some earth-awakening day of spring
   Do pass from gloom to glory, and aloft
   Winnow the purple, bearing on both sides
   Double display of starlit wings which burn
   Fanlike and fibred, with intensest bloom:
   E'en so my thoughts, erewhile so low, now felt
   Unutterable buoyancy and strength
   To bear them upward through the trackless fields
   Of undefin'd existence far and free.
 
   Then first within the South methought I saw
   A wilderness of spires, and chrystal pile
   Of rampart upon rampart, dome on dome,
   Illimitable range of battlement
   On battlement, and the Imperial height
   Of Canopy o'ercanopied.
                               Behind,
   In diamond light, upsprung the dazzling Cones
   Of Pyramids, as far surpassing Earth's
   As Heaven than Earth is fairer. Each aloft
   Upon his renown'd Eminence bore globes
   Of wheeling suns, or stars, or semblances
   Of either, showering circular abyss
   Of radiance. But the glory of the place
   Stood out a pillar'd front of burnish'd gold
   Interminably high, if gold it were
   Or metal more ethereal, and beneath
   Two doors of blinding brilliance, where no gaze
   Might rest, stood open, and the eye could scan
   Through length of porch and lake and boundless
       hall,
   Part of a throne of fiery flame, wherefrom
   The snowy skirting of a garment hung,
   And glimpse of multitudes of multitudes
   That minister'd around it--if I saw
   These things distinctly, for my human brain
   Stagger'd beneath the vision, and thick night
   Came down upon my eyelids, and I fell.
 
   With ministering hand he rais'd me up;
   Then with a mournful and ineffable smile,
   Which but to look on for a moment fill'd
   My eyes with irresistible sweet tears,
   In accents of majestic melody,
   Like a swol'n river's gushings in still night
   Mingled with floating music, thus he spake:
   'There is no mightier Spirit than I to sway
   The heart of man: and teach him to attain
   By shadowing forth the Unattainable;
   And step by step to scale that mighty stair
   Whose landing-place is wrapt about with clouds
   Of glory of Heaven.[B] With earliest Light of Spring,
   And in the glow of sallow Summertide,
   And in red Autumn when the winds are wild
   With gambols, and when full-voiced Winter roofs
   The headland with inviolate white snow,
   I play about his heart a thousand ways,
   Visit his eyes with visions, and his ears
   With harmonies of wind and wave and wood
   --Of winds which tell of waters, and of waters
   Betraying the close kisses of the wind--
   And win him unto me: and few there be
   So gross of heart who have not felt and known
   A higher than they see: They with dim eyes
   Behold me darkling. Lo! I have given _thee_
   To understand my presence, and to feel
   My fullness; I have fill'd thy lips with power.
   I have rais'd thee higher to the Spheres of Heaven,
   Man's first, last home: and thou with ravish'd sense
   Listenest the lordly music flowing from
   Th' illimitable years. I am the Spirit,
   The permeating life which courseth through
   All th' intricate and labyrinthine veins
   Of the great vine of _Fable_, which, outspread
   With growth of shadowing leaf and clusters rare,
   Reacheth to every corner under Heaven,
   Deep-rooted in the living soil of truth:
   So that men's hopes and fears take refuge in
   The fragrance of its complicated glooms
   And cool impleached twilights. Child of Man,
   See'st thou yon river, whose translucent wave,
   Forth issuing from darkness, windeth through
   The argent streets o' the City, imaging
   The soft inversion of her tremulous Domes;
   Her gardens frequent with the stately Palm,
   Her Pagods hung with music of sweet bells:
   Her obelisks of ranged Chrysolite,
   Minarets and towers? Lo! how he passeth by,
   And gulphs himself in sands, as not enduring
   To carry through the world those waves, which bore
   The reflex of my City in their depths.
   Oh City! Oh latest Throne! where I was rais'd
   To be a mystery of loveliness
   Unto all eyes, the time is well nigh come
   When I must render up this glorious home
   To keen _Discovery_: soon yon brilliant towers
   Shall darken with the waving of her wand;
   Darken, and shrink and shiver into huts,
   Black specks amid a waste of dreary sand,
   Low-built, mud-walled, Barbarian settlement,
   How chang'd from this fair City!'
                     Thus far the Spirit:
   Then parted Heavenward on the wing: and I
   Was left alone on Calpe, and the Moon
   Had fallen from the night, and all was dark!
 
 
 [The following review of 'Timbuctoo' was published in the _Athenaeum_
 of 22nd July, 1829: 'We have accustomed ourselves to think, perhaps
 without any very good reason, that poetry was likely to perish among
 us for a considerable period after the great generation of poets which
 is now passing away. The age seems determined to contradict us, and
 that in the most decided manner; for it has put forth poetry by a
 young man, and that where we should least expect it--namely, in a
 prize poem. These productions have often been ingenious and elegant
 but we have never before seen one of them which indicated really
 first-rate poetical genius, and which would have done honour to any
 men that ever wrote. Such, we do not hesitate to affirm, is the little
 work before us; and the examiners seem to have felt it like ourselves,
 for they have assigned the prize to the author, though the measure in
 which he writes was never before, we believe, thus selected for
 honour. We extract a few lines to justify our admiration (50 lines,
 62-112, quoted). How many men have lived for a century who could equal
 this?' At the time when this highly eulogistic notice of the youthful
 unknown poet appeared, the _Athenaeum_ was edited by John Sterling and
 Frederick Denison Maurice, its then proprietors.]
 
 
 [Footnote A: Mr Swinburne failed to find this couplet in any of
 Chapman's original poems or translations, and was of opinion that it
 is Tennyson's own.]
 
 [Footnote B: Be ye perfect even as your Father in Heaven is perfect.]
 
 
 
 
 =Poems Chiefly Lyrical=
 
 [The poems numbered I-XXIV which follow, were published in 1830 in the
 volume _Poems chiefly Lyrical_. (London: Effingham Wilson, Royal
 Exchange, 1830.) They were never republished by Tennyson.]
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 =The 'How' and the 'Why'=
 
       I am any man's suitor,
       If any will be my tutor:
   Some say this life is pleasant,
       Some think it speedeth fast:
   In time there is no present,
       In eternity no future,
       In eternity no past.
   We laugh, we cry, we are born, we die,
   Who will riddle me the _how_ and the _why_?
 
   The bulrush nods unto his brother
   The wheatears whisper to each other:
   What is it they say? What do they there?
   Why two and two make four? Why round is not square?
   Why the rocks stand still, and the light clouds fly?
   Why the heavy oak groans, and the white willows sigh?
   Why deep is not high, and high is not deep?
   Whether we wake or whether we sleep?
   Whether we sleep or whether we die?
   How you are you? Why I am I?
   Who will riddle me the _how_ and the _why_?
 
   The world is somewhat; it goes on somehow;
   But what is the meaning of _then_ and _now_!
   I feel there is something; but how and what?
   I know there is somewhat; but what and why!
   I cannot tell if that somewhat be I.
 
   The little bird pipeth 'why! why!'
   In the summerwoods when the sun falls low,
   And the great bird sits on the opposite bough,
   And stares in his face and shouts 'how? how?'
   And the black owl scuds down the mellow twilight,
   And chaunts 'how? how?' the whole of the night.
 
   Why the life goes when the blood is spilt?
   What the life is? where the soul may lie?
   Why a church is with a steeple built;
   And a house with a chimney-pot?
   Who will riddle me the how and the what?
   Who will riddle me the what and the why?
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 =The Burial of Love=
 
       His eyes in eclipse,
       Pale cold his lips,
   The light of his hopes unfed,
       Mute his tongue,
       His bow unstrung
   With the tears he hath shed,
   Backward drooping his graceful head.
 
       Love is dead;
       His last arrow sped;
   He hath not another dart;
       Go--carry him to his dark deathbed;
   Bury him in the cold, cold heart--
       Love is dead.
 
   Oh, truest love! art thou forlorn,
       And unrevenged? Thy pleasant wiles
   Forgotten, and thine innocent joy?
       Shall hollow-hearted apathy,
   The cruellest form of perfect scorn,
       With langour of most hateful smiles,
   For ever write
   In the weathered light
       Of the tearless eye
       An epitaph that all may spy?
       No! sooner she herself shall die.
 
   For her the showers shall not fall,
   Nor the round sun that shineth to all;
       Her light shall into darkness change;
   For her the green grass shall not spring,
   Nor the rivers flow, nor the sweet birds sing,
       Till Love have his full revenge.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 =To ----=
 
   Sainted Juliet! dearest name!
       If to love be life alone,
         Divinest Juliet,
       I love thee, and live; and yet
   Love unreturned is like the fragrant flame
       Folding the slaughter of the sacrifice
       Offered to Gods upon an altarthrone;
   My heart is lighted at thine eyes,
   Changed into fire, and blown about with sighs.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 =Song=
 
   I
 
       I' the glooming light
       Of middle night,
       So cold and white,
   Worn Sorrow sits by the moaning wave;
       Beside her are laid,
       Her mattock and spade,
   For she hath half delved her own deep grave.
       Alone she is there:
   The white clouds drizzle: her hair falls loose;
       Her shoulders are bare;
   Her tears are mixed with the bearded dews.
 
   II
 
       Death standeth by;
       She will not die;
       With glazed eye
   She looks at her grave: she cannot sleep;
       Ever alone
       She maketh her moan:
   She cannot speak; she can only weep;
       For she will not hope.
   The thick snow falls on her flake by flake,
       The dull wave mourns down the slope,
   The world will not change, and her heart will not break.
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 =Song=
 
   I
 
   Every day hath its night:
       Every night its morn:
   Through dark and bright
       Winged hours are borne;
           Ah! welaway!
   Seasons flower and fade;
       Golden calm and storm
           Mingle day by day.
       There is no bright form
   Doth not cast a shade--
           Ah! welaway!
 
   II
 
   When we laugh, and our mirth
       Apes the happy vein,
   We're so kin to earth
       Pleasuance fathers pain--
           Ah! welaway!
   Madness laugheth loud:
       Laughter bringeth tears:
           Eyes are worn away
       Till the end of fears
   Cometh in the shroud,
           Ah! welaway!
 
   III
 
   All is change, woe or weal;
       Joy is sorrow's brother;
   Grief and sadness steal
       Symbols of each other;
           Ah! welaway!
   Larks in heaven's cope
       Sing: the culvers mourn
           All the livelong day.
       Be not all forlorn;
   Let us weep in hope--
           Ah! welaway!
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 =Hero to Leander=
 
   Oh go not yet, my love,
       The night is dark and vast;
   The white moon is hid in her heaven above,
       And the waves climb high and fast.
   Oh! kiss me, kiss me, once again,
       Lest thy kiss should be the last.
       Oh kiss me ere we part;
       Grow closer to my heart.
   My heart is warmer surely than the bosom of the main.
 
   Oh joy! O bliss of blisses!
       My heart of hearts art thou.
   Come bathe me with thy kisses,
       My eyelids and my brow.
   Hark how the wild rain hisses,
       And the loud sea roars below.
 
   Thy heart beats through thy rosy limbs
       So gladly doth it stir;
   Thine eye in drops of gladness swims.
       I have bathed thee with the pleasant myrrh;
   Thy locks are dripping balm;
       Thou shalt not wander hence to-night,
   I'll stay thee with my kisses.
       To-night the roaring brine
   Will rend thy golden tresses;
       The ocean with the morrow light
   Will be both blue and calm;
       And the billow will embrace thee with a kiss as soft as mine.
 
   No western odours wander
       On the black and moaning sea,
   And when thou art dead, Leander,
       My soul shall follow thee!
   Oh go not yet, my love,
       Thy voice is sweet and low;
   The deep salt wave breaks in above
       Those marble steps below.
   The turretstairs are wet
       That lead into the sea.
   Leander! go not yet.
   The pleasant stars have set!
   Oh! go not, go not yet,
       Or I will follow thee.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 =The Mystic=
 
   Angels have talked with him, and showed him thrones:
   Ye knew him not: he was not one of ye,
   Ye scorned him with an undiscerning scorn:
   Ye could not read the marvel in his eye,
   The still serene abstraction; he hath felt
   The vanities of after and before;
   Albeit, his spirit and his secret heart
   The stern experiences of converse lives,
   The linked woes of many a fiery change
   Had purified, and chastened, and made free.
   Always there stood before him, night and day,
   Of wayward vary coloured circumstance,
   The imperishable presences serene,
   Colossal, without form, or sense, or sound,
   Dim shadows but unwaning presences
   Fourfaced to four corners of the sky;
   And yet again, three shadows, fronting one,
   One forward, one respectant, three but one;
   And yet again, again and evermore,
   For the two first were not, but only seemed
   One shadow in the midst of a great light,
   One reflex from eternity on time,
   One mighty countenance of perfect calm,
   Awful with most invariable eyes.
   For him the silent congregated hours,
   Daughters of time, divinely tall, beneath
   Severe and youthful brows, with shining eyes
   Smiling a godlike smile (the innocent light
   Of earliest youth pierced through and through with all
   Keen knowledges of low-embowed eld)
   Upheld, and ever hold aloft the cloud
   Which droops low hung on either gate of life,
   Both birth and death; he in the centre fixed,
   Saw far on each side through the grated gates
   Most pale and clear and lovely distances.
   He often lying broad awake, and yet
   Remaining from the body, and apart
   In intellect and power and will, hath heard
   Time flowing in the middle of the night,
   And all things creeping to a day of doom.
   How could ye know him? Ye were yet within
   The narrower circle; he had well nigh reached
   The last, with which a region of white flame,
   Pure without heat, into a larger air
   Upburning, and an ether of black hue,
   Investeth and ingirds all other lives.
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 =The Grasshopper=
 
   I
 
   Voice of the summerwind,
       Joy of the summerplain,
       Life of the summerhours,
     Carol clearly, bound along.
       No Tithon thou as poets feign
   (Shame fall 'em they are deaf and blind)
     But an insect lithe and strong,
       Bowing the seeded summerflowers.
   Prove their falsehood and thy quarrel,
       Vaulting on thine airy feet.
   Clap thy shielded sides and carol,
       Carol clearly, chirrup sweet
   Thou art a mailed warrior in youth and strength complete;
       Armed cap-a-pie,
       Full fair to see;
         Unknowing fear,
       Undreading loss,
         A gallant cavalier
   _Sans peur et sans reproche_,
       In sunlight and in shadow,
       The Bayard of the meadow.
 
   II
 
   I would dwell with thee,
       Merry grasshopper,
   Thou art so glad and free,
       And as light as air;
   Thou hast no sorrow or tears,
   Thou hast no compt of years,
   No withered immortality,
   But a short youth sunny and free.
   Carol clearly, bound along,
       Soon thy joy is over,
   A summer of loud song,
       And slumbers in the clover.
       What hast thou to do with evil
       In thine hour of love and revel,
       In thy heat of summerpride,
       Pushing the thick roots aside
       Of the singing flowered grasses,
       That brush thee with their silken tresses?
   What hast thou to do with evil,
   Shooting, singing, ever springing
       In and out the emerald glooms,
   Ever leaping, ever singing,
       Lighting on the golden blooms?
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 =Love, Pride and Forgetfulness=
 
   Ere yet my heart was sweet Love's tomb,
   Love laboured honey busily.
   I was the hive and Love the bee,
   My heart the honey-comb.
   One very dark and chilly night
   Pride came beneath and held a light.
 
   The cruel vapours went through all,
   Sweet Love was withered in his cell;
   Pride took Love's sweets, and by a spell
   Did change them into gall;
   And Memory tho' fed by Pride
   Did wax so thin on gall,
   Awhile she scarcely lived at all,
   What marvel that she died?
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 =Chorus=
 
 _In an unpublished drama written very early._
 
   The varied earth, the moving heaven,
       The rapid waste of roving sea,
   The fountainpregnant mountains riven
       To shapes of wildest anarchy,
   By secret fire and midnight storms
       That wander round their windy cones,
   The subtle life, the countless forms
       Of living things, the wondrous tones
   Of man and beast are full of strange
   Astonishment and boundless change.
 
   The day, the diamonded light,
       The echo, feeble child of sound,
   The heavy thunder's girding might,
       The herald lightning's starry bound,
   The vocal spring of bursting bloom,
       The naked summer's glowing birth,
   The troublous autumn's sallow gloom,
       The hoarhead winter paving earth
   With sheeny white, are full of strange
   Astonishment and boundless change.
 
   Each sun which from the centre flings
       Grand music and redundant fire,
   The burning belts, the mighty rings,
       The murmurous planets' rolling choir,
   The globefilled arch that, cleaving air,
       Lost in its effulgence sleeps,
   The lawless comets as they glare,
       And thunder thro' the sapphire deeps
   In wayward strength, are full of strange
   Astonishment and boundless change.
 
 
 
 
 XI
 
 =Lost Hope=
 
   You cast to ground the hope which once was mine,
       But did the while your harsh decree deplore,
   Embalming with sweet tears the vacant shrine,
       My heart, where Hope had been and was no more.
 
   So on an oaken sprout
       A goodly acorn grew;
   But winds from heaven shook the acorn out,
       And filled the cup with dew.
 
 
 
 
 XII
 
 =The Tears of Heaven=
 
   Heaven weeps above the earth all night till morn,
   In darkness weeps, as all ashamed to weep,
   Because the earth hath made her state forlorn
   With selfwrought evils of unnumbered years,
   And doth the fruit of her dishonour reap.
   And all the day heaven gathers back her tears
   Into her own blue eyes so clear and deep,
   And showering down the glory of lightsome day,
   Smiles on the earth's worn brow to win her if she may.
 
 
 
 
 XIII
 
 =Love and Sorrow=
 
   O maiden, fresher than the first green leaf
   With which the fearful springtide flecks the lea,
   Weep not, Almeida, that I said to thee
   That thou hast half my heart, for bitter grief
   Doth hold the other half in sovranty.
   Thou art my heart's sun in love's crystalline:
   Yet on both sides at once thou canst not shine:
   Thine is the bright side of my heart, and thine
   My heart's day, but the shadow of my heart,
   Issue of its own substance, my heart's night
   Thou canst not lighten even with _thy_ light,
   All powerful in beauty as thou art.
   Almeida, if my heart were substanceless,
   Then might thy rays pass thro' to the other side,
   So swiftly, that they nowhere would abide,
   But lose themselves in utter emptiness.
   Half-light, half-shadow, let my spirit sleep
   They never learnt to love who never knew to weep.
 
 
 
 
 XIV
 
 =To a Lady Sleeping=
 
   O thou whose fringed lids I gaze upon,
   Through whose dim brain the winged dreams are born,
   Unroof the shrines of clearest vision,
   In honour of the silverflecked morn:
   Long hath the white wave of the virgin light
   Driven back the billow of the dreamful dark.
   Thou all unwittingly prolongest night,
   Though long ago listening the poised lark,
   With eyes dropt downward through the blue serene,
   Over heaven's parapets the angels lean.
 
 
 
 
 XV
 
 =Sonnet=
 
   Could I outwear my present state of woe
   With one brief winter, and indue i' the spring
   Hues of fresh youth, and mightily outgrow
   The wan dark coil of faded suffering--
   Forth in the pride of beauty issuing
   A sheeny snake, the light of vernal bowers,
   Moving his crest to all sweet plots of flowers
   And watered vallies where the young birds sing;
   Could I thus hope my lost delights renewing,
   I straightly would commend the tears to creep
   From my charged lids; but inwardly I weep:
   Some vital heat as yet my heart is wooing:
   This to itself hath drawn the frozen rain
   From my cold eyes and melted it again.
 
 
 
 
 XVI
 
 =Sonnet=
 
   Though Night hath climbed her peak of highest noon,
   And bitter blasts the screaming autumn whirl,
   All night through archways of the bridged pearl
   And portals of pure silver walks the moon.
   Wake on, my soul, nor crouch to agony:
   Turn cloud to light, and bitterness to joy,
   And dross to gold with glorious alchemy,
   Basing thy throne above the world's annoy.
   Reign thou above the storms of sorrow and ruth
   That roar beneath; unshaken peace hath won thee:
   So shall thou pierce the woven glooms of truth;
   So shall the blessing of the meek be on thee;
   So in thine hour of dawn, the body's youth,
   An honourable eld shall come upon thee.
 
 
 
 
 XVII
 
 =Sonnet=
 
   Shall the hag Evil die with the child of Good,
   Or propagate again her loathed kind,
   Thronging the cells of the diseased mind,
   Hateful with hanging cheeks, a withered brood,
   Though hourly pastured on the salient blood?
   Oh! that the wind which bloweth cold or heat
   Would shatter and o'erbear the brazen beat
   Of their broad vans, and in the solitude
   Of middle space confound them, and blow back
   Their wild cries down their cavernthroats, and slake
   With points of blastborne hail their heated eyne!
   So their wan limbs no more might come between
   The moon and the moon's reflex in the night;
   Nor blot with floating shades the solar light.
 
 
 
 
 XVIII
 
 =Sonnet=
 
   The palid thunderstricken sigh for gain,
   Down an ideal stream they ever float,
   And sailing on Pactolus in a boat,
   Drown soul and sense, while wistfully they strain
   Weak eyes upon the glistering sands that robe
   The understream. The wise could he behold
   Cathedralled caverns of thick-ribbed gold
   And branching silvers of the central globe,
   Would marvel from so beautiful a sight
   How scorn and ruin, pain and hate could flow:
   But Hatred in a gold cave sits below,
   Pleached with her hair, in mail of argent light
   Shot into gold, a snake her forehead clips
   And skins the colour from her trembling lips.
 
 
 
 
 XIX
 
 =Love=
 
   I
 
   Thou, from the first, unborn, undying love,
   Albeit we gaze not on thy glories near,
   Before the face of God didst breath and move,
   Though night and pain and ruin and death reign here.
   Thou foldest, like a golden atmosphere,
   The very throne of the eternal God:
   Passing through thee the edicts of his fear
   Are mellowed into music, borne abroad
   By the loud winds, though they uprend the sea,
   Even from his central deeps: thine empery
   Is over all: thou wilt not brook eclipse;
   Thou goest and returnest to His Lips
   Like lightning: thou dost ever brood above
   The silence of all hearts, unutterable Love.
 
   II
 
   To know thee is all wisdom, and old age
   Is but to know thee: dimly we behold thee
   Athwart the veils of evil which enfold thee
   We beat upon our aching hearts with rage;
   We cry for thee: we deem the world thy tomb.
   As dwellers in lone planets look upon
   The mighty disk of their majestic sun,
   Hallowed in awful chasms of wheeling gloom,
   Making their day dim, so we gaze on thee.
   Come, thou of many crowns, white-robed love,
   Oh! rend the veil in twain: all men adore thee;
   Heaven crieth after thee; earth waileth for thee:
   Breathe on thy winged throne, and it shall move
   In music and in light o'er land and sea.
 
   III
 
   And now--methinks I gaze upon thee now,
   As on a serpent in his agonies
   Awestricken Indians; what time laid low
   And crushing the thick fragrant reeds he lies,
   When the new year warm breathed on the earth,
   Waiting to light him with his purple skies,
   Calls to him by the fountain to uprise.
   Already with the pangs of a new birth
   Strain the hot spheres of his convulsed eyes,
   And in his writhings awful hues begin
   To wander down his sable sheeny sides,
   Like light on troubled waters: from within
   Anon he rusheth forth with merry din,
   And in him light and joy and strength abides;
   And from his brows a crown of living light
   Looks through the thickstemmed woods by day and night
 
 
 
 
 XX
 
 =English War Song=
 
       Who fears to die? Who fears to die?
       Is there any here who fears to die
   He shall find what he fears, and none shall grieve
       For the man who fears to die:
   But the withering scorn of the many shall cleave
       To the man who fears to die.
 
   _Chorus_.--Shout for England!
                   Ho! for England!
                   George for England!
                   Merry England!
                   England for aye!
 
   The hollow at heart shall crouch forlorn,
   He shall eat the bread of common scorn;
       It shall be steeped in the salt, salt tear,
       Shall be steeped in his own salt tear:
   Far better, far better he never were born
       Than to shame merry England here.
 
   _Chorus_.--Shout for England! etc.
 
   There standeth our ancient enemy;
   Hark! he shouteth--the ancient enemy!
       On the ridge of the hill his banners rise;
       They stream like fire in the skies;
   Hold up the Lion of England on high
       Till it dazzle and blind his eyes.
 
       _Chorus_.--Shout for England! etc.
 
   Come along! we alone of the earth are free;
   The child in our cradles is bolder than he;
       For where is the heart and strength of slaves?
       Oh! where is the strength of slaves?
   He is weak! we are strong; he a slave, we are free;
       Come along! we will dig their graves.
 
       _Chorus_.--Shout for England! etc.
 
   There standeth our ancient enemy;
   Will he dare to battle with the free?
       Spur along! spur amain! charge to the fight:
       Charge! charge to the fight!
   Hold up the Lion of England on high!
       Shout for God and our right!
 
       _Chorus_.--Shout for England! etc.
 
 
 
 
 XXI
 
 =National Song=
 
   There is no land like England
     Where'er the light of day be;
   There are no hearts like English hearts,
     Such hearts of oak as they be.
   There is no land like England
     Where'er the light of day be;
   There are no men like Englishmen,
     So tall and bold as they be.
 
   _Chorus_.--For the French the Pope may shrive 'em,
                   For the devil a whit we heed 'em,
                   As for the French, God speed 'em
                     Unto their hearts' desire,
                   And the merry devil drive 'em
                     Through the water and the fire.
 
   _Chorus_.--Our glory is our freedom,
                     We lord it o'er the sea;
                   We are the sons of freedom,
                     We are free.
 
   There is no land like England,
     Where'er the light of day be;
   There are no wives like English wives,
     So fair and chaste as they be.
   There is no land like England,
     Where'er the light of day be,
   There are no maids like English maids,
     So beautiful as they be.
 
   _Chorus_.--For the French, etc.
 
 [Sixty years after first publication this Song was incorporated in
 'The Foresters' (published 1892) as the opening chorus of the second
 act. The two verses were unaltered, but the two choruses were
 re-written.]
 
 
 
 
 XXII
 
 =Dualisms=
 
   Two bees within a chrystal flowerbell rocked
   Hum a lovelay to the westwind at noontide.
   Both alike, they buzz together,
   Both alike, they hum together
   Through and through the flowered heather.
 
   Where in a creeping cove the wave unshocked
     Lays itself calm and wide,
   Over a stream two birds of glancing feather
   Do woo each other, carolling together.
   Both alike, they glide together
     Side by side;
   Both alike, they sing together,
   Arching blue-glossed necks beneath the purple weather.
 
   Two children lovelier than love, adown the lea are singing,
   As they gambol, lilygarlands ever stringing:
   Both in blosmwhite silk are frocked:
   Like, unlike, they roam together
   Under a summervault of golden weather;
   Like, unlike, they sing together
     Side by side;
   Mid May's darling goldenlocked,
   Summer's tanling diamondeyed.
 
 
 
 
 XXIII
 
 [Greek: ohi rheontes]
 
   I
 
   All thoughts, all creeds, all dreams are true,
     All visions wild and strange;
   Man is the measure of all truth
     Unto himself. All truth is change:
   All men do walk in sleep, and all
     Have faith in that they dream:
   For all things are as they seem to all,
     And all things flow like a stream.
 
   II
 
   There is no rest, no calm, no pause,
     Nor good nor ill, nor light nor shade,
   Nor essence nor eternal laws:
     For nothing is, but all is made,
   But if I dream that all these are,
     They are to me for that I dream;
   For all things are as they seem to all,
     And all things flow like a stream.
 
 
 Argal.--This very opinion is only true relatively to the flowing
 philosophers. (Tennyson's note.)
 
 
 
 
 XXIV
 
 =Song=
 
   I
 
   The lintwhite and the throstlecock
       Have voices sweet and clear;
     All in the bloomed May.
   They from the blosmy brere
   Call to the fleeting year,
   If that he would them hear
       And stay.
   Alas! that one so beautiful
     Should have so dull an ear.
 
   II
 
   Fair year, fair year, thy children call,
       But thou art deaf as death;
     All in the bloomed May.
   When thy light perisheth
   That from thee issueth,
   Our life evanisheth:
       Oh! stay.
   Alas! that lips so cruel dumb
     Should have so sweet a breath!
 
   III
 
   Fair year, with brows of royal love
       Thou comest, as a King.
     All in the bloomed May.
   Thy golden largess fling,
   And longer hear us sing;
   Though thou art fleet of wing,
       Yet stay.
   Alas! that eyes so full of light
   Should be so wandering!
 
   IV
 
   Thy locks are full of sunny sheen
       In rings of gold yronne,[C]
     All in the bloomed May,
   We pri' thee pass not on;
   If thou dost leave the sun,
   Delight is with thee gone,
       Oh! stay.
   Thou art the fairest of thy feres,
     We pri' thee pass not on.
 
 [Footnote C: His crispe hair in ringis was yronne.--Chaucer, _Knight's
 Tale_. (Tennyson's note.)]
 
 
 
 
 =Contributions to Periodicals 1831-32=
 
 
 XXV
 
 =A Fragment=
 
 [Published in _The Gem: a Literary Annual_. London: W. Marshall,
 Holborn Bars, mdcccxxxi.]
 
   Where is the Giant of the Sun, which stood
   In the midnoon the glory of old Rhodes,
   A perfect Idol, with profulgent brows
   Far sheening down the purple seas to those
   Who sailed from Mizraim underneath the star
   Named of the Dragon--and between whose limbs
   Of brassy vastness broad-blown Argosies
   Drave into haven? Yet endure unscathed
   Of changeful cycles the great Pyramids
   Broad-based amid the fleeting sands, and sloped
   Into the slumberous summer noon; but where,
   Mysterious Egypt, are thine obelisks
   Graven with gorgeous emblems undiscerned?
   Thy placid Sphinxes brooding o'er the Nile?
   Thy shadowy Idols in the solitudes,
   Awful Memnonian countenances calm
   Looking athwart the burning flats, far off
   Seen by the high-necked camel on the verge
   Journeying southward? Where are thy monuments
   Piled by the strong and sunborn Anakim
   Over their crowned brethren [Greek: ON] and [Greek: ORE]?
   Thy Memnon, when his peaceful lips are kissed
   With earliest rays, that from his mother's eyes
   Flow over the Arabian bay, no more
   Breathes low into the charmed ears of morn
   Clear melody flattering the crisped Nile
   By columned Thebes. Old Memphis hath gone down:
   The Pharaohs are no more: somewhere in death
   They sleep with staring eyes and gilded lips,
   Wrapped round with spiced cerements in old grots
   Rock-hewn and sealed for ever.
 
 
 
 
 XXVI
 
 =Anacreontics=
 
 [Published in _The Gem: a Literary Annual_. London: W. Marshall,
 Holborn Bars, mdcccxxxi.]
 
   With roses musky breathed,
   And drooping daffodilly,
   And silverleaved lily,
   And ivy darkly-wreathed,
   I wove a crown before her,
   For her I love so dearly,
   A garland for Lenora.
   With a silken cord I bound it.
   Lenora, laughing clearly
   A light and thrilling laughter,
   About her forehead wound it,
   And loved me ever after.
 
 
 
 
 XXVII
 
 [Published in _The Gem: a Literary Annual_. London: W. Marshall,
 Holborn Bars, mdcccxxxi.]
 
       O sad _No more!_ O sweet _No more!_
                 O strange _No more!_
       By a mossed brookbank on a stone
       I smelt a wildweed flower alone;
       There was a ringing in my ears,
       And both my eyes gushed out with tears.
   Surely all pleasant things had gone before,
   Low-buried fathom deep beneath with thee,
                 NO MORE!
 
 
 
 
 XXVIII
 
 =Sonnet=
 
 [Published in the _Englishman's Magazine_, August, 1831. London:
 Edward Moxon, 64 New Bond Street. Reprinted in _Friendship's Offering:
 a Literary Album_ for 1833. London; Smith and Elder.]
 
   Check every outflash, every ruder sally
     Of thought and speech; speak low, and give up wholly
     Thy spirit to mild-minded Melancholy;
   This is the place. Through yonder poplar alley
   Below, the blue-green river windeth slowly;
     But in the middle of the sombre valley
     The crisped waters whisper musically,
   And all the haunted place is dark and holy.
   The nightingale, with long and low preamble,
     Warbled from yonder knoll of solemn larches,
     And in and out the woodbine's flowery arches
   The summer midges wove their wanton gambol,
     And all the white-stemmed pinewood slept above--
     When in this valley first I told my love.
 
 
 
 
 XXIX
 
 =Sonnet=
 
 [Published in _Friendships Offering: a Literary Album_ for 1832.
 London: Smith and Elder.]
 
   Me my own fate to lasting sorrow doometh:
     Thy woes are birds of passage, transitory:
     Thy spirit, circled with a living glory,
   In summer still a summer joy resumeth.
   Alone my hopeless melancholy gloometh,
     Like a lone cypress, through the twilight hoary,
   From an old garden where no flower bloometh,
     One cypress on an inland promontory.
   But yet my lonely spirit follows thine,
     As round the rolling earth night follows day:
   But yet thy lights on my horizon shine
     Into my night when thou art far away;
   I am so dark, alas! and thou so bright,
   When we two meet there's never perfect light.
 
 
 
 
 XXX
 
 =Sonnet=
 
 [Published in the _Yorkshire Literary Annual_ for 1832. Edited by C.F.
 Edgar, London: Longman and Co. Reprinted in the _Athenaeum_, 4 May,
 1867.]
 
   There are three things that fill my heart with sighs
   And steep my soul in laughter (when I view
   Fair maiden forms moving like melodies),
   Dimples, roselips, and eyes of any hue.
 
   There are three things beneath the blessed skies
   For which I live--black eyes, and brown and blue;
   I hold them all most dear; but oh! black eyes,
   I live and die, and only die for you.
 
   Of late such eyes looked at me--while I mused
   At sunset, underneath a shadowy plane
   In old Bayona, nigh the Southern Sea--
   From an half-open lattice looked at _me_.
 
   I saw no more only those eyes--confused
   And dazzled to the heart with glorious pain.
 
 
 
 
 =Poems, 1833=
 
 
 [The poems numbered XXXI-XXXIX were published in the 1832 volume
 (_Poems by Alfred Tennyson_. London: Edward Moxon, 94 New Bond Street.
 MDCCCXXXIII; published December, 1832), and were thereafter
 suppressed.]
 
 
 
 
 XXXI
 
 =Sonnet=
 
   Oh, Beauty, passing beauty! sweetest Sweet!
     How canst thou let me waste my youth in sighs;
   I only ask to sit beside thy feet.
     Thou knowest I dare not look into thine eyes,
   Might I but kiss thy hand! I dare not fold
     My arms about thee--scarcely dare to speak.
   And nothing seems to me so wild and bold,
     As with one kiss to touch thy blessed cheek.
   Methinks if I should kiss thee, no control
     Within the thrilling brain could keep afloat
     The subtle spirit. Even while I spoke,
   The bare word KISS hath made my inner soul
     To tremble like a lutestring, ere the note
     Hath melted in the silence that it broke.
 
 
 
 
 XXXII
 
 =The Hesperides=
 
     Hesperus and his daughters three
     That sing about the golden tree.
       --COMUS.
 
   The Northwind fall'n, in the newstarred night
   Zidonian Hanno, voyaging beyond
   The hoary promontory of Soloe
   Past Thymiaterion, in calmed bays,
   Between the Southern and the Western Horn,
   Heard neither warbling of the nightingale,
   Nor melody o' the Lybian lotusflute
   Blown seaward from the shore; but from a slope
   That ran bloombright into the Atlantic blue,
   Beneath a highland leaning down a weight
   Of cliffs, and zoned below with cedarshade,
   Came voices, like the voices in a dream,
   Continuous till he reached the other sea.
 
 
 _Song_
 
   I
 
   The golden apple, the golden apple, the hallowed fruit,
   Guard it well, guard it warily,
   Singing airily,
   Standing about the charmed root.
   Round about all is mute,
   As the snowfield on the mountain-peaks,
   As the sandfield at the mountain-foot.
   Crocodiles in briny creeks
   Sleep and stir not: all is mute.
   If ye sing not, if ye make false measure,
   We shall lose eternal pleasure,
   Worth eternal want of rest.
   Laugh not loudly: watch the treasure
   Of the wisdom of the West.
   In a corner wisdom whispers. Five and three
   (Let it not be preached abroad) make an awful mystery.
   For the blossom unto three-fold music bloweth;
   Evermore it is born anew;
   And the sap to three-fold music floweth,
   From the root
   Drawn in the dark,
   Up to the fruit,
   Creeping under the fragrant bark,
   Liquid gold, honeysweet thro' and thro'.
   Keen-eyed Sisters, singing airily,
   Looking warily
   Every way,
   Guard the apple night and day,
   Lest one from the East come and take it away.
 
   II
 
   Father Hesper, Father Hesper, watch, watch, ever and aye,
   Looking under silver hair with a silver eye.
   Father, twinkle not thy stedfast sight;
   Kingdoms lapse, and climates change, and races die;
   Honour comes with mystery;
   Hoarded wisdom brings delight.
   Number, tell them over and number
   How many the mystic fruit-tree holds,
   Lest the redcombed dragon slumber
   Rolled together in purple folds.
   Look to him, father, lest he wink, and the golden apple be stol'n away,
   For his ancient heart is drunk with overwatchings night and day,
   Round about the hallowed fruit tree curled--
   Sing away, sing aloud and evermore in the wind, without stop,
   Lest his scaled eyelid drop,
   For he is older than the world.
   If he waken, we waken,
   Rapidly levelling eager eyes.
   If he sleep, we sleep,
   Dropping the eyelid over the eyes.
   If the golden apple be taken
   The world will be overwise.
   Five links, a golden chain, are we,
   Hesper, the dragon, and sisters three,
   Bound about the golden tree.
 
   III
 
   Father Hesper, Father Hesper, watch, watch, night and day,
   Lest the old wound of the world be healed,
   The glory unsealed,
   The golden apple stol'n away,
   And the ancient secret revealed.
   Look from west to east along:
   Father, old Himla weakens, Caucasus is bold and strong.
   Wandering waters unto wandering waters call;
   Let them clash together, foam and fall.
   Out of watchings, out of wiles,
   Comes the bliss of secret smiles,
   All things are not told to all,
   Half round the mantling night is drawn,
   Purplefringed with even and dawn.
   Hesper hateth Phosphor, evening hateth morn.
 
   IV
 
   Every flower and every fruit the redolent breath
   Of this warm seawind ripeneth,
   Arching the billow in his sleep;
   But the land-wind wandereth,
   Broken by the highland-steep,
   Two streams upon the violet deep:
   For the western sun and the western star,
   And the low west wind, breathing afar,
   The end of day and beginning of night
   Make the apple holy and bright,
   Holy and bright, round and full, bright and blest,
   Mellowed in a land of rest;
   Watch it warily day and night;
   All good things are in the west,
   Till midnoon the cool east light
   Is shut out by the round of the tall hillbrow;
   But when the fullfaced sunset yellowly
   Stays on the flowering arch of the bough,
   The luscious fruitage clustereth mellowly,
   Goldenkernelled, goldencored,
   Sunset ripened, above on the tree,
   The world is wasted with fire and sword,
   But the apple of gold hangs over the sea,
   Five links, a golden chain, are we,
   Hesper, the dragon, and sisters three,
       Daughters three,
       Bound about
       All round about
   The gnarled bole of the charmed tree,
   The golden apple, the golden apple, the hallowed fruit,
   Guard it well, guard it warily,
       Watch it warily,
       Singing airily,
   Standing about the charmed root.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIII
 
 =Rosalind=
 
     My Rosalind, my Rosalind,
   Bold, subtle, careless Rosalind,
   Is one of those who know no strife
   Of inward woe or outward fear;
   To whom the slope and stream of life,
   The life before, the life behind,
   In the ear, from far and near,
   Chimeth musically clear.
   My falconhearted Rosalind
   Fullsailed before a vigorous wind,
   Is one of those who cannot weep
   For others' woes, but overleap
   All the petty shocks and fears
   That trouble life in early years,
   With a flash of frolic scorn
   And keen delight, that never falls
   Away from freshness, self-upborne
   With such gladness, as, whenever
   The freshflushing springtime calls
   To the flooding waters cool,
   Young fishes, on an April morn,
   Up and down a rapid river,
   Leap the little waterfalls
   That sing into the pebbled pool.
   My happy falcon, Rosalind,
   Hath daring fancies of her own,
   Fresh as the dawn before the day,
   Fresh as the early seasmell blown
   Through vineyards from an inland bay.
   My Rosalind, my Rosalind,
   Because no shadow on you falls,
   Think you hearts are tennis balls
   To play with, wanton Rosalind?
 
 
 
 
 XXXIV
 
 =Song=
 
   Who can say
   Why To-day
   To-morrow will be yesterday?
   Who can tell
   Why to smell
   The violet, recalls the dewy prime
   Of youth and buried time?
   The cause is nowhere found in rhyme.
 
 
 
 
 XXXV
 
 =Sonnet=
 
 _Written on hearing of the outbreak of the Polish Insurrection._
 
   Blow ye the trumpet, gather from afar
     The hosts to battle: be not bought and sold.
     Arise, brave Poles, the boldest of the bold;
   Break through your iron shackles--fling them far.
   O for those days of Piast, ere the Czar
     Grew to this strength among his deserts cold;
     When even to Moscow's cupolas were rolled
   The growing murmurs of the Polish war!
   Now must your noble anger blaze out more
     Than when from Sobieski, clan by clan,
   The Moslem myriads fell, and fled before--
     Than when Zamoysky smote the Tartar Khan,
   Than earlier, when on the Baltic shore
     Boleslas drove the Pomeranian.
 
 
 
 
 XXXVI
 
 =O Darling Room=[D]
 
   I
 
   O darling room, my heart's delight,
   Dear room, the apple of my sight,
   With thy two couches soft and white,
   There is no room so exquisite,
   No little room so warm and bright
   Wherein to read, wherein to write.
 
   II
 
   For I the Nonnenwerth have seen,
   And Oberwinter's vineyards green,
   Musical Lurlei; and between
   The hills to Bingen have I been,
   Bingen in Darmstadt, where the Rhene
   Curves towards Mentz, a woody scene.
 
   III
 
   Yet never did there meet my sight,
   In any town, to left or right,
   A little room so exquisite,
   With two such couches soft and white;
   Not any room so warm and bright,
   Wherein to read, wherein to write.
 
 [Footnote D: 'As soon as this poem was published, I altered the second
 line to "All books and pictures ranged aright"; yet "Dear room, the
 apple of my sight" (which was much abused) is not as bad as "Do go,
 dear rain, do go away."' [Note initialed 'A.T.' in _Life_, vol. I, p.
 89.] The worthlessness of much of the criticism lavished on Tennyson
 by his coterie of adulating friends may be judged from the fact that
 Arthur Hallam wrote to Tennyson that this poem was 'mighty
 pleasant.']
 
 
 
 
 XXXVII
 
 =To Christopher North=
 
   You did late review my lays,
     Crusty Christopher;
   You did mingle blame and praise,
     Rusty Christopher.
   When I learnt from whom it came,
   I forgave you all the blame,
     Musty Christopher;
   I could _not_ forgive the praise,
     Fusty Christopher.
 
 [This epigram was Tennyson's reply to an article by Professor
 Wilson--'Christopher North'--in _Blackwood's Magazine_ for May 1832,
 dealing in sensible fashion with Tennyson's 1830 volume, and
 ridiculing the fulsome praise lavished on him by his inconsiderate
 friends--especially referring to Arthur Hallam's article in the
 _Englishman's Magazine_ for August, 1831.]
 
 
 
 
 XXXVIII
 
 =The Lotos-Eaters=
 
 [These forty lines formed the conclusion to the original (1833)
 version of the poem. When the poem was reprinted in the 1842 volumes
 these lines were suppressed.]
 
   We have had enough of motion,
   Weariness and wild alarm,
   Tossing on the tossing ocean,
   Where the tusked seahorse walloweth
   In a stripe of grassgreen calm,
   At noon-tide beneath the lea;
   And the monstrous narwhale swalloweth
   His foamfountains in the sea.
   Long enough the winedark wave our weary bark did carry.
   This is lovelier and sweeter,
   Men of Ithaca, this is meeter,
   In the hollow rosy vale to tarry,
   Like a dreamy Lotos-eater, a delirious Lotos-eater!
   We will eat the Lotos, sweet
   As the yellow honeycomb,
   In the valley some, and some
   On the ancient heights divine;
   And no more roam,
   On the loud hoar foam,
   To the melancholy home
   At the limit of the brine,
   The little isle of Ithaca, beneath the day's decline.
   We'll lift no more the shattered oar,
   No more unfurl the straining sail;
   With the blissful Lotos-eaters pale
   We will abide in the golden vale
   Of the Lotos-land, till the Lotos fail;
   We will not wander more.
   Hark! how sweet the horned ewes bleat
   On the solitary steeps,
   And the merry lizard leaps,
   And the foam-white waters pour;
   And the dark pine weeps,
   And the lithe vine creeps,
   And the heavy melon sleeps
   On the level of the shore:
   Oh! islanders of Ithaca, we will not wander more,
   Surely, surely, slumber is more sweet than toil, the shore
   Than labour in the ocean, and rowing with the oar,
   Oh! islanders of Ithaca, we will return no more.
 
 
 
 
 XXXIX
 
 =A Dream of Fair Women=
 
 [In the 1833 volume the poem opened with the following four verses,
 suppressed after 1842. These Fitz Gerald considered made 'a perfect
 poem by themselves.']
 
   As when a man, that sails in a balloon,
     Downlooking sees the solid shining ground
   Stream from beneath him in the broad blue noon,
     Tilth, hamlet, mead and mound:
 
   And takes his flags and waves them to the mob
     That shout below, all faces turned to where
   Glows rubylike the far-up crimson globe,
     Filled with a finer air:
 
   So, lifted high, the poet at his will
     Lets the great world flit from him, seeing all,
   Higher thro' secret splendours mounting still,
     Self-poised, nor fears to fall.
 
   Hearing apart the echoes of his fame.
     While I spoke thus, the seedsman, Memory,
   Sowed my deep-furrowed thought with many a name
     Whose glory will not die.
 
 
 
 
 =Miscellaneous Poems and Contributions to Periodicals=
 =1833-1868=
 
 
 
 
 XL
 
 =Cambridge=
 
 [This poem is written in pencil on the fly-leaf of a copy of _Poems_
 1833 in the Dyce Collection in South Kensington Museum. Reprinted with
 many alterations in _Life_, vol. I, p. 67.]
 
   Therefore your halls, your ancient colleges,
     Your portals statued with old kings and queens,
   Your bridges and your busted libraries,
     Wax-lighted chapels and rich carved screens,
     Your doctors and your proctors and your deans
   Shall not avail you when the day-beam sports
     New-risen o'er awakened Albion--No,
     Nor yet your solemn organ-pipes that blow
   Melodious thunders through your vacant courts
   At morn and even; for your manner sorts
     Not with this age, nor with the thoughts that roll,
   Because the words of little children preach
   Against you,--ye that did profess to teach
     And have taught nothing, feeding on the soul.
 
 
 
 
 XLI
 
 =The Germ of 'Maud'=
 
 [There was published in 1837 in _The Tribute_, (a collection of
 original poems by various authors, edited by Lord Northampton), a
 contribution by Tennyson entitled 'Stanzas,' consisting of xvi stanzas
 of varying lengths (110 lines in all). In 1855 the first xii stanzas
 were published as the fourth section of the second part of 'Maud.'
 Some verbal changes and transpositions of lines were made; a new
 stanza (the present sixth) and several new lines were introduced, and
 the xth stanza of 1837 became the xiiith of 1855. But stanzas xiii-xvi
 of 1837 have never been reprinted in any edition of Tennyson's works,
 though quoted in whole or part in various critical studies of the
 poet. Swinburne refers to this poem as 'the poem of deepest charm and
 fullest delight of pathos and melody ever written, even by Mr
 Tennyson.' This poem in _The Tribute_ gained Tennyson his first notice
 in the _Edinburgh Review_, which had till then ignored him.]
 
   XIII
 
   But she tarries in her place
   And I paint the beauteous face
       Of the maiden, that I lost,
           In my inner eyes again,
   Lest my heart be overborne,
   By the thing I hold in scorn,
       By a dull mechanic ghost
           And a juggle of the brain.
 
   XIV
 
   I can shadow forth my bride
       As I knew her fair and kind
           As I woo'd her for my wife;
   She is lovely by my side
       In the silence of my life--
           'Tis a phantom of the mind.
 
   XV
 
   'Tis a phantom fair and good
       I can call it to my side,
           So to guard my life from ill,
       Tho' its ghastly sister glide
           And be moved around me still
   With the moving of the blood
       That is moved not of the will.
 
   XVI
 
   Let it pass, the dreary brow,
       Let the dismal face go by,
   Will it lead me to the grave?
       Then I lose it: it will fly:
   Can it overlast the nerves?
       Can it overlive the eye?
   But the other, like a star,
   Thro' the channel windeth far
       Till it fade and fail and die,
   To its Archetype that waits
   Clad in light by golden gates,
   Clad in light the Spirit waits
       To embrace me in the sky.
 
 
 
 
 XLII
 
 [On the fly-leaf of a book illustrated by Bewick, in the library of
 the late Lord Ravensworth, the following lines in Tennyson's autograph
 were discovered in 1903.]
 
   A gate and a field half ploughed,
   A solitary cow,
   A child with a broken slate,
   And a titmarsh in the bough.
   But where, alack, is Bewick
   To tell the meaning now?
 
 
 
 
 XLIII
 
 =The Skipping-Rope=
 
 [This poem, published in the second volume of _Poems by Alfred
 Tennyson_ (in two volumes, London, Edward Moxon, MDCCCXLII), was
 reprinted in every edition until 1851, when it was suppressed.]
 
   Sure never yet was Antelope
     Could skip so lightly by.
   Stand off, or else my skipping-rope
     Will hit you in the eye.
   How lightly whirls the skipping-rope!
     How fairy-like you fly!
   Go, get you gone, you muse and mope--
     I hate that silly sigh.
   Nay, dearest, teach me how to hope,
     Or tell me how to die.
   There, take it, take my skipping-rope
     And hang yourself thereby.
 
 
 
 
 XLIV
 
 =The New Timon and the Poets=
 
 [From _Punch_, February 28, 1846. Bulwer Lytton published in 1845 his
 satirical poem 'New Timon: a Romance of London,' in which he bitterly
 attacked Tennyson for the civil list pension granted the previous
 year, particularly referring to the poem 'O Darling Room' in the 1833
 volume. Tennyson replied in the following vigorous verses, which made
 the literary sensation of the year. Tennyson afterwards declared: 'I
 never sent my lines to _Punch_. John Forster did. They were too
 bitter. I do not think that I should ever have published
 them.'--_Life_, vol. I, p. 245.]
 
   We know him, out of Shakespeare's art,
     And those fine curses which he spoke;
   The old Timon, with his noble heart,
     That, strongly loathing, greatly broke.
 
   So died the Old: here comes the New:
     Regard him: a familiar face:
   I _thought_ we knew him: What, it's you
     The padded man--that wears the stays--
 
   Who killed the girls and thrill'd the boys
     With dandy pathos when you wrote,
   A Lion, you, that made a noise,
     And shook a mane en papillotes.
 
   And once you tried the Muses too:
     You fail'd, Sir: therefore now you turn,
   You fall on those who are to you
     As captain is to subaltern.
 
   But men of long enduring hopes,
     And careless what this hour may bring,
   Can pardon little would-be Popes
     And Brummels, when they try to sting.
 
   An artist, Sir, should rest in art,
     And wave a little of his claim;
   To have the deep poetic heart
     Is more than all poetic fame.
 
   But you, Sir, you are hard to please;
     You never look but half content:
   Nor like a gentleman at ease
     With moral breadth of temperament.
 
   And what with spites and what with fears,
     You cannot let a body be:
   It's always ringing in your ears,
     'They call this man as good as _me_.'
 
   What profits now to understand
     The merits of a spotless shirt--
   A dapper boot--a little hand--
     If half the little soul is dirt?
 
   _You_ talk of tinsel! why we see
     The old mark of rouge upon your cheeks.
   _You_ prate of nature! you are he
   That spilt his life about the cliques.
 
   A Timon you! Nay, nay, for shame:
     It looks too arrogant a jest--
   The fierce old man--to take _his_ name
   You bandbox. Off, and let him rest.
 
 
 
 
 XLV
 
 =Mablethorpe=
 
 [Published in _Manchester Athaenaum Album_, 1850. Written, 1837.
 Republished, altered, in _Life_, vol. I, p. 161.]
 
   How often, when a child I lay reclined,
     I took delight in this locality!
   Here stood the infant Ilion of the mind,
     And here the Grecian ships did seem to be.
 
   And here again I come and only find
     The drain-cut levels of the marshy lea,--
   Gray sand banks and pale sunsets--dreary wind,
     Dim shores, dense rains, and heavy clouded sea.
 
 
 
 
 XLVI
 
 [Published in _The Keepsake for 1851: an illustrated annual_, edited
 by Miss Power. London: David Bogue. To this issue of the Keepsake
 Tennyson also contributed 'Come not when I am dead' now included in
 the collected Works.]
 
   What time I wasted youthful hours
   One of the shining winged powers,
   Show'd me vast cliffs with crown of towers,
 
   As towards the gracious light I bow'd,
   They seem'd high palaces and proud,
   Hid now and then with sliding cloud.
 
   He said, 'The labour is not small;
   Yet winds the pathway free to all:--
   Take care thou dost not fear to fall!'
 
 
 
 
 XLVII
 
 =Britons, Guard your Own=
 
 [Published in _The Examiner_, January 31, 1852. Verses 1 (considerably
 altered), 7, 8 and 10, are reprinted in Life, vol. I, p. 344.]
 
   Rise, Britons, rise, if manhood be not dead;
   The world's last tempest darkens overhead;
           The Pope has bless'd him;
           The Church caress'd him;
   He triumphs; maybe, we shall stand alone:
           Britons, guard your own.
 
   His ruthless host is bought with plunder'd gold,
   By lying priest's the peasant's votes controlled.
           All freedom vanish'd,
           The true men banished,
   He triumphs; maybe, we shall stand alone.
           Britons, guard your own.
 
   Peace-lovers we--sweet Peace we all desire--
   Peace-lovers we--but who can trust a liar?--
          Peace-lovers, haters
          Of shameless traitors,
   We hate not France, but this man's heart of stone.
           Britons, guard your own.
 
   We hate not France, but France has lost her voice
   This man is France, the man they call her choice.
           By tricks and spying,
           By craft and lying,
   And murder was her freedom overthrown.
           Britons, guard your own.
 
   'Vive l'Empereur' may follow by and bye;
   'God save the Queen' is here a truer cry.
           God save the Nation,
           The toleration,
   And the free speech that makes a Briton known.
           Britons, guard your own.
 
   Rome's dearest daughter now is captive France,
   The Jesuit laughs, and reckoning on his chance,
           Would, unrelenting,
           Kill all dissenting,
   Till we were left to fight for truth alone.
           Britons, guard your own.
 
   Call home your ships across Biscayan tides,
   To blow the battle from their oaken sides.
           Why waste they yonder
           Their idle thunder?
   Why stay they there to guard a foreign throne?
           Seamen, guard your own.
 
   We were the best of marksmen long ago,
   We won old battles with our strength, the bow.
           Now practise, yeomen,
           Like those bowmen,
   Till your balls fly as their true shafts have flown.
           Yeomen, guard your own.
 
   His soldier-ridden Highness might incline
   To take Sardinia, Belgium, or the Rhine:
          Shall we stand idle,
          Nor seek to bridle
   His vile aggressions, till we stand alone?
           Make their cause your own.
 
   Should he land here, and for one hour prevail,
   There must no man go back to bear the tale:
           No man to bear it--
           Swear it! We swear it!
   Although we fought the banded world alone,
           We swear to guard our own.
 
 
 
 
 XLVIII
 
 =Hands all Round=
 
 [Published in _The Examiner_, February 7, 1852. Reprinted, slightly
 altered, in Life, vol. I, p. 345. Included, almost entirely
 re-written, in collected Works.]
 
   First drink a health, this solemn night,
     A health to England, every guest;
   That man's the best cosmopolite
     Who loves his native country best.
   May Freedom's oak for ever live
     With stronger life from day to day;
   That man's the best Conservative
     Who lops the mouldered branch away.
           Hands all round!
   God the tyrant's hope confound!
   To this great cause of Freedom drink, my friends,
     And the great name of England round and round.
 
   A health to Europe's honest men!
     Heaven guard them from her tyrants' jails!
   From wronged Poerio's noisome den,
     From iron limbs and tortured nails!
   We curse the crimes of Southern kings,
     The Russian whips and Austrian rods--
   We likewise have our evil things;
     Too much we make our Ledgers, Gods.
           Yet hands all round!
     God the tyrant's cause confound!
   To Europe's better health we drink, my friends,
     And the great name of England round and round.
 
   What health to France, if France be she
     Whom martial progress only charms?
   Yet tell her--better to be free
     Than vanquish all the world in arms.
   Her frantic city's flashing heats
     But fire, to blast the hopes of men.
   Why change the titles of your streets?
     You fools, you'll want them all again.
           Hands all round!
     God the tyrant's cause confound!
   To France, the wiser France, we drink, my friends,
     And the great name of England round and round.
 
   Gigantic daughter of the West,
     We drink to thee across the flood,
   We know thee most, we love thee best,
     For art thou not of British blood?
   Should war's mad blast again be blown,
     Permit not thou the tyrant powers
   To fight thy mother here alone,
     But let thy broadsides roar with ours.
           Hands all round!
     God the tyrant's cause confound!
   To our great kinsmen of the West, my friends,
     And the great name of England round and round.
 
   O rise, our strong Atlantic sons,
     When war against our freedom springs!
   O speak to Europe through your guns!
   They _can_ be understood by kings.
   You must not mix our Queen with those
     That wish to keep their people fools;
   Our freedom's foemen are her foes,
     She comprehends the race she rules.
           Hands all round!
     God the tyrant's cause confound!
   To our dear kinsmen of the West, my friends,
     And the great name of England round and round.
 
 
 
 
 XLIX
 
 =Suggested by Reading an Article in a Newspaper=
 
 [Published in _The Examiner_, February 14, 1852, and never reprinted
 nor acknowledged. The proof sheets of the poem, with alterations in
 Tennyson's autograph, were offered for public sale in 1906.]
 
 To the Editor of _The Examiner_.
 
 SIR,--I have read with much interest the poems of Merlin. The enclosed
 is longer than either of those, and certainly not so good: yet as I
 flatter myself that it has a smack of Merlin's style in it, and as I
 feel that it expresses forcibly enough some of the feelings of our
 time, perhaps you may be induced to admit it.
 
 TALIESSEN.
 
 
   How much I love this writer's manly style!
     By such men led, our press had ever been
   The public conscience of our noble isle,
     Severe and quick to feel a civic sin,
   To raise the people and chastise the times
   With such a heat as lives in great creative rhymes.
 
   O you, the Press! what good from you might spring!
     What power is yours to blast a cause or bless!
   I fear for you, as for some youthful king,
     Lest you go wrong from power in excess.
   Take heed of your wide privileges! we
   The thinking men of England, loathe a tyranny.
 
   A freeman is, I doubt not, freest here;
     The single voice may speak his mind aloud;
   An honest isolation need not fear
     The Court, the Church, the Parliament, the crowd.
   No, nor the Press! and look you well to that--
   We must not dread in you the nameless autocrat.
 
   And you, dark Senate of the public pen,
     You may not, like yon tyrant, deal in spies.
   Yours are the public acts of public men,
     But yours are not their household privacies.
   I grant you one of the great Powers on earth,
   But be not you the blatant traitors of the hearth.
 
   You hide the hand that writes: it must be so,
     For better so you fight for public ends;
   But some you strike can scarce return the blow;
     You should be all the nobler, O my friends.
   Be noble, you! nor work with faction's tools
     To charm a lower sphere of fulminating fools.
 
   But knowing all your power to heat or cool,
     To soothe a civic wound or keep it raw,
   Be loyal, if you wish for wholesome rule:
     Our ancient boast is this--we reverence law.
   We still were loyal in our wildest fights,
   Or loyally disloyal battled for our rights.
 
   O Grief and Shame if while I preach of laws
     Whereby to guard our Freedom from offence--
   And trust an ancient manhood and the cause
     Of England and her health of commonsense--
   There hang within the heavens a dark disgrace,
   Some vast Assyrian doom to burst upon our race.
 
   I feel the thousand cankers of our State,
     I fain would shake their triple-folded ease,
   The hogs who can believe in nothing great,
     Sneering bedridden in the down of Peace
   Over their scrips and shares, their meats and wine,
   With stony smirks at all things human and divine!
 
   I honour much, I say, this man's appeal.
     We drag so deep in our commercial mire,
   We move so far from greatness, that I feel
     Exception to be character'd in fire.
   Who looks for Godlike greatness here shall see
   The British Goddess, sleek Respectability.
 
   Alas for her and all her small delights!
     She feels not how the social frame is rack'd.
   She loves a little scandal which excites;
     A little feeling is a want of tact.
   For her there lie in wait millions of foes,
   And yet the 'not too much' is all the rule she knows.
 
   Poor soul! behold her: what decorous calm!
     She, with her week-day worldliness sufficed,
   Stands in her pew and hums her decent psalm
     With decent dippings at the name of Christ!
   And she has mov'd in that smooth way so long,
     She hardly can believe that she shall suffer wrong.
 
   Alas, our Church! alas, her growing ills,
     And those who tolerate not her tolerance,
   But needs must sell the burthen of their wills
     To that half-pagan harlot kept by France!
   Free subjects of the kindliest of all thrones,
   Headlong they plunge their doubts among old rags and bones.
 
   Alas, Church writers, altercating tribes--
     The vessel and your Church may sink in storms.
   Christ cried: Woe, woe, to Pharisees and Scribes!
     Like them, you bicker less for truth than forms.
   I sorrow when I read the things you write,
   What unheroic pertness! what un-Christian spite!
 
   Alas, our youth, so clever yet so small,
     Thin dilletanti deep in nature's plan,
   Who make the emphatic One, by whom is all,
     An essence less concentred than a man!
   Better wild Mahmoud's war-cry once again!
   O fools, we want a manlike God and Godlike men!
 
   Go, frightful omens. Yet once more I turn
     To you that mould men's thoughts; I call on you
   To make opinion warlike, lest we learn
     A sharper lesson than we ever knew.
   I hear a thunder though the skies are fair,
   But shrill you, loud and long, the warning-note:
       Prepare!
 
 
 
 
 L
 
 [Lord Tennyson wrote, by Royal request, two stanzas which were sung as
 part of _God Save the Queen_ at a State concert in connection with the
 Princess Royal's marriage: these were printed in the _Times_ of
 January 26, 1858.]
 
   God bless our Prince and Bride!
   God keep their lands allied,
     God save the Queen!
   Clothe them with righteousness,
   Crown them with happiness,
   Them with all blessings bless,
     God save the Queen.
 
   Fair fall this hallow'd hour,
   Farewell our England's flower,
     God save the Queen!
   Farewell, fair rose of May!
   Let both the peoples say,
   God bless thy marriage-day,
     God bless the Queen.
 
 
 
 
 LI
 
 =The Ringlet=
 
 [Published in _Enoch Arden_ volume (London: E. Moxon & Co, 1864) and
 never reprinted.]
 
   'Your ringlets, your ringlets,
     That look so golden-gay,
   If you will give me one, but one,
     To kiss it night and day,
   Then never chilling touch of Time
     Will turn it silver-gray;
   And then shall I know it is all true gold
   To flame and sparkle and stream as of old,
   Till all the comets in heaven are cold,
     And all her stars decay.'
   'Then take it, love, and put it by;
   This cannot change, nor yet can I.'
 
   'My ringlet, my ringlet,
     That art so golden-gay,
   Now never chilling touch of Time
     Can turn thee silver-gray;
   And a lad may wink, and a girl may hint,
     And a fool may say his say;
   For my doubts and fears were all amiss,
   And I swear henceforth by this and this,
   That a doubt will only come for a kiss,
     And a fear to be kissed away.'
   'Then kiss it, love, and put it by:
   If this can change, why so can I.'
 
   O Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     I kiss'd you night and day,
   And Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     You still are golden-gay,
   But Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     You should be silver-gray:
   For what is this which now I'm told,
   I that took you for true gold,
   She that gave you's bought and sold,
           Sold, sold.
 
   O Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     She blush'd a rosy red,
   When Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     She clipt you from her head,
   And Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     She gave you me, and said,
   'Come, kiss it, love, and put it by:
   If this can change, why so can I.'
   O fie, you golden nothing, fie
           You golden lie.
 
   O Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     I count you much to blame,
   For Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     You put me much to shame,
   So Ringlet, O Ringlet,
     I doom you to the flame.
   For what is this which now I learn,
   Has given all my faith a turn?
   Burn, you glossy heretic, burn,
             Burn, burn.
 
 
 
 
 LII
 
 =Song=
 
 [This first form of the Song in _The Princess_ ('Home they brought her
 warrior dead') was published only in _Selections from Tennyson_.
 London: E. Moxon & Co, 1864.]
 
   Home they brought him slain with spears.
     They brought him home at even-fall:
   All alone she sits and hears
     Echoes in his empty hall,
       Sounding on the morrow.
 
   The Sun peeped in from open field,
     The boy began to leap and prance,
     Rode upon his father's lance,
   Beat upon his father's shield--
       'Oh hush, my joy, my sorrow.'
 
 
 
 
 LIII
 
 =1865-1866=
 
 [Published in _Good Words_ for March 1, 1868 as a decorative page,
 with an accompanying full page plate by T. Dalziel. The lines were
 never reprinted.]
 
   I stood on a tower in the wet,
   And New Year and Old Year met,
   And winds were roaring and blowing;
   And I said, 'O years that meet in tears,
   Have ye aught that is worth the knowing?
 
   'Science enough and exploring
   Wanderers coming and going
   Matter enough for deploring
   But aught that is worth the knowing?'
 
   Seas at my feet were flowing
   Waves on the shingle pouring,
   Old Year roaring and blowing
   And New Year blowing and roaring.
 
 
 
 
 =The Lover's Tale=
 1833
 
 [It was originally intended by Tennyson that this poem should
 form part of his 1833 volume. It was put in type and, according to
 custom, copies were distributed among his friends, when, on the eve of
 publication, he decided to omit it. Again, in 1869, it was sent to
 press with a new third part added, and was again withdrawn, the third
 part only--'The Golden Supper,' founded on a story in Boccaccio's
 _Decameron_--being published in the volume, 'The Holy Grail.' In 1866,
 1870 and 1875, attempts had been made by Mr Herne Shepherd to publish
 editions of 'The Lover's Tale,' reprinted from stray proof copies of
 the 1833 printing. Each of these attempts was repressed by Tennyson,
 and at last in 1879 the complete poem, as now included in the
 collected Works, was issued, with an apologetic reference to the
 necessity of reprinting the poem to prevent its circulation in an
 unauthorised form. But the 1879 issue is considerably altered from the
 original issue of 1833, as written by Tennyson in his nineteenth year.
 Since only as a product of Tennyson's youth does the poem merit any
 attention, it has seemed good to reprint it here as originally
 written.]
 
 A FRAGMENT
 
 The Poem of the Lover's Tale (the lover is supposed to be himself a
 poet) was written in my nineteenth year, and consequently contains
 nearly as many faults as words. That I deemed it not wholly unoriginal
 is my only apology for its publication--an apology lame and poor, and
 somewhat impertinent to boot: so that if its infirmities meet with
 more laughter than charity in the world, I shall not raise my voice in
 its defence. I am aware how deficient the Poem is in point of art, and
 it is not without considerable misgivings that I have ventured to
 publish even this fragment of it. 'Enough,' says the old proverb, 'is
 as good as a feast.'--(Tennyson's original introductory note.)
 
   Here far away, seen from the topmost cliff,
   Filling with purple gloom the vacancies
   Between the tufted hills the sloping seas
   Hung in mid-heaven, and half-way down rare sails,
   White as white clouds, floated from sky to sky.
   Oh! pleasant breast of waters, quiet bay,
   Like to a quiet mind in the loud world,
   Where the chafed breakers of the outer sea
   Sunk powerless, even as anger falls aside,
   And withers on the breast of peaceful love,
   Thou didst receive that belt of pines, that fledged
   The hills that watch'd thee, as Love watcheth Love,--
   In thine own essence, and delight thyself
   To make it wholly thine on sunny days.
   Keep thou thy name of 'Lover's bay': See, Sirs,
   Even now the Goddess of the Past, that takes
   The heart, and sometimes toucheth but one string,
   That quivers, and is silent, and sometimes
   Sweeps suddenly all its half-moulder'd chords
   To an old melody, begins to play
   On those first-moved fibres of the brain.
   I come, Great mistress of the ear and eye:
   Oh! lead me tenderly, for fear the mind
   Rain thro' my sight, and strangling sorrow weigh
   Mine utterance with lameness. Tho' long years
   Have hallowed out a valley and a gulf
   Betwixt the native land of Love and me,
   Breathe but a little on me, and the sail
   Will draw me to the rising of the sun,
   The lucid chambers of the morning star,
   And East of life.
                     Permit me, friend, I prithee,
   To pass my hand across my brows, and muse
   On those dear hills, that nevermore will meet
   The sight that throbs and aches beneath my touch,
   As tho' there beat a heart in either eye;
   For when the outer lights are darken'd thus,
   The memory's vision hath a keener edge.
   It grows upon me now--the semicircle
   Of dark blue waters and the narrow fringe
   Of curving beach--its wreaths of dripping green--
   Its pale pink shells--the summer-house aloft
   That open'd on the pines with doors of glass,
   A mountain nest the pleasure boat that rock'd
   Light-green with its own shadow, keel to keel,
   Upon the crispings of the dappled waves
   That blanched upon its side.
                                O Love, O Hope,
   They come, they crowd upon me all at once,
   Moved from the cloud of unforgotten things,
   That sometimes on the horizon of the mind
   Lies folded--often sweeps athwart in storm--
   They flash across the darkness of my brain,
   The many pleasant days, the moolit nights,
   The dewy dawnings and the amber eyes,
   When thou and I, Camilla, thou and I
   Were borne about the bay, or safely moor'd
   Beneath some low brow'd cavern, where the wave
   Plash'd sapping its worn ribs (the while without,
   And close above us, sang the wind-tost pine,
   And shook its earthly socket, for we heard,
   In rising and in falling with the tide,
   Close by our ears, the huge roots strain and creak),
   Eye feeding upon eye with deep intent;
   And mine, with love too high to be express'd
   Arrested in its sphere, and ceasing from
   All contemplation of all forms, did pause
   To worship mine own image, laved in light,
   The centre of the splendours, all unworthy
   Of such a shrine--mine image in her eyes,
   By diminution made most glorious,
   Moved with their motions, as those eyes were moved
   With motions of the soul, as my heart beat
   Twice to the melody of hers. Her face
   Was starry-fair, not pale, tenderly flush'd
   As 'twere with dawn. She was dark-hair'd, dark-eyed;
   Oh, such dark eyes! A single glance of them
   Will govern a whole life from birth to death,
   Careless of all things else, led on with light
   In trances and in visions: look at them,
   You lose yourself in utter ignorance,
   You cannot find their depth; for they go back,
   And farther back, and still withdraw themselves
   Quite into the deep soul, that evermore,
   Fresh springing from her fountains in the brain,
   Still pouring thro', floods with redundant light
   Her narrow portals.
 
                       Trust me, long ago
   I should have died, if it were possible
   To die in gazing on that perfectness
   Which I do bear within me; I had died
   But from my farthest lapse, my latest ebb,
   Thine image, like a charm of light and strength
   Upon the waters, pushed me back again
   On these deserted sands of barren life.
   Tho' from the deep vault, where the heart of hope
   Fell into dust, and crumbled in the dark--
   Forgetting who to render beautiful
   Her countenance with quick and healthful blood--
   Thou didst not sway me upward, could I perish
   With such a costly casket in the grasp
   Of memory? He, that saith it, hath o'erstepp'd
   The slippery footing of his narrow wit,
   And fall'n away from judgment. Thou art light,
   To which my spirit leaneth all her flowers,
   And length of days, and immortality
   Of thought, and freshness ever self-renew'd.
   For Time and Grief abode too long with Life,
   And like all other friends i' the world, at last
   They grew aweary of her fellowship:
   So Time and Grief did beckon unto Death,
   And Death drew nigh and beat the doors of Life;
   But thou didst sit alone in the inner house,
   A wakeful port'ress and didst parle with Death,
   'This is a charmed dwelling which I hold';
   So Death gave back, and would no further come.
   Yet is my life nor in the present time,
   Nor in the present place. To me alone,
   Pushed from his chair of regal heritage,
   The Present is the vassal of the Past:
   So that, in that I _have_ lived, do I live,
   And cannot die, and am, in having been,
   A portion of the pleasant yesterday,
   Thrust forward on to-day and out of place;
   A body journeying onward, sick with toil,
   The lithe limbs bow'd as with a heavy weight
   And all the senses weaken'd in all save that
   Which, long ago, they had glean'd and garner'd up
   Into the granaries of memory--
   The clear brow, bulwark of the precious brain,
   Now seam'd and chink'd with years--and all the while
   The light soul twines and mingles with the growths
   Of vigorous early days, attracted, won,
   Married, made one with, molten into all
   The beautiful in Past of act or place.
   Even as the all-enduring camel, driven
   Far from the diamond fountain by the palms,
   Toils onward thro' the middle moonlight nights,
   Shadow'd and crimson'd with the drifting dust,
   Or when the white heats of the blinding noons
   Beat from the concave sand; yet in him keeps
   A draught of that sweet fountain that he loves,
   To stay his feet from falling, and his spirit
   From bitterness of death.
 
                             Ye ask me, friends,
   When I began to love. How should I tell ye?
   Or from the after fulness of my heart,
   Flow back again unto my slender spring
   And first of love, tho' every turn and depth
   Between is clearer in my life than all
   Its present flow. Ye know not what ye ask.
   How should the broad and open flower tell
   What sort of bud it was, when press'd together
   In its green sheath, close lapt in silken folds?
   It seemed to keep its sweetness to itself,
   Yet was not the less sweet for that it seem'd.
   For young Life knows not when young Life was born,
   But takes it all for granted: neither Love,
   Warm in the heart, his cradle can remember
   Love in the womb, but resteth satisfied,
   Looking on her that brought him to the light:
   Or as men know not when they fall asleep
   Into delicious dreams, our other life,
   So know I not when I began to love.
   This is my sum of knowledge--that my love
   Grew with myself--and say rather, was my growth,
   My inward sap, the hold I have on earth,
   My outward circling air wherein I breathe,
   Which yet upholds my life, and evermore
   Was to me daily life and daily death:
   For how should I have lived and not have loved?
   Can ye take off the sweetness from the flower,
   The colour and the sweetness from the rose,
   And place them by themselves? or set apart
   Their motions and their brightness from the stars,
   And then point out the flower or the star?
   Or build a wall betwixt my life and love,
   And tell me where I am? 'Tis even thus:
   In that I live I love; because I love
   I live: whate'er is fountain to the one
   Is fountain to the other; and whene'er
   Our God unknits the riddle of the one,
   There is no shade or fold of mystery
   Swathing the other.
 
                       Many, many years,
   For they seem many and my most of life,
   And well I could have linger'd in that porch,
   So unproportioned to the dwelling place,
   In the maydews of childhood, opposite
   The flush and dawn of youth, we lived together,
   Apart, alone together on those hills.
   Before he saw my day my father died,
   And he was happy that he saw it not:
   But I and the first daisy on his grave
   From the same clay came into light at once.
   As Love and I do number equal years
   So she, my love, is of an age with me.
   How like each other was the birth of each!
   The sister of my mother--she that bore
   Camilla close beneath her beating heart,
   Which to the imprisoned spirit of the child,
   With its true touched pulses in the flow
   And hourly visitation of the blood,
   Sent notes of preparation manifold,
   And mellow'd echoes of the outer world--
   My mother's sister, mother of my love,
   Who had a twofold claim upon my heart,
   One twofold mightier than the other was,
   In giving so much beauty to the world,
   And so much wealth as God had charged her with,
   Loathing to put it from herself for ever,
   Crown'd with her highest act the placid face
   And breathless body of her good deeds past.
   So we were born, so orphan'd. She was motherless,
   And I without a father. So from each
   Of those two pillars which from earth uphold
   Our childhood, one had fall'n away, and all
   The careful burthen of our tender years
   Trembled upon the other. He that gave
   Her life, to me delightedly fulfill'd
   All loving-kindnesses, all offices
   Of watchful care and trembling tenderness.
   He worked for both: he pray'd for both: he slept
   Dreaming of both; nor was his love the less
   Because it was divided, and shot forth
   Boughs on each side, laden with wholesome shade,
   Wherein we rested sleeping or awake,
   And sung aloud the matin-song of life.
 
   She was my foster-sister: on one arm
   The flaxen ringlets of our infancies
   Wander'd, the while we rested: one soft lap
   Pillow'd us both: one common light of eyes
   Was on us as we lay: our baby lips,
   Kissing one bosom, ever drew from thence
   The stream of life, one stream, one life, one blood,
   One sustenance, which, still as thought grew large,
   Still larger moulding all the house of thought,
   Perchance assimilated all our tastes
   And future fancies. 'Tis a beautiful
   And pleasant meditation, what whate'er
   Our general mother meant for me alone,
   Our mutual mother dealt to both of us:
   So what was earliest mine in earliest life,
   I shared with her in whom myself remains.
   As was our childhood, so our infancy,
   They tell me, was a very miracle
   Of fellow-feeling and communion.
   They tell me that we would not be alone,--
   We cried when we were parted; when I wept,
   Her smile lit up the rainbow on my tears,
   Stay'd on the clouds of sorrow; that we loved
   The sound of one another's voices more
   Than the grey cuckoo loves his name, and learn'd
   To lisp in tune together; that we slept
   In the same cradle always, face to face,
   Heart beating time to heart, lip pressing lip,
   Folding each other, breathing on each other,
   Dreaming together (dreaming of each other
   They should have added) till the morning light
   Sloped thro' the pines, upon the dewy pane
   Falling, unseal'd our eyelids, and we woke
   To gaze upon each other. If this be true,
   At thought of which my whole soul languishes
   And faints, and hath no pulse, no breath, as tho'
   A man in some still garden should infuse
   Rich attar in the bosom of the rose,
   Till, drunk with its own wine and overfull
   Of sweetness, and in smelling of itself,
   It fall on its own thorns--if this be true--
   And that way my wish leaneth evermore
   Still to believe it--'tis so sweet a thought,
   Why in the utter stillness of the soul
   Doth question'd memory answer not, nor tell,
   Of this our earliest, our closest drawn,
   Most loveliest, most delicious union?
   Oh, happy, happy outset of my days!
   Green springtide, April promise, glad new year
   Of Being, which with earliest violets,
   And lavish carol of clear-throated larks,
   Fill'd all the march of life.--I will not speak of thee;
   These have not seen thee, these can never know thee,
   They cannot understand me. Pass on then
   A term of eighteen years. Ye would but laugh
   If I should tell ye how I heard in thought
   Those rhymes, 'The Lion and the Unicorn'
   'The Four-and-twenty Blackbirds' 'Banbury Cross,'
   'The Gander' and 'The man of Mitylene,'
   And all the quaint old scraps of ancient crones,
   Which are as gems set in my memory,
   Because she learn'd them with me. Or what profits it
   To tell ye that her father died, just ere
   The daffodil was blown; or how we found
   The drowned seaman on the shore? These things
   Unto the quiet daylight of your minds
   Are cloud and smoke, but in the dark of mine
   Show traced with flame. Move with me to that hour,
   Which was the hinge on which the door of Hope,
   Once turning, open'd far into the outward,
   And never closed again.
 
                         I well remember,
   It was a glorious morning, such a one
   As dawns but once a season. Mercury
   On such a morning would have flung himself
   From cloud to cloud, and swum with balanced wings
   To some tall mountain. On that day the year
   First felt his youth and strength, and from his spring
   Moved smiling toward his summer. On that day,
   Love working shook his wings (that charged the winds
   With spiced May-sweets from bound to bound) and blew
   Fresh fire into the sun, and from within
   Burst thro' the heated buds, and sent his soul
   Into the songs of birds, and touch'd far-off
   His mountain-altars, his high hills, with flame
   Milder and purer. Up the rocks we wound;
   The great pine shook with lovely sounds of joy,
   That came on the sea-wind. As mountain brooks
   Our blood ran free: the sunshine seem'd to brood
   More warmly on the heart than on the brow.
   We often paused, and looking back, we saw
   The clefts and openings in the hills all fill'd
   With the blue valley and the glistening brooks,
   And with the low dark groves--a land of Love;
   Where Love was worshipp'd upon every height,
   Where Love was worshipp'd under every tree--
   A land of promise, flowing with the milk
   And honey of delicious memories
   Down to the sea, as far as eye could ken,
   From verge to verge it was a holy land,
   Still growing holier as you near'd the bay,
   For where the temple stood. When we had reach'd
   The grassy platform on some hill, I stoop'd,
   I gather'd the wild herbs, and for her brows
   And mine wove chaplets of the self-same flower,
   Which she took smiling, and with my work there
   Crown'd her clear forehead. Once or twice she told me
   (For I remember all things), to let grow
   The flowers that run poison in their veins.
   She said, 'The evil flourish in the world';
   Then playfully she gave herself the lie:
   'Nothing in nature is unbeautiful,
   So, brother, pluck and spare not.' So I wove
   Even the dull-blooded poppy, 'whose red flower
   Hued with the scarlet of a fierce sunrise,
   Like to the wild youth of an evil king,
   Is without sweetness, but who crowns himself
   Above the secret poisons of his heart
   In his old age'--a graceful thought of hers
   Graven on my fancy! As I said, with these
   She crown'd her forehead. O how like a nymph,
   A stately mountain-nymph, she look'd! how native
   Unto the hills she trod on! What an angel!
   How clothed with beams! My eyes, fix'd upon hers,
   Almost forgot even to move again.
   My spirit leap'd as with those thrills of bliss
   That shoot across the soul in prayer, and show us
   That we are surely heard. Methought a light
   Burst from the garland I had woven, and stood
   A solid glory on her bright black hair:
   A light, methought, broke from her dark, dark eyes,
   And shot itself into the singing winds;
   A light, methought, flash'd even from her white robe,
   As from a glass in the sun, and fell about
   My footsteps on the mountains.
 
                       About sunset
   We came unto the hill of woe, so call'd
   Because the legend ran that, long time since,
   One rainy night, when every wind blew loud,
   A woful man had thrust his wife and child
   With shouts from off the bridge, and following, plunged
   Into the dizzy chasm below. Below,
   Sheer thro' the black-wall'd cliff the rapid brook
   Shot down his inner thunders, built above
   With matted bramble and the shining gloss
   Of ivy-leaves, whose low-hung tresses, dipp'd
   In the fierce stream, bore downward with the wave.
   The path was steep and loosely strewn with crags
   We mounted slowly: yet to both of us
   It was delight, not hindrance: unto both
   Delight from hardship to be overcome,
   And scorn of perilous seeming: unto me
   Intense delight and rapture that I breathed,
   As with a sense of nigher Deity,
   With her to whom all outward fairest things
   Were by the busy mind referr'd, compared,
   As bearing no essential fruits of excellence.
   Save as they were the types and shadowings
   Of hers--and then that I became to her
   A tutelary angel as she rose,
   And with a fearful self-impelling joy
   Saw round her feet the country far away,
   Beyond the nearest mountain's bosky brows,
   Burst into open prospect--heath and hill,
   And hollow lined and wooded to the lips--
   And steep down walls of battlemented rock
   Girded with broom or shiver'd into peaks--
   And glory of broad waters interfused,
   Whence rose as it were breath and steam of gold;
   And over all the great wood rioting
   And climbing, starr'd at slender intervals
   With blossom tufts of purest white; and last,
   Framing the mighty landskip to the West,
   A purple range of purple cones, between
   Whose interspaces gush'd, in blinding bursts,
   The incorporate light of sun and sea.
 
                             At length,
   Upon the tremulous bridge, that from beneath
   Seemed with a cobweb firmament to link
   The earthquake-shattered chasm, hung with shrubs,
   We passed with tears of rapture. All the West,
   And even unto the middle South, was ribb'd
   And barr'd with bloom on bloom. The sun beneath,
   Held for a space 'twixt cloud and wave, shower'd down
   Rays of a mighty circle, weaving over
   That varied wilderness a tissue of light
   Unparallel'd. On the other side the moon,
   Half-melted into thin blue air, stood still
   And pale and fibrous as a wither'd leaf,
   Nor yet endured in presence of his eyes
   To imbue his lustre; most unloverlike;
   Since in his absence full of light and joy
   And giving light to others. But this chiefest,
   Next to her presence whom I loved so well,
   Spoke loudly, even into my inmost heart,
   As to my outward hearing: the loud stream,
   Forth issuing from his portals in the crag
   (A visible link unto the home of my heart),
   Ran amber toward the West, and nigh the sea,
   Parting my own loved mountains, was received
   Shorn of its strength, into the sympathy
   Of that small bay, which into open main
   Glow'd intermingling close beneath the sun
   Spirit of Love! That little hour was bound,
   Shut in from Time, and dedicate to thee;
   Thy fires from heav'n had touch'd it, and the earth
   They fell on became hallow'd evermore.
 
   We turn'd: our eyes met: her's were bright, and mine
   Were dim with floating tears, that shot the sunset,
   In light rings round me; and my name was borne
   Upon her breath. Henceforth my name has been
   A hallow'd memory, like the names of old;
   A center'd, glory-circled memory,
   And a peculiar treasure, brooking not
   Exchange or currency; and in that hour
   A hope flow'd round me, like a golden mist
   Charm'd amid eddies of melodious airs,
   A moment, ere the onward whirlwind shatter it,
   Waver'd and floated--which was less than Hope,
   Because it lack'd the power of perfect Hope;
   But which was more and higher than all Hope,
   Because all other Hope hath lower aim;
   Even that this name to which her seraph lips
   Did lend such gentle utterance, this one name
   In some obscure hereafter, might inwreathe
   (How lovelier, nobler then!) her life, her love,
   With my life, love, soul, spirit and heart and strength.
 
   'Brother,' she said, 'let this be call'd henceforth
   The Hill of Hope'; and I replied: 'O sister,
   My will is one with thine; the Hill of Hope.'
   Nevertheless, we did not change the name.
 
   Love lieth deep; Love dwells not in lip-depths:
   Love wraps her wings on either side the heart,
   Constraining it with kisses close and warm,
   Absorbing all the incense of sweet thoughts
   So that they pass not to the shrine of sound.
   Else had the life of that delighted hour
   Drunk in the largeness of the utterance
   Of Love; but how should earthly measure mete
   The heavenly unmeasured or unlimited Love,
   Which scarce can tune his high majestic sense
   Unto the thunder-song that wheels the spheres;
   Scarce living in the Aeolian harmony,
   And flowing odour of the spacious air;
   Scarce housed in the circle of this earth:
   Be cabin'd up in words and syllables,
   Which waste with the breath that made 'em.
                           Sooner earth
   Might go round heaven, and the straight girth of Time
   Inswathe the fullness of Eternity,
   Than language grasp the infinite of Love.
   O day, which did enwomb that happy hour,
   Thou art blest in the years, divinest day!
   O Genius of that hour which dost uphold
   Thy coronal of glory like a God,
   Amid thy melancholy mates far-seen,
   Who walk before thee, and whose eyes are dim
   With gazing on the light and depth of thine
   Thy name is ever worshipp'd among hours!
   Had I died then, I had not seem'd to die
   For bliss stood round me like the lights of heaven,
   That cannot fade, they are so burning bright.
   Had I died then, I had not known the death;
   Planting my feet against this mound of time
   I had thrown me on the vast, and from this impulse
   Continuing and gathering ever, ever,
   Agglomerated swiftness, I had lived
   That intense moment thro' eternity.
   Oh, had the Power from whose right hand the light
   Of Life issueth, and from whose left hand floweth
   The shadow of Death, perennial effluences,
   Whereof to all that draw the wholesome air,
   Somewhile the one must overflow the other;
   Then had he stemm'd my day with night and driven
   My current to the fountain whence it sprang--
   Even his own abiding excellence--
   On me, methinks, that shock of gloom had fall'n
   Unfelt, and like the sun I gazed upon,
   Which, lapt in seeming dissolution,
   And dipping his head low beneath the verge,
   Yet bearing round about him his own day,
   In confidence of unabated strength,
   Steppeth from heaven to heaven, from light to light,
   And holding his undimmed forehead far
   Into a clearer zenith, pure of cloud;
   So bearing on thro' Being limitless
   The triumph of this foretaste, I had merged
   Glory in glory, without sense of change.
 
   We trod the shadow of the downward hill;
   We pass'd from light to dark. On the other side
   Is scooped a cavern and a mountain-hall,
   Which none have fathom'd. If you go far in
   (The country people rumour) you may hear
   The moaning of the woman and the child,
   Shut in the secret chambers of the rock.
   I too have heard a sound--perchance of streams
   Running far-off within its inmost halls,
   The home of darkness, but the cavern mouth,
   Half overtrailed with a wanton weed
   Gives birth to a brawling stream, that stepping lightly
   Adown a natural stair of tangled roots,
   Is presently received in a sweet grove
   Of eglantine, a place of burial
   Far lovelier than its cradle; for unseen
   But taken with the sweetness of the place,
   It giveth out a constant melody
   That drowns the nearer echoes. Lower down
   Spreads out a little lake, that, flooding, makes
   Cushions of yellow sand; and from the woods
   That belt it rise three dark tall cypresses;
   Three cypresses, symbols of mortal woe,
   That men plant over graves.
 
                    Hither we came,
   And sitting down upon the golden moss
   Held converse sweet and low--low converse sweet,
   In which our voices bore least part. The wind
   Told a love-tale beside us, how he woo'd
   The waters, and the crisp'd waters lisp'd
   The kisses of the wind, that, sick with love,
   Fainted at intervals, and grew again
   To utterance of passion. Ye cannot shape
   Fancy so fair as is this memory.
   Methought all excellence that ever was
   Had drawn herself from many thousand years,
   And all the separate Edens of this earth,
   To centre in this place and time. I listen'd,
   And her words stole with most prevailing sweetness
   Into my heart, as thronged fancies come,
   All unawares, into the poet's brain;
   Or as the dew-drops on the petal hung,
   When summer winds break their soft sleep with sighs,
   Creep down into the bottom of the flower.
   Her words were like a coronal of wild blooms
   Strung in the very negligence of Art,
   Or in the art of Nature, where each rose
   Doth faint upon the bosom of the other,
   Flooding its angry cheek with odorous tears.
   So each with each inwoven lived with each,
   And were in union more than double-sweet.
   What marvel my Camilla told me all?
   It was so happy an hour, so sweet a place,
   And I was as the brother of her blood,
   And by that name was wont to live in her speech,
   Dear name! which had too much of nearness in it
   And heralded the distance of this time.
   At first her voice was very sweet and low,
   As tho' she were afeard of utterance;
   But in the onward current of her speech,
   (As echoes of the hollow-banked brooks
   Are fashioned by the channel which they keep)
   His words did of their meaning borrow sound,
   Her cheek did catch the colour of her words,
   I heard and trembled, yet I could but hear;
   My heart paused,--my raised eyelids would not fall,
   But still I kept my eyes upon the sky.
   I seem'd the only part of Time stood still,
   And saw the motion of all other things;
   While her words, syllable by syllable,
   Like water, drop by drop, upon my ear
   Fell, and I wish'd, yet wish'd her not to speak,
   But she spoke on, for I did name no wish.
   What marvel my Camilla told me all
   Her maiden dignities of Hope and Love,
   'Perchance' she said 'return'd.' Even then the stars
   Did tremble in their stations as I gazed;
   But she spake on, for I did name no wish,
   No wish--no hope. Hope was not wholly dead,
   But breathing hard at the approach of Death,
   Updrawn in expectation of her change--
   Camilla, my Camilla, who was mine
   No longer in the dearest use of mine--
   The written secrets of her inmost soul
   Lay like an open scroll before my view,
   And my eyes read, they read aright, her heart
   Was Lionel's: it seem'd as tho' a link
   Of some light chain within my inmost frame
   Was riven in twain: that life I heeded not
   Flow'd from me, and the darkness of the grave,
   The darkness of the grave and utter night,
   Did swallow up my vision: at her feet,
   Even the feet of her I loved, I fell,
   Smit with exceeding sorrow unto death.
 
   Then had the earth beneath me yawning given
   Sign of convulsion; and tho' horrid rifts
   Sent up the moaning of unhappy spirits
   Imprison'd in her centre, with the heat
   Of their infolding element; had the angels,
   The watchers at heaven's gate, push'd them apart,
   And from the golden threshold had down-roll'd
   Their heaviest thunder, I had lain as still,
   And blind and motionless as then I lay!
   White as quench'd ashes, cold as were the hopes
   Of my lorn love! What happy air shall woo
   The wither'd leaf fall'n in the woods, or blasted
   Upon this bough? a lightning stroke had come
   Even from that Heaven in whose light I bloom'd
   And taken away the greenness of my life,
   The blossom and the fragrance. Who was cursed
   But I? who miserable but I? even Misery
   Forgot herself in that extreme distress,
   And with the overdoing of her part
   Did fall away into oblivion.
   The night in pity took away my day
   Because my grief as yet was newly born,
   Of too weak eyes to look upon the light,
   And with the hasty notice of the ear,
   Frail life was startled from the tender love
   Of him she brooded over. Would I had lain
   Until the pleached ivy tress had wound
   Round my worn limbs, and the wild briar had driven
   Its knotted thorns thro' my unpaining brows
   Leaning its roses on my faded eyes.
   The wind had blown above me, and the rain
   Had fall'n upon me, and the gilded snake
   Had nestled in this bosomthrone of love,
   But I had been at rest for evermore.
   Long time entrancement held me: all too soon,
   Life (like a wanton too-officious friend
   Who will not hear denial, vain and rude
   With proffer of unwished for services)
   Entering all the avenues of sense,
   Pass'd thro' into his citadel, the brain
   With hated warmth of apprehensiveness:
   And first the chillness of the mountain stream
   Smote on my brow, and then I seem'd to hear
   Its murmur, as the drowning seaman hears,
   Who with his head below the surface dropt,
   Listens the dreadful murmur indistinct
   Of the confused seas, and knoweth not
   Beyond the sound he lists: and then came in
   O'erhead the white light of the weary moon,
   Diffused and molten into flaky cloud.
   Was my sight drunk, that it did shape to me
   Him who should own that name? or had my fancy
   So lethargised discernment in the sense,
   That she did act the step-dame to mine eyes,
   Warping their nature, till they minister'd
   Unto her swift conceits? 'Twere better thus
   If so be that the memory of that sound
   With mighty evocation, had updrawn
   The fashion and the phantasm of the form
   It should attach to. There was no such thing.--
   It was the man she loved, even Lionel,
   The lover Lionel, the happy Lionel,
   All joy; who drew the happy atmosphere
   Of my unhappy sighs, fed with my tears,
   To him the honey dews of orient hope.
   Oh! rather had some loathly ghastful brow,
   Half-bursten from the shroud, in cere cloth bound,
   The dead skin withering on the fretted bone,
   The very spirit of Paleness made still paler
   By the shuddering moonlight, fix'd his eyes on mine
   Horrible with the anger and the heat
   Of the remorseful soul alive within,
   And damn'd unto his loathed tenement.
   Methinks I could have sooner met that gaze!
   Oh, how her choice did leap forth from his eyes!
   Oh, how her love did clothe itself in smiles
   About his lips! This was the very arch-mock
   And insolence of uncontrolled Fate,
   When the effect weigh'd seas upon my head
   To twit me with the cause.
                           Why how was this?
   Could he not walk what paths he chose, nor breathe
   What airs he pleased! Was not the wide world free,
   With all her interchange of hill and plain
   To him as well as me? I know not, faith:
   But Misery, like a fretful, wayward child,
   Refused to look his author in the face,
   Must he come my way too? Was not the South,
   The East, the West, all open, if he had fall'n
   In love in twilight? Why should he come my way,
   Robed in those robes of light I must not wear,
   With that great crown of beams about his brows?
   Come like an angel to a damned soul?
   To tell him of the bliss he had with God;
   Come like a careless and a greedy heir,
   That scarce can wait the reading of the will
   Before he takes possession? Was mine a mood
   To be invaded rudely, and not rather
   A sacred, secret, unapproached woe
   Unspeakable? I was shut up with grief;
   She took the body of my past delight,
   Narded, and swathed and balm'd it for herself,
   And laid it in a new-hewn sepulchre,
   Where man had never lain. I was led mute
   Into her temple like a sacrifice;
   I was the high-priest in her holiest place,
   Not to be loudly broken in upon.
   Oh! friend, thoughts deep and heavy as these well-nigh
   O'erbore the limits of my brain; but he
   Bent o'er me, and my neck his arm upstay'd
   From earth. I thought it was an adder's fold,
   And once I strove to disengage myself,
   But fail'd, I was so feeble. She was there too:
   She bent above me too: her cheek was pale,
   Oh! very fair and pale: rare pity had stolen
   The living bloom away, as tho' a red rose
   Should change into a white one suddenly.
   Her eyes, I saw, were full of tears in the morn,
   And some few drops of that distressful rain
   Being wafted on the wind, drove in my sight,
   And being there they did break forth afresh
   In a new birth, immingled with my own,
   And still bewept my grief. Keeping unchanged
   The purport of their coinage. Her long ringlets,
   Drooping and beaten with the plaining wind,
   Did brush my forehead in their to-and-fro:
   For in the sudden anguish of her heart
   Loosed from their simple thrall they had flowed abroad,
   And onward floating in a full, dark wave,
   Parted on either side her argent neck,
   Mantling her form half way. She, when I woke,
   After my refluent health made tender quest
   Unanswer'd, for I spoke not: for the sound
   Of that dear voice so musically low,
   And now first heard with any sense of pain,
   As it had taken life away before,
   Choked all the syllables that in my throat
   Strove to uprise, laden with mournful thanks,
   From my full heart: and ever since that hour,
   My voice hath somewhat falter'd--and what wonder
   That when hope died, part of her eloquence
   Died with her? He, the blissful lover, too,
   From his great hoard of happiness distill'd
   Some drops of solace; like a vain rich man,
   That, having always prosper'd in the world,
   Folding his hands deals comfortable words
   To hearts wounded for ever; yet, in truth,
   Fair speech was his and delicate of phrase,
   Falling in whispers on the sense, address'd
   More to the inward than the outward ear,
   As rain of the midsummer midnight soft
   Scarce-heard, recalling fragrance and the green
   Of the dead spring--such as in other minds
   Had film'd the margents of the recent wound.
   And why was I to darken their pure love,
   If, as I knew, they two did love each other,
   Because my own was darken'd? Why was I
   To stand within the level of their hopes,
   Because my hope was widow'd, like the cur
   In the child's adage? Did I love Camilla?
   Ye know that I did love her: to this present
   My full-orb'd love hath waned not. Did I love her,
   And could I look upon her tearful eyes?
   Tears wept for me; for me--weep at my grief?
   What had _she_ done to weep--let my heart
   Break rather--whom the gentlest airs of heaven
   Should kiss with an unwonted gentleness.
   Her love did murder mine; what then? she deem'd
   I wore a brother's mind: she call'd me brother:
   She told me all her love: she shall not weep.
 
   The brightness of a burning thought awhile
   Battailing with the glooms of my dark will,
   Moonlike emerged, lit up unto itself,
   Upon the depths of an unfathom'd woe,
   Reflex of action, starting up at once,
   As men do from a vague and horrid dream,
   And throwing by all consciousness of self,
   In eager haste I shook him by the hand;
   Then flinging myself down upon my knees
   Even where the grass was warm where I had lain,
   I pray'd aloud to God that he would hold
   The hand of blessing over Lionel,
   And her whom he would make his wedded wife,
   Camilla! May their days be golden days,
   And their long life a dream of linked love,
   From which may rude Death never startle them,
   But grow upon them like a glorious vision
   Of unconceived and awful happiness,
   Solemn but splendid, full of shapes and sounds,
   Swallowing its precedent in victory.
   Let them so love that men and boys may say,
   Lo! how they love each other! till their love
   Shall ripen to a proverb unto all,
   Known when their faces are forgot in the land.
   And as for me, Camilla, as for me,
   Think not thy tears will make my name grow green,--
   The dew of tears is an unwholesome dew.
   The course of Hope is dried,--the life o' the plant--
   They will but sicken the sick plant more.
   Deem then I love thee but as brothers do,
   So shalt thou love me still as sisters do;
   Or if thou dream'st aught farther, dream but how
   I could have loved thee, had there been none else
   To love as lovers, loved again by thee.
 
   Or this, or somewhat like to this, I spoke,
   When I did see her weep so ruefully;
   For sure my love should ne'er induce the front
   And mask of Hate, whom woful ailments
   Of unavailing tears and heart deep moans
   Feed and envenom, as the milky blood
   Of hateful herbs a subtle-fanged snake.
   Shall Love pledge Hatred in her bitter draughts,
   And batten on his poisons? Love forbid!
   Love passeth not the threshold of cold Hate,
   And Hate is strange beneath the roof of Love.
   O Love, if thou be'st Love, dry up these tears
   Shed for the love of Love; for tho' mine image,
   The subject of thy power, be cold in her,
   Yet, like cold snow, it melteth in the source
   Of these sad tears, and feeds their downward flow.
   So Love, arraign'd to judgment and to death,
   Received unto himself a part of blame.
   Being guiltless, as an innocent prisoner,
   Who when the woful sentence hath been past,
   And all the clearness of his fame hath gone
   Beneath the shadow of the curse of men,
   First falls asleep in swoon. Wherefrom awaked
   And looking round upon his tearful friends,
   Forthwith and in his agony conceives
   A shameful sense as of a cleaving crime--
   For whence without some guilt should such grief be?
   So died that hour, and fell into the abysm
   Of forms outworn, but not to be outworn,
   Who never hail'd another worth the Life
   That made it sensible. So died that hour,
   Like odour wrapt into the winged wind
   Borne into alien lands and far away.
   There be some hearts so airy-fashioned,
   That in the death of love, if e'er they loved,
   On that sharp ridge of utmost doom ride highly
   Above the perilous seas of change and chance;
   Nay, more, holds out the lights of cheerfulness;
   As the tall ship, that many a dreary year
   Knit to some dismal sandbank far at sea,
   All through the lifelong hours of utter dark,
   Showers slanting light upon the dolorous wave.
   For me all other Hopes did sway from that
   Which hung the frailest: falling, they fell too,
   Crush'd link on link into the beaten earth,
   And Love did walk with banish'd Hope no more,
   It was ill-done to part ye, Sisters fair;
   Love's arms were wreathed about the neck of Hope,
   And Hope kiss'd Love, and Love drew in her breath
   In that close kiss, and drank her whisper'd tales.
   They said that Love would die when Hope was gone,
   And Love mourned long, and sorrowed after Hope;
   At last she sought out memory, and they trod
   The same old paths where Love had walked with Hope,
   And Memory fed the soul of Love with tears.
 
   II
 
   From that time forth I would not see her more,
   But many weary moons I lived alone--
   Alone, and in the heart of the great forest.
   Sometimes upon the hills beside the sea
   All day I watched the floating isles of shade,
   And sometimes on the shore, upon the sands
   Insensibly I drew her name, until
   The meaning of the letters shot into
   My brain: anon the wanton billow wash'd
   Them over, till they faded like my love.
   The hollow caverns heard me--the black brooks
   Of the mid-forest heard me--the soft winds,
   Laden with thistledown and seeds of flowers,
   Paused in their course to hear me, for my voice
   Was all of thee: the merry linnet knew me,
   The squirrel knew me, and the dragon-fly
   Shot by me like a flash of purple fire.
   The rough briar tore my bleeding palms; the hemlock,
   Brow high, did strike my forehead as I pas'd;
   Yet trod I not the wild-flower in my path,
   Nor bruised the wild-bird's egg.
                         Was this the end?
   Why grew we then together i' the same plot?
   Why fed we the same fountain? drew the same sun?
   Why were our mothers branches of one stem?
   Why were we one in all things, save in that
   Where to have been one had been the roof and crown
   Of all I hoped and fear'd? if that same nearness
   Were father to this distance, and that _one_
   Vauntcourier this _double_? If affection
   Living slew Love, and Sympathy hew'd out
   The bosom-sepulchre of Sympathy.
 
   Chiefly I sought the cavern and the hill
   Where last we roam'd together, for the sound
   Of the loud stream was pleasant, and the wind
   Came wooingly with violet smells. Sometimes
   All day I sat within the cavern-mouth,
   Fixing my eyes on those three cypress-cones
   Which spired above the wood; and with mad hand
   Tearing the bright leaves of the ivy-screen,
   I cast them in the noisy brook beneath,
   And watch'd them till they vanished from my sight
   Beneath the bower of wreathed eglantines:
   And all the fragments of the living rock,
   (Huge splinters, which the sap of earliest showers,
   Or moisture of the vapour, left in clinging,
   When the shrill storm-blast feeds it from behind,
   And scatters it before, had shatter'd from
   The mountain, till they fell, and with the shock
   Half dug their own graves), in mine agony,
   Did I make bear of all the deep rich moss
   Wherewith the dashing runnel in the spring
   Had liveried them all over. In my brain
   The spirit seem'd to flag from thought to thought,
   Like moonlight wandering through a mist: my blood
   Crept like the drains of a marsh thro' all my body;
   The motions of my heart seem'd far within me,
   Unfrequent, low, as tho' it told its pulses;
   And yet it shook me, that my frame did shudder,
   As it were drawn asunder by the rack.
   But over the deep graves of Hope and Fear,
   The wreck of ruin'd life and shatter'd thought,
   Brooded one master-passion evermore,
   Like to a low hung and a fiery sky
   Above some great metropolis, earth shock'd
   Hung round with ragged-rimmed burning folds,
   Embathing all with wild and woful hues--
   Great hills of ruins, and collapsed masses
   Of thunder-shaken columns, indistinct
   And fused together in the tyrannous light.
 
   So gazed I on the ruins of that thought
   Which was the playmate of my youth--for which
   I lived and breathed: the dew, the sun, the rain,
   Unto the growth of body and of mind;
   The blood, the breath, the feeling and the motion,
   The slope into the current of my years,
   Which drove them onward--made them sensible;
   The precious jewel of my honour'd life,
   Erewhile close couch'd in golden happiness,
   Now proved counterfeit, was shaken out,
   And, trampled on, left to its own decay.
 
 
 
 
 The Lover's Tale
 
   Sometimes I thought Camilla was no more,
   Some one had told me she was dead, and ask'd me
   If I would see her burial: then I seem'd
   To rise, and thro' the forest-shadow borne
   With more than mortal swiftness, I ran down
   The sleepy sea-bank, till I came upon
   The rear of a procession, curving round
   The silver-sheeted bay: in front of which
   Six stately virgins, all in white, upbare
   A broad earth-sweeping pall of whitest lawn,
   Wreathed round the bier with garlands: in the distance,
   From out the yellow woods, upon the hill,
   Look'd forth the summit and the pinnacles
   Of a grey steeple. All the pageantry,
   Save those six virgins which upheld the bier,
   Were stoled from head to foot in flowing black;
   One walk'd abreast with me, and veiled his brow,
   And he was loud in weeping and in praise
   Of the departed: a strong sympathy
   Shook all my soul: I flung myself upon him
   In tears and cries: I told him all my love,
   How I had loved her from the first; whereat
   He shrunk and howl'd, and from his brow drew back
   His hand to push me from him; and the face
   The very face and form of Lionel,
   Flash'd through my eyes into my innermost brain,
   And at his feet I seemed to faint and fall,
   To fall and die away. I could not rise,
   Albeit I strove to follow. They pass'd on,
   The lordly Phantasms; in their floating folds
   They pass'd and were no more: but I had fall'n
   Prone by the dashing runnel on the grass.
 
   Always th' inaudible, invisible thought
   Artificer and subject, lord and slave
   Shaped by the audible and visible,
   Moulded the audible and visible;
   All crisped sounds of wave, and leaf and wind,
   Flatter'd the fancy of my fading brain;
   The storm-pavilion'd element, the wood,
   The mountain, the three cypresses, the cave,
   Were wrought into the tissue of my dream.
   The moanings in the forest, the loud stream,
   Awoke me not, but were a part of sleep;
   And voices in the distance, calling to me,
   And in my vision bidding me dream on,
   Like sounds within the twilight realms of dreams,
   Which wander round the bases of the hills,
   And murmur in the low-dropt eaves of sleep,
   But faint within the portals. Oftentimes
   The vision had fair prelude, in the end
   Opening on darkness, stately vestibules
   To cares and shows of Death; whether the mind,
   With a revenge even to itself unknown,
   Made strange division of its suffering
   With her, whom to have suffering view'd had been
   Extremest pain; or that the clear-eyed Spirit,
   Being blasted in the Present, grew at length
   Prophetical and prescient of whate'er
   The Future had in store; or that which most
   Enchains belief, the sorrow of my spirit
   Was of so wide a compass it took in
   All I had loved, and my dull agony.
   Ideally to her transferred, became
   Anguish intolerable.
                  The day waned;
   Alone I sat with her: about my brow
   Her warm breath floated in the utterance
   Of silver-chorded tones: her lips were sunder'd
   With smiles of tranquil bliss, which broke in light
   Like morning from her eyes--her eloquent eyes
   (As I have seen them many hundred times),
   Fill'd all with clear pure fire, thro' mine down rain'd
   Their spirit-searching splendours. As a vision
   Unto a haggard prisoner, iron-stay'd
   In damp and dismal dungeons underground
   Confined on points of faith, when strength is shock'd
   With torment, and expectancy of worse
   Upon the morrow, thro' the ragged walls,
   All unawares before his half-shut eyes,
   Comes in upon him in the dead of night,
   And with th' excess of sweetness and of awe,
   Makes the heart tremble, and the eyes run over
   Upon his steely gyves; so those fair eyes
   Shone on my darkness forms which ever stood
   Within the magic cirque of memory,
   Invisible but deathless, waiting still
   The edict of the will to reassume
   The semblance of those rare realities
   Of which they were the mirrors. Now the light,
   Which was their life, burst through the cloud of thought
   Keen, irrepressible.
                         It was a room
   Within the summer-house of which I spoke,
   Hung round with paintings of the sea, and one
   A vessel in mid-ocean, her heaved prow
   Clambering, the mast bent, and the revin wind
   In her sail roaring. From the outer day,
   Betwixt the closest ivies came a broad
   And solid beam of isolated light,
   Crowded with driving atomies, and fell
   Slanting upon that picture, from prime youth
   Well-known, well-loved. She drew it long ago
   Forth gazing on the waste and open sea,
   One morning when the upblown billow ran
   Shoreward beneath red clouds, and I had pour'd
   Into the shadowing pencil's naked forms
   Colour and life: it was a bond and seal
   Of friendship, spoken of with tearful smiles;
   A monument of childhood and of love,
   The poesy of childhood; my lost love
   Symbol'd in storm. We gazed on it together
   In mute and glad remembrance, and each heart
   Grew closer to the other, and the eye
   Was riveted and charm-bound, gazing like
   The Indian on a still-eyed snake, low crouch'd
   A beauty which is death, when all at once
   That painted vessel, as with inner life,
   'Gan rock and heave upon that painted sea;
   An earthquake, my loud heartbeats, made the ground
   Roll under us, and all at once soul, life,
   And breath, and motion, pass'd and flow'd away
   To those unreal billows: round and round
   A whirlwind caught and bore us; mighty gyves,
   Rapid and vast, of hissing spray wind-driven
   Far through the dizzy dark. Aloud she shriek'd--
   My heart was cloven with pain. I wound my arms
   About her: we whirl'd giddily: the wind
   Sung: but I clasp'd her without fear: her weight
   Shrank in my grasp, and over my dim eyes
   And parted lips which drank her breath, down hung
   The jaws of Death: I, screaming, from me flung
   The empty phantom: all the sway and whirl
   Of the storm dropt to windless calm, and I
   Down welter'd thro' the dark ever and ever.
 
 
 
 
 Index to First Lines
 
 
 A gate and a field half ploughed
 All thoughts, all creeds, all dreams, are true
 Angels have talked with him and showed him thrones
 As when a man, that sails in a balloon
 Blow ye the trumpets, gather from afar
 But she tarries in her place
 Check every outflash, every ruder sally
 Could I outwear my present state of woe
 Ere yet my heart was sweet Love's tomb
 Every day hath its night
 First drink a health, this solemn night
 God bless our Prince and Bride
 Heaven weeps above the earth all night
 Here far away, seen from the topmost cliff
 His eyes in eclipse
 Home they brought him slain with spears
 How much I love this writer's manly style
 How often, when a child I lay reclined
 I am any man's suitor
 I stood on a tower in the wet
 I stood upon the Mountain which o'erlooks
 I' the glooming light
 Me my own fate to lasting sorrow doometh
 My Rosalind, my Rosalind
 O darling room, my heart's delight
 Oh, Beauty, passing beauty! sweetest sweet!
 Oh, go not yet, my love
 O maiden fresher than the first green leaf
 O sad _No more_! O sweet _No more_
 O thou whose fringed lids I gaze upon
 Rise, Britons, rise, if manhood be not dead
 Sainted Juliet! dearest name
 Shall the hag Evil die with the child of Good
 Sure never yet was Antelope
 The lintwhite and the throstlecock
 The Northwind fall'n in the new starred night
 The pallid thunderstricken sigh for gain
 There are three things that fill my heart with sighs
 Therefore your halls, your ancient colleges
 There is no land like England
 The varied earth, the moving heaven
 Thou, from the first, unborn, undying love
 Though Night hath climbed her peak
 Two bees within a chrystal flowerbell rocked
 Voice of the summerwind
 We have had enough of motion
 We know him, out of Shakespeare's art
 What time I wasted youthful hours
 Where is the Giant of the Sun, which stood
 Who can say
 Who fears to die? Who fears to die
 With roses musky breathed
 You cast to ground the hope which once was mine
 You did late review my lays
 Your ringlets, your ringlets
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Suppressed Poems of Alfred Lord

 
 
 
 Produced by David Starner
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LADY CLARE
 
 By Alfred Tennyson
 
 
 22 illustrations by Alfred Fredericks,
                     Granville Perkins,
                     Frederic B. Schell,
                     Edmund H. Garrett,
                     F. S. Church
                     and Harry Fenn
 
 
 LIST OF ILLUSTRATIONS:
 
 Lady Clare, by Alfred Fredericks
 
 Lady Clare, by Alfred Fredericks
 
 Headpiece, by Edmund H. Garrett
 
 Vignette, by Edmund H. Garrett
 
 "It was the time when lilies blow", by Frederic B. Schnell
 
 "Lily-white doe", by Frederic B. Schnell
 
 "I trow they did not part in scorn", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "He does not love me for my birth", by Frederic B. Schnell
 
 "In came old Alice the nurse", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "'Oh, God be thanked!' said Alice the nurse", by Granville Perkins
 
 "Are ye out of your mind, my nurse, my nurse", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "Falsely, falsely have ye done", by Frederic B. Schnell
 
 "'If I'm a beggar born,' she said", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "'Nay now, my child.' said Alice the nurse", by Granville Perkins
 
 "Yet give one kiss to your mother, dear!", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "She clad herself in a russet gown", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "The lily-white doe Lord Ronald had brought", by F. S. Church
 
 "Down stepped Lord Ronald from his tower", by Granville Perkins
 
 "If I come dressed like a village maid", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "'Play me no tricks,' said Lord Ronald", by Edmund H. Garrett
 
 "Oh, and proudly stood she up", by Harry Fenn
 
 "He laughed a laugh of merry score", by Alfred Fredericks
 
 "If you are not the heiress born", by Edmund H. Garrett
 
 
 
 
 LADY CLARE
 
 It was the time when lilies blow,
 And clouds are highest up in air.
 Lord Ronald brought a lily-white doe
 To give his cousin, Lady Clare.
 
 I trow they did not part in scorn:
 Lovers long betrothed were they;
 They two will wed the morrow morn;
 God's blessing on the day!
 
 "He does not love me for my birth
 Nor for my lands so broad and fair;
 He loves me for my own true worth,
 And that is well," said Lady Clare.
 
 In there came old Alice the nurse,
 Said, "Who was this that went from thee?"
 "It was my cousin," said Lady Clare;
 "To-morrow he weds with me."
 
 "Oh, God be thanked!" said Alice the nurse,
 "That all comes round so just and fair:
 Lord Ronald is heir of all your lands,
 And you are not the Lady Clare."
 
 "Are ye out of your mind, my nurse, my nurse,"
 Said Lady Clare, "that ye speak so wild?"
 "As God's above," said Alice the nurse,
 "I speak the truth: you are my child.
 
 The old earl's daughter died at my breast;
 I speak the truth, as I live by bread!
 I buried her like my own sweet child,
 And put my child in her stead."
 
 "Falsely, falsely have ye done,
 O mother," she said, "if this be true,
 To keep the best man under the sun
 So many years from his due."
 
 "Nay now, my child," said Alice the nurse,
 "But keep the secret for your life,
 And all you have will be Lord Ronald's,
 When you are man and wife."
 
 "If I'm a beggar born," she said
 "I will speak out, for I dare not lie,
 Pull off, pull off the brooch of gold,
 And fling the diamond necklace by."
 
 "Nay now, my child," said Alice the nurse,
 "But keep the secret all you can."
 She said, "Not so; but I will know
 If there be any faith in man."
 
 "Nay now, what faith?" said Alice the nurse,
 "The man will cleave unto his right."
 "And he shall have it," the lady replied,
 "Though I should die to-night."
 
 "Yet give one kiss to your mother, dear!
 Alas, my child! I sinned for thee."
 "O mother, mother, mother," she said,
 "So strange it seems to me!
 
 "Yet here's a kiss for my mother dear,
 My mother dear, if this be so,
 And lay your hand upon my head,
 And bless me, mother, ere I go."
 
 She clad herself in a russen gown,
 She was no longer Lady Clare:
 She went by dale, and she went by down,
 With a single rose in her hair.
 
 The lily-white doe Lord Ronald had brought
 Leapt up from where she lay.
 Dropped her head in the maiden's hand.
 And followed her all the way.
 
 Down stepped Lord Ronald from his tower:
 "O Lady Clare, you shame your worth!
 Why come you dressed like a village maid,
 That are the flower of the earth?"
 
 "If I come dressed like a village maid,
 I am but as my fortunes are:
 I am a beggar born," she said,
 "And not the Lady Clare."
 
 "Play me no tricks," said Lord Ronald,
 "For I am yours in word and in deed;
 Play me no tricks," said Lord Ronald,
 "Your riddle is hard to read."
 
 Oh, and proudly stood she up!
 Her heart within her did not fail:
 She looked into Lord Ronald's eyes,
 And told him all her nurse's tale.
 
 He laughed a laugh of merry scorn:
 He turned and kissed her where she stood;
 "If you are not the heiress born,
 And I," said he, "the next in blood--
 
 "If you are not the heiress born,
 And I," said he, "the lawful heir,
 We two will wed to-morrow morn,
 And you shall still be Lady Clare."
 
 Finis
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Ted Garvin and the Distributed Proofreading Team
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE LAST TOURNAMENT
 
 BY
 
 ALFRED TENNYSON, D.C.L.,
 
 POET-LAUREATE
 
 AUTHOR'S EDITION
 
 FROM ADVANCE SHEETS
 
 This poem forms one of the "Idyls of the King." Its place
 is between "Pelleas" and "Guinevere."
 
 BY ALFRED TENNYSON,
 
 POET LAUREATE
 
    Dagonet, the fool, whom Gawain in his moods
  Had made mock-knight of Arthur's Table Round,
  At Camelot, high above the yellowing woods,
  Danced like a wither'd leaf before the Hall.
  And toward him from the Hall, with harp in hand,
  And from the crown thereof a carcanet
  Of ruby swaying to and fro, the prize
  Of Tristram in the jousts of yesterday,
  Came Tristram, saying, "Why skip ye so, Sir Fool?"
 
    For Arthur and Sir Lancelot riding once
  Far down beneath a winding wall of rock
  Heard a child wail. A stump of oak half-dead,
  From roots like some black coil of carven snakes
  Clutch'd at the crag, and started thro' mid-air
  Bearing an eagle's nest: and thro' the tree
  Rush'd ever a rainy wind, and thro' the wind
  Pierced ever a child's cry: and crag and tree
  Scaling, Sir Lancelot from the perilous nest,
  This ruby necklace thrice around her neck,
  And all unscarr'd from beak or talon, brought
  A maiden babe; which Arthur pitying took,
  Then gave it to his Queen to rear: the Queen
  But coldly acquiescing, in her white arms
  Received, and after loved it tenderly,
  And named it Nestling; so forgot herself
  A moment, and her cares; till that young life
  Being smitten in mid-heaven with mortal cold
  Past from her; and in time the carcanet
  Vext her with plaintive memories of the child:
  So she, delivering it to Arthur, said,
  "Take thou the jewels of this dead innocence,
  And make them, an thou wilt, a tourney-prize."
 
    To whom the King, "Peace to thine eagle-borne
  Dead nestling, and this honor after death,
  Following thy will! but, O my Queen, I muse
  Why ye not wear on arm, or neck, or zone,
  Those diamonds that I rescued from the tarn,
  And Lancelot won, methought, for thee to wear."
 
    "Would rather ye had let them fall," she cried,
  "Plunge and be lost--ill-fated as they were,
  A bitterness to me!--ye look amazed,
  Not knowing they were lost as soon as given--
  Slid from my hands, when I was leaning out
  Above the river--that unhappy child
  Past in her barge: but rosier luck will go
  With these rich jewels, seeing that they came
  Not from the skeleton of a brother-slayer,
  But the sweet body of a maiden babe.
  Perchance--who knows?--the purest of thy knights
  May win them for the purest of my maids."
 
    She ended, and the cry of a great jousts
  With trumpet-blowings ran on all the ways
  From Camelot in among the faded fields
  To furthest towers; and everywhere the knights
  Arm'd for a day of glory before the King.
 
    But on the hither side of that loud morn
  Into the hall stagger'd, his visage ribb'd
  From ear to ear with dogwhip-weals, his nose
  Bridge-broken, one eye out, and one hand off,
  And one with shatter'd fingers dangling lame,
  A churl, to whom indignantly the King,
  "My churl, for whom Christ died, what evil beast
  Hath drawn his claws athwart thy face? or fiend?
  Man was it who marr'd Heaven's image in thee thus?"
 
    Then, sputtering thro' the hedge of splinter'd teeth,
  Yet strangers to the tongue, and with blunt stump
  Pitch-blacken'd sawing the air, said the maim'd churl,
  "He took them and he drave them to his tower--
  Some hold he was a table-knight of thine--
  A hundred goodly ones--the Red Knight, he--
 
  "Lord, I was tending swine, and the Red Knight
  Brake in upon me and drave them to his tower;
  And when I call'd upon thy name as one
  That doest right by gentle and by churl,
  Maim'd me and maul'd, and would outright have slain,
  Save that he sware me to a message, saying--
  'Tell thou the King and all his liars, that I
  Have founded my Round Table in the North,
  And whatsoever his own knights have sworn
  My knights have sworn the counter to it--and say
  My tower is full of harlots, like his court,
  But mine are worthier, seeing they profess
  To be none other than themselves--and say
  My knights are all adulterers like his own,
  But mine are truer, seeing they profess
  To be none other; and say his hour is come,
  The heathen are upon him, his long lance
  Broken, and his Excalibur a straw.'"
 
    Then Arthur turn'd to Kay the seneschal,
  "Take thou my churl, and tend him curiously
  Like a king's heir, till all his hurts be whole.
  The heathen--but that ever-climbing wave,
  Hurl'd back again so often in empty foam,
  Hath lain for years at rest--and renegades,
  Thieves, bandits, leavings of confusion, whom
  The wholesome realm is purged of otherwhere,--
  Friends, thro' your manhood and your fealty,--now
  Make their last head like Satan in the North.
  My younger knights, new-made, in whom your flower
  Waits to be solid fruit of golden deeds,
  Move with me toward their quelling, which achieved,
  The loneliest ways are safe from shore to shore.
  But thou, Sir Lancelot, sitting in my place
  Enchair'd to-morrow, arbitrate the field;
  For wherefore shouldst thou care to mingle with it,
  Only to yield my Queen her own again?
  Speak, Lancelot, thou art silent: is it well?"
 
         *       *       *       *       *
 
    Thereto Sir Lancelot answer'd, "It is well:
  Yet better if the King abide, and leave
  The leading of his younger knights to me.
  Else, for the King has will'd it, it is well."
 
          *       *       *       *       *
 
    Then Arthur rose and Lancelot follow'd him,
  And while they stood without the doors, the King
  Turn'd to him saying, "Is it then so well?
  Or mine the blame that oft I seem as he
  Of whom was written, 'a sound is in his ears'--
  The foot that loiters, bidden go,--the glance
  That only seems half-loyal to command,--
  A manner somewhat fall'n from reverence--
  Or have I dream'd the bearing of our knights
  Tells of a manhood ever less and lower?
  Or whence the fear lest this my realm, uprear'd,
  By noble deeds at one with noble vows,
  From flat confusion and brute violences,
  Reel back into the beast, and be no more?"
 
         *       *       *       *       *
 
    He spoke, and taking all his younger knights,
  Down the slope city rode, and sharply turn'd
  North by the gate. In her high bower the Queen,
  Working a tapestry, lifted up her head,
  Watch'd her lord pass, and knew not that she sigh'd.
  Then ran across her memory the strange rhyme
  Of bygone Merlin, "Where is he who knows?
  From the great deep to the great deep he goes."
 
         *       *       *       *       *
 
    But when the morning of a tournament,
  By these in earnest those in mockery call'd
  The Tournament of the Dead Innocence,
  Brake with a wet wind blowing, Lancelot,
  Round whose sick head all night, like birds of prey,
  The words of Arthur flying shriek'd, arose,
  And down a streetway hung with folds of pure
  White samite, and by fountains running wine,
  Where children sat in white with cups of gold,
  Moved to the lists, and there, with slow sad steps
  Ascending, fill'd his double-dragon'd chair.
 
         *       *       *       *       *
 
    He glanced and saw the stately galleries,
  Dame, damsel, each thro' worship of their Queen
  White-robed in honor of the stainless child,
  And some with scatter'd jewels, like a bank
  Of maiden snow mingled with sparks of fire.
  He lookt but once, and veil'd his eyes again.
 
          *       *       *       *       *
 
    The sudden trumpet sounded as in a dream
  To ears but half-awaked, then one low roll
  Of Autumn thunder, and the jousts began:
  And ever the wind blew, and yellowing leaf
  And gloom and gleam, and shower and shorn plume
  Went down it. Sighing weariedly, as one
  Who sits and gazes on a faded fire,
  When all the goodlier guests are past away,
  Sat their great umpire, looking o'er the lists.
  He saw the laws that ruled the tournament
  Broken, but spake not; once, a knight cast down
  Before his throne of arbitration cursed
  The dead babe and the follies of the King;
  And once the laces of a helmet crack'd,
  And show'd him, like a vermin in its hole,
  Modred, a narrow face: anon he heard
  The voice that billow'd round the barriers roar
  An ocean-sounding welcome to one knight,
  But newly-enter'd, taller than the rest,
  And armor'd all in forest green, whereon
  There tript a hundred tiny silver deer,
  And wearing but a holly-spray for crest,
  With ever-scattering berries, and on shield
  A spear, a harp, a bugle--Tristram--late
  From overseas in Brittany return'd,
  And marriage with a princess of that realm,
  Isolt the White--Sir Tristram of the Woods--
  Whom Lancelot knew, had held sometime with pain
  His own against him, and now yearn'd to shake
  The burthen off his heart in one full shock
  With Tristram ev'n to death: his strong hands gript
  And dinted the gilt dragons right and left,
  Until he groan'd for wrath--so many of those,
  That ware their ladies' colors on the casque,
  Drew from before Sir Tristram to the bounds,
  And there with gibes and nickering mockeries
  Stood, while he mutter'd, "Craven chests! O shame!
  What faith have these in whom they sware to love?
  The glory of our Round Table is no more."
 
         *       *       *       *       *
 
    So Tristram won, and Lancelot gave, the gems,
  Not speaking other word than "Hast thou won?
  Art thou the purest, brother? See, the hand
  Wherewith thou takest this is red!" to whom
  Tristram, half plagued by Lancelot's languorous mood,
  Made answer, "Ay, but wherefore toss me this
  Like a dry bone cast to some hungry hound?
  Let be thy fair Queen's fantasy. Strength of heart
  And might of limb, but mainly use and skill,
  Are winners in this pastime of our King.
  My hand--belike the lance hath dript upon it--
  No blood of mine, I trow; but O chief knight,
  Right arm of Arthur in the battlefield,
  Great brother, thou nor I have made the world;
  Be happy in thy fair Queen as I in mine."
  And Tristram round the gallery made his horse
  Caracole; then bow'd his homage, bluntly saying,
  "Fair damsels, each to him who worships each
  Sole Queen of Beauty and of love, behold
  This day my Queen of Beauty is not here."
  Then most of these were mute, some anger'd, one
  Murmuring "All courtesy is dead," and one,
  "The glory of our Round Table is no more."
 
    Then fell thick rain, plume droopt and mantle clung,
  And pettish cries awoke, and the wan day
  Went glooming down in wet and weariness:
  But under her black brows a swarthy dame
  Laught shrilly, crying "Praise the patient saints,
  Our one white day of Innocence hath past,
  Tho' somewhat draggled at the skirt. So be it.
  The snowdrop only, flow'ring thro' the year,
  Would make the world as blank as wintertide.
  Come--let us comfort their sad eyes, our Queen's
  And Lancelot's, at this night's solemnity
  With all the kindlier colors of the field."
 
         *       *       *       *       *
 
    So dame and damsel glitter'd at the feast
  Variously gay: for he that tells the tale
  Liken'd them, saying "as when an hour of cold
  Falls on the mountain in midsummer snows,
  And all the purple slopes of mountain flowers
  Pass under white, till the warm hour returns
  With veer of wind, and all are flowers again;"
  So dame and damsel cast the simple white,
  And glowing in all colors, the live grass,
  Rose-campion, bluebell, kingcup, poppy, glanced
  About the revels, and with mirth so loud
  Beyond all use, that, half-amazed, the Queen,
  And wroth at Tristram and the lawless jousts,
  Brake up their sports, then slowly to her bower
  Parted, and in her bosom pain was lord.
 
         *       *       *       *       *
 
    And little Dagonet on the morrow morn,
  High over all the yellowing Autumn-tide,
  Danced like a wither'd leaf before the hall.
  Then Tristram saying, "Why skip ye so, Sir Fool?"
  Wheel'd round on either heel, Dagonet replied,
  "Belike for lack of wiser company;
  Or being fool, and seeing too much wit
  Makes the world rotten, why, belike I skip
  To know myself the wisest knight of all."
  "Ay, fool," said Tristram, "but 'tis eating dry
  To dance without a catch, a roundelay
  To dance to." Then he twangled on his harp,
  And while he twangled little Dagonet stood,
  Quiet as any water-sodden log
  Stay'd in the wandering warble of a brook;
  But when the twangling ended, skipt again;
  Then being ask'd, "Why skipt ye not, Sir Fool?"
  Made answer, "I had liefer twenty years
  Skip to the broken music of my brains
  Than any broken music ye can make."
  Then Tristram, waiting for the quip to come,
  "Good now, what music have I broken, fool?"
  And little Dagonet, skipping, "Arthur, the king's;
  For when thou playest that air with Queen Isolt,
  Thou makest broken music with thy bride,
  Her daintier namesake down in Brittany--
  And so thou breakest Arthur's music too."
  "Save for that broken music in thy brains,
  Sir Fool," said Tristram, "I would break thy head.
  Fool, I came late, the heathen wars were o'er,
  The life had flown, we sware but by the shell--
  I am but a fool to reason with a fool
  Come, thou art crabb'd and sour: but lean me down,
  Sir Dagonet, one of thy long asses' ears,
  And hearken if my music be not true.
 
    "'Free love--free field--we love but while we may:
  The woods are hush'd, their music is no more:
  The leaf is dead, the yearning past away:
  New leaf, new life--the days of frost are o'er:
  New life, new love to suit the newer day:
  New loves are sweet as those that went before:
  Free love,--free field--we love but while we may.'
 
    "Ye might have moved slow-measure to my tune,
  Not stood stockstill. I made it in the woods,
  And found it ring as true as tested gold."
 
    But Dagonet with one foot poised in his hand,
  "Friend, did ye mark that fountain yesterday
  Made to run wine?--but this had run itself
  All out like a long life to a sour end--
  And them that round it sat with golden cups
  To hand the wine to whomsoever came--
  The twelve small damosels white as Innocence,
 
    "In honor of poor Innocence the babe,
  Who left the gems which Innocence the Queen
  Lent to the King, and Innocence the King
  Gave for a prize--and one of those white slips
  Handed her cup and piped, the pretty one,
  'Drink, drink, Sir Fool,' and thereupon I drank,
  Spat--pish--the cup was gold, the draught was mud."
  And Tristram, "Was it muddier than thy gibes?
  Is all the laughter gone dead out of thee?--
  Not marking how the knighthood mock thee, fool--
  'Fear God: honor the king--his one true knight--
  Sole follower of the vows'--for here be they
  Who knew thee swine enow before I came,
  Smuttier than blasted grain: but when the King
  Had made thee fool, thy vanity so shot up
  It frighted all free fool from out thy heart;
  Which left thee less than fool, and less than swine,
  A naked aught--yet swine I hold thee still,
  For I have flung thee pearls, and find thee swine."
 
    And little Dagonet mincing with his feet,
  "Knight, an ye fling those rubies round my neck
  In lieu of hers, I'll hold thou hast some touch
  Of music, since I care not for thy pearls.
  Swine? I have wallow'd, I have wash'd--the world
  Is flesh and shadow--I have had my day.
  The dirty nurse, Experience, in her kind
  Hath foul'd me--an I wallow'd, then I wash'd--
  I have had my day and my philosophies--
  And thank the Lord I am King Arthur's fool.
  Swine, say ye? swine, goats, asses, rams and geese
  Troop'd round a Paynim harper once, who thrumm'd
  On such a wire as musically as thou
  Some such fine song--but never a king's fool."
 
    And Tristram, "Then were swine, goats, asses, geese
  The wiser fools, seeing thy Paynim bard
  Had such a mastery of his mystery
  That he could harp his wife up out of Hell."
 
    Then Dagonet, turning on the ball of his foot,
  "And whither harp'st thou thine? down! and thyself
  Down! and two more: a helpful harper thou,
  That harpest downward! Dost thou know the star
  We call the harp of Arthur up in heaven?"
 
    And Tristram, "Ay, Sir Fool, for when our King
  Was victor wellnigh day by day, the knights,
  Glorying in each new glory, set his name
  High on all hills, and in the signs of heaven."
 
    And Dagonet answer'd, "Ay, and when the land
  Was freed, and the Queen false, ye set yourself
  To babble about him, all to show your wit--
  And whether he were king by courtesy,
  Or king by right--and so went harping down
  The black king's highway, got so far, and grew
  So witty, that ye play'd at ducks and drakes
  With Arthur's vows on the great lake of fire.
  Tuwhoo! do ye see it? do ye see the star?"
  "Nay, fool," said Tristram, "not in open day."
  And Dagonet, "Nay, nor will: I see it and hear.
  It makes a silent music up in heaven,
  And I, and Arthur and the angels hear,
  And then we skip." "Lo, fool," he said, "ye talk
  Fool's treason: is the king thy brother fool?"
  Then little Dagonet clapt his hands and shrill'd,
  "Ay, ay, my brother fool, the king of fools*!
  Conceits himself as God that he can make
  Figs out of thistles, silk from bristles, milk
  From burning spurge, honey from hornet-combs,
  And men from beasts.--Long live the king of fools!"
 
    And down the city Dagonet danced away.
  But thro' the slowly-mellowing avenues
  And solitary passes of the wood
  Rode Tristram toward Lyonesse and the west.
  Before him fled the face of Queen Isolt
  With ruby-circled neck, but evermore
  Past, as a rustle or twitter in the wood
  Made dull his inner, keen his outer eye
  For all that walk'd, or crept, or perched, or flew.
  Anon the face, as, when a gust hath blown,
  Unruffling waters re-collect the shape
  Of one that in them sees himself, return'd;
  But at the slot or fewmets of a deer,
  Or ev'n a fall'n feather, vanish'd again.
 
    So on for all that day from lawn to lawn
  Thro' many a league-long bower he rode. At length
  A lodge of intertwisted beechen-boughs
  Furze-cramm'd, and bracken-rooft, the which himself
  Built for a summer day with Queen Isolt
  Against a shower, dark in the golden grove
  Appearing, sent his fancy back to where
  She lived a moon in that low lodge with him:
  Till Mark her lord had past, the Cornish king,
  With six or seven, when Tristram was away,
  And snatch'd her thence; yet dreading worse than shame
  Her warrior Tristram, spake not any word,
  But bode his hour, devising wretchedness.
 
    And now that desert lodge to Tristram lookt
  So sweet, that, halting, in he past, and sank
  Down on a drift of foliage random-blown;
  But could not rest for musing how to smooth
  And sleek his marriage over to the Queen.
  Perchance in lone Tintagil far from all
  The tonguesters of the court she had not heard.
  But then what folly had sent him overseas
  After she left him lonely here? a name?
  Was it the name of one in Brittany,
  Isolt, the daughter of the King? "Isolt
  Of the white hands" they call'd her: the sweet name
  Allured him first, and then the maid herself,
  Who served him well with those white hands of hers,
  And loved him well, until himself had thought
  He loved her also, wedded easily,
  But left her all as easily, and return'd.
  The black-blue Irish hair and Irish eyes
  Had drawn him home--what marvel? then he laid
  His brows upon the drifted leaf and dream'd.
 
    He seem'd to pace the strand of Brittany
  Between Isolt of Britain and his bride,
  And show'd them both the ruby-chain, and both
  Began to struggle for it, till his Queen
  Graspt it so hard, that all her hand was red.
  Then cried the Breton, "Look, her hand is red!
  These be no rubies, this is frozen blood,
  And melts within her hand--her hand is hot
  With ill desires, but this I gave thee, look,
  Is all as cool and white as any flower."
  Follow'd a rush of eagle's wings, and then
  A whimpering of the spirit of the child,
  Because the twain had spoil'd her carcanet.
 
    He dream'd; but Arthur with a hundred spears
  Rode far, till o'er the illimitable reed,
  And many a glancing plash and sallowy isle,
  The wide-wing'd sunset of the misty marsh
  Glared on a huge machicolated tower
  That stood with open doors, whereout was roll'd
  A roar of riot, as from men secure
  Amid their marshes, ruffians at their ease
  Among their harlot-brides, an evil song.
  "Lo there," said one of Arthur's youth, for there,
  High on a grim dead tree before the tower,
  A goodly brother of The Table Round
  Swung by the neck: and on the boughs a shield
  Showing a shower of blood in a field noir,
  And therebeside a horn, inflamed the knights
  At that dishonor done the gilded spur,
  Till each would clash the shield, and blow the horn.
  But Arthur waved them back: alone he rode.
  Then at the dry harsh roar of the great horn,
  That sent the face of all the marsh aloft
 
    An ever upward-rushing storm and cloud
  Of shriek and plume, the Red Knight heard, and all,
  Even to tipmost lance and topmost helm,
  In blood-red armor sallying, howl'd to the King,
  "The teeth of Hell flay bare and gnash thee flat!--
  Lo! art thou not that eunuch-hearted King
  Who fain had clipt free manhood from the world--
  The woman-worshipper? Yea, God's curse, and I!
  Slain was the brother of my paramour
  By a knight of thine, and I that heard her whine
  And snivel, being eunuch-hearted too,
  Sware by the scorpion-worm that twists in hell,
  And stings itself to everlasting death,
  To hang whatever knight of thine I fought
  And tumbled. Art thou King?--Look to thy life!"
  He ended: Arthur knew the voice; the face
  Wellnigh was helmet-hidden, and the name
  Went wandering somewhere darkling in his mind.
  And Arthur deign'd not use of word or sword,
  But let the drunkard, as he stretch'd from horse
  To strike him, overbalancing his bulk,
  Down from the causeway heavily to the swamp
  Fall, as the crest of some slow-arching wave
  Heard in dead night along that table-shore
  Drops flat, and after the great waters break
  Whitening for half a league, and thin themselves
  Far over sands marbled with moon and cloud.
  From less and less to nothing; thus he fell
  Head-heavy, while the knights, who watch'd him, roar'd
  And shouted and leapt down upon the fall'n;
  There trampled out his face from being known,
  And sank his head in mire, and slimed themselves:
  Nor heard the King for their own cries, but sprang
  Thro' open doors, and swording right and left
  Men, women, on their sodden faces, hurl'd
  The tables over and the wines, and slew
  Till all the rafters rang with woman-yells,
  And all the pavement stream'd with massacre:
  Then, yell with yell echoing, they fired the tower,
  Which half that autumn night, like the live North,
  Red-pulsing up thro' Alioth and Alcor,
  Made all above it, and a hundred meres
  About it, as the water Moab saw
  Come round by the East, and out beyond them flush'd
  The long low dune, and lazy-plunging sea.
 
    So all the ways were safe from shore to shore,
  But in the heart of Arthur pain was lord.
  Then out of Tristram waking the red dream
  Fled with a shout, and that low lodge return'd,
  Mid-forest, and the wind among the boughs.
  He whistled his good warhorse left to graze
  Among the forest greens, vaulted upon him,
  And rode beneath an ever-showering leaf,
  Till one lone woman, weeping near a cross,
  Stay'd him, "Why weep ye?" "Lord," she said, "my man
  Hath left me or is dead;" whereon he thought--
  "What an she hate me now? I would not this.
  What an she love me still? I would not that.
  I know not what I would"--but said to her,--
  "Yet weep not thou, lest, if thy mate return,
  He find thy favor changed and love thee not"--
  Then pressing day by day thro' Lyonesse
  Last in a roky hollow, belling, heard
  The hounds of Mark, and felt the goodly hounds
  Yelp at his heart, but, turning, past and gain'd
  Tintagil, half in sea, and high on land,
  A crown of towers.
 
    Down in a casement sat,
  A low sea-sunset glorying round her hair
  And glossy-throated grace, Isolt the Queen.
  And when she heard the feet of Tristram grind
  The spiring stone that scaled about her tower,
  Flush'd, started, met him at the doors, and there
  Belted his body with her white embrace,
  Crying aloud, "Not Mark--not Mark, my soul!
  The footstep flutter'd me at first: not he:
  Catlike thro' his own castle steals my Mark,
  But warrior-wise thou stridest through his halls
  Who hates thee, as I him--ev'n to the death.
  My soul, I felt my hatred for my Mark
  Quicken within me, and knew that thou wert nigh."
  To whom Sir Tristram smiling, "I am here.
  Let be thy Mark, seeing he is not thine."
 
    And drawing somewhat backward she replied,
  "Can he be wrong'd who is not ev'n his own,
  But save for dread of thee had beaten me,
  Scratch'd, bitten, blinded, marr'd me somehow--Mark?
  What rights are his that dare not strike for them?
  Not lift a hand--not, tho' he found me thus!
  But hearken, have ye met him? hence he went
  To-day for three days' hunting--as he said--
  And so returns belike within an hour.
  Mark's way, my soul!--but eat not thou with him,
  Because he hates thee even more than fears;
  Nor drink: and when thou passest any wood
  Close visor, lest an arrow from the bush
  Should leave me all alone with Mark and hell.
  My God, the measure of my hate for Mark
  Is as the measure of my love for thee."
 
    So, pluck'd one way by hate and one by love,
  Drain'd of her force, again she sat, and spake
  To Tristram, as he knelt before her, saying,
  "O hunter, and O blower of the horn,
  Harper, and thou hast been a rover too,
  For, ere I mated with my shambling king,
  Ye twain had fallen out about the bride
  Of one--his name is out of me--the prize,
  If prize she were--(what marvel--she could see)--
  Thine, friend; and ever since my craven seeks
  To wreck thee villanously: but, O Sir Knight,
  What dame or damsel have ye kneeled to last?"
 
    And Tristram, "Last to my Queen Paramount,
  Here now to my Queen Paramount of love,
  And loveliness, ay, lovelier than when first
  Her light feet fell on our rough Lyonesse,
  Sailing from Ireland."
 
    Softly laugh'd Isolt,
  "Flatter me not, for hath not our great Queen
  My dole of beauty trebled?" and he said,
  "Her beauty is her beauty, and thine thine,
  And thine is more to me--soft, gracious, kind--
  Save when thy Mark is kindled on thy lips
  Most gracious; but she, haughty, ev'n to him,
  Lancelot; for I have seen him wan enow
  To make one doubt if ever the great Queen
  Have yielded him her love."
 
    To whom Isolt,
  "Ah then, false hunter and false harper, thou
  Who brakest thro' the scruple of my bond,
  Calling me thy white hind, and saying to me
  That Guinevere had sinned against the highest,
  And I--misyoked with such a want of man--
  That I could hardly sin against the lowest."
 
    He answer'd, "O my soul, be comforted!
  If this be sweet, to sin in leading-strings,
  If here be comfort, and if ours be sin,
  Crown'd warrant had we for the crowning sin
  That made us happy: but how ye greet me--fear
  And fault and doubt--no word of that fond tale--
  Thy deep heart-yearnings, thy sweet memories
  Of Tristram in that year he was away."
 
    And, saddening on the sudden, spake Isolt,
  "I had forgotten all in my strong joy
  To see thee--yearnings?--ay! for, hour by hour,
  Here in the never-ended afternoon,
  O sweeter than all memories of thee,
  Deeper than any yearnings after thee
  Seem'd those far-rolling, westward-smiling seas,
  Watched from this tower. Isolt of Britain dash'd
  Before Isolt of Brittany on the strand,
  Would that have chill'd her bride-kiss? Wedded her?
  Fought in her father's battles? wounded there?
  The King was all fulfill'd with gratefulness,
  And she, my namesake of the hands, that heal'd
  Thy hurt and heart with unguent and caress--
  Well--can I wish her any huger wrong
  Than having known thee? her too hast thou left
  To pine and waste in those sweet memories?
  O were I not my Mark's, by whom all men
  Are noble, I should hate thee more than love."
 
    And Tristram, fondling her light hands, replied,
  "Grace, Queen, for being loved: she loved me well.
  Did I love her? the name at least I loved.
  Isolt?--I fought his battles, for Isolt!
  The night was dark; the true star set. Isolt!
  The name was ruler of the dark----Isolt?
  Care not for her! patient, and prayerful, meek,
  Pale-blooded, she will yield herself to God."
  And Isolt answer'd, "Yea, and why not I?
  Mine is the larger need, who am not meek,
  Pale-blooded, prayerful. Let me tell thee now.
  Here one black, mute midsummer night I sat
  Lonely, but musing on thee, wondering where,
  Murmuring a light song I had heard thee sing,
  And once or twice I spake thy name aloud.
  Then flash'd a levin-brand; and near me stood,
  In fuming sulphur blue and green, a fiend--
  Mark's way to steal behind one in the dark--
  For there was Mark: 'He has wedded her,' he said,
  Not said, but hiss'd it: then this crown of towers
  So shook to such a roar of all the sky,
  That here in utter dark I swoon'd away,
  And woke again in utter dark, and cried,
  'I will flee hence and give myself to God'--
  And thou wert lying in thy new leman's arms."
 
    Then Tristram, ever dallying with her hand,
  "May God be with thee, sweet, when old and gray,
  And past desire!" a saying that anger'd her.
  "'May God be with thee, sweet, when thou art old,
  And sweet no more to me!' I need Him now.
  For when had Lancelot utter'd aught so gross
  Ev'n to the swineherd's malkin in the mast?
  The greater man, the greater courtesy.
  But thou, thro' ever harrying thy wild beasts--
  Save that to touch a harp, tilt with a lance
  Becomes thee well--art grown wild beast thyself.
  How darest thou, if lover, push me even
  In fancy from thy side, and set me far
  In the gray distance, half a life away,
  Her to be loved no more? Unsay it, unswear!
  Flatter me rather, seeing me so weak,
  Broken with Mark and hate and solitude,
  Thy marriage and mine own, that I should suck
  Lies like sweet wines: lie to me: I believe.
  Will ye not lie? not swear, as there ye kneel,
  And solemnly as when ye sware to him,
  The man of men, our King--My God, the power
  Was once in vows when men believed the King!
  They lied not then, who sware, and thro' their vows
  The King prevailing made his realm:--I say,
  Swear to me thou wilt love me ev'n when old,
  Gray-haired, and past desire, and in despair."
 
    Then Tristram, pacing moodily up and down,
  "Vows! did ye keep the vow ye made to Mark
  More than I mine? Lied, say ye? Nay, but learnt,
  The vow that binds too strictly snaps itself--
  My knighthood taught me this--ay, being snapt--
  We run more counter to the soul thereof
  Than had we never sworn. I swear no more.
  I swore to the great King, and am forsworn.
  For once--ev'n to the height--I honor'd him.
  'Man, is he man at all?' methought, when first
  I rode from our rough Lyonesse, and beheld
  That victor of the Pagan throned in hall--
  His hair, a sun that ray'd from off a brow
  Like hillsnow high in heaven, the steel-blue eyes,
  The golden beard that clothed his lips with light--
  Moreover, that weird legend of his birth,
  With Merlin's mystic babble about his end,
  Amazed me; then, his foot was on a stool
  Shaped as a dragon; he seem'd to me no man,
  But Michael trampling Satan; so I sware,
  Being amazed: but this went by--the vows!
  O ay--the wholesome madness of an hour--
  They served their use, their time; for every knight
  Believed himself a greater than himself,
  And every follower eyed him as a God;
  Till he, being lifted up beyond himself,
  Did mightier deeds than elsewise he had done,
  And so the realm was made; but then their vows--
  First mainly thro' that sullying of our Queen--
  Began to gall the knighthood, asking whence
  Had Arthur right to bind them to himself?
  Dropt down from heaven? wash'd up from out the deep?
  They fail'd to trace him thro' the flesh and blood
  Of our old Kings: whence then? a doubtful lord
  To bind them by inviolable vows,
  Which flesh and blood perforce would violate:
  For feel this arm of mine--the tide within
  Red with free chase and heather-scented air,
  Pulsing full man; can Arthur make me pure
  As any maiden child? lock up my tongue
  From uttering freely what I freely hear?
  Bind me to one? The great world laughs at it.
  And worldling of the world am I, and know
  The ptarmigan that whitens ere his hour
  Wooes his own end; we are not angels here
  Nor shall be: vows--I am woodman of the woods,
  And hear the garnet-headed yaffingale
  Mock them: my soul, we love but while we may;
  And therefore is my love so large for thee,
  Seeing it is not bounded save by love."
 
    Here ending, he moved toward her, and she said,
  "Good: an I turn'd away my love for thee
  To some one thrice as courteous as thyself--
  For courtesy wins woman all as well
  As valor may--but he that closes both
  Is perfect, he is Lancelot--taller indeed,
  Rosier, and comelier, thou--but say I loved
  This knightliest of all knights, and cast thee back
  Thine own small saw 'We love but while we may,'
  Well then, what answer?"
 
    He that while she spake,
  Mindful of what he brought to adorn her with,
  The jewels, had let one finger lightly touch
  The warm white apple of her throat, replied,
  "Press this a little closer, sweet, until--
  Come, I am hunger'd and half-anger'd--meat,
  Wine, wine--and I will love thee to the death,
  And out beyond into the dream to come."
 
    So then, when both were brought to full accord,
  She rose, and set before him all he will'd;
  And after these had comforted the blood
  With meats and wines, and satiated their hearts--
  Now talking of their woodland paradise,
  The deer, the dews, the fern, the founts, the lawns;
  Now mocking at the much ungainliness,
  And craven shifts, and long crane legs of Mark--
  Then Tristram laughing caught the harp, and sang:
 
    "Ay, ay, O ay--the winds that bend the brier!
  A star in heaven, a star within the mere!
  Ay, ay, O ay--a star was my desire,
  And one was far apart, and one was near:
  Ay, ay, O ay--the winds that bow the grass!
  And one was water and one star was fire,
  And one will ever shine and one will pass.
  Ay, ay, O ay--the winds that move the mere."
 
    Then in the light's last glimmer Tristram show'd
  And swung the ruby carcanet. She cried,
  "The collar of some order, which our King
  Hath newly founded, all for thee, my soul,
  For thee, to yield thee grace beyond thy peers."
  "Not so, my Queen," he said, "but the red fruit
  Grown on a magic oak-tree in mid-heaven,
  And won by Tristram as a tourney-prize,
  And hither brought by Tristram for his last
  Love-offering and peace-offering unto thee."
 
    He rose, he turn'd, and flinging round her neck,
  Claspt it; but while he bow'd himself to lay
  Warm kisses in the hollow of her throat,
  Out of the dark, just as the lips had touch'd,
  Behind him rose a shadow and a shriek--
  "Mark's way," said Mark, and clove him thro' the brain.
 
    That night came Arthur home, and while he climb'd,
  All in a death-dumb autumn-dripping gloom,
  The stairway to the hall, and look'd and saw
  The great Queen's bower was dark,--about his feet
  A voice clung sobbing till he question'd it,
  "What art thou?" and the voice about his feet
  Sent up an answer, sobbing, "I am thy fool,
  And I shall never make thee smile again."
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by ddNg E-Ching
 
 
 
 
 
 THE PRINCESS
 
 by Alfred Lord Tennyson
 
 
 
 
 PROLOGUE
 
 
    Sir Walter Vivian all a summer's day
    Gave his broad lawns until the set of sun
    Up to the people:  thither flocked at noon
    His tenants, wife and child, and thither half
    The neighbouring borough with their Institute
    Of which he was the patron.  I was there
    From college, visiting the son,--the son
    A Walter too,--with others of our set,
    Five others:  we were seven at Vivian-place.
 
         And me that morning Walter showed the house,
    Greek, set with busts:  from vases in the hall
    Flowers of all heavens, and lovelier than their names,
    Grew side by side; and on the pavement lay
    Carved stones of the Abbey-ruin in the park,
    Huge Ammonites, and the first bones of Time;
    And on the tables every clime and age
    Jumbled together; celts and calumets,
    Claymore and snowshoe, toys in lava, fans
    Of sandal, amber, ancient rosaries,
    Laborious orient ivory sphere in sphere,
    The cursed Malayan crease, and battle-clubs
    From the isles of palm:  and higher on the walls,
    Betwixt the monstrous horns of elk and deer,
    His own forefathers' arms and armour hung.
 
         And 'this' he said 'was Hugh's at Agincourt;
    And that was old Sir Ralph's at Ascalon:
    A good knight he! we keep a chronicle
    With all about him'--which he brought, and I
    Dived in a hoard of tales that dealt with knights,
    Half-legend, half-historic, counts and kings
    Who laid about them at their wills and died;
    And mixt with these, a lady, one that armed
    Her own fair head, and sallying through the gate,
    Had beat her foes with slaughter from her walls.
 
         'O miracle of women,' said the book,
    'O noble heart who, being strait-besieged
    By this wild king to force her to his wish,
    Nor bent, nor broke, nor shunned a soldier's death,
    But now when all was lost or seemed as lost--
    Her stature more than mortal in the burst
    Of sunrise, her arm lifted, eyes on fire--
    Brake with a blast of trumpets from the gate,
    And, falling on them like a thunderbolt,
    She trampled some beneath her horses' heels,
    And some were whelmed with missiles of the wall,
    And some were pushed with lances from the rock,
    And part were drowned within the whirling brook:
    O miracle of noble womanhood!'
 
         So sang the gallant glorious chronicle;
    And, I all rapt in this, 'Come out,' he said,
    'To the Abbey: there is Aunt Elizabeth
    And sister Lilia with the rest.'  We went
    (I kept the book and had my finger in it)
    Down through the park:  strange was the sight to me;
    For all the sloping pasture murmured, sown
    With happy faces and with holiday.
    There moved the multitude, a thousand heads:
    The patient leaders of their Institute
    Taught them with facts.  One reared a font of stone
    And drew, from butts of water on the slope,
    The fountain of the moment, playing, now
    A twisted snake, and now a rain of pearls,
    Or steep-up spout whereon the gilded ball
    Danced like a wisp:  and somewhat lower down
    A man with knobs and wires and vials fired
    A cannon:  Echo answered in her sleep
    From hollow fields:  and here were telescopes
    For azure views; and there a group of girls
    In circle waited, whom the electric shock
    Dislinked with shrieks and laughter:  round the lake
    A little clock-work steamer paddling plied
    And shook the lilies:  perched about the knolls
    A dozen angry models jetted steam:
    A petty railway ran:  a fire-balloon
    Rose gem-like up before the dusky groves
    And dropt a fairy parachute and past:
    And there through twenty posts of telegraph
    They flashed a saucy message to and fro
    Between the mimic stations; so that sport
    Went hand in hand with Science; otherwhere
    Pure sport; a herd of boys with clamour bowled
    And stumped the wicket; babies rolled about
    Like tumbled fruit in grass; and men and maids
    Arranged a country dance, and flew through light
    And shadow, while the twangling violin
    Struck up with Soldier-laddie, and overhead
    The broad ambrosial aisles of lofty lime
    Made noise with bees and breeze from end to end.
 
         Strange was the sight and smacking of the time;
    And long we gazed, but satiated at length
    Came to the ruins.  High-arched and ivy-claspt,
    Of finest Gothic lighter than a fire,
    Through one wide chasm of time and frost they gave
    The park, the crowd, the house; but all within
    The sward was trim as any garden lawn:
    And here we lit on Aunt Elizabeth,
    And Lilia with the rest, and lady friends
    From neighbour seats:  and there was Ralph himself,
    A broken statue propt against the wall,
    As gay as any.  Lilia, wild with sport,
    Half child half woman as she was, had wound
    A scarf of orange round the stony helm,
    And robed the shoulders in a rosy silk,
    That made the old warrior from his ivied nook
    Glow like a sunbeam:  near his tomb a feast
    Shone, silver-set; about it lay the guests,
    And there we joined them:  then the maiden Aunt
    Took this fair day for text, and from it preached
    An universal culture for the crowd,
    And all things great; but we, unworthier, told
    Of college:  he had climbed across the spikes,
    And he had squeezed himself betwixt the bars,
    And he had breathed the Proctor's dogs; and one
    Discussed his tutor, rough to common men,
    But honeying at the whisper of a lord;
    And one the Master, as a rogue in grain
    Veneered with sanctimonious theory.
         But while they talked, above their heads I saw
    The feudal warrior lady-clad; which brought
    My book to mind:  and opening this I read
    Of old Sir Ralph a page or two that rang
    With tilt and tourney; then the tale of her
    That drove her foes with slaughter from her walls,
    And much I praised her nobleness, and 'Where,'
    Asked Walter, patting Lilia's head (she lay
    Beside him) 'lives there such a woman now?'
 
         Quick answered Lilia 'There are thousands now
    Such women, but convention beats them down:
    It is but bringing up; no more than that:
    You men have done it:  how I hate you all!
    Ah, were I something great!  I wish I were
    Some might poetess, I would shame you then,
    That love to keep us children!  O I wish
    That I were some great princess, I would build
    Far off from men a college like a man's,
    And I would teach them all that men are taught;
    We are twice as quick!'  And here she shook aside
    The hand that played the patron with her curls.
 
         And one said smiling 'Pretty were the sight
    If our old halls could change their sex, and flaunt
    With prudes for proctors, dowagers for deans,
    And sweet girl-graduates in their golden hair.
    I think they should not wear our rusty gowns,
    But move as rich as Emperor-moths, or Ralph
    Who shines so in the corner; yet I fear,
    If there were many Lilias in the brood,
    However deep you might embower the nest,
    Some boy would spy it.'
                           At this upon the sward
    She tapt her tiny silken-sandaled foot:
    'That's your light way; but I would make it death
    For any male thing but to peep at us.'
 
         Petulant she spoke, and at herself she laughed;
    A rosebud set with little wilful thorns,
    And sweet as English air could make her, she:
    But Walter hailed a score of names upon her,
    And 'petty Ogress', and 'ungrateful Puss',
    And swore he longed at college, only longed,
    All else was well, for she-society.
    They boated and they cricketed; they talked
    At wine, in clubs, of art, of politics;
    They lost their weeks; they vext the souls of deans;
    They rode; they betted; made a hundred friends,
    And caught the blossom of the flying terms,
    But missed the mignonette of Vivian-place,
    The little hearth-flower Lilia.  Thus he spoke,
    Part banter, part affection.
                                'True,' she said,
    'We doubt not that.  O yes, you missed us much.
    I'll stake my ruby ring upon it you did.'
 
         She held it out; and as a parrot turns
    Up through gilt wires a crafty loving eye,
    And takes a lady's finger with all care,
    And bites it for true heart and not for harm,
    So he with Lilia's.  Daintily she shrieked
    And wrung it.  'Doubt my word again!' he said.
    'Come, listen! here is proof that you were missed:
    We seven stayed at Christmas up to read;
    And there we took one tutor as to read:
    The hard-grained Muses of the cube and square
    Were out of season:  never man, I think,
    So mouldered in a sinecure as he:
    For while our cloisters echoed frosty feet,
    And our long walks were stript as bare as brooms,
    We did but talk you over, pledge you all
    In wassail; often, like as many girls--
    Sick for the hollies and the yews of home--
    As many little trifling Lilias--played
    Charades and riddles as at Christmas here,
    And _what's my thought_ and _when_ and _where_ and _how_,
    As here at Christmas.'
                          She remembered that:
    A pleasant game, she thought:  she liked it more
    Than magic music, forfeits, all the rest.
    But these--what kind of tales did men tell men,
    She wondered, by themselves?
                                A half-disdain
    Perched on the pouted blossom of her lips:
    And Walter nodded at me; '_He_ began,
    The rest would follow, each in turn; and so
    We forged a sevenfold story.  Kind? what kind?
    Chimeras, crotchets, Christmas solecisms,
    Seven-headed monsters only made to kill
    Time by the fire in winter.'
                                'Kill him now,
    The tyrant! kill him in the summer too,'
    Said Lilia; 'Why not now?' the maiden Aunt.
    'Why not a summer's as a winter's tale?
    A tale for summer as befits the time,
    And something it should be to suit the place,
    Heroic, for a hero lies beneath,
    Grave, solemn!'
                   Walter warped his mouth at this
    To something so mock-solemn, that I laughed
    And Lilia woke with sudden-thrilling mirth
    An echo like a ghostly woodpecker,
    Hid in the ruins; till the maiden Aunt
    (A little sense of wrong had touched her face
    With colour) turned to me with 'As you will;
    Heroic if you will, or what you will,
    Or be yourself you hero if you will.'
 
         'Take Lilia, then, for heroine' clamoured he,
    'And make her some great Princess, six feet high,
    Grand, epic, homicidal; and be you
    The Prince to win her!'
                           'Then follow me, the Prince,'
    I answered, 'each be hero in his turn!
    Seven and yet one, like shadows in a dream.--
    Heroic seems our Princess as required--
    But something made to suit with Time and place,
    A Gothic ruin and a Grecian house,
    A talk of college and of ladies' rights,
    A feudal knight in silken masquerade,
    And, yonder, shrieks and strange experiments
    For which the good Sir Ralph had burnt them all--
    This _were_ a medley! we should have him back
    Who told the "Winter's tale" to do it for us.
    No matter:  we will say whatever comes.
    And let the ladies sing us, if they will,
    From time to time, some ballad or a song
    To give us breathing-space.'
                                So I began,
    And the rest followed:  and the women sang
    Between the rougher voices of the men,
    Like linnets in the pauses of the wind:
    And here I give the story and the songs.
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 
 
    A prince I was, blue-eyed, and fair in face,
    Of temper amorous, as the first of May,
    With lengths of yellow ringlet, like a girl,
    For on my cradle shone the Northern star.
 
         There lived an ancient legend in our house.
    Some sorcerer, whom a far-off grandsire burnt
    Because he cast no shadow, had foretold,
    Dying, that none of all our blood should know
    The shadow from the substance, and that one
    Should come to fight with shadows and to fall.
    For so, my mother said, the story ran.
    And, truly, waking dreams were, more or less,
    An old and strange affection of the house.
    Myself too had weird seizures, Heaven knows what:
    On a sudden in the midst of men and day,
    And while I walked and talked as heretofore,
    I seemed to move among a world of ghosts,
    And feel myself the shadow of a dream.
    Our great court-Galen poised his gilt-head cane,
    And pawed his beard, and muttered 'catalepsy'.
    My mother pitying made a thousand prayers;
    My mother was as mild as any saint,
    Half-canonized by all that looked on her,
    So gracious was her tact and tenderness:
    But my good father thought a king a king;
    He cared not for the affection of the house;
    He held his sceptre like a pedant's wand
    To lash offence, and with long arms and hands
    Reached out, and picked offenders from the mass
    For judgment.
                 Now it chanced that I had been,
    While life was yet in bud and blade, bethrothed
    To one, a neighbouring Princess:  she to me
    Was proxy-wedded with a bootless calf
    At eight years old; and still from time to time
    Came murmurs of her beauty from the South,
    And of her brethren, youths of puissance;
    And still I wore her picture by my heart,
    And one dark tress; and all around them both
    Sweet thoughts would swarm as bees about their queen.
 
         But when the days drew nigh that I should wed,
    My father sent ambassadors with furs
    And jewels, gifts, to fetch her:  these brought back
    A present, a great labour of the loom;
    And therewithal an answer vague as wind:
    Besides, they saw the king; he took the gifts;
    He said there was a compact; that was true:
    But then she had a will; was he to blame?
    And maiden fancies; loved to live alone
    Among her women; certain, would not wed.
 
         That morning in the presence room I stood
    With Cyril and with Florian, my two friends:
    The first, a gentleman of broken means
    (His father's fault) but given to starts and bursts
    Of revel; and the last, my other heart,
    And almost my half-self, for still we moved
    Together, twinned as horse's ear and eye.
 
         Now, while they spake, I saw my father's face
    Grow long and troubled like a rising moon,
    Inflamed with wrath:  he started on his feet,
    Tore the king's letter, snowed it down, and rent
    The wonder of the loom through warp and woof
    From skirt to skirt; and at the last he sware
    That he would send a hundred thousand men,
    And bring her in a whirlwind:  then he chewed
    The thrice-turned cud of wrath, and cooked his spleen,
    Communing with his captains of the war.
 
         At last I spoke.  'My father, let me go.
    It cannot be but some gross error lies
    In this report, this answer of a king,
    Whom all men rate as kind and hospitable:
    Or, maybe, I myself, my bride once seen,
    Whate'er my grief to find her less than fame,
    May rue the bargain made.'  And Florian said:
    'I have a sister at the foreign court,
    Who moves about the Princess; she, you know,
    Who wedded with a nobleman from thence:
    He, dying lately, left her, as I hear,
    The lady of three castles in that land:
    Through her this matter might be sifted clean.'
    And Cyril whispered:  'Take me with you too.'
    Then laughing 'what, if these weird seizures come
    Upon you in those lands, and no one near
    To point you out the shadow from the truth!
    Take me:  I'll serve you better in a strait;
    I grate on rusty hinges here:'  but 'No!'
    Roared the rough king, 'you shall not; we ourself
    Will crush her pretty maiden fancies dead
    In iron gauntlets:  break the council up.'
 
         But when the council broke, I rose and past
    Through the wild woods that hung about the town;
    Found a still place, and plucked her likeness out;
    Laid it on flowers, and watched it lying bathed
    In the green gleam of dewy-tasselled trees:
    What were those fancies? wherefore break her troth?
    Proud looked the lips:  but while I meditated
    A wind arose and rushed upon the South,
    And shook the songs, the whispers, and the shrieks
    Of the wild woods together; and a Voice
    Went with it, 'Follow, follow, thou shalt win.'
 
         Then, ere the silver sickle of that month
    Became her golden shield, I stole from court
    With Cyril and with Florian, unperceived,
    Cat-footed through the town and half in dread
    To hear my father's clamour at our backs
    With Ho! from some bay-window shake the night;
    But all was quiet:  from the bastioned walls
    Like threaded spiders, one by one, we dropt,
    And flying reached the frontier:  then we crost
    To a livelier land; and so by tilth and grange,
    And vines, and blowing bosks of wilderness,
    We gained the mother city thick with towers,
    And in the imperial palace found the king.
 
         His name was Gama; cracked and small his voice,
    But bland the smile that like a wrinkling wind
    On glassy water drove his cheek in lines;
    A little dry old man, without a star,
    Not like a king:  three days he feasted us,
    And on the fourth I spake of why we came,
    And my bethrothed.  'You do us, Prince,' he said,
    Airing a snowy hand and signet gem,
    'All honour.  We remember love ourselves
    In our sweet youth:  there did a compact pass
    Long summers back, a kind of ceremony--
    I think the year in which our olives failed.
    I would you had her, Prince, with all my heart,
    With my full heart:  but there were widows here,
    Two widows, Lady Psyche, Lady Blanche;
    They fed her theories, in and out of place
    Maintaining that with equal husbandry
    The woman were an equal to the man.
    They harped on this; with this our banquets rang;
    Our dances broke and buzzed in knots of talk;
    Nothing but this; my very ears were hot
    To hear them:  knowledge, so my daughter held,
    Was all in all:  they had but been, she thought,
    As children; they must lose the child, assume
    The woman:  then, Sir, awful odes she wrote,
    Too awful, sure, for what they treated of,
    But all she is and does is awful; odes
    About this losing of the child; and rhymes
    And dismal lyrics, prophesying change
    Beyond all reason:  these the women sang;
    And they that know such things--I sought but peace;
    No critic I--would call them masterpieces:
    They mastered _me_.  At last she begged a boon,
    A certain summer-palace which I have
    Hard by your father's frontier:  I said no,
    Yet being an easy man, gave it:  and there,
    All wild to found an University
    For maidens, on the spur she fled; and more
    We know not,--only this:  they see no men,
    Not even her brother Arac, nor the twins
    Her brethren, though they love her, look upon her
    As on a kind of paragon; and I
    (Pardon me saying it) were much loth to breed
    Dispute betwixt myself and mine:  but since
    (And I confess with right) you think me bound
    In some sort, I can give you letters to her;
    And yet, to speak the truth, I rate your chance
    Almost at naked nothing.'
                             Thus the king;
    And I, though nettled that he seemed to slur
    With garrulous ease and oily courtesies
    Our formal compact, yet, not less (all frets
    But chafing me on fire to find my bride)
    Went forth again with both my friends.  We rode
    Many a long league back to the North.  At last
    From hills, that looked across a land of hope,
    We dropt with evening on a rustic town
    Set in a gleaming river's crescent-curve,
    Close at the boundary of the liberties;
    There, entered an old hostel, called mine host
    To council, plied him with his richest wines,
    And showed the late-writ letters of the king.
 
         He with a long low sibilation, stared
    As blank as death in marble; then exclaimed
    Averring it was clear against all rules
    For any man to go:  but as his brain
    Began to mellow, 'If the king,' he said,
    'Had given us letters, was he bound to speak?
    The king would bear him out;' and at the last--
    The summer of the vine in all his veins--
    'No doubt that we might make it worth his while.
    She once had past that way; he heard her speak;
    She scared him; life! he never saw the like;
    She looked as grand as doomsday and as grave:
    And he, he reverenced his liege-lady there;
    He always made a point to post with mares;
    His daughter and his housemaid were the boys:
    The land, he understood, for miles about
    Was tilled by women; all the swine were sows,
    And all the dogs'--
                       But while he jested thus,
    A thought flashed through me which I clothed in act,
    Remembering how we three presented Maid
    Or Nymph, or Goddess, at high tide of feast,
    In masque or pageant at my father's court.
    We sent mine host to purchase female gear;
    He brought it, and himself, a sight to shake
    The midriff of despair with laughter, holp
    To lace us up, till, each, in maiden plumes
    We rustled:  him we gave a costly bribe
    To guerdon silence, mounted our good steeds,
    And boldly ventured on the liberties.
 
         We followed up the river as we rode,
    And rode till midnight when the college lights
    Began to glitter firefly-like in copse
    And linden alley:  then we past an arch,
    Whereon a woman-statue rose with wings
    From four winged horses dark against the stars;
    And some inscription ran along the front,
    But deep in shadow:  further on we gained
    A little street half garden and half house;
    But scarce could hear each other speak for noise
    Of clocks and chimes, like silver hammers falling
    On silver anvils, and the splash and stir
    Of fountains spouted up and showering down
    In meshes of the jasmine and the rose:
    And all about us pealed the nightingale,
    Rapt in her song, and careless of the snare.
 
         There stood a bust of Pallas for a sign,
    By two sphere lamps blazoned like Heaven and Earth
    With constellation and with continent,
    Above an entry:  riding in, we called;
    A plump-armed Ostleress and a stable wench
    Came running at the call, and helped us down.
    Then stept a buxom hostess forth, and sailed,
    Full-blown, before us into rooms which gave
    Upon a pillared porch, the bases lost
    In laurel:  her we asked of that and this,
    And who were tutors.  'Lady Blanche' she said,
    'And Lady Psyche.'  'Which was prettiest,
    Best-natured?'  'Lady Psyche.'  'Hers are we,'
    One voice, we cried; and I sat down and wrote,
    In such a hand as when a field of corn
    Bows all its ears before the roaring East;
 
         'Three ladies of the Northern empire pray
    Your Highness would enroll them with your own,
    As Lady Psyche's pupils.'
                             This I sealed:
    The seal was Cupid bent above a scroll,
    And o'er his head Uranian Venus hung,
    And raised the blinding bandage from his eyes:
    I gave the letter to be sent with dawn;
    And then to bed, where half in doze I seemed
    To float about a glimmering night, and watch
    A full sea glazed with muffled moonlight, swell
    On some dark shore just seen that it was rich.
 
 
    As through the land at eve we went,
       And plucked the ripened ears,
    We fell out, my wife and I,
    O we fell out I know not why,
       And kissed again with tears.
    And blessings on the falling out
       That all the more endears,
    When we fall out with those we love
       And kiss again with tears!
    For when we came where lies the child
       We lost in other years,
    There above the little grave,
    O there above the little grave,
       We kissed again with tears.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 
 
    At break of day the College Portress came:
    She brought us Academic silks, in hue
    The lilac, with a silken hood to each,
    And zoned with gold; and now when these were on,
    And we as rich as moths from dusk cocoons,
    She, curtseying her obeisance, let us know
    The Princess Ida waited:  out we paced,
    I first, and following through the porch that sang
    All round with laurel, issued in a court
    Compact of lucid marbles, bossed with lengths
    Of classic frieze, with ample awnings gay
    Betwixt the pillars, and with great urns of flowers.
    The Muses and the Graces, grouped in threes,
    Enringed a billowing fountain in the midst;
    And here and there on lattice edges lay
    Or book or lute; but hastily we past,
    And up a flight of stairs into the hall.
 
         There at a board by tome and paper sat,
    With two tame leopards couched beside her throne,
    All beauty compassed in a female form,
    The Princess; liker to the inhabitant
    Of some clear planet close upon the Sun,
    Than our man's earth; such eyes were in her head,
    And so much grace and power, breathing down
    From over her arched brows, with every turn
    Lived through her to the tips of her long hands,
    And to her feet.  She rose her height, and said:
 
         'We give you welcome:  not without redound
    Of use and glory to yourselves ye come,
    The first-fruits of the stranger:  aftertime,
    And that full voice which circles round the grave,
    Will rank you nobly, mingled up with me.
    What! are the ladies of your land so tall?'
    'We of the court' said Cyril.  'From the court'
    She answered, 'then ye know the Prince?' and he:
    'The climax of his age! as though there were
    One rose in all the world, your Highness that,
    He worships your ideal:'  she replied:
    'We scarcely thought in our own hall to hear
    This barren verbiage, current among men,
    Light coin, the tinsel clink of compliment.
    Your flight from out your bookless wilds would seem
    As arguing love of knowledge and of power;
    Your language proves you still the child.  Indeed,
    We dream not of him:  when we set our hand
    To this great work, we purposed with ourself
    Never to wed.  You likewise will do well,
    Ladies, in entering here, to cast and fling
    The tricks, which make us toys of men, that so,
    Some future time, if so indeed you will,
    You may with those self-styled our lords ally
    Your fortunes, justlier balanced, scale with scale.'
 
         At those high words, we conscious of ourselves,
    Perused the matting:  then an officer
    Rose up, and read the statutes, such as these:
    Not for three years to correspond with home;
    Not for three years to cross the liberties;
    Not for three years to speak with any men;
    And many more, which hastily subscribed,
    We entered on the boards:  and 'Now,' she cried,
    'Ye are green wood, see ye warp not.  Look, our hall!
    Our statues!--not of those that men desire,
    Sleek Odalisques, or oracles of mode,
    Nor stunted squaws of West or East; but she
    That taught the Sabine how to rule, and she
    The foundress of the Babylonian wall,
    The Carian Artemisia strong in war,
    The Rhodope, that built the pyramid,
    Clelia, Cornelia, with the Palmyrene
    That fought Aurelian, and the Roman brows
    Of Agrippina.  Dwell with these, and lose
    Convention, since to look on noble forms
    Makes noble through the sensuous organism
    That which is higher.  O lift your natures up:
    Embrace our aims:  work out your freedom.  Girls,
    Knowledge is now no more a fountain sealed:
    Drink deep, until the habits of the slave,
    The sins of emptiness, gossip and spite
    And slander, die.  Better not be at all
    Than not be noble.  Leave us:  you may go:
    Today the Lady Psyche will harangue
    The fresh arrivals of the week before;
    For they press in from all the provinces,
    And fill the hive.'
                       She spoke, and bowing waved
    Dismissal:  back again we crost the court
    To Lady Psyche's:  as we entered in,
    There sat along the forms, like morning doves
    That sun their milky bosoms on the thatch,
    A patient range of pupils; she herself
    Erect behind a desk of satin-wood,
    A quick brunette, well-moulded, falcon-eyed,
    And on the hither side, or so she looked,
    Of twenty summers.  At her left, a child,
    In shining draperies, headed like a star,
    Her maiden babe, a double April old,
    Aglaia slept.  We sat:  the Lady glanced:
    Then Florian, but not livelier than the dame
    That whispered 'Asses' ears', among the sedge,
    'My sister.'  'Comely, too, by all that's fair,'
    Said Cyril.  'Oh hush, hush!' and she began.
 
         'This world was once a fluid haze of light,
    Till toward the centre set the starry tides,
    And eddied into suns, that wheeling cast
    The planets:  then the monster, then the man;
    Tattooed or woaded, winter-clad in skins,
    Raw from the prime, and crushing down his mate;
    As yet we find in barbarous isles, and here
    Among the lowest.'
                      Thereupon she took
    A bird's-eye-view of all the ungracious past;
    Glanced at the legendary Amazon
    As emblematic of a nobler age;
    Appraised the Lycian custom, spoke of those
    That lay at wine with Lar and Lucumo;
    Ran down the Persian, Grecian, Roman lines
    Of empire, and the woman's state in each,
    How far from just; till warming with her theme
    She fulmined out her scorn of laws Salique
    And little-footed China, touched on Mahomet
    With much contempt, and came to chivalry:
    When some respect, however slight, was paid
    To woman, superstition all awry:
    However then commenced the dawn:  a beam
    Had slanted forward, falling in a land
    Of promise; fruit would follow.  Deep, indeed,
    Their debt of thanks to her who first had dared
    To leap the rotten pales of prejudice,
    Disyoke their necks from custom, and assert
    None lordlier than themselves but that which made
    Woman and man.  She had founded; they must build.
    Here might they learn whatever men were taught:
    Let them not fear:  some said their heads were less:
    Some men's were small; not they the least of men;
    For often fineness compensated size:
    Besides the brain was like the hand, and grew
    With using; thence the man's, if more was more;
    He took advantage of his strength to be
    First in the field:  some ages had been lost;
    But woman ripened earlier, and her life
    Was longer; and albeit their glorious names
    Were fewer, scattered stars, yet since in truth
    The highest is the measure of the man,
    And not the Kaffir, Hottentot, Malay,
    Nor those horn-handed breakers of the glebe,
    But Homer, Plato, Verulam; even so
    With woman:  and in arts of government
    Elizabeth and others; arts of war
    The peasant Joan and others; arts of grace
    Sappho and others vied with any man:
    And, last not least, she who had left her place,
    And bowed her state to them, that they might grow
    To use and power on this Oasis, lapt
    In the arms of leisure, sacred from the blight
    Of ancient influence and scorn.
                                   At last
    She rose upon a wind of prophecy
    Dilating on the future; 'everywhere
    Who heads in council, two beside the hearth,
    Two in the tangled business of the world,
    Two in the liberal offices of life,
    Two plummets dropt for one to sound the abyss
    Of science, and the secrets of the mind:
    Musician, painter, sculptor, critic, more:
    And everywhere the broad and bounteous Earth
    Should bear a double growth of those rare souls,
    Poets, whose thoughts enrich the blood of the world.'
 
         She ended here, and beckoned us:  the rest
    Parted; and, glowing full-faced welcome, she
    Began to address us, and was moving on
    In gratulation, till as when a boat
    Tacks, and the slackened sail flaps, all her voice
    Faltering and fluttering in her throat, she cried
    'My brother!'  'Well, my sister.'  'O,' she said,
    'What do you here? and in this dress? and these?
    Why who are these? a wolf within the fold!
    A pack of wolves! the Lord be gracious to me!
    A plot, a plot, a plot to ruin all!'
    'No plot, no plot,' he answered.  'Wretched boy,
    How saw you not the inscription on the gate,
    LET NO MAN ENTER IN ON PAIN OF DEATH?'
    'And if I had,' he answered, 'who could think
    The softer Adams of your Academe,
    O sister, Sirens though they be, were such
    As chanted on the blanching bones of men?'
    'But you will find it otherwise' she said.
    'You jest:  ill jesting with edge-tools! my vow
    Binds me to speak, and O that iron will,
    That axelike edge unturnable, our Head,
    The Princess.'  'Well then, Psyche, take my life,
    And nail me like a weasel on a grange
    For warning:  bury me beside the gate,
    And cut this epitaph above my bones;
    _Here lies a brother by a sister slain,
    All for the common good of womankind._'
    'Let me die too,' said Cyril, 'having seen
    And heard the Lady Psyche.'
                               I struck in:
    'Albeit so masked, Madam, I love the truth;
    Receive it; and in me behold the Prince
    Your countryman, affianced years ago
    To the Lady Ida:  here, for here she was,
    And thus (what other way was left) I came.'
    'O Sir, O Prince, I have no country; none;
    If any, this; but none.  Whate'er I was
    Disrooted, what I am is grafted here.
    Affianced, Sir? love-whispers may not breathe
    Within this vestal limit, and how should I,
    Who am not mine, say, live:  the thunderbolt
    Hangs silent; but prepare:  I speak; it falls.'
    'Yet pause,' I said: 'for that inscription there,
    I think no more of deadly lurks therein,
    Than in a clapper clapping in a garth,
    To scare the fowl from fruit:  if more there be,
    If more and acted on, what follows? war;
    Your own work marred:  for this your Academe,
    Whichever side be Victor, in the halloo
    Will topple to the trumpet down, and pass
    With all fair theories only made to gild
    A stormless summer.'  'Let the Princess judge
    Of that' she said:  'farewell, Sir--and to you.
    I shudder at the sequel, but I go.'
 
         'Are you that Lady Psyche,' I rejoined,
    'The fifth in line from that old Florian,
    Yet hangs his portrait in my father's hall
    (The gaunt old Baron with his beetle brow
    Sun-shaded in the heat of dusty fights)
    As he bestrode my Grandsire, when he fell,
    And all else fled? we point to it, and we say,
    The loyal warmth of Florian is not cold,
    But branches current yet in kindred veins.'
    'Are you that Psyche,' Florian added; 'she
    With whom I sang about the morning hills,
    Flung ball, flew kite, and raced the purple fly,
    And snared the squirrel of the glen? are you
    That Psyche, wont to bind my throbbing brow,
    To smoothe my pillow, mix the foaming draught
    Of fever, tell me pleasant tales, and read
    My sickness down to happy dreams? are you
    That brother-sister Psyche, both in one?
    You were that Psyche, but what are you now?'
    'You are that Psyche,' said Cyril, 'for whom
    I would be that for ever which I seem,
    Woman, if I might sit beside your feet,
    And glean your scattered sapience.'
                                       Then once more,
    'Are you that Lady Psyche,' I began,
    'That on her bridal morn before she past
    From all her old companions, when the kind
    Kissed her pale cheek, declared that ancient ties
    Would still be dear beyond the southern hills;
    That were there any of our people there
    In want or peril, there was one to hear
    And help them? look! for such are these and I.'
    'Are you that Psyche,' Florian asked, 'to whom,
    In gentler days, your arrow-wounded fawn
    Came flying while you sat beside the well?
    The creature laid his muzzle on your lap,
    And sobbed, and you sobbed with it, and the blood
    Was sprinkled on your kirtle, and you wept.
    That was fawn's blood, not brother's, yet you wept.
    O by the bright head of my little niece,
    You were that Psyche, and what are you now?'
    'You are that Psyche,' Cyril said again,
    'The mother of the sweetest little maid,
    That ever crowed for kisses.'
                                 'Out upon it!'
    She answered, 'peace! and why should I not play
    The Spartan Mother with emotion, be
    The Lucius Junius Brutus of my kind?
    Him you call great:  he for the common weal,
    The fading politics of mortal Rome,
    As I might slay this child, if good need were,
    Slew both his sons:  and I, shall I, on whom
    The secular emancipation turns
    Of half this world, be swerved from right to save
    A prince, a brother? a little will I yield.
    Best so, perchance, for us, and well for you.
    O hard, when love and duty clash!  I fear
    My conscience will not count me fleckless; yet--
    Hear my conditions:  promise (otherwise
    You perish) as you came, to slip away
    Today, tomorrow, soon:  it shall be said,
    These women were too barbarous, would not learn;
    They fled, who might have shamed us:  promise, all.'
 
         What could we else, we promised each; and she,
    Like some wild creature newly-caged, commenced
    A to-and-fro, so pacing till she paused
    By Florian; holding out her lily arms
    Took both his hands, and smiling faintly said:
    'I knew you at the first:  though you have grown
    You scarce have altered:  I am sad and glad
    To see you, Florian.  _I_ give thee to death
    My brother! it was duty spoke, not I.
    My needful seeming harshness, pardon it.
    Our mother, is she well?'
                             With that she kissed
    His forehead, then, a moment after, clung
    About him, and betwixt them blossomed up
    From out a common vein of memory
    Sweet household talk, and phrases of the hearth,
    And far allusion, till the gracious dews
    Began to glisten and to fall:  and while
    They stood, so rapt, we gazing, came a voice,
    'I brought a message here from Lady Blanche.'
    Back started she, and turning round we saw
    The Lady Blanche's daughter where she stood,
    Melissa, with her hand upon the lock,
    A rosy blonde, and in a college gown,
    That clad her like an April daffodilly
    (Her mother's colour) with her lips apart,
    And all her thoughts as fair within her eyes,
    As bottom agates seen to wave and float
    In crystal currents of clear morning seas.
 
         So stood that same fair creature at the door.
    Then Lady Psyche, 'Ah--Melissa--you!
    You heard us?' and Melissa, 'O pardon me
    I heard, I could not help it, did not wish:
    But, dearest Lady, pray you fear me not,
    Nor think I bear that heart within my breast,
    To give three gallant gentlemen to death.'
    'I trust you,' said the other, 'for we two
    Were always friends, none closer, elm and vine:
    But yet your mother's jealous temperament--
    Let not your prudence, dearest, drowse, or prove
    The Danaid of a leaky vase, for fear
    This whole foundation ruin, and I lose
    My honour, these their lives.'  'Ah, fear me not'
    Replied Melissa; 'no--I would not tell,
    No, not for all Aspasia's cleverness,
    No, not to answer, Madam, all those hard things
    That Sheba came to ask of Solomon.'
    'Be it so' the other, 'that we still may lead
    The new light up, and culminate in peace,
    For Solomon may come to Sheba yet.'
    Said Cyril, 'Madam, he the wisest man
    Feasted the woman wisest then, in halls
    Of Lebanonian cedar:  nor should you
    (Though, Madam, _you_ should answer, _we_ would ask)
    Less welcome find among us, if you came
    Among us, debtors for our lives to you,
    Myself for something more.'  He said not what,
    But 'Thanks,' she answered 'Go:  we have been too long
    Together:  keep your hoods about the face;
    They do so that affect abstraction here.
    Speak little; mix not with the rest; and hold
    Your promise:  all, I trust, may yet be well.'
 
         We turned to go, but Cyril took the child,
    And held her round the knees against his waist,
    And blew the swollen cheek of a trumpeter,
    While Psyche watched them, smiling, and the child
    Pushed her flat hand against his face and laughed;
    And thus our conference closed.
                                   And then we strolled
    For half the day through stately theatres
    Benched crescent-wise.  In each we sat, we heard
    The grave Professor.  On the lecture slate
    The circle rounded under female hands
    With flawless demonstration:  followed then
    A classic lecture, rich in sentiment,
    With scraps of thunderous Epic lilted out
    By violet-hooded Doctors, elegies
    And quoted odes, and jewels five-words-long
    That on the stretched forefinger of all Time
    Sparkle for ever:  then we dipt in all
    That treats of whatsoever is, the state,
    The total chronicles of man, the mind,
    The morals, something of the frame, the rock,
    The star, the bird, the fish, the shell, the flower,
    Electric, chemic laws, and all the rest,
    And whatsoever can be taught and known;
    Till like three horses that have broken fence,
    And glutted all night long breast-deep in corn,
    We issued gorged with knowledge, and I spoke:
    'Why, Sirs, they do all this as well as we.'
    'They hunt old trails' said Cyril 'very well;
    But when did woman ever yet invent?'
    'Ungracious!' answered Florian; 'have you learnt
    No more from Psyche's lecture, you that talked
    The trash that made me sick, and almost sad?'
    'O trash' he said, 'but with a kernel in it.
    Should I not call her wise, who made me wise?
    And learnt?  I learnt more from her in a flash,
    Than in my brainpan were an empty hull,
    And every Muse tumbled a science in.
    A thousand hearts lie fallow in these halls,
    And round these halls a thousand baby loves
    Fly twanging headless arrows at the hearts,
    Whence follows many a vacant pang; but O
    With me, Sir, entered in the bigger boy,
    The Head of all the golden-shafted firm,
    The long-limbed lad that had a Psyche too;
    He cleft me through the stomacher; and now
    What think you of it, Florian? do I chase
    The substance or the shadow? will it hold?
    I have no sorcerer's malison on me,
    No ghostly hauntings like his Highness.  I
    Flatter myself that always everywhere
    I know the substance when I see it.  Well,
    Are castles shadows?  Three of them?  Is she
    The sweet proprietress a shadow?  If not,
    Shall those three castles patch my tattered coat?
    For dear are those three castles to my wants,
    And dear is sister Psyche to my heart,
    And two dear things are one of double worth,
    And much I might have said, but that my zone
    Unmanned me:  then the Doctors!  O to hear
    The Doctors!  O to watch the thirsty plants
    Imbibing! once or twice I thought to roar,
    To break my chain, to shake my mane:  but thou,
    Modulate me, Soul of mincing mimicry!
    Make liquid treble of that bassoon, my throat;
    Abase those eyes that ever loved to meet
    Star-sisters answering under crescent brows;
    Abate the stride, which speaks of man, and loose
    A flying charm of blushes o'er this cheek,
    Where they like swallows coming out of time
    Will wonder why they came:  but hark the bell
    For dinner, let us go!'
                           And in we streamed
    Among the columns, pacing staid and still
    By twos and threes, till all from end to end
    With beauties every shade of brown and fair
    In colours gayer than the morning mist,
    The long hall glittered like a bed of flowers.
    How might a man not wander from his wits
    Pierced through with eyes, but that I kept mine own
    Intent on her, who rapt in glorious dreams,
    The second-sight of some Astraean age,
    Sat compassed with professors:  they, the while,
    Discussed a doubt and tost it to and fro:
    A clamour thickened, mixt with inmost terms
    Of art and science:  Lady Blanche alone
    Of faded form and haughtiest lineaments,
    With all her autumn tresses falsely brown,
    Shot sidelong daggers at us, a tiger-cat
    In act to spring.
                     At last a solemn grace
    Concluded, and we sought the gardens:  there
    One walked reciting by herself, and one
    In this hand held a volume as to read,
    And smoothed a petted peacock down with that:
    Some to a low song oared a shallop by,
    Or under arches of the marble bridge
    Hung, shadowed from the heat:  some hid and sought
    In the orange thickets:  others tost a ball
    Above the fountain-jets, and back again
    With laughter:  others lay about the lawns,
    Of the older sort, and murmured that their May
    Was passing:  what was learning unto them?
    They wished to marry; they could rule a house;
    Men hated learned women:  but we three
    Sat muffled like the Fates; and often came
    Melissa hitting all we saw with shafts
    Of gentle satire, kin to charity,
    That harmed not:  then day droopt; the chapel bells
    Called us:  we left the walks; we mixt with those
    Six hundred maidens clad in purest white,
    Before two streams of light from wall to wall,
    While the great organ almost burst his pipes,
    Groaning for power, and rolling through the court
    A long melodious thunder to the sound
    Of solemn psalms, and silver litanies,
    The work of Ida, to call down from Heaven
    A blessing on her labours for the world.
 
 
    Sweet and low, sweet and low,
       Wind of the western sea,
    Low, low, breathe and blow,
       Wind of the western sea!
    Over the rolling waters go,
    Come from the dying moon, and blow,
       Blow him again to me;
    While my little one, while my pretty one, sleeps.
 
    Sleep and rest, sleep and rest,
       Father will come to thee soon;
    Rest, rest, on mother's breast,
       Father will come to thee soon;
    Father will come to his babe in the nest,
    Silver sails all out of the west
       Under the silver moon:
    Sleep, my little one, sleep, my pretty one, sleep.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 
 
    Morn in the wake of the morning star
    Came furrowing all the orient into gold.
    We rose, and each by other drest with care
    Descended to the court that lay three parts
    In shadow, but the Muses' heads were touched
    Above the darkness from their native East.
 
         There while we stood beside the fount, and watched
    Or seemed to watch the dancing bubble, approached
    Melissa, tinged with wan from lack of sleep,
    Or grief, and glowing round her dewy eyes
    The circled Iris of a night of tears;
    'And fly,' she cried, 'O fly, while yet you may!
    My mother knows:'  and when I asked her 'how,'
    'My fault' she wept 'my fault! and yet not mine;
    Yet mine in part.  O hear me, pardon me.
    My mother, 'tis her wont from night to night
    To rail at Lady Psyche and her side.
    She says the Princess should have been the Head,
    Herself and Lady Psyche the two arms;
    And so it was agreed when first they came;
    But Lady Psyche was the right hand now,
    And the left, or not, or seldom used;
    Hers more than half the students, all the love.
    And so last night she fell to canvass you:
    _Her_ countrywomen! she did not envy her.
    "Who ever saw such wild barbarians?
    Girls?--more like men!" and at these words the snake,
    My secret, seemed to stir within my breast;
    And oh, Sirs, could I help it, but my cheek
    Began to burn and burn, and her lynx eye
    To fix and make me hotter, till she laughed:
    "O marvellously modest maiden, you!
    Men! girls, like men! why, if they had been men
    You need not set your thoughts in rubric thus
    For wholesale comment."  Pardon, I am shamed
    That I must needs repeat for my excuse
    What looks so little graceful:  "men" (for still
    My mother went revolving on the word)
    "And so they are,--very like men indeed--
    And with that woman closeted for hours!"
    Then came these dreadful words out one by one,
    "Why--these--_are_--men:"  I shuddered:  "and you know it."
    "O ask me nothing," I said:  "And she knows too,
    And she conceals it."  So my mother clutched
    The truth at once, but with no word from me;
    And now thus early risen she goes to inform
    The Princess:  Lady Psyche will be crushed;
    But you may yet be saved, and therefore fly;
    But heal me with your pardon ere you go.'
 
         'What pardon, sweet Melissa, for a blush?'
    Said Cyril:  'Pale one, blush again:  than wear
    Those lilies, better blush our lives away.
    Yet let us breathe for one hour more in Heaven'
    He added, 'lest some classic Angel speak
    In scorn of us, "They mounted, Ganymedes,
    To tumble, Vulcans, on the second morn."
    But I will melt this marble into wax
    To yield us farther furlough:'  and he went.
 
         Melissa shook her doubtful curls, and thought
    He scarce would prosper.  'Tell us,' Florian asked,
    'How grew this feud betwixt the right and left.'
    'O long ago,' she said, 'betwixt these two
    Division smoulders hidden; 'tis my mother,
    Too jealous, often fretful as the wind
    Pent in a crevice:  much I bear with her:
    I never knew my father, but she says
    (God help her) she was wedded to a fool;
    And still she railed against the state of things.
    She had the care of Lady Ida's youth,
    And from the Queen's decease she brought her up.
    But when your sister came she won the heart
    Of Ida:  they were still together, grew
    (For so they said themselves) inosculated;
    Consonant chords that shiver to one note;
    One mind in all things:  yet my mother still
    Affirms your Psyche thieved her theories,
    And angled with them for her pupil's love:
    She calls her plagiarist; I know not what:
    But I must go:  I dare not tarry,' and light,
    As flies the shadow of a bird, she fled.
 
         Then murmured Florian gazing after her,
    'An open-hearted maiden, true and pure.
    If I could love, why this were she:  how pretty
    Her blushing was, and how she blushed again,
    As if to close with Cyril's random wish:
    Not like your Princess crammed with erring pride,
    Nor like poor Psyche whom she drags in tow.'
 
         'The crane,' I said, 'may chatter of the crane,
    The dove may murmur of the dove, but I
    An eagle clang an eagle to the sphere.
    My princess, O my princess! true she errs,
    But in her own grand way:  being herself
    Three times more noble than three score of men,
    She sees herself in every woman else,
    And so she wears her error like a crown
    To blind the truth and me:  for her, and her,
    Hebes are they to hand ambrosia, mix
    The nectar; but--ah she--whene'er she moves
    The Samian Here rises and she speaks
    A Memnon smitten with the morning Sun.'
 
         So saying from the court we paced, and gained
    The terrace ranged along the Northern front,
    And leaning there on those balusters, high
    Above the empurpled champaign, drank the gale
    That blown about the foliage underneath,
    And sated with the innumerable rose,
    Beat balm upon our eyelids.  Hither came
    Cyril, and yawning 'O hard task,' he cried;
    'No fighting shadows here!  I forced a way
    Through opposition crabbed and gnarled.
    Better to clear prime forests, heave and thump
    A league of street in summer solstice down,
    Than hammer at this reverend gentlewoman.
    I knocked and, bidden, entered; found her there
    At point to move, and settled in her eyes
    The green malignant light of coming storm.
    Sir, I was courteous, every phrase well-oiled,
    As man's could be; yet maiden-meek I prayed
    Concealment:  she demanded who we were,
    And why we came?  I fabled nothing fair,
    But, your example pilot, told her all.
    Up went the hushed amaze of hand and eye.
    But when I dwelt upon your old affiance,
    She answered sharply that I talked astray.
    I urged the fierce inscription on the gate,
    And our three lives.  True--we had limed ourselves
    With open eyes, and we must take the chance.
    But such extremes, I told her, well might harm
    The woman's cause.  "Not more than now," she said,
    "So puddled as it is with favouritism."
    I tried the mother's heart.  Shame might befall
    Melissa, knowing, saying not she knew:
    Her answer was "Leave me to deal with that."
    I spoke of war to come and many deaths,
    And she replied, her duty was to speak,
    And duty duty, clear of consequences.
    I grew discouraged, Sir; but since I knew
    No rock so hard but that a little wave
    May beat admission in a thousand years,
    I recommenced; "Decide not ere you pause.
    I find you here but in the second place,
    Some say the third--the authentic foundress you.
    I offer boldly:  we will seat you highest:
    Wink at our advent:  help my prince to gain
    His rightful bride, and here I promise you
    Some palace in our land, where you shall reign
    The head and heart of all our fair she-world,
    And your great name flow on with broadening time
    For ever."  Well, she balanced this a little,
    And told me she would answer us today,
    meantime be mute:  thus much, nor more I gained.'
 
         He ceasing, came a message from the Head.
    'That afternoon the Princess rode to take
    The dip of certain strata to the North.
    Would we go with her? we should find the land
    Worth seeing; and the river made a fall
    Out yonder:'  then she pointed on to where
    A double hill ran up his furrowy forks
    Beyond the thick-leaved platans of the vale.
 
         Agreed to, this, the day fled on through all
    Its range of duties to the appointed hour.
    Then summoned to the porch we went.  She stood
    Among her maidens, higher by the head,
    Her back against a pillar, her foot on one
    Of those tame leopards.  Kittenlike he rolled
    And pawed about her sandal.  I drew near;
    I gazed.  On a sudden my strange seizure came
    Upon me, the weird vision of our house:
    The Princess Ida seemed a hollow show,
    Her gay-furred cats a painted fantasy,
    Her college and her maidens, empty masks,
    And I myself the shadow of a dream,
    For all things were and were not.  Yet I felt
    My heart beat thick with passion and with awe;
    Then from my breast the involuntary sigh
    Brake, as she smote me with the light of eyes
    That lent my knee desire to kneel, and shook
    My pulses, till to horse we got, and so
    Went forth in long retinue following up
    The river as it narrowed to the hills.
 
         I rode beside her and to me she said:
    'O friend, we trust that you esteemed us not
    Too harsh to your companion yestermorn;
    Unwillingly we spake.'  'No--not to her,'
    I answered, 'but to one of whom we spake
    Your Highness might have seemed the thing you say.'
    'Again?' she cried, 'are you ambassadresses
    From him to me? we give you, being strange,
    A license:  speak, and let the topic die.'
 
         I stammered that I knew him--could have wished--
    'Our king expects--was there no precontract?
    There is no truer-hearted--ah, you seem
    All he prefigured, and he could not see
    The bird of passage flying south but longed
    To follow:  surely, if your Highness keep
    Your purport, you will shock him even to death,
    Or baser courses, children of despair.'
 
         'Poor boy,' she said, 'can he not read--no books?
    Quoit, tennis, ball--no games? nor deals in that
    Which men delight in, martial exercise?
    To nurse a blind ideal like a girl,
    Methinks he seems no better than a girl;
    As girls were once, as we ourself have been:
    We had our dreams; perhaps he mixt with them:
    We touch on our dead self, nor shun to do it,
    Being other--since we learnt our meaning here,
    To lift the woman's fallen divinity
    Upon an even pedestal with man.'
 
         She paused, and added with a haughtier smile
    'And as to precontracts, we move, my friend,
    At no man's beck, but know ourself and thee,
    O Vashti, noble Vashti!  Summoned out
    She kept her state, and left the drunken king
    To brawl at Shushan underneath the palms.'
 
         'Alas your Highness breathes full East,' I said,
    'On that which leans to you.  I know the Prince,
    I prize his truth:  and then how vast a work
    To assail this gray preeminence of man!
    You grant me license; might I use it? think;
    Ere half be done perchance your life may fail;
    Then comes the feebler heiress of your plan,
    And takes and ruins all; and thus your pains
    May only make that footprint upon sand
    Which old-recurring waves of prejudice
    Resmooth to nothing:  might I dread that you,
    With only Fame for spouse and your great deeds
    For issue, yet may live in vain, and miss,
    Meanwhile, what every woman counts her due,
    Love, children, happiness?'
                               And she exclaimed,
    'Peace, you young savage of the Northern wild!
    What! though your Prince's love were like a God's,
    Have we not made ourself the sacrifice?
    You are bold indeed:  we are not talked to thus:
    Yet will we say for children, would they grew
    Like field-flowers everywhere! we like them well:
    But children die; and let me tell you, girl,
    Howe'er you babble, great deeds cannot die;
    They with the sun and moon renew their light
    For ever, blessing those that look on them.
    Children--that men may pluck them from our hearts,
    Kill us with pity, break us with ourselves--
    O--children--there is nothing upon earth
    More miserable than she that has a son
    And sees him err:  nor would we work for fame;
    Though she perhaps might reap the applause of Great,
    Who earns the one POU STO whence after-hands
    May move the world, though she herself effect
    But little:  wherefore up and act, nor shrink
    For fear our solid aim be dissipated
    By frail successors.  Would, indeed, we had been,
    In lieu of many mortal flies, a race
    Of giants living, each, a thousand years,
    That we might see our own work out, and watch
    The sandy footprint harden into stone.'
 
         I answered nothing, doubtful in myself
    If that strange Poet-princess with her grand
    Imaginations might at all be won.
    And she broke out interpreting my thoughts:
 
         'No doubt we seem a kind of monster to you;
    We are used to that:  for women, up till this
    Cramped under worse than South-sea-isle taboo,
    Dwarfs of the gynaeceum, fail so far
    In high desire, they know not, cannot guess
    How much their welfare is a passion to us.
    If we could give them surer, quicker proof--
    Oh if our end were less achievable
    By slow approaches, than by single act
    Of immolation, any phase of death,
    We were as prompt to spring against the pikes,
    Or down the fiery gulf as talk of it,
    To compass our dear sisters' liberties.'
 
         She bowed as if to veil a noble tear;
    And up we came to where the river sloped
    To plunge in cataract, shattering on black blocks
    A breadth of thunder.  O'er it shook the woods,
    And danced the colour, and, below, stuck out
    The bones of some vast bulk that lived and roared
    Before man was.  She gazed awhile and said,
    'As these rude bones to us, are we to her
    That will be.'  'Dare we dream of that,' I asked,
    'Which wrought us, as the workman and his work,
    That practice betters?'  'How,' she cried, 'you love
    The metaphysics! read and earn our prize,
    A golden brooch:  beneath an emerald plane
    Sits Diotima, teaching him that died
    Of hemlock; our device; wrought to the life;
    She rapt upon her subject, he on her:
    For there are schools for all.'  'And yet' I said
    'Methinks I have not found among them all
    One anatomic.'  'Nay, we thought of that,'
    She answered, 'but it pleased us not:  in truth
    We shudder but to dream our maids should ape
    Those monstrous males that carve the living hound,
    And cram him with the fragments of the grave,
    Or in the dark dissolving human heart,
    And holy secrets of this microcosm,
    Dabbling a shameless hand with shameful jest,
    Encarnalize their spirits:  yet we know
    Knowledge is knowledge, and this matter hangs:
    Howbeit ourself, foreseeing casualty,
    Nor willing men should come among us, learnt,
    For many weary moons before we came,
    This craft of healing.  Were you sick, ourself
    Would tend upon you.  To your question now,
    Which touches on the workman and his work.
    Let there be light and there was light:  'tis so:
    For was, and is, and will be, are but is;
    And all creation is one act at once,
    The birth of light:  but we that are not all,
    As parts, can see but parts, now this, now that,
    And live, perforce, from thought to thought, and make
    One act a phantom of succession:  thus
    Our weakness somehow shapes the shadow, Time;
    But in the shadow will we work, and mould
    The woman to the fuller day.'
                                 She spake
    With kindled eyes; we rode a league beyond,
    And, o'er a bridge of pinewood crossing, came
    On flowery levels underneath the crag,
    Full of all beauty.  'O how sweet' I said
    (For I was half-oblivious of my mask)
    'To linger here with one that loved us.'  'Yea,'
    She answered, 'or with fair philosophies
    That lift the fancy; for indeed these fields
    Are lovely, lovelier not the Elysian lawns,
    Where paced the Demigods of old, and saw
    The soft white vapour streak the crowned towers
    Built to the Sun:'  then, turning to her maids,
    'Pitch our pavilion here upon the sward;
    Lay out the viands.'  At the word, they raised
    A tent of satin, elaborately wrought
    With fair Corinna's triumph; here she stood,
    Engirt with many a florid maiden-cheek,
    The woman-conqueror; woman-conquered there
    The bearded Victor of ten-thousand hymns,
    And all the men mourned at his side:  but we
    Set forth to climb; then, climbing, Cyril kept
    With Psyche, with Melissa Florian, I
    With mine affianced.  Many a little hand
    Glanced like a touch of sunshine on the rocks,
    Many a light foot shone like a jewel set
    In the dark crag:  and then we turned, we wound
    About the cliffs, the copses, out and in,
    Hammering and clinking, chattering stony names
    Of shales and hornblende, rag and trap and tuff,
    Amygdaloid and trachyte, till the Sun
    Grew broader toward his death and fell, and all
    The rosy heights came out above the lawns.
 
 
       The splendour falls on castle walls
          And snowy summits old in story:
       The long light shakes across the lakes,
          And the wild cataract leaps in glory.
    Blow, bugle, blow, set the wild echoes flying,
    Blow, bugle; answer, echoes, dying, dying, dying.
 
       O hark, O hear! how thin and clear,
          And thinner, clearer, farther going!
       O sweet and far from cliff and scar
          The horns of Elfland faintly blowing!
    Blow, let us hear the purple glens replying:
    Blow, bugle; answer, echoes, dying, dying, dying.
 
       O love, they die in yon rich sky,
          They faint on hill or field or river:
       Our echoes roll from soul to soul,
          And grow for ever and for ever.
    Blow, bugle, blow, set the wild echoes flying,
    And answer, echoes, answer, dying, dying, dying.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 
 
    'There sinks the nebulous star we call the Sun,
    If that hypothesis of theirs be sound'
    Said Ida; 'let us down and rest;' and we
    Down from the lean and wrinkled precipices,
    By every coppice-feathered chasm and cleft,
    Dropt through the ambrosial gloom to where below
    No bigger than a glow-worm shone the tent
    Lamp-lit from the inner.  Once she leaned on me,
    Descending; once or twice she lent her hand,
    And blissful palpitations in the blood,
    Stirring a sudden transport rose and fell.
 
         But when we planted level feet, and dipt
    Beneath the satin dome and entered in,
    There leaning deep in broidered down we sank
    Our elbows:  on a tripod in the midst
    A fragrant flame rose, and before us glowed
    Fruit, blossom, viand, amber wine, and gold.
 
         Then she, 'Let some one sing to us:  lightlier move
    The minutes fledged with music:' and a maid,
    Of those beside her, smote her harp, and sang.
 
 
       'Tears, idle tears, I know not what they mean,
    Tears from the depth of some divine despair
    Rise in the heart, and gather to the eyes,
    In looking on the happy Autumn-fields,
    And thinking of the days that are no more.
 
       'Fresh as the first beam glittering on a sail,
    That brings our friends up from the underworld,
    Sad as the last which reddens over one
    That sinks with all we love below the verge;
    So sad, so fresh, the days that are no more.
 
       'Ah, sad and strange as in dark summer dawns
    The earliest pipe of half-awakened birds
    To dying ears, when unto dying eyes
    The casement slowly grows a glimmering square;
    So sad, so strange, the days that are no more.
 
       'Dear as remembered kisses after death,
    And sweet as those by hopeless fancy feigned
    On lips that are for others; deep as love,
    Deep as first love, and wild with all regret;
    O Death in Life, the days that are no more.'
 
 
         She ended with such passion that the tear,
    She sang of, shook and fell, an erring pearl
    Lost in her bosom:  but with some disdain
    Answered the Princess, 'If indeed there haunt
    About the mouldered lodges of the Past
    So sweet a voice and vague, fatal to men,
    Well needs it we should cram our ears with wool
    And so pace by:  but thine are fancies hatched
    In silken-folded idleness; nor is it
    Wiser to weep a true occasion lost,
    But trim our sails, and let old bygones be,
    While down the streams that float us each and all
    To the issue, goes, like glittering bergs of ice,
    Throne after throne, and molten on the waste
    Becomes a cloud:  for all things serve their time
    Toward that great year of equal mights and rights,
    Nor would I fight with iron laws, in the end
    Found golden:  let the past be past; let be
    Their cancelled Babels:  though the rough kex break
    The starred mosaic, and the beard-blown goat
    Hang on the shaft, and the wild figtree split
    Their monstrous idols, care not while we hear
    A trumpet in the distance pealing news
    Of better, and Hope, a poising eagle, burns
    Above the unrisen morrow:' then to me;
    'Know you no song of your own land,' she said,
    'Not such as moans about the retrospect,
    But deals with the other distance and the hues
    Of promise; not a death's-head at the wine.'
 
         Then I remembered one myself had made,
    What time I watched the swallow winging south
    From mine own land, part made long since, and part
    Now while I sang, and maidenlike as far
    As I could ape their treble, did I sing.
 
 
       'O Swallow, Swallow, flying, flying South,
    Fly to her, and fall upon her gilded eaves,
    And tell her, tell her, what I tell to thee.
 
       'O tell her, Swallow, thou that knowest each,
    That bright and fierce and fickle is the South,
    And dark and true and tender is the North.
 
       'O Swallow, Swallow, if I could follow, and light
    Upon her lattice, I would pipe and trill,
    And cheep and twitter twenty million loves.
 
       'O were I thou that she might take me in,
    And lay me on her bosom, and her heart
    Would rock the snowy cradle till I died.
 
       'Why lingereth she to clothe her heart with love,
    Delaying as the tender ash delays
    To clothe herself, when all the woods are green?
 
       'O tell her, Swallow, that thy brood is flown:
    Say to her, I do but wanton in the South,
    But in the North long since my nest is made.
 
       'O tell her, brief is life but love is long,
    And brief the sun of summer in the North,
    And brief the moon of beauty in the South.
 
       'O Swallow, flying from the golden woods,
    Fly to her, and pipe and woo her, and make her mine,
    And tell her, tell her, that I follow thee.'
 
 
         I ceased, and all the ladies, each at each,
    Like the Ithacensian suitors in old time,
    Stared with great eyes, and laughed with alien lips,
    And knew not what they meant; for still my voice
    Rang false:  but smiling 'Not for thee,' she said,
    O Bulbul, any rose of Gulistan
    Shall burst her veil:  marsh-divers, rather, maid,
    Shall croak thee sister, or the meadow-crake
    Grate her harsh kindred in the grass:  and this
    A mere love-poem!  O for such, my friend,
    We hold them slight:  they mind us of the time
    When we made bricks in Egypt.  Knaves are men,
    That lute and flute fantastic tenderness,
    And dress the victim to the offering up,
    And paint the gates of Hell with Paradise,
    And play the slave to gain the tyranny.
    Poor soul!  I had a maid of honour once;
    She wept her true eyes blind for such a one,
    A rogue of canzonets and serenades.
    I loved her.  Peace be with her.  She is dead.
    So they blaspheme the muse!  But great is song
    Used to great ends:  ourself have often tried
    Valkyrian hymns, or into rhythm have dashed
    The passion of the prophetess; for song
    Is duer unto freedom, force and growth
    Of spirit than to junketing and love.
    Love is it?  Would this same mock-love, and this
    Mock-Hymen were laid up like winter bats,
    Till all men grew to rate us at our worth,
    Not vassals to be beat, nor pretty babes
    To be dandled, no, but living wills, and sphered
    Whole in ourselves and owed to none.  Enough!
    But now to leaven play with profit, you,
    Know you no song, the true growth of your soil,
    That gives the manners of your country-women?'
 
         She spoke and turned her sumptuous head with eyes
    Of shining expectation fixt on mine.
    Then while I dragged my brains for such a song,
    Cyril, with whom the bell-mouthed glass had wrought,
    Or mastered by the sense of sport, began
    To troll a careless, careless tavern-catch
    Of Moll and Meg, and strange experiences
    Unmeet for ladies.  Florian nodded at him,
    I frowning; Psyche flushed and wanned and shook;
    The lilylike Melissa drooped her brows;
    'Forbear,' the Princess cried; 'Forbear, Sir' I;
    And heated through and through with wrath and love,
    I smote him on the breast; he started up;
    There rose a shriek as of a city sacked;
    Melissa clamoured 'Flee the death;' 'To horse'
    Said Ida; 'home! to horse!' and fled, as flies
    A troop of snowy doves athwart the dusk,
    When some one batters at the dovecote-doors,
    Disorderly the women.  Alone I stood
    With Florian, cursing Cyril, vext at heart,
    In the pavilion:  there like parting hopes
    I heard them passing from me:  hoof by hoof,
    And every hoof a knell to my desires,
    Clanged on the bridge; and then another shriek,
    'The Head, the Head, the Princess, O the Head!'
    For blind with rage she missed the plank, and rolled
    In the river.  Out I sprang from glow to gloom:
    There whirled her white robe like a blossomed branch
    Rapt to the horrible fall:  a glance I gave,
    No more; but woman-vested as I was
    Plunged; and the flood drew; yet I caught her; then
    Oaring one arm, and bearing in my left
    The weight of all the hopes of half the world,
    Strove to buffet to land in vain.  A tree
    Was half-disrooted from his place and stooped
    To wrench his dark locks in the gurgling wave
    Mid-channel.  Right on this we drove and caught,
    And grasping down the boughs I gained the shore.
 
         There stood her maidens glimmeringly grouped
    In the hollow bank.  One reaching forward drew
    My burthen from mine arms; they cried 'she lives:'
    They bore her back into the tent:  but I,
    So much a kind of shame within me wrought,
    Not yet endured to meet her opening eyes,
    Nor found my friends; but pushed alone on foot
    (For since her horse was lost I left her mine)
    Across the woods, and less from Indian craft
    Than beelike instinct hiveward, found at length
    The garden portals.  Two great statues, Art
    And Science, Caryatids, lifted up
    A weight of emblem, and betwixt were valves
    Of open-work in which the hunter rued
    His rash intrusion, manlike, but his brows
    Had sprouted, and the branches thereupon
    Spread out at top, and grimly spiked the gates.
 
         A little space was left between the horns,
    Through which I clambered o'er at top with pain,
    Dropt on the sward, and up the linden walks,
    And, tost on thoughts that changed from hue to hue,
    Now poring on the glowworm, now the star,
    I paced the terrace, till the Bear had wheeled
    Through a great arc his seven slow suns.
                                            A step
    Of lightest echo, then a loftier form
    Than female, moving through the uncertain gloom,
    Disturbed me with the doubt 'if this were she,'
    But it was Florian.  'Hist O Hist,' he said,
    'They seek us:  out so late is out of rules.
    Moreover "seize the strangers" is the cry.
    How came you here?' I told him:  'I' said he,
    'Last of the train, a moral leper, I,
    To whom none spake, half-sick at heart, returned.
    Arriving all confused among the rest
    With hooded brows I crept into the hall,
    And, couched behind a Judith, underneath
    The head of Holofernes peeped and saw.
    Girl after girl was called to trial:  each
    Disclaimed all knowledge of us:  last of all,
    Melissa:  trust me, Sir, I pitied her.
    She, questioned if she knew us men, at first
    Was silent; closer prest, denied it not:
    And then, demanded if her mother knew,
    Or Psyche, she affirmed not, or denied:
    From whence the Royal mind, familiar with her,
    Easily gathered either guilt.  She sent
    For Psyche, but she was not there; she called
    For Psyche's child to cast it from the doors;
    She sent for Blanche to accuse her face to face;
    And I slipt out:  but whither will you now?
    And where are Psyche, Cyril? both are fled:
    What, if together? that were not so well.
    Would rather we had never come!  I dread
    His wildness, and the chances of the dark.'
 
         'And yet,' I said, 'you wrong him more than I
    That struck him:  this is proper to the clown,
    Though smocked, or furred and purpled, still the clown,
    To harm the thing that trusts him, and to shame
    That which he says he loves:  for Cyril, howe'er
    He deal in frolic, as tonight--the song
    Might have been worse and sinned in grosser lips
    Beyond all pardon--as it is, I hold
    These flashes on the surface are not he.
    He has a solid base of temperament:
    But as the waterlily starts and slides
    Upon the level in little puffs of wind,
    Though anchored to the bottom, such is he.'
 
         Scarce had I ceased when from a tamarisk near
    Two Proctors leapt upon us, crying, 'Names:'
    He, standing still, was clutched; but I began
    To thrid the musky-circled mazes, wind
    And double in and out the boles, and race
    By all the fountains:  fleet I was of foot:
    Before me showered the rose in flakes; behind
    I heard the puffed pursuer; at mine ear
    Bubbled the nightingale and heeded not,
    And secret laughter tickled all my soul.
    At last I hooked my ankle in a vine,
    That claspt the feet of a Mnemosyne,
    And falling on my face was caught and known.
 
         They haled us to the Princess where she sat
    High in the hall:  above her drooped a lamp,
    And made the single jewel on her brow
    Burn like the mystic fire on a mast-head,
    Prophet of storm:  a handmaid on each side
    Bowed toward her, combing out her long black hair
    Damp from the river; and close behind her stood
    Eight daughters of the plough, stronger than men,
    Huge women blowzed with health, and wind, and rain,
    And labour.  Each was like a Druid rock;
    Or like a spire of land that stands apart
    Cleft from the main, and wailed about with mews.
 
         Then, as we came, the crowd dividing clove
    An advent to the throne:  and therebeside,
    Half-naked as if caught at once from bed
    And tumbled on the purple footcloth, lay
    The lily-shining child; and on the left,
    Bowed on her palms and folded up from wrong,
    Her round white shoulder shaken with her sobs,
    Melissa knelt; but Lady Blanche erect
    Stood up and spake, an affluent orator.
 
         'It was not thus, O Princess, in old days:
    You prized my counsel, lived upon my lips:
    I led you then to all the Castalies;
    I fed you with the milk of every Muse;
    I loved you like this kneeler, and you me
    Your second mother:  those were gracious times.
    Then came your new friend:  you began to change--
    I saw it and grieved--to slacken and to cool;
    Till taken with her seeming openness
    You turned your warmer currents all to her,
    To me you froze:  this was my meed for all.
    Yet I bore up in part from ancient love,
    And partly that I hoped to win you back,
    And partly conscious of my own deserts,
    And partly that you were my civil head,
    And chiefly you were born for something great,
    In which I might your fellow-worker be,
    When time should serve; and thus a noble scheme
    Grew up from seed we two long since had sown;
    In us true growth, in her a Jonah's gourd,
    Up in one night and due to sudden sun:
    We took this palace; but even from the first
    You stood in your own light and darkened mine.
    What student came but that you planed her path
    To Lady Psyche, younger, not so wise,
    A foreigner, and I your countrywoman,
    I your old friend and tried, she new in all?
    But still her lists were swelled and mine were lean;
    Yet I bore up in hope she would be known:
    Then came these wolves:  _they_ knew her:  _they_ endured,
    Long-closeted with her the yestermorn,
    To tell her what they were, and she to hear:
    And me none told:  not less to an eye like mine
    A lidless watcher of the public weal,
    Last night, their mask was patent, and my foot
    Was to you:  but I thought again:  I feared
    To meet a cold "We thank you, we shall hear of it
    From Lady Psyche:" you had gone to her,
    She told, perforce; and winning easy grace
    No doubt, for slight delay, remained among us
    In our young nursery still unknown, the stem
    Less grain than touchwood, while my honest heat
    Were all miscounted as malignant haste
    To push my rival out of place and power.
    But public use required she should be known;
    And since my oath was ta'en for public use,
    I broke the letter of it to keep the sense.
    I spoke not then at first, but watched them well,
    Saw that they kept apart, no mischief done;
    And yet this day (though you should hate me for it)
    I came to tell you; found that you had gone,
    Ridden to the hills, she likewise:  now, I thought,
    That surely she will speak; if not, then I:
    Did she?  These monsters blazoned what they were,
    According to the coarseness of their kind,
    For thus I hear; and known at last (my work)
    And full of cowardice and guilty shame,
    I grant in her some sense of shame, she flies;
    And I remain on whom to wreak your rage,
    I, that have lent my life to build up yours,
    I that have wasted here health, wealth, and time,
    And talent, I--you know it--I will not boast:
    Dismiss me, and I prophesy your plan,
    Divorced from my experience, will be chaff
    For every gust of chance, and men will say
    We did not know the real light, but chased
    The wisp that flickers where no foot can tread.'
 
         She ceased:  the Princess answered coldly, 'Good:
    Your oath is broken:  we dismiss you:  go.
    For this lost lamb (she pointed to the child)
    Our mind is changed:  we take it to ourself.'
 
         Thereat the Lady stretched a vulture throat,
    And shot from crooked lips a haggard smile.
    'The plan was mine.  I built the nest' she said
    'To hatch the cuckoo.  Rise!' and stooped to updrag
    Melissa:  she, half on her mother propt,
    Half-drooping from her, turned her face, and cast
    A liquid look on Ida, full of prayer,
    Which melted Florian's fancy as she hung,
    A Niobean daughter, one arm out,
    Appealing to the bolts of Heaven; and while
    We gazed upon her came a little stir
    About the doors, and on a sudden rushed
    Among us, out of breath as one pursued,
    A woman-post in flying raiment.  Fear
    Stared in her eyes, and chalked her face, and winged
    Her transit to the throne, whereby she fell
    Delivering sealed dispatches which the Head
    Took half-amazed, and in her lion's mood
    Tore open, silent we with blind surmise
    Regarding, while she read, till over brow
    And cheek and bosom brake the wrathful bloom
    As of some fire against a stormy cloud,
    When the wild peasant rights himself, the rick
    Flames, and his anger reddens in the heavens;
    For anger most it seemed, while now her breast,
    Beaten with some great passion at her heart,
    Palpitated, her hand shook, and we heard
    In the dead hush the papers that she held
    Rustle:  at once the lost lamb at her feet
    Sent out a bitter bleating for its dam;
    The plaintive cry jarred on her ire; she crushed
    The scrolls together, made a sudden turn
    As if to speak, but, utterance failing her,
    She whirled them on to me, as who should say
    'Read,' and I read--two letters--one her sire's.
 
         'Fair daughter, when we sent the Prince your way,
    We knew not your ungracious laws, which learnt,
    We, conscious of what temper you are built,
    Came all in haste to hinder wrong, but fell
    Into his father's hands, who has this night,
    You lying close upon his territory,
    Slipt round and in the dark invested you,
    And here he keeps me hostage for his son.'
 
         The second was my father's running thus:
    'You have our son:  touch not a hair of his head:
    Render him up unscathed:  give him your hand:
    Cleave to your contract:  though indeed we hear
    You hold the woman is the better man;
    A rampant heresy, such as if it spread
    Would make all women kick against their Lords
    Through all the world, and which might well deserve
    That we this night should pluck your palace down;
    And we will do it, unless you send us back
    Our son, on the instant, whole.'
                                    So far I read;
    And then stood up and spoke impetuously.
 
         'O not to pry and peer on your reserve,
    But led by golden wishes, and a hope
    The child of regal compact, did I break
    Your precinct; not a scorner of your sex
    But venerator, zealous it should be
    All that it might be:  hear me, for I bear,
    Though man, yet human, whatsoe'er your wrongs,
    From the flaxen curl to the gray lock a life
    Less mine than yours:  my nurse would tell me of you;
    I babbled for you, as babies for the moon,
    Vague brightness; when a boy, you stooped to me
    From all high places, lived in all fair lights,
    Came in long breezes rapt from inmost south
    And blown to inmost north; at eve and dawn
    With Ida, Ida, Ida, rang the woods;
    The leader wildswan in among the stars
    Would clang it, and lapt in wreaths of glowworm light
    The mellow breaker murmured Ida.  Now,
    Because I would have reached you, had you been
    Sphered up with Cassiopeia, or the enthroned
    Persephone in Hades, now at length,
    Those winters of abeyance all worn out,
    A man I came to see you:  but indeed,
    Not in this frequence can I lend full tongue,
    O noble Ida, to those thoughts that wait
    On you, their centre:  let me say but this,
    That many a famous man and woman, town
    And landskip, have I heard of, after seen
    The dwarfs of presage:  though when known, there grew
    Another kind of beauty in detail
    Made them worth knowing; but in your I found
    My boyish dream involved and dazzled down
    And mastered, while that after-beauty makes
    Such head from act to act, from hour to hour,
    Within me, that except you slay me here,
    According to your bitter statute-book,
    I cannot cease to follow you, as they say
    The seal does music; who desire you more
    Than growing boys their manhood; dying lips,
    With many thousand matters left to do,
    The breath of life; O more than poor men wealth,
    Than sick men health--yours, yours, not mine--but half
    Without you; with you, whole; and of those halves
    You worthiest; and howe'er you block and bar
    Your heart with system out from mine, I hold
    That it becomes no man to nurse despair,
    But in the teeth of clenched antagonisms
    To follow up the worthiest till he die:
    Yet that I came not all unauthorized
    Behold your father's letter.'
                                 On one knee
    Kneeling, I gave it, which she caught, and dashed
    Unopened at her feet:  a tide of fierce
    Invective seemed to wait behind her lips,
    As waits a river level with the dam
    Ready to burst and flood the world with foam:
    And so she would have spoken, but there rose
    A hubbub in the court of half the maids
    Gathered together:  from the illumined hall
    Long lanes of splendour slanted o'er a press
    Of snowy shoulders, thick as herded ewes,
    And rainbow robes, and gems and gemlike eyes,
    And gold and golden heads; they to and fro
    Fluctuated, as flowers in storm, some red, some pale,
    All open-mouthed, all gazing to the light,
    Some crying there was an army in the land,
    And some that men were in the very walls,
    And some they cared not; till a clamour grew
    As of a new-world Babel, woman-built,
    And worse-confounded:  high above them stood
    The placid marble Muses, looking peace.
 
         Not peace she looked, the Head:  but rising up
    Robed in the long night of her deep hair, so
    To the open window moved, remaining there
    Fixt like a beacon-tower above the waves
    Of tempest, when the crimson-rolling eye
    Glares ruin, and the wild birds on the light
    Dash themselves dead.  She stretched her arms and called
    Across the tumult and the tumult fell.
 
         'What fear ye, brawlers? am not I your Head?
    On me, me, me, the storm first breaks:  _I_ dare
    All these male thunderbolts:  what is it ye fear?
    Peace! there are those to avenge us and they come:
    If not,--myself were like enough, O girls,
    To unfurl the maiden banner of our rights,
    And clad in iron burst the ranks of war,
    Or, falling, promartyr of our cause,
    Die:  yet I blame you not so much for fear:
    Six thousand years of fear have made you that
    From which I would redeem you:  but for those
    That stir this hubbub--you and you--I know
    Your faces there in the crowd--tomorrow morn
    We hold a great convention:  then shall they
    That love their voices more than duty, learn
    With whom they deal, dismissed in shame to live
    No wiser than their mothers, household stuff,
    Live chattels, mincers of each other's fame,
    Full of weak poison, turnspits for the clown,
    The drunkard's football, laughing-stocks of Time,
    Whose brains are in their hands and in their heels
    But fit to flaunt, to dress, to dance, to thrum,
    To tramp, to scream, to burnish, and to scour,
    For ever slaves at home and fools abroad.'
 
         She, ending, waved her hands:  thereat the crowd
    Muttering, dissolved:  then with a smile, that looked
    A stroke of cruel sunshine on the cliff,
    When all the glens are drowned in azure gloom
    Of thunder-shower, she floated to us and said:
 
         'You have done well and like a gentleman,
    And like a prince:  you have our thanks for all:
    And you look well too in your woman's dress:
    Well have you done and like a gentleman.
    You saved our life:  we owe you bitter thanks:
    Better have died and spilt our bones in the flood--
    Then men had said--but now--What hinders me
    To take such bloody vengeance on you both?--
    Yet since our father--Wasps in our good hive,
    You would-be quenchers of the light to be,
    Barbarians, grosser than your native bears--
    O would I had his sceptre for one hour!
    You that have dared to break our bound, and gulled
    Our servants, wronged and lied and thwarted us--
    _I_ wed with thee!  _I_ bound by precontract
    Your bride, our bondslave! not though all the gold
    That veins the world were packed to make your crown,
    And every spoken tongue should lord you.  Sir,
    Your falsehood and yourself are hateful to us:
    I trample on your offers and on you:
    Begone:  we will not look upon you more.
    Here, push them out at gates.'
                                  In wrath she spake.
    Then those eight mighty daughters of the plough
    Bent their broad faces toward us and addressed
    Their motion:  twice I sought to plead my cause,
    But on my shoulder hung their heavy hands,
    The weight of destiny:  so from her face
    They pushed us, down the steps, and through the court,
    And with grim laughter thrust us out at gates.
 
         We crossed the street and gained a petty mound
    Beyond it, whence we saw the lights and heard the voices murmuring.
    While I listened, came
    On a sudden the weird seizure and the doubt:
    I seemed to move among a world of ghosts;
    The Princess with her monstrous woman-guard,
    The jest and earnest working side by side,
    The cataract and the tumult and the kings
    Were shadows; and the long fantastic night
    With all its doings had and had not been,
    And all things were and were not.
                                     This went by
    As strangely as it came, and on my spirits
    Settled a gentle cloud of melancholy;
    Not long; I shook it off; for spite of doubts
    And sudden ghostly shadowings I was one
    To whom the touch of all mischance but came
    As night to him that sitting on a hill
    Sees the midsummer, midnight, Norway sun
    Set into sunrise; then we moved away.
 
 
    Thy voice is heard through rolling drums,
       That beat to battle where he stands;
    Thy face across his fancy comes,
       And gives the battle to his hands:
    A moment, while the trumpets blow,
       He sees his brood about thy knee;
    The next, like fire he meets the foe,
       And strikes him dead for thine and thee.
 
 
    So Lilia sang:  we thought her half-possessed,
    She struck such warbling fury through the words;
    And, after, feigning pique at what she called
    The raillery, or grotesque, or false sublime--
    Like one that wishes at a dance to change
    The music--clapt her hands and cried for war,
    Or some grand fight to kill and make an end:
    And he that next inherited the tale
    Half turning to the broken statue, said,
    'Sir Ralph has got your colours:  if I prove
    Your knight, and fight your battle, what for me?'
    It chanced, her empty glove upon the tomb
    Lay by her like a model of her hand.
    She took it and she flung it.  'Fight' she said,
    'And make us all we would be, great and good.'
    He knightlike in his cap instead of casque,
    A cap of Tyrol borrowed from the hall,
    Arranged the favour, and assumed the Prince.
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 
 
    Now, scarce three paces measured from the mound,
    We stumbled on a stationary voice,
    And 'Stand, who goes?'  'Two from the palace' I.
    'The second two:  they wait,' he said, 'pass on;
    His Highness wakes:' and one, that clashed in arms,
    By glimmering lanes and walls of canvas led
    Threading the soldier-city, till we heard
    The drowsy folds of our great ensign shake
    From blazoned lions o'er the imperial tent
    Whispers of war.
                    Entering, the sudden light
    Dazed me half-blind:  I stood and seemed to hear,
    As in a poplar grove when a light wind wakes
    A lisping of the innumerous leaf and dies,
    Each hissing in his neighbour's ear; and then
    A strangled titter, out of which there brake
    On all sides, clamouring etiquette to death,
    Unmeasured mirth; while now the two old kings
    Began to wag their baldness up and down,
    The fresh young captains flashed their glittering teeth,
    The huge bush-bearded Barons heaved and blew,
    And slain with laughter rolled the gilded Squire.
 
         At length my Sire, his rough cheek wet with tears,
    Panted from weary sides 'King, you are free!
    We did but keep you surety for our son,
    If this be he,--or a dragged mawkin, thou,
    That tends to her bristled grunters in the sludge:'
    For I was drenched with ooze, and torn with briers,
    More crumpled than a poppy from the sheath,
    And all one rag, disprinced from head to heel.
    Then some one sent beneath his vaulted palm
    A whispered jest to some one near him, 'Look,
    He has been among his shadows.'  'Satan take
    The old women and their shadows! (thus the King
    Roared) make yourself a man to fight with men.
    Go:  Cyril told us all.'
                            As boys that slink
    From ferule and the trespass-chiding eye,
    Away we stole, and transient in a trice
    From what was left of faded woman-slough
    To sheathing splendours and the golden scale
    Of harness, issued in the sun, that now
    Leapt from the dewy shoulders of the Earth,
    And hit the Northern hills.  Here Cyril met us.
    A little shy at first, but by and by
    We twain, with mutual pardon asked and given
    For stroke and song, resoldered peace, whereon
    Followed his tale.  Amazed he fled away
    Through the dark land, and later in the night
    Had come on Psyche weeping:  'then we fell
    Into your father's hand, and there she lies,
    But will not speak, or stir.'
                                 He showed a tent
    A stone-shot off:  we entered in, and there
    Among piled arms and rough accoutrements,
    Pitiful sight, wrapped in a soldier's cloak,
    Like some sweet sculpture draped from head to foot,
    And pushed by rude hands from its pedestal,
    All her fair length upon the ground she lay:
    And at her head a follower of the camp,
    A charred and wrinkled piece of womanhood,
    Sat watching like the watcher by the dead.
 
         Then Florian knelt, and 'Come' he whispered to her,
    'Lift up your head, sweet sister:  lie not thus.
    What have you done but right? you could not slay
    Me, nor your prince:  look up:  be comforted:
    Sweet is it to have done the thing one ought,
    When fallen in darker ways.'  And likewise I:
    'Be comforted:  have I not lost her too,
    In whose least act abides the nameless charm
    That none has else for me?'  She heard, she moved,
    She moaned, a folded voice; and up she sat,
    And raised the cloak from brows as pale and smooth
    As those that mourn half-shrouded over death
    In deathless marble.  'Her,' she said, 'my friend--
    Parted from her--betrayed her cause and mine--
    Where shall I breathe? why kept ye not your faith?
    O base and bad! what comfort? none for me!'
    To whom remorseful Cyril, 'Yet I pray
    Take comfort:  live, dear lady, for your child!'
    At which she lifted up her voice and cried.
 
         'Ah me, my babe, my blossom, ah, my child,
    My one sweet child, whom I shall see no more!
    For now will cruel Ida keep her back;
    And either she will die from want of care,
    Or sicken with ill-usage, when they say
    The child is hers--for every little fault,
    The child is hers; and they will beat my girl
    Remembering her mother:  O my flower!
    Or they will take her, they will make her hard,
    And she will pass me by in after-life
    With some cold reverence worse than were she dead.
    Ill mother that I was to leave her there,
    To lag behind, scared by the cry they made,
    The horror of the shame among them all:
    But I will go and sit beside the doors,
    And make a wild petition night and day,
    Until they hate to hear me like a wind
    Wailing for ever, till they open to me,
    And lay my little blossom at my feet,
    My babe, my sweet Aglaia, my one child:
    And I will take her up and go my way,
    And satisfy my soul with kissing her:
    Ah! what might that man not deserve of me
    Who gave me back my child?'  'Be comforted,'
    Said Cyril, 'you shall have it:' but again
    She veiled her brows, and prone she sank, and so
    Like tender things that being caught feign death,
    Spoke not, nor stirred.
                           By this a murmur ran
    Through all the camp and inward raced the scouts
    With rumour of Prince Arab hard at hand.
    We left her by the woman, and without
    Found the gray kings at parle:  and 'Look you' cried
    My father 'that our compact be fulfilled:
    You have spoilt this child; she laughs at you and man:
    She wrongs herself, her sex, and me, and him:
    But red-faced war has rods of steel and fire;
    She yields, or war.'
                        Then Gama turned to me:
    'We fear, indeed, you spent a stormy time
    With our strange girl:  and yet they say that still
    You love her.  Give us, then, your mind at large:
    How say you, war or not?'
                             'Not war, if possible,
    O king,' I said, 'lest from the abuse of war,
    The desecrated shrine, the trampled year,
    The smouldering homestead, and the household flower
    Torn from the lintel--all the common wrong--
    A smoke go up through which I loom to her
    Three times a monster:  now she lightens scorn
    At him that mars her plan, but then would hate
    (And every voice she talked with ratify it,
    And every face she looked on justify it)
    The general foe.  More soluble is this knot,
    By gentleness than war.  I want her love.
    What were I nigher this although we dashed
    Your cities into shards with catapults,
    She would not love;--or brought her chained, a slave,
    The lifting of whose eyelash is my lord,
    Not ever would she love; but brooding turn
    The book of scorn, till all my flitting chance
    Were caught within the record of her wrongs,
    And crushed to death:  and rather, Sire, than this
    I would the old God of war himself were dead,
    Forgotten, rusting on his iron hills,
    Rotting on some wild shore with ribs of wreck,
    Or like an old-world mammoth bulked in ice,
    Not to be molten out.'
                          And roughly spake
    My father, 'Tut, you know them not, the girls.
    Boy, when I hear you prate I almost think
    That idiot legend credible.  Look you, Sir!
    Man is the hunter; woman is his game:
    The sleek and shining creatures of the chase,
    We hunt them for the beauty of their skins;
    They love us for it, and we ride them down.
    Wheedling and siding with them!  Out! for shame!
    Boy, there's no rose that's half so dear to them
    As he that does the thing they dare not do,
    Breathing and sounding beauteous battle, comes
    With the air of the trumpet round him, and leaps in
    Among the women, snares them by the score
    Flattered and flustered, wins, though dashed with death
    He reddens what he kisses:  thus I won
    You mother, a good mother, a good wife,
    Worth winning; but this firebrand--gentleness
    To such as her! if Cyril spake her true,
    To catch a dragon in a cherry net,
    To trip a tigress with a gossamer
    Were wisdom to it.'
                       'Yea but Sire,' I cried,
    'Wild natures need wise curbs.  The soldier?  No:
    What dares not Ida do that she should prize
    The soldier?  I beheld her, when she rose
    The yesternight, and storming in extremes,
    Stood for her cause, and flung defiance down
    Gagelike to man, and had not shunned the death,
    No, not the soldier's:  yet I hold her, king,
    True woman:  you clash them all in one,
    That have as many differences as we.
    The violet varies from the lily as far
    As oak from elm:  one loves the soldier, one
    The silken priest of peace, one this, one that,
    And some unworthily; their sinless faith,
    A maiden moon that sparkles on a sty,
    Glorifying clown and satyr; whence they need
    More breadth of culture:  is not Ida right?
    They worth it? truer to the law within?
    Severer in the logic of a life?
    Twice as magnetic to sweet influences
    Of earth and heaven? and she of whom you speak,
    My mother, looks as whole as some serene
    Creation minted in the golden moods
    Of sovereign artists; not a thought, a touch,
    But pure as lines of green that streak the white
    Of the first snowdrop's inner leaves; I say,
    Not like the piebald miscellany, man,
    Bursts of great heart and slips in sensual mire,
    But whole and one:  and take them all-in-all,
    Were we ourselves but half as good, as kind,
    As truthful, much that Ida claims as right
    Had ne'er been mooted, but as frankly theirs
    As dues of Nature.  To our point:  not war:
    Lest I lose all.'
                     'Nay, nay, you spake but sense'
    Said Gama.  'We remember love ourself
    In our sweet youth; we did not rate him then
    This red-hot iron to be shaped with blows.
    You talk almost like Ida:  _she_ can talk;
    And there is something in it as you say:
    But you talk kindlier:  we esteem you for it.--
    He seems a gracious and a gallant Prince,
    I would he had our daughter:  for the rest,
    Our own detention, why, the causes weighed,
    Fatherly fears--you used us courteously--
    We would do much to gratify your Prince--
    We pardon it; and for your ingress here
    Upon the skirt and fringe of our fair land,
    you did but come as goblins in the night,
    Nor in the furrow broke the ploughman's head,
    Nor burnt the grange, nor bussed the milking-maid,
    Nor robbed the farmer of his bowl of cream:
    But let your Prince (our royal word upon it,
    He comes back safe) ride with us to our lines,
    And speak with Arac:  Arac's word is thrice
    As ours with Ida:  something may be done--
    I know not what--and ours shall see us friends.
    You, likewise, our late guests, if so you will,
    Follow us:  who knows? we four may build some plan
    Foursquare to opposition.'
                              Here he reached
    White hands of farewell to my sire, who growled
    An answer which, half-muffled in his beard,
    Let so much out as gave us leave to go.
 
         Then rode we with the old king across the lawns
    Beneath huge trees, a thousand rings of Spring
    In every bole, a song on every spray
    Of birds that piped their Valentines, and woke
    Desire in me to infuse my tale of love
    In the old king's ears, who promised help, and oozed
    All o'er with honeyed answer as we rode
    And blossom-fragrant slipt the heavy dews
    Gathered by night and peace, with each light air
    On our mailed heads:  but other thoughts than Peace
    Burnt in us, when we saw the embattled squares,
    And squadrons of the Prince, trampling the flowers
    With clamour:  for among them rose a cry
    As if to greet the king; they made a halt;
    The horses yelled; they clashed their arms; the drum
    Beat; merrily-blowing shrilled the martial fife;
    And in the blast and bray of the long horn
    And serpent-throated bugle, undulated
    The banner:  anon to meet us lightly pranced
    Three captains out; nor ever had I seen
    Such thews of men:  the midmost and the highest
    Was Arac:  all about his motion clung
    The shadow of his sister, as the beam
    Of the East, that played upon them, made them glance
    Like those three stars of the airy Giant's zone,
    That glitter burnished by the frosty dark;
    And as the fiery Sirius alters hue,
    And bickers into red and emerald, shone
    Their morions, washed with morning, as they came.
 
         And I that prated peace, when first I heard
    War-music, felt the blind wildbeast of force,
    Whose home is in the sinews of a man,
    Stir in me as to strike:  then took the king
    His three broad sons; with now a wandering hand
    And now a pointed finger, told them all:
    A common light of smiles at our disguise
    Broke from their lips, and, ere the windy jest
    Had laboured down within his ample lungs,
    The genial giant, Arac, rolled himself
    Thrice in the saddle, then burst out in words.
 
         'Our land invaded, 'sdeath! and he himself
    Your captive, yet my father wills not war:
    And, 'sdeath! myself, what care I, war or no?
    but then this question of your troth remains:
    And there's a downright honest meaning in her;
    She flies too high, she flies too high! and yet
    She asked but space and fairplay for her scheme;
    She prest and prest it on me--I myself,
    What know I of these things? but, life and soul!
    I thought her half-right talking of her wrongs;
    I say she flies too high, 'sdeath! what of that?
    I take her for the flower of womankind,
    And so I often told her, right or wrong,
    And, Prince, she can be sweet to those she loves,
    And, right or wrong, I care not:  this is all,
    I stand upon her side:  she made me swear it--
    'Sdeath--and with solemn rites by candle-light--
    Swear by St something--I forget her name--
    Her that talked down the fifty wisest men;
    _She_ was a princess too; and so I swore.
    Come, this is all; she will not:  waive your claim:
    If not, the foughten field, what else, at once
    Decides it, 'sdeath! against my father's will.'
 
         I lagged in answer loth to render up
    My precontract, and loth by brainless war
    To cleave the rift of difference deeper yet;
    Till one of those two brothers, half aside
    And fingering at the hair about his lip,
    To prick us on to combat 'Like to like!
    The woman's garment hid the woman's heart.'
    A taunt that clenched his purpose like a blow!
    For fiery-short was Cyril's counter-scoff,
    And sharp I answered, touched upon the point
    Where idle boys are cowards to their shame,
    'Decide it here:  why not? we are three to three.'
 
         Then spake the third 'But three to three? no more?
    No more, and in our noble sister's cause?
    More, more, for honour:  every captain waits
    Hungry for honour, angry for his king.
    More, more some fifty on a side, that each
    May breathe himself, and quick! by overthrow
    Of these or those, the question settled die.'
 
         'Yea,' answered I, 'for this wreath of air,
    This flake of rainbow flying on the highest
    Foam of men's deeds--this honour, if ye will.
    It needs must be for honour if at all:
    Since, what decision? if we fail, we fail,
    And if we win, we fail:  she would not keep
    Her compact.'  ''Sdeath! but we will send to her,'
    Said Arac, 'worthy reasons why she should
    Bide by this issue:  let our missive through,
    And you shall have her answer by the word.'
 
         'Boys!' shrieked the old king, but vainlier than a hen
    To her false daughters in the pool; for none
    Regarded; neither seemed there more to say:
    Back rode we to my father's camp, and found
    He thrice had sent a herald to the gates,
    To learn if Ida yet would cede our claim,
    Or by denial flush her babbling wells
    With her own people's life:  three times he went:
    The first, he blew and blew, but none appeared:
    He battered at the doors; none came:  the next,
    An awful voice within had warned him thence:
    The third, and those eight daughters of the plough
    Came sallying through the gates, and caught his hair,
    And so belaboured him on rib and cheek
    They made him wild:  not less one glance he caught
    Through open doors of Ida stationed there
    Unshaken, clinging to her purpose, firm
    Though compassed by two armies and the noise
    Of arms; and standing like a stately Pine
    Set in a cataract on an island-crag,
    When storm is on the heights, and right and left
    Sucked from the dark heart of the long hills roll
    The torrents, dashed to the vale:  and yet her will
    Bred will in me to overcome it or fall.
 
         But when I told the king that I was pledged
    To fight in tourney for my bride, he clashed
    His iron palms together with a cry;
    Himself would tilt it out among the lads:
    But overborne by all his bearded lords
    With reasons drawn from age and state, perforce
    He yielded, wroth and red, with fierce demur:
    And many a bold knight started up in heat,
    And sware to combat for my claim till death.
 
         All on this side the palace ran the field
    Flat to the garden-wall:  and likewise here,
    Above the garden's glowing blossom-belts,
    A columned entry shone and marble stairs,
    And great bronze valves, embossed with Tomyris
    And what she did to Cyrus after fight,
    But now fast barred:  so here upon the flat
    All that long morn the lists were hammered up,
    And all that morn the heralds to and fro,
    With message and defiance, went and came;
    Last, Ida's answer, in a royal hand,
    But shaken here and there, and rolling words
    Oration-like.  I kissed it and I read.
 
         'O brother, you have known the pangs we felt,
    What heats of indignation when we heard
    Of those that iron-cramped their women's feet;
    Of lands in which at the altar the poor bride
    Gives her harsh groom for bridal-gift a scourge;
    Of living hearts that crack within the fire
    Where smoulder their dead despots; and of those,--
    Mothers,--that, with all prophetic pity, fling
    Their pretty maids in the running flood, and swoops
    The vulture, beak and talon, at the heart
    Made for all noble motion:  and I saw
    That equal baseness lived in sleeker times
    With smoother men:  the old leaven leavened all:
    Millions of throats would bawl for civil rights,
    No woman named:  therefore I set my face
    Against all men, and lived but for mine own.
    Far off from men I built a fold for them:
    I stored it full of rich memorial:
    I fenced it round with gallant institutes,
    And biting laws to scare the beasts of prey
    And prospered; till a rout of saucy boys
    Brake on us at our books, and marred our peace,
    Masked like our maids, blustering I know not what
    Of insolence and love, some pretext held
    Of baby troth, invalid, since my will
    Sealed not the bond--the striplings! for their sport!--
    I tamed my leopards:  shall I not tame these?
    Or you? or I? for since you think me touched
    In honour--what, I would not aught of false--
    Is not our case pure? and whereas I know
    Your prowess, Arac, and what mother's blood
    You draw from, fight; you failing, I abide
    What end soever:  fail you will not.  Still
    Take not his life:  he risked it for my own;
    His mother lives:  yet whatsoe'er you do,
    Fight and fight well; strike and strike him.  O dear
    Brothers, the woman's Angel guards you, you
    The sole men to be mingled with our cause,
    The sole men we shall prize in the after-time,
    Your very armour hallowed, and your statues
    Reared, sung to, when, this gad-fly brushed aside,
    We plant a solid foot into the Time,
    And mould a generation strong to move
    With claim on claim from right to right, till she
    Whose name is yoked with children's, know herself;
    And Knowledge in our own land make her free,
    And, ever following those two crowned twins,
    Commerce and conquest, shower the fiery grain
    Of freedom broadcast over all the orbs
    Between the Northern and the Southern morn.'
 
         Then came a postscript dashed across the rest.
    See that there be no traitors in your camp:
    We seem a nest of traitors--none to trust
    Since our arms failed--this Egypt-plague of men!
    Almost our maids were better at their homes,
    Than thus man-girdled here:  indeed I think
    Our chiefest comfort is the little child
    Of one unworthy mother; which she left:
    She shall not have it back:  the child shall grow
    To prize the authentic mother of her mind.
    I took it for an hour in mine own bed
    This morning:  there the tender orphan hands
    Felt at my heart, and seemed to charm from thence
    The wrath I nursed against the world:  farewell.'
 
         I ceased; he said, 'Stubborn, but she may sit
    Upon a king's right hand in thunder-storms,
    And breed up warriors!  See now, though yourself
    Be dazzled by the wildfire Love to sloughs
    That swallow common sense, the spindling king,
    This Gama swamped in lazy tolerance.
    When the man wants weight, the woman takes it up,
    And topples down the scales; but this is fixt
    As are the roots of earth and base of all;
    Man for the field and woman for the hearth:
    Man for the sword and for the needle she:
    Man with the head and woman with the heart:
    Man to command and woman to obey;
    All else confusion.  Look you! the gray mare
    Is ill to live with, when her whinny shrills
    From tile to scullery, and her small goodman
    Shrinks in his arm-chair while the fires of Hell
    Mix with his hearth:  but you--she's yet a colt--
    Take, break her:  strongly groomed and straitly curbed
    She might not rank with those detestable
    That let the bantling scald at home, and brawl
    Their rights and wrongs like potherbs in the street.
    They say she's comely; there's the fairer chance:
    _I_ like her none the less for rating at her!
    Besides, the woman wed is not as we,
    But suffers change of frame.  A lusty brace
    Of twins may weed her of her folly.  Boy,
    The bearing and the training of a child
    Is woman's wisdom.'
                       Thus the hard old king:
    I took my leave, for it was nearly noon:
    I pored upon her letter which I held,
    And on the little clause 'take not his life:'
    I mused on that wild morning in the woods,
    And on the 'Follow, follow, thou shalt win:'
    I thought on all the wrathful king had said,
    And how the strange betrothment was to end:
    Then I remembered that burnt sorcerer's curse
    That one should fight with shadows and should fall;
    And like a flash the weird affection came:
    King, camp and college turned to hollow shows;
    I seemed to move in old memorial tilts,
    And doing battle with forgotten ghosts,
    To dream myself the shadow of a dream:
    And ere I woke it was the point of noon,
    The lists were ready.  Empanoplied and plumed
    We entered in, and waited, fifty there
    Opposed to fifty, till the trumpet blared
    At the barrier like a wild horn in a land
    Of echoes, and a moment, and once more
    The trumpet, and again:  at which the storm
    Of galloping hoofs bare on the ridge of spears
    And riders front to front, until they closed
    In conflict with the crash of shivering points,
    And thunder.  Yet it seemed a dream, I dreamed
    Of fighting.  On his haunches rose the steed,
    And into fiery splinters leapt the lance,
    And out of stricken helmets sprang the fire.
    Part sat like rocks:  part reeled but kept their seats:
    Part rolled on the earth and rose again and drew:
    Part stumbled mixt with floundering horses.  Down
    From those two bulks at Arac's side, and down
    From Arac's arm, as from a giant's flail,
    The large blows rained, as here and everywhere
    He rode the mellay, lord of the ringing lists,
    And all the plain,--brand, mace, and shaft, and shield--
    Shocked, like an iron-clanging anvil banged
    With hammers; till I thought, can this be he
    From Gama's dwarfish loins? if this be so,
    The mother makes us most--and in my dream
    I glanced aside, and saw the palace-front
    Alive with fluttering scarfs and ladies' eyes,
    And highest, among the statues, statuelike,
    Between a cymballed Miriam and a Jael,
    With Psyche's babe, was Ida watching us,
    A single band of gold about her hair,
    Like a Saint's glory up in heaven:  but she
    No saint--inexorable--no tenderness--
    Too hard, too cruel:  yet she sees me fight,
    Yea, let her see me fall! and with that I drave
    Among the thickest and bore down a Prince,
    And Cyril, one.  Yea, let me make my dream
    All that I would.  But that large-moulded man,
    His visage all agrin as at a wake,
    Made at me through the press, and, staggering back
    With stroke on stroke the horse and horseman, came
    As comes a pillar of electric cloud,
    Flaying the roofs and sucking up the drains,
    And shadowing down the champaign till it strikes
    On a wood, and takes, and breaks, and cracks, and splits,
    And twists the grain with such a roar that Earth
    Reels, and the herdsmen cry; for everything
    Game way before him:  only Florian, he
    That loved me closer than his own right eye,
    Thrust in between; but Arac rode him down:
    And Cyril seeing it, pushed against the Prince,
    With Psyche's colour round his helmet, tough,
    Strong, supple, sinew-corded, apt at arms;
    But tougher, heavier, stronger, he that smote
    And threw him:  last I spurred; I felt my veins
    Stretch with fierce heat; a moment hand to hand,
    And sword to sword, and horse to horse we hung,
    Till I struck out and shouted; the blade glanced,
    I did but shear a feather, and dream and truth
    Flowed from me; darkness closed me; and I fell.
 
 
    Home they brought her warrior dead:
       She nor swooned, nor uttered cry:
    All her maidens, watching, said,
       'She must weep or she will die.'
 
    Then they praised him, soft and low,
       Called him worthy to be loved,
    Truest friend and noblest foe;
       Yet she neither spoke nor moved.
 
    Stole a maiden from her place,
       Lightly to the warrior stept,
    Took the face-cloth from the face;
       Yet she neither moved nor wept.
 
    Rose a nurse of ninety years,
       Set his child upon her knee--
    Like summer tempest came her tears--
       'Sweet my child, I live for thee.'
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 
 
    My dream had never died or lived again.
    As in some mystic middle state I lay;
    Seeing I saw not, hearing not I heard:
    Though, if I saw not, yet they told me all
    So often that I speak as having seen.
 
         For so it seemed, or so they said to me,
    That all things grew more tragic and more strange;
    That when our side was vanquished and my cause
    For ever lost, there went up a great cry,
    The Prince is slain.  My father heard and ran
    In on the lists, and there unlaced my casque
    And grovelled on my body, and after him
    Came Psyche, sorrowing for Aglaia.
         But high upon the palace Ida stood
    With Psyche's babe in arm:  there on the roofs
    Like that great dame of Lapidoth she sang.
 
 
       'Our enemies have fallen, have fallen:  the seed,
    The little seed they laughed at in the dark,
    Has risen and cleft the soil, and grown a bulk
    Of spanless girth, that lays on every side
    A thousand arms and rushes to the Sun.
 
       'Our enemies have fallen, have fallen:  they came;
    The leaves were wet with women's tears:  they heard
    A noise of songs they would not understand:
    They marked it with the red cross to the fall,
    And would have strown it, and are fallen themselves.
 
       'Our enemies have fallen, have fallen:  they came,
    The woodmen with their axes:  lo the tree!
    But we will make it faggots for the hearth,
    And shape it plank and beam for roof and floor,
    And boats and bridges for the use of men.
 
       'Our enemies have fallen, have fallen:  they struck;
    With their own blows they hurt themselves, nor knew
    There dwelt an iron nature in the grain:
    The glittering axe was broken in their arms,
    Their arms were shattered to the shoulder blade.
 
       'Our enemies have fallen, but this shall grow
    A night of Summer from the heat, a breadth
    Of Autumn, dropping fruits of power:  and rolled
    With music in the growing breeze of Time,
    The tops shall strike from star to star, the fangs
    Shall move the stony bases of the world.
 
         'And now, O maids, behold our sanctuary
    Is violate, our laws broken:  fear we not
    To break them more in their behoof, whose arms
    Championed our cause and won it with a day
    Blanched in our annals, and perpetual feast,
    When dames and heroines of the golden year
    Shall strip a hundred hollows bare of Spring,
    To rain an April of ovation round
    Their statues, borne aloft, the three:  but come,
    We will be liberal, since our rights are won.
    Let them not lie in the tents with coarse mankind,
    Ill nurses; but descend, and proffer these
    The brethren of our blood and cause, that there
    Lie bruised and maimed, the tender ministries
    Of female hands and hospitality.'
 
         She spoke, and with the babe yet in her arms,
    Descending, burst the great bronze valves, and led
    A hundred maids in train across the Park.
    Some cowled, and some bare-headed, on they came,
    Their feet in flowers, her loveliest:  by them went
    The enamoured air sighing, and on their curls
    From the high tree the blossom wavering fell,
    And over them the tremulous isles of light
    Slided, they moving under shade:  but Blanche
    At distance followed:  so they came:  anon
    Through open field into the lists they wound
    Timorously; and as the leader of the herd
    That holds a stately fretwork to the Sun,
    And followed up by a hundred airy does,
    Steps with a tender foot, light as on air,
    The lovely, lordly creature floated on
    To where her wounded brethren lay; there stayed;
    Knelt on one knee,--the child on one,--and prest
    Their hands, and called them dear deliverers,
    And happy warriors, and immortal names,
    And said 'You shall not lie in the tents but here,
    And nursed by those for whom you fought, and served
    With female hands and hospitality.'
 
         Then, whether moved by this, or was it chance,
    She past my way.  Up started from my side
    The old lion, glaring with his whelpless eye,
    Silent; but when she saw me lying stark,
    Dishelmed and mute, and motionlessly pale,
    Cold even to her, she sighed; and when she saw
    The haggard father's face and reverend beard
    Of grisly twine, all dabbled with the blood
    Of his own son, shuddered, a twitch of pain
    Tortured her mouth, and o'er her forehead past
    A shadow, and her hue changed, and she said:
    'He saved my life:  my brother slew him for it.'
    No more:  at which the king in bitter scorn
    Drew from my neck the painting and the tress,
    And held them up:  she saw them, and a day
    Rose from the distance on her memory,
    When the good Queen, her mother, shore the tress
    With kisses, ere the days of Lady Blanche:
    And then once more she looked at my pale face:
    Till understanding all the foolish work
    Of Fancy, and the bitter close of all,
    Her iron will was broken in her mind;
    Her noble heart was molten in her breast;
    She bowed, she set the child on the earth; she laid
    A feeling finger on my brows, and presently
    'O Sire,' she said, 'he lives:  he is not dead:
    O let me have him with my brethren here
    In our own palace:  we will tend on him
    Like one of these; if so, by any means,
    To lighten this great clog of thanks, that make
    Our progress falter to the woman's goal.'
 
         She said:  but at the happy word 'he lives'
    My father stooped, re-fathered o'er my wounds.
    So those two foes above my fallen life,
    With brow to brow like night and evening mixt
    Their dark and gray, while Psyche ever stole
    A little nearer, till the babe that by us,
    Half-lapt in glowing gauze and golden brede,
    Lay like a new-fallen meteor on the grass,
    Uncared for, spied its mother and began
    A blind and babbling laughter, and to dance
    Its body, and reach its fatling innocent arms
    And lazy lingering fingers.  She the appeal
    Brooked not, but clamouring out 'Mine--mine--not yours,
    It is not yours, but mine:  give me the child'
    Ceased all on tremble:  piteous was the cry:
    So stood the unhappy mother open-mouthed,
    And turned each face her way:  wan was her cheek
    With hollow watch, her blooming mantle torn,
    Red grief and mother's hunger in her eye,
    And down dead-heavy sank her curls, and half
    The sacred mother's bosom, panting, burst
    The laces toward her babe; but she nor cared
    Nor knew it, clamouring on, till Ida heard,
    Looked up, and rising slowly from me, stood
    Erect and silent, striking with her glance
    The mother, me, the child; but he that lay
    Beside us, Cyril, battered as he was,
    Trailed himself up on one knee:  then he drew
    Her robe to meet his lips, and down she looked
    At the armed man sideways, pitying as it seemed,
    Or self-involved; but when she learnt his face,
    Remembering his ill-omened song, arose
    Once more through all her height, and o'er him grew
    Tall as a figure lengthened on the sand
    When the tide ebbs in sunshine, and he said:
 
         'O fair and strong and terrible!  Lioness
    That with your long locks play the Lion's mane!
    But Love and Nature, these are two more terrible
    And stronger.  See, your foot is on our necks,
    We vanquished, you the Victor of your will.
    What would you more? Give her the child! remain
    Orbed in your isolation:  he is dead,
    Or all as dead:  henceforth we let you be:
    Win you the hearts of women; and beware
    Lest, where you seek the common love of these,
    The common hate with the revolving wheel
    Should drag you down, and some great Nemesis
    Break from a darkened future, crowned with fire,
    And tread you out for ever:  but howso'er
    Fixed in yourself, never in your own arms
    To hold your own, deny not hers to her,
    Give her the child!  O if, I say, you keep
    One pulse that beats true woman, if you loved
    The breast that fed or arm that dandled you,
    Or own one port of sense not flint to prayer,
    Give her the child! or if you scorn to lay it,
    Yourself, in hands so lately claspt with yours,
    Or speak to her, your dearest, her one fault,
    The tenderness, not yours, that could not kill,
    Give _me_ it:  _I_ will give it her.
                                    He said:
    At first her eye with slow dilation rolled
    Dry flame, she listening; after sank and sank
    And, into mournful twilight mellowing, dwelt
    Full on the child; she took it:  'Pretty bud!
    Lily of the vale! half opened bell of the woods!
    Sole comfort of my dark hour, when a world
    Of traitorous friend and broken system made
    No purple in the distance, mystery,
    Pledge of a love not to be mine, farewell;
    These men are hard upon us as of old,
    We two must part:  and yet how fain was I
    To dream thy cause embraced in mine, to think
    I might be something to thee, when I felt
    Thy helpless warmth about my barren breast
    In the dead prime:  but may thy mother prove
    As true to thee as false, false, false to me!
    And, if thou needs must needs bear the yoke, I wish it
    Gentle as freedom'--here she kissed it:  then--
    'All good go with thee! take it Sir,' and so
    Laid the soft babe in his hard-mailed hands,
    Who turned half-round to Psyche as she sprang
    To meet it, with an eye that swum in thanks;
    Then felt it sound and whole from head to foot,
    And hugged and never hugged it close enough,
    And in her hunger mouthed and mumbled it,
    And hid her bosom with it; after that
    Put on more calm and added suppliantly:
 
         'We two were friends:  I go to mine own land
    For ever:  find some other:  as for me
    I scarce am fit for your great plans:  yet speak to me,
    Say one soft word and let me part forgiven.'
 
         But Ida spoke not, rapt upon the child.
    Then Arac.  'Ida--'sdeath! you blame the man;
    You wrong yourselves--the woman is so hard
    Upon the woman.  Come, a grace to me!
    I am your warrior:  I and mine have fought
    Your battle:  kiss her; take her hand, she weeps:
    'Sdeath!  I would sooner fight thrice o'er than see it.'
 
         But Ida spoke not, gazing on the ground,
    And reddening in the furrows of his chin,
    And moved beyond his custom, Gama said:
 
         'I've heard that there is iron in the blood,
    And I believe it.  Not one word? not one?
    Whence drew you this steel temper? not from me,
    Not from your mother, now a saint with saints.
    She said you had a heart--I heard her say it--
    "Our Ida has a heart"--just ere she died--
    "But see that some on with authority
    Be near her still" and I--I sought for one--
    All people said she had authority--
    The Lady Blanche:  much profit!  Not one word;
    No! though your father sues:  see how you stand
    Stiff as Lot's wife, and all the good knights maimed,
    I trust that there is no one hurt to death,
    For our wild whim:  and was it then for this,
    Was it for this we gave our palace up,
    Where we withdrew from summer heats and state,
    And had our wine and chess beneath the planes,
    And many a pleasant hour with her that's gone,
    Ere you were born to vex us?  Is it kind?
    Speak to her I say:  is this not she of whom,
    When first she came, all flushed you said to me
    Now had you got a friend of your own age,
    Now could you share your thought; now should men see
    Two women faster welded in one love
    Than pairs of wedlock; she you walked with, she
    You talked with, whole nights long, up in the tower,
    Of sine and arc, spheroid and azimuth,
    And right ascension, Heaven knows what; and now
    A word, but one, one little kindly word,
    Not one to spare her:  out upon you, flint!
    You love nor her, nor me, nor any; nay,
    You shame your mother's judgment too.  Not one?
    You will not? well--no heart have you, or such
    As fancies like the vermin in a nut
    Have fretted all to dust and bitterness.'
    So said the small king moved beyond his wont.
 
         But Ida stood nor spoke, drained of her force
    By many a varying influence and so long.
    Down through her limbs a drooping languor wept:
    Her head a little bent; and on her mouth
    A doubtful smile dwelt like a clouded moon
    In a still water:  then brake out my sire,
    Lifted his grim head from my wounds.  'O you,
    Woman, whom we thought woman even now,
    And were half fooled to let you tend our son,
    Because he might have wished it--but we see,
    The accomplice of your madness unforgiven,
    And think that you might mix his draught with death,
    When your skies change again:  the rougher hand
    Is safer:  on to the tents:  take up the Prince.'
 
         He rose, and while each ear was pricked to attend
    A tempest, through the cloud that dimmed her broke
    A genial warmth and light once more, and shone
    Through glittering drops on her sad friend.
                                               'Come hither.
    O Psyche,' she cried out, 'embrace me, come,
    Quick while I melt; make reconcilement sure
    With one that cannot keep her mind an hour:
    Come to the hollow hear they slander so!
    Kiss and be friends, like children being chid!
    _I_ seem no more:  _I_ want forgiveness too:
    I should have had to do with none but maids,
    That have no links with men.  Ah false but dear,
    Dear traitor, too much loved, why?--why?--Yet see,
    Before these kings we embrace you yet once more
    With all forgiveness, all oblivion,
    And trust, not love, you less.
                                  And now, O sire,
    Grant me your son, to nurse, to wait upon him,
    Like mine own brother.  For my debt to him,
    This nightmare weight of gratitude, I know it;
    Taunt me no more:  yourself and yours shall have
    Free adit; we will scatter all our maids
    Till happier times each to her proper hearth:
    What use to keep them here--now? grant my prayer.
    Help, father, brother, help; speak to the king:
    Thaw this male nature to some touch of that
    Which kills me with myself, and drags me down
    From my fixt height to mob me up with all
    The soft and milky rabble of womankind,
    Poor weakling even as they are.'
                                    Passionate tears
    Followed:  the king replied not:  Cyril said:
    'Your brother, Lady,--Florian,--ask for him
    Of your great head--for he is wounded too--
    That you may tend upon him with the prince.'
    'Ay so,' said Ida with a bitter smile,
    'Our laws are broken:  let him enter too.'
    Then Violet, she that sang the mournful song,
    And had a cousin tumbled on the plain,
    Petitioned too for him.  'Ay so,' she said,
    'I stagger in the stream:  I cannot keep
    My heart an eddy from the brawling hour:
    We break our laws with ease, but let it be.'
    'Ay so?' said Blanche:  'Amazed am I to her
    Your Highness:  but your Highness breaks with ease
    The law your Highness did not make:  'twas I.
    I had been wedded wife, I knew mankind,
    And blocked them out; but these men came to woo
    Your Highness--verily I think to win.'
 
         So she, and turned askance a wintry eye:
    But Ida with a voice, that like a bell
    Tolled by an earthquake in a trembling tower,
    Rang ruin, answered full of grief and scorn.
 
         'Fling our doors wide! all, all, not one, but all,
    Not only he, but by my mother's soul,
    Whatever man lies wounded, friend or foe,
    Shall enter, if he will.  Let our girls flit,
    Till the storm die! but had you stood by us,
    The roar that breaks the Pharos from his base
    Had left us rock.  She fain would sting us too,
    But shall not.  Pass, and mingle with your likes.
    We brook no further insult but are gone.'
         She turned; the very nape of her white neck
    Was rosed with indignation:  but the Prince
    Her brother came; the king her father charmed
    Her wounded soul with words:  nor did mine own
    Refuse her proffer, lastly gave his hand.
 
         Then us they lifted up, dead weights, and bare
    Straight to the doors:  to them the doors gave way
    Groaning, and in the Vestal entry shrieked
    The virgin marble under iron heels:
    And on they moved and gained the hall, and there
    Rested:  but great the crush was, and each base,
    To left and right, of those tall columns drowned
    In silken fluctuation and the swarm
    Of female whisperers:  at the further end
    Was Ida by the throne, the two great cats
    Close by her, like supporters on a shield,
    Bow-backed with fear:  but in the centre stood
    The common men with rolling eyes; amazed
    They glared upon the women, and aghast
    The women stared at these, all silent, save
    When armour clashed or jingled, while the day,
    Descending, struck athwart the hall, and shot
    A flying splendour out of brass and steel,
    That o'er the statues leapt from head to head,
    Now fired an angry Pallas on the helm,
    Now set a wrathful Dian's moon on flame,
    And now and then an echo started up,
    And shuddering fled from room to room, and died
    Of fright in far apartments.
                                Then the voice
    Of Ida sounded, issuing ordinance:
    And me they bore up the broad stairs, and through
    The long-laid galleries past a hundred doors
    To one deep chamber shut from sound, and due
    To languid limbs and sickness; left me in it;
    And others otherwhere they laid; and all
    That afternoon a sound arose of hoof
    And chariot, many a maiden passing home
    Till happier times; but some were left of those
    Held sagest, and the great lords out and in,
    From those two hosts that lay beside the walls,
    Walked at their will, and everything was changed.
 
 
    Ask me no more:  the moon may draw the sea;
       The cloud may stoop from heaven and take the shape
       With fold to fold, of mountain or of cape;
    But O too fond, when have I answered thee?
                           Ask me no more.
 
    Ask me no more:  what answer should I give?
       I love not hollow cheek or faded eye:
       Yet, O my friend, I will not have thee die!
    Ask me no more, lest I should bid thee live;
                           Ask me no more.
 
    Ask me no more:  thy fate and mine are sealed:
       I strove against the stream and all in vain:
       Let the great river take me to the main:
    No more, dear love, for at a touch I yield;
                           Ask me no more.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 
 
    So was their sanctuary violated,
    So their fair college turned to hospital;
    At first with all confusion:  by and by
    Sweet order lived again with other laws:
    A kindlier influence reigned; and everywhere
    Low voices with the ministering hand
    Hung round the sick:  the maidens came, they talked,
    They sang, they read:  till she not fair began
    To gather light, and she that was, became
    Her former beauty treble; and to and fro
    With books, with flowers, with Angel offices,
    Like creatures native unto gracious act,
    And in their own clear element, they moved.
 
         But sadness on the soul of Ida fell,
    And hatred of her weakness, blent with shame.
    Old studies failed; seldom she spoke:  but oft
    Clomb to the roofs, and gazed alone for hours
    On that disastrous leaguer, swarms of men
    Darkening her female field:  void was her use,
    And she as one that climbs a peak to gaze
    O'er land and main, and sees a great black cloud
    Drag inward from the deeps, a wall of night,
    Blot out the slope of sea from verge to shore,
    And suck the blinding splendour from the sand,
    And quenching lake by lake and tarn by tarn
    Expunge the world:  so fared she gazing there;
    So blackened all her world in secret, blank
    And waste it seemed and vain; till down she came,
    And found fair peace once more among the sick.
 
         And twilight dawned; and morn by morn the lark
    Shot up and shrilled in flickering gyres, but I
    Lay silent in the muffled cage of life:
    And twilight gloomed; and broader-grown the bowers
    Drew the great night into themselves, and Heaven,
    Star after Star, arose and fell; but I,
    Deeper than those weird doubts could reach me, lay
    Quite sundered from the moving Universe,
    Nor knew what eye was on me, nor the hand
    That nursed me, more than infants in their sleep.
 
         But Psyche tended Florian:  with her oft,
    Melissa came; for Blanche had gone, but left
    Her child among us, willing she should keep
    Court-favour:  here and there the small bright head,
    A light of healing, glanced about the couch,
    Or through the parted silks the tender face
    Peeped, shining in upon the wounded man
    With blush and smile, a medicine in themselves
    To wile the length from languorous hours, and draw
    The sting from pain; nor seemed it strange that soon
    He rose up whole, and those fair charities
    Joined at her side; nor stranger seemed that hears
    So gentle, so employed, should close in love,
    Than when two dewdrops on the petals shake
    To the same sweet air, and tremble deeper down,
    And slip at once all-fragrant into one.
 
         Less prosperously the second suit obtained
    At first with Psyche.  Not though Blanche had sworn
    That after that dark night among the fields
    She needs must wed him for her own good name;
         Not though he built upon the babe restored;
    Nor though she liked him, yielded she, but feared
    To incense the Head once more; till on a day
    When Cyril pleaded, Ida came behind
    Seen but of Psyche:  on her foot she hung
    A moment, and she heard, at which her face
    A little flushed, and she past on; but each
    Assumed from thence a half-consent involved
    In stillness, plighted troth, and were at peace.
 
         Nor only these:  Love in the sacred halls
    Held carnival at will, and flying struck
    With showers of random sweet on maid and man.
    Nor did her father cease to press my claim,
    Nor did mine own, now reconciled; nor yet
    Did those twin-brothers, risen again and whole;
    Nor Arac, satiate with his victory.
 
         But I lay still, and with me oft she sat:
    Then came a change; for sometimes I would catch
    Her hand in wild delirium, gripe it hard,
    And fling it like a viper off, and shriek
    'You are not Ida;' clasp it once again,
    And call her Ida, though I knew her not,
    And call her sweet, as if in irony,
    And call her hard and cold which seemed a truth:
    And still she feared that I should lose my mind,
    And often she believed that I should die:
    Till out of long frustration of her care,
    And pensive tendance in the all-weary noons,
    And watches in the dead, the dark, when clocks
    Throbbed thunder through the palace floors, or called
    On flying Time from all their silver tongues--
    And out of memories of her kindlier days,
    And sidelong glances at my father's grief,
    And at the happy lovers heart in heart--
    And out of hauntings of my spoken love,
    And lonely listenings to my muttered dream,
    And often feeling of the helpless hands,
    And wordless broodings on the wasted cheek--
    From all a closer interest flourished up,
    Tenderness touch by touch, and last, to these,
    Love, like an Alpine harebell hung with tears
    By some cold morning glacier; frail at first
    And feeble, all unconscious of itself,
    But such as gathered colour day by day.
 
    Last I woke sane, but well-nigh close to death
    For weakness:  it was evening:  silent light
    Slept on the painted walls, wherein were wrought
    Two grand designs; for on one side arose
    The women up in wild revolt, and stormed
    At the Oppian Law.  Titanic shapes, they crammed
    The forum, and half-crushed among the rest
    A dwarf-like Cato cowered.  On the other side
    Hortensia spoke against the tax; behind,
    A train of dames:  by axe and eagle sat,
    With all their foreheads drawn in Roman scowls,
    And half the wolf's-milk curdled in their veins,
    The fierce triumvirs; and before them paused
    Hortensia pleading:  angry was her face.
 
         I saw the forms:  I knew not where I was:
    They did but look like hollow shows; nor more
    Sweet Ida:  palm to palm she sat:  the dew
    Dwelt in her eyes, and softer all her shape
    And rounder seemed:  I moved:  I sighed:  a touch
    Came round my wrist, and tears upon my hand:
    Then all for languor and self-pity ran
    Mine down my face, and with what life I had,
    And like a flower that cannot all unfold,
    So drenched it is with tempest, to the sun,
    Yet, as it may, turns toward him, I on her
    Fixt my faint eyes, and uttered whisperingly:
 
         'If you be, what I think you, some sweet dream,
    I would but ask you to fulfil yourself:
    But if you be that Ida whom I knew,
    I ask you nothing:  only, if a dream,
    Sweet dream, be perfect.  I shall die tonight.
    Stoop down and seem to kiss me ere I die.'
 
         I could no more, but lay like one in trance,
    That hears his burial talked of by his friends,
    And cannot speak, nor move, nor make one sign,
    But lies and dreads his doom.  She turned; she paused;
    She stooped; and out of languor leapt a cry;
    Leapt fiery Passion from the brinks of death;
    And I believed that in the living world
    My spirit closed with Ida's at the lips;
    Till back I fell, and from mine arms she rose
    Glowing all over noble shame; and all
    Her falser self slipt from her like a robe,
    And left her woman, lovelier in her mood
    Than in her mould that other, when she came
    From barren deeps to conquer all with love;
    And down the streaming crystal dropt; and she
    Far-fleeted by the purple island-sides,
    Naked, a double light in air and wave,
    To meet her Graces, where they decked her out
    For worship without end; nor end of mine,
    Stateliest, for thee! but mute she glided forth,
    Nor glanced behind her, and I sank and slept,
    Filled through and through with Love, a happy sleep.
 
         Deep in the night I woke:  she, near me, held
    A volume of the Poets of her land:
    There to herself, all in low tones, she read.
 
 
       'Now sleeps the crimson petal, now the white;
    Nor waves the cypress in the palace walk;
    Nor winks the gold fin in the porphyry font:
    The fire-fly wakens:  wake thou with me.
 
       Now droops the milkwhite peacock like a ghost,
    And like a ghost she glimmers on to me.
 
       Now lies the Earth all Danae to the stars,
    And all thy heart lies open unto me.
 
       Now lies the silent meteor on, and leaves
    A shining furrow, as thy thoughts in me.
 
       Now folds the lily all her sweetness up,
    And slips into the bosom of the lake:
    So fold thyself, my dearest, thou, and slip
    Into my bosom and be lost in me.'
 
 
    I heard her turn the page; she found a small
    Sweet Idyl, and once more, as low, she read:
 
 
       'Come down, O maid, from yonder mountain height:
    What pleasure lives in height (the shepherd sang)
    In height and cold, the splendour of the hills?
    But cease to move so near the Heavens, and cease
    To glide a sunbeam by the blasted Pine,
    To sit a star upon the sparkling spire;
    And come, for love is of the valley, come,
    For love is of the valley, come thou down
    And find him; by the happy threshold, he,
    Or hand in hand with Plenty in the maize,
    Or red with spirted purple of the vats,
    Or foxlike in the vine; nor cares to walk
    With Death and Morning on the silver horns,
    Nor wilt thou snare him in the white ravine,
    Nor find him dropt upon the firths of ice,
    That huddling slant in furrow-cloven falls
    To roll the torrent out of dusky doors:
    But follow; let the torrent dance thee down
    To find him in the valley; let the wild
    Lean-headed Eagles yelp alone, and leave
    The monstrous ledges there to slope, and spill
    Their thousand wreaths of dangling water-smoke,
    That like a broken purpose waste in air:
    So waste not thou; but come; for all the vales
    Await thee; azure pillars of the hearth
    Arise to thee; the children call, and I
    Thy shepherd pipe, and sweet is every sound,
    Sweeter thy voice, but every sound is sweet;
    Myriads of rivulets hurrying through the lawn,
    The moan of doves in immemorial elms,
    And murmuring of innumerable bees.'
 
 
    So she low-toned; while with shut eyes I lay
    Listening; then looked.  Pale was the perfect face;
    The bosom with long sighs laboured; and meek
    Seemed the full lips, and mild the luminous eyes,
    And the voice trembled and the hand.  She said
    Brokenly, that she knew it, she had failed
    In sweet humility; had failed in all;
    That all her labour was but as a block
    Left in the quarry; but she still were loth,
    She still were loth to yield herself to one
    That wholly scorned to help their equal rights
    Against the sons of men, and barbarous laws.
    She prayed me not to judge their cause from her
    That wronged it, sought far less for truth than power
    In knowledge:  something wild within her breast,
    A greater than all knowledge, beat her down.
    And she had nursed me there from week to week:
    Much had she learnt in little time.  In part
    It was ill counsel had misled the girl
    To vex true hearts:  yet was she but a girl--
    'Ah fool, and made myself a Queen of farce!
    When comes another such? never, I think,
    Till the Sun drop, dead, from the signs.'
                                             Her voice
    choked, and her forehead sank upon her hands,
    And her great heart through all the faultful Past
    Went sorrowing in a pause I dared not break;
    Till notice of a change in the dark world
    Was lispt about the acacias, and a bird,
    That early woke to feed her little ones,
    Sent from a dewy breast a cry for light:
    She moved, and at her feet the volume fell.
 
         'Blame not thyself too much,' I said, 'nor blame
    Too much the sons of men and barbarous laws;
    These were the rough ways of the world till now.
    Henceforth thou hast a helper, me, that know
    The woman's cause is man's:  they rise or sink
    Together, dwarfed or godlike, bond or free:
    For she that out of Lethe scales with man
    The shining steps of Nature, shares with man
    His nights, his days, moves with him to one goal,
    Stays all the fair young planet in her hands--
    If she be small, slight-natured, miserable,
    How shall men grow? but work no more alone!
    Our place is much:  as far as in us lies
    We two will serve them both in aiding her--
    Will clear away the parasitic forms
    That seem to keep her up but drag her down--
    Will leave her space to burgeon out of all
    Within her--let her make herself her own
    To give or keep, to live and learn and be
    All that not harms distinctive womanhood.
    For woman is not undevelopt man,
    But diverse:  could we make her as the man,
    Sweet Love were slain:  his dearest bond is this,
    Not like to like, but like in difference.
    Yet in the long years liker must they grow;
    The man be more of woman, she of man;
    He gain in sweetness and in moral height,
    Nor lose the wrestling thews that throw the world;
    She mental breadth, nor fail in childward care,
    Nor lose the childlike in the larger mind;
    Till at the last she set herself to man,
    Like perfect music unto noble words;
    And so these twain, upon the skirts of Time,
    Sit side by side, full-summed in all their powers,
    Dispensing harvest, sowing the To-be,
    Self-reverent each and reverencing each,
    Distinct in individualities,
    But like each other even as those who love.
    Then comes the statelier Eden back to men:
    Then reign the world's great bridals, chaste and calm:
    Then springs the crowning race of humankind.
    May these things be!'
                         Sighing she spoke 'I fear
    They will not.'
                   'Dear, but let us type them now
    In our own lives, and this proud watchword rest
    Of equal; seeing either sex alone
    Is half itself, and in true marriage lies
    Nor equal, nor unequal:  each fulfils
    Defect in each, and always thought in thought,
    Purpose in purpose, will in will, they grow,
    The single pure and perfect animal,
    The two-celled heart beating, with one full stroke,
    Life.'
          And again sighing she spoke:  'A dream
    That once was mind! what woman taught you this?'
 
         'Alone,' I said, 'from earlier than I know,
    Immersed in rich foreshadowings of the world,
    I loved the woman:  he, that doth not, lives
    A drowning life, besotted in sweet self,
    Or pines in sad experience worse than death,
    Or keeps his winged affections clipt with crime:
    Yet was there one through whom I loved her, one
    Not learned, save in gracious household ways,
    Not perfect, nay, but full of tender wants,
    No Angel, but a dearer being, all dipt
    In Angel instincts, breathing Paradise,
    Interpreter between the Gods and men,
    Who looked all native to her place, and yet
    On tiptoe seemed to touch upon a sphere
    Too gross to tread, and all male minds perforce
    Swayed to her from their orbits as they moved,
    And girdled her with music.  Happy he
    With such a mother! faith in womankind
    Beats with his blood, and trust in all things high
    Comes easy to him, and though he trip and fall
    He shall not blind his soul with clay.'
                                           'But I,'
    Said Ida, tremulously, 'so all unlike--
    It seems you love to cheat yourself with words:
    This mother is your model.  I have heard
    of your strange doubts:  they well might be:  I seem
    A mockery to my own self.  Never, Prince;
    You cannot love me.'
                        'Nay but thee' I said
    'From yearlong poring on thy pictured eyes,
    Ere seen I loved, and loved thee seen, and saw
    Thee woman through the crust of iron moods
    That masked thee from men's reverence up, and forced
    Sweet love on pranks of saucy boyhood:  now,
    Given back to life, to life indeed, through thee,
    Indeed I love:  the new day comes, the light
    Dearer for night, as dearer thou for faults
    Lived over:  lift thine eyes; my doubts are dead,
    My haunting sense of hollow shows:  the change,
    This truthful change in thee has killed it.  Dear,
    Look up, and let thy nature strike on mine,
    Like yonder morning on the blind half-world;
    Approach and fear not; breathe upon my brows;
    In that fine air I tremble, all the past
    Melts mist-like into this bright hour, and this
    Is morn to more, and all the rich to-come
    Reels, as the golden Autumn woodland reels
    Athwart the smoke of burning weeds.  Forgive me,
    I waste my heart in signs:  let be.  My bride,
    My wife, my life.  O we will walk this world,
    Yoked in all exercise of noble end,
    And so through those dark gates across the wild
    That no man knows.  Indeed I love thee:  come,
    Yield thyself up:  my hopes and thine are one:
    Accomplish thou my manhood and thyself;
    Lay thy sweet hands in mine and trust to me.'
 
 
 
 
 CONCLUSION
 
 
 
    So closed our tale, of which I give you all
    The random scheme as wildly as it rose:
    The words are mostly mine; for when we ceased
    There came a minute's pause, and Walter said,
    'I wish she had not yielded!' then to me,
    'What, if you drest it up poetically?'
    So prayed the men, the women:  I gave assent:
    Yet how to bind the scattered scheme of seven
    Together in one sheaf?  What style could suit?
    The men required that I should give throughout
    The sort of mock-heroic gigantesque,
    With which we bantered little Lilia first:
    The women--and perhaps they felt their power,
    For something in the ballads which they sang,
    Or in their silent influence as they sat,
    Had ever seemed to wrestle with burlesque,
    And drove us, last, to quite a solemn close--
    They hated banter, wished for something real,
    A gallant fight, a noble princess--why
    Not make her true-heroic--true-sublime?
    Or all, they said, as earnest as the close?
    Which yet with such a framework scarce could be.
    Then rose a little feud betwixt the two,
    Betwixt the mockers and the realists:
    And I, betwixt them both, to please them both,
    And yet to give the story as it rose,
    I moved as in a strange diagonal,
    And maybe neither pleased myself nor them.
 
         But Lilia pleased me, for she took no part
    In our dispute:  the sequel of the tale
    Had touched her; and she sat, she plucked the grass,
    She flung it from her, thinking:  last, she fixt
    A showery glance upon her aunt, and said,
    'You--tell us what we are' who might have told,
    For she was crammed with theories out of books,
    But that there rose a shout:  the gates were closed
    At sunset, and the crowd were swarming now,
    To take their leave, about the garden rails.
 
         So I and some went out to these:  we climbed
    The slope to Vivian-place, and turning saw
    The happy valleys, half in light, and half
    Far-shadowing from the west, a land of peace;
    Gray halls alone among their massive groves;
    Trim hamlets; here and there a rustic tower
    Half-lost in belts of hop and breadths of wheat;
    The shimmering glimpses of a stream; the seas;
    A red sail, or a white; and far beyond,
    Imagined more than seen, the skirts of France.
 
         'Look there, a garden!' said my college friend,
    The Tory member's elder son, 'and there!
    God bless the narrow sea which keeps her off,
    And keeps our Britain, whole within herself,
    A nation yet, the rulers and the ruled--
    Some sense of duty, something of a faith,
    Some reverence for the laws ourselves have made,
    Some patient force to change them when we will,
    Some civic manhood firm against the crowd--
    But yonder, whiff! there comes a sudden heat,
    The gravest citizen seems to lose his head,
    The king is scared, the soldier will not fight,
    The little boys begin to shoot and stab,
    A kingdom topples over with a shriek
    Like an old woman, and down rolls the world
    In mock heroics stranger than our own;
    Revolts, republics, revolutions, most
    No graver than a schoolboys' barring out;
    Too comic for the serious things they are,
    Too solemn for the comic touches in them,
    Like our wild Princess with as wise a dream
    As some of theirs--God bless the narrow seas!
    I wish they were a whole Atlantic broad.'
 
         'Have patience,' I replied, 'ourselves are full
    Of social wrong; and maybe wildest dreams
    Are but the needful preludes of the truth:
    For me, the genial day, the happy crowd,
    The sport half-science, fill me with a faith.
    This fine old world of ours is but a child
    Yet in the go-cart.  Patience!  Give it time
    To learn its limbs:  there is a hand that guides.'
 
         In such discourse we gained the garden rails,
    And there we saw Sir Walter where he stood,
    Before a tower of crimson holly-hoaks,
    Among six boys, head under head, and looked
    No little lily-handed Baronet he,
    A great broad-shouldered genial Englishman,
    A lord of fat prize-oxen and of sheep,
    A raiser of huge melons and of pine,
    A patron of some thirty charities,
    A pamphleteer on guano and on grain,
    A quarter-sessions chairman, abler none;
    Fair-haired and redder than a windy morn;
    Now shaking hands with him, now him, of those
    That stood the nearest--now addressed to speech--
    Who spoke few words and pithy, such as closed
    Welcome, farewell, and welcome for the year
    To follow:  a shout rose again, and made
    The long line of the approaching rookery swerve
    From the elms, and shook the branches of the deer
    From slope to slope through distant ferns, and rang
    Beyond the bourn of sunset; O, a shout
    More joyful than the city-roar that hails
    Premier or king!  Why should not these great Sirs
    Give up their parks some dozen times a year
    To let the people breathe?  So thrice they cried,
    I likewise, and in groups they streamed away.
 
         But we went back to the Abbey, and sat on,
    So much the gathering darkness charmed:  we sat
    But spoke not, rapt in nameless reverie,
    Perchance upon the future man:  the walls
    Blackened about us, bats wheeled, and owls whooped,
    And gradually the powers of the night,
    That range above the region of the wind,
    Deepening the courts of twilight broke them up
    Through all the silent spaces of the worlds,
    Beyond all thought into the Heaven of Heavens.
 
         Last little Lilia, rising quietly,
    Disrobed the glimmering statue of Sir Ralph
    From those rich silks, and home well-pleased we went.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Clytie Siddall, Charles Franks,
 and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE EARLY POEMS
 
 OF
 
 ALFRED LORD TENNYSON
 
 
 
 EDITED WITH A CRITICAL INTRODUCTION. COMMENTARIES AND NOTES,
 
 TOGETHER WITH THE VARIOUS READINGS,
 
 A TRANSCRIPT OF THE POEMS TEMPORARILY AND FINALLY SUPPRESSED
 
 AND A BIBLIOGRAPHY
 
 
 
 BY
 
 JOHN CHURTON COLLINS
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 A Critical edition of Tennyson's poems has long been an acknowledged
 want. He has taken his place among the English Classics, and as a
 Classic he is, and will be, studied, seriously and minutely, by many
 thousands of his countrymen, both in the present generation as well as
 in future ages. As in the works of his more illustrious brethren, so in
 his trifles will become subjects of curious interest, and assume an
 importance of which we have no conception now. Here he will engage the
 attention of the antiquary, there of the social historian. Long after
 his politics, his ethics, his theology have ceased to be immediately
 influential, they will be of immense historical significance. A
 consummate artist and a consummate master of our language, the process
 by which he achieved results so memorable can never fail to be of
 interest, and of absorbing interest, to critical students.
 
 I must, I fear, claim the indulgence due to one who attempts, for the
 first time, a critical edition of a text so perplexingly voluminous in
 variants as Tennyson's. I can only say that I have spared neither time
 nor labour to be accurate and exhaustive. I have myself collated, or
 have had collated for me, every edition recorded in the British Museum
 Catalogue, and where that has been deficient I have had recourse to
 other public libraries, and to the libraries of private friends. I am
 not conscious that I have left any variant unrecorded, but I should not
 like to assert that this is the case. Tennyson was so restlessly
 indefatigable in his corrections that there may lurk, in editions of the
 poems which I have not seen, other variants; and it is also possible
 that, in spite of my vigilance, some may have escaped me even in the
 editions which have been collated, and some may have been made at a date
 earlier than the date recorded. But I trust this has not been the case.
 
 Of the Bibliography I can say no more than that I have done my utmost to
 make it complete, and that it is very much fuller than any which has
 hitherto appeared. That it is exhaustive I dare not promise.
 
 With regard to the Notes and Commentaries, I have spared no pains to
 explain everything which seemed to need explanation. There are, I think,
 only two points which I have not been able to clear up, namely, the name
 of the friend to whom the 'Palace of Art' was addressed, and the name
 of the friend to whom the 'Verses after Reading a Life and Letters'
 were addressed. I have consulted every one who would be likely to throw
 light on the subject, including the poet's surviving sister, many of his
 friends, and the present Lord Tennyson, but without success; so the
 names, if they were not those of some imaginary person, appear to be
 irrecoverable. The Prize Poem, 'Timbuctoo', as well as the poems which
 were temporarily or finally suppressed in the volumes published in 1830
 and 1832 have been printed in the Appendix: those which were
 subsequently incorporated in his Works, in large type; those which he
 never reprinted, in small.
 
 The text here adopted is that of 1857, but Messrs. Macmillan, to whom I
 beg to express my hearty thanks, have most generously allowed me to
 record all the variants which are still protected by copyright. I have
 to thank them, too, for assistance in the Bibliography. I have also to
 thank Mr. J. T. Wise for his kindness in lending me the privately
 printed volume containing the 'Morte d'Arthur, Dora,' etc.
 
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 I
 
 The development of Tennyson's genius, methods, aims and capacity of
 achievement in poetry can be studied with singular precision and fulness
 in the history of the poems included in the present volume. In 1842 he
 published the two volumes which gave him, by almost general consent, the
 first place among the poets of his time, for, though Wordsworth was
 alive, Wordsworth's best work had long been done. These two volumes
 contained poems which had appeared before, some in 1830 and some in
 1832, and some which were then given to the world for the first time, so
 that they represent work belonging to three eras in the poet's life,
 poems written before he had completed his twenty-second year and
 belonging for the most part to his boyhood, poems written in his early
 manhood, and poems written between his thirty-first and thirty-fourth
 year.
 
 The poems published in 1830 had the following title-page:
 
   "Poems, Chiefly Lyrical, by Alfred Tennyson.
   London: Effingham Wilson, Royal Exchange, 1830".
 
 They are fifty-six in number and the titles are:--
 
 
   Claribel..
   Lilian.  .
   Isabel.  .
   Elegiacs.+
   The "How" and the "Why".
   Mariana. .
   To----. Madeline.
   The Merman.
   The Mermaid. .
   Supposed Confessions of a second-rate sensitive mind not in unity with
     itself. +
   The Burial of Love.
   To--(Sainted Juliet dearest name.)
   Song. The Owl. .
   Second Song. To the same. .
   Recollections of the Arabian Nights. .
   Ode to Memory. .
   Song. (I'the the glooming light.)
   Song. (A spirit haunts.) .
   Adeline. .
   A Character. .
   Song. (The lint-white and the throstle cock.)
   Song. (Every day hath its night.)
   The Poet. .
   The Poet's Mind. .
   Nothing will die. +
   All things will die. +
   Hero to Leander.
   The Mystic.
   The Dying Swan. .
   A Dirge. .
   The Grasshopper.
   Love, Pride and Forgetfulness.
   Chorus (in an unpublished drama written very early).
   Lost Hope.
   The Deserted House. +@
   The Tears of Heaven.
   Love and Sorrow.
   To a Lady Sleeping.
   Sonnet. (Could I outwear my present state of woe.)
   Sonnet. (Though Night hath climbed her peak of highest noon.)
   Sonnet. (Shall the hag Evil die with child of Good.)
   Sonnet. (The pallid thunderstricken sigh for gain.)
   Love.
   Love and Death. .
   The Kraken. +
   The Ballad of Oriana. .
   Circumstance. .
   English War Song.
   National Song.
   The Sleeping Beauty. .
   Dualisms.
   We are Free.
   The Sea-Fairies. +@
   Sonnet
   to J.M.K. .
   [Greek (transliterated): oi rheontes] .
 
 
 .   Of these the poems marked . appeared in the edition of 1842, and
 were not much altered.
 
 +   Those marked + were, in addition to the italicised poems, afterwards
 included among the 'Juvenilia' in the collected works (1871-1872),
 though excluded from all preceding editions of the poems.
 
 +@  Those marked @+ were restored in editions previous to the first
 collected editions of the works.
 
 
 
 
 In December, 1832, appeared a second volume (it is dated on the
 title-page, 1833):
 
 "Poems by Alfred Tennyson. London: Moxon, MDCCCXXXIII."
 
 This contains thirty poems:--
 
 
   Sonnet. (Mine be the strength of spirit fierce and free.) #
   To--.   (All good things have not kept aloof.) #
   Buonaparte. #
   Sonnet I. (O Beauty passing beauty, sweetest Sweet.)
   Sonnet II. (But were I loved, as I desire to be.) #
   The Lady of Shalott. .+
   Mariana in the South. .+
   Eleanore. .
   The Miller's Daughter. .+
   [Greek: phainetai moi kaenos isos theoisin hemmen anaer] .
   'none. .+
   The Sisters. .
   To--. (With the Palace of Art.)
   The Palace of Art .+
   The May Queen. .
   New Year's Eve. .
   The Hesperides.
   The Lotos Eaters. .
   Rosalind. #
   A Dream of Fair Women .+
   Song. (Who can say.)
   Margaret. .
   Kate.
   Sonnet. Written on hearing of the outbreak of the Polish Insurrection.
   Sonnet. On the result of the late Russian invasion of Poland. #
   Sonnet. (As when with downcast eyes we muse and brood.) #
   O Darling Room.
   To Christopher North.
   The Death of the Old Year. .
   To J. S. .
 
 
 .   Of these the poems marked . were included in the edition of 1842;
 
 +   those marked + being greatly altered and in some cases almost
       rewritten,
 
 @   those marked @ being practically unaltered.
 
 #  To those reprinted in the collected works # is added.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 In 1842 appeared the two volumes which contained, in addition to the
 selections made from the two former volumes, several new poems:--
 
 "Poems by Alfred Tennyson. In two volumes. London: Edward Moxon,
 MDCCCXLII."
 
 The first volume is divided into two parts:
 
 (1) Selections from the poems published in 1830, 'Claribel' to the
 'Sonnet to J. M. K.' inclusive.
 
 (2) Selections from the poems of 1832, 'The Lady of Shalott' to 'The
 Goose' inclusive.
 
 The second volume contains poems then, with two exceptions, first
 published.
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
   The Epic.
   Morte d'Arthur.
   The Gardener's Daughter.
   Dora.
   Audley Court.
   Walking to the Mail.
   St. Simeon Stylites.
   Conclusion to the May Queen.
   The Talking Oak.
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere.
   Love and Duty.
   Ulysses.
   Locksley Hall.
   Godiva.
   The Two Voices.
   The Day Dream.
   Prologue.
   The Sleeping Palace.
   The Sleeping Beauty.
   The Arrival.
   The Revival.
   The Departure.
   Moral.
   L'Envoi.
   Epilogue.
   Amphion.
   St. Agnes.
   Sir Galahad.
   Edward Gray.
   Will Waterproofs Lyrical Monologue, made at the Cock.
   Lady Clare.
   The Lord of Burleigh.
   Sir Launcelot and Queen Guinevere.
   A Farewell.
   The Beggar Maid.
   The Vision of Sin.
   The Skipping Rope.
   Move Eastward, happy Earth.
   "Break, break, break."
   The Poet's Song.
 
 
 Only two of these poems had been published before, namely, 'St. Agnes',
 which was printed in 'The Keepsake' for 1837, and 'The Sleeping Beauty'
 in 'The Day Dream', which was adopted with some alterations from the
 1830 poem, and only one of these poems was afterwards suppressed, 'The
 Skipping Rope', which was, however, allowed to stand till 1851. In 1843
 appeared the second edition of these poems, which is merely a reprint
 with a few unimportant alterations, and which was followed in 1845 and
 in 1846 by a third and fourth edition equally unimportant in their
 variants, but in the fourth 'The Golden Year' was added. In the next
 edition, the fifth, 1848, 'The Deserted House' was included from the
 poems of 1830. In the sixth edition, 1850, was included another poem,
 'To--, after reading a Life and Letters', reprinted, with some
 alterations, from the 'Examiner' of 24th March, 1849.
 
 The seventh edition, 1851, contained important additions. First the
 Dedication to the Queen, then 'Edwin Morris,' the fragment of 'The
 Eagle,' and the stanzas, "Come not when I am dead," first printed in
 'The Keepsake' for 1851, under the title of 'Stanzas.' In this edition
 the absurd trifle 'The Skipping Rope' was excised and finally cancelled.
 In the eighth edition, 1853, 'The Sea-Fairies,' though greatly altered,
 was included from the poems of 1830, and the poem 'To E. L. on his
 Travels in Greece' was added. This edition, the eighth, may be regarded
 as the final one. Nothing afterwards of much importance was added or
 subtracted, and comparatively few alterations were made in the text from
 that date to the last collected edition in 1898.
 
 All the editions up to, and including, that of 1898 have been carefully
 collated, so that the student of Tennyson can follow step by step the
 process by which he arrived at that perfection of expression which is
 perhaps his most striking characteristic as a poet. And it was indeed a
 trophy of labour, of the application "of patient touches of unwearied
 art". Whoever will turn, say to 'The Palace of Art,' to ''none,' to the
 'Dream of Fair Women,' or even to 'The Sea-Fairies' and to 'The Lady of
 Shalott,' will see what labour was expended on their composition.
 Nothing indeed can be more interesting than to note the touches, the
 substitution of which measured the whole distance between mediocrity and
 excellence. Take, for example, the magical alteration in the couplet in
 the 'Dream of Fair Women':--
 
 
   One drew a sharp knife thro' my tender throat
   Slowly,--and nothing more,
 
 
 into
 
 
   The bright death quiver'd at the victim's throat;
   Touch'd; and I knew no more.
 
 
 Or, in the same poem:--
 
 
   What nights we had in Egypt!
   I could hit His humours while I cross'd him.
   O the life I led him, and the dalliance and the wit,
 
 
 into
 
   We drank the Libyan Sun to sleep, and lit
   Lamps which outburn'd Canopus.
   O my life In Egypt!
   O the dalliance and the wit,
   The flattery and the strife.
 
 
 Or, in 'Mariana in the South':--
 
   She mov'd her lips, she pray'd alone,
   She praying, disarray'd and warm
   From slumber, deep her wavy form
   In the dark lustrous mirror shone,
 
 into
 
   Complaining, "Mother, give me grace
   To help me of my weary load".
   And on the liquid mirror glow'd
   The clear perfection of her face.
 
 
 How happy is this slight alteration in the verses 'To J. S.' which
 corrects one of the falsest notes ever struck by a poet:--
 
  A tear Dropt on _my tablets_ as I wrote.
 
   A tear Dropt on _the letters_ as I wrote.
 
 or where in 'Locksley Hall' a splendidly graphic touch of description is
 gained by the alteration of "_droops_ the trailer from the crag" into
 "_swings_ the trailer".
 
 So again in 'Love and Duty':--
 
   Should my shadow cross thy thoughts
   Too sadly for their peace, _so put it back_.
   For calmer hours in memory's darkest hold,
 
 where by altering "so put it back" into "remand it thou," a somewhat
 ludicrous image is at all events softened.
 
 What great care Tennyson took with his phraseology is curiously
 illustrated in 'The May Queen'. In the 1842 edition "Robin" was the name
 of the May Queen's lover. In 1843 it was altered to "Robert," and in
 1845 and subsequent editions back to "Robin".
 
 Compare, again, the old stanza in 'The Miller's Daughter':--
 
   How dear to me in youth, my love,
   Was everything about the mill;
   The black and silent pool above,
   The pool beneath it never still,
 
 
 with what was afterwards substituted:--
 
 
   I loved the brimming wave that swam
   Through quiet meadows round the mill,
   The sleepy pool above the dam,
   The pool beneath it never still.
 
 
 Another most felicitous emendation is to be found in 'The Poet',
 where the edition of 1830 reads:--
 
 
   And in the bordure of her robe was writ
   Wisdom, a name to shake
   Hoar anarchies, as with a thunderfit.
 
 
 This in 1842 appears as:--
 
 
   And in her raiment's hem was trac'd in flame
   Wisdom, a name to shake
   All evil dreams of power--a sacred name.
 
 
 Again, in the 'Lotos Eaters'
 
 
   _Three thunder-cloven thrones of oldest snow_
   Stood sunset-flushed
 
 
 is changed into
 
   _Three silent pinnacles of aged snow_.
 
 
 So in 'Will Waterproof' the cumbrous
 
 
   Like Hezekiah's backward runs The shadow of my days,
 
 
 was afterwards simplified into
 
 
   Against its fountain upward runs
   The current of my days.
 
 
 Not less felicitous have been the additions made from time to time. Thus
 in 'Audley Court' the concluding lines ran:--
 
 
   The harbour buoy,
   With one green sparkle ever and anon
   Dipt by itself.
 
 
 But what vividness is there in the subsequent insertion of
 
 
   "Sole star of phosphorescence in the calm."
 
 
 between the first line and the second.
 
 So again in the 'Morte d'Arthur' how greatly are imagery and rhythm
 improved by the insertion of
 
 
   Across the ridge, and paced beside the mere,
 
 
 between
 
 
   Then went Sir Bedivere the second time,
 
 
 and
 
 
   Counting the dewy pebbles, fix'd in thought.
 
 
 There is an alteration in 'none which is very interesting. Till 1884
 this was allowed to stand:--
 
 
   The lizard, with his shadow on the stone,
   Rests like a shadow, _and the cicala sleeps_.
 
 
 No one could have known better than Tennyson that the cicala is loudest
 in the torrid calm of the noonday, as Theocritus, Virgil, Byron and
 innumerable other poets have noticed; at last he altered it, but at the
 heavy price of a cumbrous pleonasm, into "and the winds are dead".
 
 He allowed many years to elapse before he corrected another error in
 natural history--but at last the alteration came. In 'The Poet's Song'
 in the line--
 
 
   The swallow stopt as he hunted the _bee_,
 
 
 the "fly" which the swallow does hunt was substituted for what it does
 not hunt, and that for very obvious reasons. But whoever would see what
 Tennyson's poetry has owed to elaborate revision and scrupulous care
 would do well to compare the first edition of 'Mariana in the South',
 'The Sea-Fairies', 'OEnone', 'The Lady of Shalott', 'The Palace of Art'
 and 'A Dream of Fair Women' with the poems as they are presented in
 1853. Poets do not always improve their verses by revision, as all
 students of Wordsworth's text could abundantly illustrate; but it may be
 doubted whether, in these poems at least, Tennyson ever made a single
 alteration which was not for the better. Fitzgerald, indeed, contended
 that in some cases, particularly in 'The Miller's Daughter', Tennyson
 would have done well to let the first reading stand, but few critics
 would agree with him in the instances he gives. We may perhaps regret
 the sacrifice of such a stanza as this--
 
 Each coltsfoot down the grassy bent, Whose round leaves hold the
 gathered shower, Each quaintly folded cuckoo pint, And silver-paly
 cuckoo flower.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 Tennyson's genius was slow in maturing. The poems contributed by him to
 the volume of 1827, 'Poems by Two Brothers', are not without some slight
 promise, but are very far from indicating extraordinary powers. A great
 advance is discernible in 'Timbuctoo', but that Matthew Arnold should
 have discovered in it the germ of Tennyson's future powers is probably
 to be attributed to the youth of the critic. Tennyson was in his
 twenty-second year when the 'Poems Chiefly Lyrical' appeared, and what
 strikes us in these poems is certainly not what Arthur Hallam saw in
 them: much rather what Coleridge and Wilson discerned in them. They are
 the poems of a fragile and somewhat morbid young man in whose temper we
 seem to see a touch of Hamlet, a touch of Romeo and, more healthily, a
 touch of Mercutio. Their most promising characteristic is the
 versatility displayed. Thus we find 'Mariana' side by side with the
 'Supposed Confessions', the 'Ode to Memory' with Greek['oi rheontes'],
 'The Ballad of Oriana' with 'The Dying Swan', 'Recollections of The
 Arabian Nights' with 'The Poet'. Their worst fault is affectation.
 Perhaps the utmost that can be said for them is that they display a fine
 but somewhat thin vein of original genius, after deducing what they owe
 to Coleridge, to Keats and to other poets. This is seen in the magical
 touches of description, in the exquisite felicity of expression and
 rhythm which frequently mark them, in the pathos and power of such a
 poem as 'Oriana', in the pathos and charm of such poems as 'Mariana' and
 'A Dirge', in the rich and almost gorgeous fancy displayed in 'The
 Recollections'.
 
 The poems of 1833 are much more ambitious and strike deeper notes. Here
 comes in for the first time that Greek[spondai_otaes'], that high
 seriousness which is one of Tennyson's chief characteristics--we see it
 in 'The Palace of Art', in ''none' and in the verses 'To J. S.' But in
 intrinsic merit the poems were no advance on their predecessors, for the
 execution was not equal to the design. The best, such as ''none', 'A
 Dream of Fair Women', 'The Palace of Art', 'The Lady of Shalott'--I am
 speaking of course of these poems in their first form--were full of
 extraordinary blemishes. The volume was degraded by pieces which were
 very unworthy of him, such as 'O Darling Room' and the verses 'To
 Christopher North', and affectations of the worst kind deformed many,
 nay, perhaps the majority of the poems. But the capital defect lay in
 the workmanship. The diction is often languid and slipshod, sometimes
 quaintly affected, and we can never go far without encountering lines,
 stanzas, whole poems which cry aloud for the file. The power and charm
 of Tennyson's poetry, even at its ripest, depend very largely, often
 mainly, on expression, and the couplet which he envied Browning,
 
   The little more, and how much it is,
   The little less, and what worlds away,
 
 is strangely applicable to his own art. On a single word, on a subtle
 collocation, on a slight touch depend often his finest effects: "the
 little less" reduces him to mediocrity, "the little more" and he is with
 the masters. To no poetry would the application of Goethe's test be, as
 a rule, more fatal--that the real poetic quality in poetry is that which
 remains when it has been translated literally into prose.
 
 Whoever will compare the poems of 1832 with the same poems as they
 appeared in 1842 will see that the difference is not so much a
 difference in degree, but almost a difference in kind. In the collection
 of 1832 there were three gems, 'The Sisters', the lines 'To J. S.' and
 'The May Queen'. Almost all the others which are of any value were, in
 the edition of 1842, carefully revised, and in some cases practically
 rewritten. If Tennyson's career had closed in 1833 he would hardly have
 won a prominent place among the minor poets of the present century. The
 nine years which intervened between the publication of his second volume
 and the volumes of 1842 were the making of him, and transformed a mere
 dilettante into a master. Much has been said about the brutality of
 Lockhart's review in the 'Quarterly'. In some respects it was stupid, in
 some respects it was unjust, but of one thing there can be no doubt--it
 had a most salutary effect. It held up the mirror to weaknesses and
 deficiencies which, if Tennyson did not care to acknowledge to others,
 he must certainly have acknowledged to himself. It roused him and put
 him on his mettle. It was a wholesome antidote to the enervating
 flattery of coteries and "apostles" who were certainly talking a great
 deal of nonsense about him, as Arthur Hallam's essay in the 'Englishman'
 shows. During the next nine years he published nothing, with the
 exception of two unimportant contributions to certain minor
 periodicals.[1] But he was educating himself, saturating himself with
 all that is best in the poetry of Ancient Greece and Rome, of modern
 Italy, of Germany and of his own country, studying theology,
 metaphysics, natural history, geology, astronomy and travels, observing
 nature with the eye of a poet, a painter and a naturalist. Nor was he a
 recluse. He threw himself heartily into the life of his time, following
 with the keenest interest all the great political and social movements,
 the progress and effects of the Reform Bill, the troubles in Ireland,
 the troubles with the Colonies, the struggles between the Protectionists
 and the Free Traders, Municipal Reform, the advance of the democracy,
 Chartism, the popular education question. He travelled on the Continent,
 he travelled in Wales and Scotland, he visited most parts of England,
 not as an idle tourist, but as a student with note-book in hand. And he
 had been submitted also to the discipline which is of all disciplines
 the most necessary to the poet, and without which, as Goethe says, "he
 knows not the heavenly powers": he had "ate his bread in sorrow". The
 death of his father in 1831 had already brought him face to face, as he
 has himself expressed it, with the most solemn of all mysteries. In 1833
 he had an awful shock in the sudden death of his friend Arthur Hallam,
 "an overwhelming sorrow which blotted out all joy from his life and made
 him long for death". He had other minor troubles which contributed
 greatly to depress him,--the breaking up of the old home at Somersby,
 his own poverty and uncertain prospects, his being compelled in
 consequence to break off all intercourse with Miss Emily Selwood. It is
 possible that 'Love and Duty' may have reference to this sorrow; it is
 certain that 'The Two Voices' is autobiographical.
 
 Such was his education between 1832 and 1842, and such the influences
 which were moulding him, while he was slowly evolving 'In Memoriam' and
 the poems first published in the latter year. To the revision of the old
 poems he brought tastes and instincts cultivated by the critical study
 of all that was best in the poetry of the world, and more particularly
 by a familiarity singularly intimate and affectionate with the
 masterpieces of the ancient classics; he brought also the skill of a
 practised workman, for his diligence in production was literally that of
 Sir Joshua Reynolds in the sister art--'nulla dies sine linea'. Into the
 composition of the new poems all this entered. He was no longer a
 trifler and a Hedonist. As Spedding has said, his former poems betrayed
 "an over-indulgence in the luxuries of the senses, a profusion of
 splendours, harmonies, perfumes, gorgeous apparel, luscious meals and
 drinks, and creature comforts which rather pall upon the sense, and make
 the glories of the outward world to obscure a little the world within".
 Like his own 'Lady of Shalott', he had communed too much with shadows.
 But the serious poet now speaks. He appeals less to the ear and the eye,
 and more to the heart. The sensuous is subordinated to the spiritual and
 the moral. He deals immediately with the dearest concerns of man and of
 society. He has ceased to trifle. The the [Greek: spondai_otaes,] the
 high seriousness of the true poet, occasional before, now pervades and
 enters essentially into his work. It is interesting to note how many of
 these poems have direct didactic purpose. How solemn is the message
 delivered in such poems as 'The Palace of Art' and 'The Vision of Sin',
 how noble the teaching in 'Love and Duty', in 'Oenone', in 'Godiva', in
 'Ulysses'; to how many must such a poem as 'The Two Voices' have brought
 solace and light; how full of salutary lessons are the political poems
 'You ask me, why, though ill at ease' and 'Love thou thy Land', and how
 noble is their expression! And, even where the poems are less directly
 didactic, it is such refreshment as busy life needs to converse with
 them, so pure, so wholesome, so graciously human is their tone, so
 tranquilly beautiful is their world. Who could lay down 'The Miller's
 Daughter, Dora, The Golden Year, The Gardener's Daughter, The Talking
 Oak, Audley Court, The Day Dream' without something of the feeling which
 Goethe felt when he first laid down 'The Vicar of Wakefield?' In the
 best lyrics in these volumes, such as 'Break, Break', and 'Move
 Eastward', 'Happy Earth', the most fastidious of critics must recognise
 flawless gems. In the two volumes of 1842 Tennyson carried to perfection
 all that was best in his earlier poems, and displayed powers of which he
 may have given some indication in his cruder efforts, but which must
 certainly have exceeded the expectation of the most sanguine of his
 rational admirers. These volumes justly gave him the first place among
 the poets of his time, and that supremacy he maintained--in the opinion
 of most--till the day of his death. It would be absurd to contend that
 Tennyson's subsequent publications added nothing to the fame which will
 be secured to him by these poems. But this at least is certain, that,
 taken with 'In Memorium', they represent the crown and flower of his
 achievement. What is best in them he never excelled and perhaps never
 equalled. We should be the poorer, and much the poorer, for the loss of
 anything which he produced subsequently, it is true; but would we
 exchange half a dozen of the best of these poems or a score of the best
 sections of 'In Memoriam' for all that he produced between 1850 and his
 death?
 
 [Footnote 1: In 'The Keepsake', "St. Agnes' Eve"; in 'The Tribute',
 "Stanzas": "Oh! that 'twere possible". Between 1831 and 1832 he had
 contributed to 'The Gem' three, "No more," "Anacreontics," and "A
 Fragment"; in 'The Englishman's Magazine', a Sonnet; in 'The Yorkshire
 Literary Annual', lines, "There are three things that fill my heart with
 sighs"; in 'Friendship's Offering', lines, "Me my own fate".]
 
 
 
 III
 
 The poems of 1842 naturally divide themselves into seven groups:--
 
 1. STUDIES IN FANCY.
 
   'Claribel'.
   'Lilian'.
   'Isabel'.
   'Madeline'.
   'A Spirit Haunts'.
   'Recollections of the Arabian Nights'.
   'Adeline'.
   'The Dying Swan'.
   'A Dream of Fair Women'.
   'The Sea-Fairies'.
   'The Deserted House'.
   'Love and Death'.
   'The Merman'.
   'The Mermaid'.
   'The Lady of Shalott'.
   'Eleanore'.
   'Margaret'.
   'The Death of the Old Year'.
   'St. Agnes.'
   'Sir Galahad'.
   'The Day Dream'.
   'Will Waterproof's Monologue'.
   'Sir Launcelot and Queen Guinevere'.
   'The Talking Oak'.
   'The Poet's Song'.
 
 
 2. STUDIES OF PASSION
 
   'Mariana'.
   'Mariana in the South.'
   'Oriana'.
   'Fatima'.
   'The Sisters'.
   'Locksley Hall'.
   'Edward Gray'.
 
 
 3. PSYCHOLOGICAL STUDIES
 
   'A Character'.
   'The Poet'.
   'The Poet's Mind'.
   'The Two Voices'.
   'The Palace of Art'.
   'The Vision of Sin'.
   'St. Simeon Stylites'.
 
 
 4. IDYLLS
 
   (a) Classical.
 
     ''none'.
     'The Lotos Eaters'.
     'Ulysses'.
 
   (b) English
 
     'The Miller's Daughter'.
     'The May Queen'.
     'Morte d'Arthur'.
     'The Gardener's Daughter'.
     'Dora'.
     'Audley Court'.
     'Walking to the Mail'.
     'Edwin Morris'.
     'The Golden Year'.
 
 
 5. BALLADS
 
   'Oriana'.
   'Lady Clara Vere de Vere'.
   'Edward Gray'.
   'Lady Clare'.
   'The Lord of Burleigh'.
   'The Beggar Maid'.
 
 
 6. AUTOBIOGRAPHICAL
 
   'Ode to Memory'.
   'Sonnet to J. M. K'.
   'To---------with the Palace of Art'.
   'To J.S.'
   'Amphion'.
   'To E. L. on his Travels in Greece'.
   'To--------after reading a Life and Letters'.
   '"Come not when I am Dead'."
   'A Farewell'.
   "'Move Eastward, Happy Earth'."
   "'Break, Break, Break'."
 
 
 7. POLITICAL GROUP
 
   '"You ask me."'
   '"Of old sat Freedom."'
   '"Love thou thy Land."'
   'The Goose.'
 
 
 In surveying these poems two things must strike every one--their very
 wide range and their very fragmentary character. There is scarcely any
 side of life on which they do not touch, scarcely any phase of passion
 and emotion to which they do not give exquisite expression. Take the
 love poems: compare 'Fatima' with 'Isabel', 'The Miller's Daughter' with
 'Locksley Hall', 'The Gardener's Daughter' with 'Madeline', or 'Mariana'
 with Cleopatra in the 'Dream of Fair Women'. When did love find purer
 and nobler expression than in 'Love and Duty?' When has sorrow found
 utterance more perfect than in the verses 'To J. S '., or the passion for
 the past than in 'Break, Break, Break', or revenge and jealousy than in
 'The Sisters?' In 'The Two Voices', 'The Palace of Art' and 'The Vision
 of Sin' we are in another sphere. They are appeals to the soul of man on
 subjects of momentous concern to him. And each is a masterpiece. What is
 proper to philosophy and what is proper to poetry have never perhaps
 been so happily blended. They have all the sensuous charm of Keats, but
 the prose of Hume could not have presented the truths which they are
 designed to convey with more lucidity and precision. In that superb
 fragment the 'Morte d'Arthur' we have many of the noblest attributes of
 Epic poetry. ''none' is the perfection of the classical idyll, 'The
 Gardener's Daughter' and the idylls that follow it of the romantic. 'Sir
 Galahad' and 'St. Agnes' are in the vein of Keats and Coleridge, but
 Keats and Coleridge have produced nothing more exquisite and nothing so
 ethereal. 'The Lotos* Eaters' is perhaps the most purely delicious poem
 ever written, the 'ne plus ultra' of sensuous loveliness, and yet the
 poet who gave us that has given us also the political poems, poems as
 trenchant and austerely dignified in style as they are pregnant with
 practical wisdom. There is the same versatility displayed in the
 trifles.
 
 But all is fragmentary. No thread strings these jewels. They form a
 collection of gems unset and unarranged. Without any system or any
 definite scope they have nothing of that unity in diversity which is so
 perceptible in the lyrics and minor poems of Goethe and Wordsworth.
 Capricious as the gyrations of a sea-gull seem the poet's moods and
 movements. We have now the reveries of a love-sick maiden, now the
 picture of a soul wrestling with despair and death; here a study from
 rural life, or a study in character, there a sermon on politics, or a
 descent into the depths of psychological truth, or a sketch from nature.
 But nothing could be more concentrated than the power employed to shape
 each fragment into form. What Pope says of the 'Aeneid' may be applied
 with very literal truth to these poems:--
 
 
   Finish'd the whole, and laboured every part
   With patient touches of unwearied art.
 
 
 In the poems of 1842 we have the secret of Tennyson's eminence as a poet
 as well as the secret of his limitations. He appears to have been
 constitutionally deficient in what the Greeks called 'architektonike',
 combination and disposition on a large scale. The measure of his power
 as a constructive artist is given us in the poem in which the English
 idylls may be said to culminate, namely, 'Enoch Arden'. 'In Memoriam'
 and the 'Idylls of the King' have a sort of spiritual unity, but they
 are a series of fragments tacked rather than fused together. It is the
 same with 'Maud', and it is the same with 'The Princess'. His poems have
 always a tendency to resolve themselves into a series of cameos: it is
 only the short poems which have organic unity. A gift of felicitous and
 musical expression which is absolutely marvellous; an instinctive
 sympathy with what is best and most elevated in the sphere of ordinary
 life, of ordinary thought and sentiment, of ordinary activity with
 consummate representative power; a most rare faculty of seizing and
 fixing in very perfect form what is commonly so inexpressible because so
 impalpable and evanescent in emotion and expression; a power of catching
 and rendering the charm of nature with a fidelity and vividness which
 resemble magic; and lastly, unrivalled skill in choosing, repolishing
 and remounting the gems which are our common inheritance from the past:
 these are the gifts which will secure permanence for his work as long as
 the English language lasts.
 
 In his power of crystallising commonplaces he stands next to Pope, in
 subtle felicity of expression beside Virgil. And, when he says of Virgil
 that we find in his diction "all the grace of all the muses often
 flowering in one lonely word," he says what is literally true of his own
 work. As a master of style his place is in the first rank among English
 classical poets. But his style is the perfection of art. His diction,
 like the diction of Milton and Gray, resembles mosaic work. With a touch
 here and a touch there, now from memory, now from unconscious
 assimilation, inlaying here an epithet and there a phrase, adding,
 subtracting, heightening, modifying, substituting one metaphor for
 another, developing what is latent in the suggestive imagery of a
 predecessor, laying under contribution the most intimate familiarity
 with what is best in the literature of the ancient and modern world, the
 unwearied artist toils patiently on till his precious mosaic work is
 without a flaw. All the resources of rhetoric are employed to give
 distinction to his style and every figure in rhetoric finds expression
 in his diction: Hypallage as in
 
 
   _The pillard dusk_ Of sounding sycamores.
 
 --_Audley Court_.
 
 
 Paronomasia as in
 
 
   The seawind sang _Shrill, chill_ with flakes of foam.
 
 --_Morte d'Arthur_.
 
 
 Oxymoron as
 
   _Behold_ them _unbeheld, unheard Hear_ all.
 
 --''none'.
 
 
 Hyperbaton as in
 
   The _dew-impearled_ winds of dawn.
 
 --'Ode to Memory'.
 
 
 Metonymy as in
 
   The _bright death_ quiver'd at the victim's throat.
 
 --'Dream of Fair Women'.
 
 
 or in
 
   For some three _careless moans_ The summer pilot of an empty heart.
 
 --'Gardener's Daughter'.
 
 
 No poet since Milton has employed what is known as Onomatopoeia with so
 much effect. Not to go farther than the poems of 1842, we have in the
 'Morte d'Arthur':--
 
   So all day long the noise of battle _rolled
   Among the mountains by the winter sea_;
 
 or
 
   _Dry clashed_ his harness in the icy caves
   And _barren chasms_, and all to left and right
   The _bare black cliff clang'd round_ him, as he bas'd
   His feet _on juts of slippery crag that rang
   Sharp-smitten with the dint of armed heels_--
 
 or the exquisite
 
   I heard the _water lapping on the crag_,
   And the _long ripple washing in the reeds_.
 
 So in 'The Dying Swan',
 
   And _the wavy swell of the soughing reeds_.
 
 See too the whole of 'Oriana' and the description of the dance at
 the beginning of 'The Vision of Sin.'
 
 Assonance, alliteration, the revival or adoption of obsolete and
 provincial words, the transplantation of phrases and idioms from the
 Greek and Latin languages, the employment of common words in uncommon
 senses, all are pressed into the service of adding distinction to his
 diction. His diction blends the two extremes of simplicity and
 artificiality, but with such fine tact that this strange combination has
 seldom the effect of incongruity. Longinus has remarked that "as the
 fainter lustre of the stars is put out of sight by the all-encompassing
 rays of the sun, so when sublimity sheds its light round the sophistries
 of rhetoric they become invisible".[1] What Longinus says of "sublimity"
 is equally true of sincerity and truthfulness in combination with
 exquisitely harmonious expression. We have an illustration in Gray's
 'Elegy'. Nothing could be more artificial than the style, but what poem
 in the world appeals more directly to the heart and to the eye? It is
 one thing to call art to the assistance of art, it is quite another
 thing to call art to the assistance of nature. And this is what both
 Gray and Tennyson do, and this is why their artificiality, so far from
 shocking us, "passes in music out of sight". But this cannot be said of
 Tennyson without reserve. At times his strained endeavours to give
 distinction to his style by putting common things in an uncommon way led
 him into intolerable affectation. Thus we have "the knightly growth that
 fringed his lips" for a moustache, "azure pillars of the hearth" for
 ascending smoke, "ambrosial orbs" for apples, "frayed magnificence" for
 a shabby dress, "the secular abyss to come" for future ages, "the
 sinless years that breathed beneath the Syrian blue" for the life of
 Christ, "up went the hush'd amaze of hand and eye" for a gesture of
 surprise, and the like. One of the worst instances is in 'In Memoriam',
 where what is appropriate to the simple sentiment finds, as it should
 do, corresponding simplicity of expression in the first couplet, to
 collapse into the falsetto of strained artificiality in the second:--
 
 
   To rest beneath the clover sod
   That takes the sunshine and the rains,
   _Or where the kneeling hamlet drains
   The chalice of the grapes of God_.
 
 
 An illustration of the same thing, almost as offensive, is in 'Enoch
 Arden', where, in an otherwise studiously simple diction, Enoch's wares
 as a fisherman become
 
   Enoch's _ocean spoil_
   In ocean-smelling osier.
 
 
 But these peculiarities are less common in the earlier poems than in the
 later: it was a vicious habit which grew on him.
 
 But, if exception may sometimes be taken to his diction, no exception
 can be taken to his rhythm. No English poet since Milton, Tennyson's
 only superior in this respect, had a finer ear or a more consummate
 mastery over all the resources of rhythmical expression. What colours
 are to a painter rhythm is, in description, to the poet, and few have
 rivalled, none have excelled Tennyson in this. Take the following:--
 
 
   And ghastly thro' the drizzling rain
   _On the bald street strikes the blank day_.
 
 --'In Memoriam'.
 
 See particularly 'In Memoriam', cvii., the lines beginning "Fiercely
 flies," to "darken on the rolling brine": the description of the island
 in 'Enoch Arden'; but specification is needless, it applies to all his
 descriptive poetry. It is marvellous that he can produce such effects by
 such simple means: a mere enumeration of particulars will often do it,
 as here:--
 
 
   No gray old grange or lonely fold,
   Or low morass and whispering reed,
   Or simple style from mead to mead,
   Or sheep walk up the windy wold.
 
 --'In Memoriam', c.
 
 Or here:--
 
 
   The meal sacks on the whitened floor,
   The dark round of the dripping wheel,
   The very air about the door Made misty with the floating meal.
 
 --'The Miller's Daughter'.
 
 
 His blank verse is best described by negatives. It has not the endless
 variety, the elasticity and freedom of Shakespeare's, it has not the
 massiveness and majesty of Milton's, it has not the austere grandeur of
 Wordsworth's at its best, it has not the wavy swell, "the linked
 sweetness long drawn out" of Shelley's, but its distinguishing feature
 is, if we may use the expression, its importunate beauty. What Coleridge
 said of Claudian's style may be applied to it: "Every line, nay every
 word stops, looks full in your face and asks and begs for praise". His
 earlier blank verse is less elaborate and seemingly more spontaneous and
 easy than his later. [2] But it is in his lyric verse that his rhythm is
 seen in its greatest perfection. No English lyrics have more magic or
 more haunting beauty, more of that which charms at once and charms for
 ever.
 
 In his description of nature he is incomparable. Take the following from
 'The Dying Swan':--
 
 
   Some blue peaks in the distance rose,
   And white against the cold-white sky,
   Shone out their crowning snows.
   One willow over the river wept,
   And shook the wave as the wind did sigh;
   Above in the wind was the swallow,
   Chasing itself at its own wild will,
 
 
 or the opening scene in ''none' and in 'The Lotos Eaters', or the
 meadow scene in 'The Gardener's Daughter', or the conclusion of 'Audley
 Court', or the forest scene in the 'Dream of Fair Women', or this stanza
 in 'Mariana in the South':--
 
 
   There all in spaces rosy-bright
   Large Hesper glitter'd on her tears,
   And deepening through the silent spheres,
   Heaven over Heaven rose the night.
 
 
 A single line, nay, a single word, and a scene is by magic before us, as
 here where the sea is looked down upon from an immense height:--
 
 
   The _wrinkled_ sea beneath him _crawls_.
 
 --'The Eagle'.
 
 
 Or here of a ship at sea, in the distance:--
 
 
   And on through zones of light and shadow
   _Glimmer away to the lonely deep_.
 
 --'To the Rev. F. D. Maurice'.
 
 
 Or here of waters falling high up on mountains:--
 
 
   Their thousand _wreaths of dangling water-smoke_.
 
 --'The Princess'.
 
 
 Or of a water-fall seen at a distance:--
 
 
   And _like a downward smoke_ the slender stream
   Along the cliff _to fall and pause and fall_ did seem.
 
 
 Or here again:--
 
 
   We left the dying ebb that _faintly lipp'd
   The flat red granite_.
 
 
 Or here of a wave:--
 
 
   Like a wave in the wild North Sea
   _Green glimmering toward the summit_ bears with all
   _Its stormy crests that smoke_ against the skies
   Down on a bark.
 
 --'Elaine'.
 
 
   That beech will _gather brown_,
   This _maple burn itself away_.
 
 --'In Memoriam'.
 
 
   The _wide-wing'd sunset_ of the misty marsh.
 
 --'Last Tournament'.
 
 
 But illustrations would be endless. Nothing seems to escape him in
 Nature. Take the following:--
 
 
   Like _a purple beech among the greens
   Looks out of place_.
 
 --'Edwin Morris'.
 
 
 Or
 
   Delays _as the tender ash delays
   To clothe herself, when all the woods are green_.
 
 --'The Princess'.
 
 
   As _black as ash-buds in the front of March_.
 
 --'The Gardener's Daughter'.
 
 
   A gusty April morn
   That _puff'd_ the swaying _branches into smoke_.
 
 --'Holy Grail'.
 
 
 So with flowers, trees, birds and insects:--
 
 
   The fox-glove _clusters dappled bells_.
 
 --'The Two Voices'.
 
 
 The sunflower:--
 
 
   _Rays round with flame its disk of seed_.
 
 --'In Memoriam'.
 
 
 The dog-rose:--
 
 
   _Tufts of rosy-tinted snow_.
 
 --'Two Voices'.
 
 
   A _million emeralds_ break from the _ruby-budded lime_.
 
 --'Maud'.
 
 
   In gloss and hue the chestnut, _when the shell
   Divides threefold to show the fruit within_.
 
 --'The Brook'.
 
 
 Or of a chrysalis:--
 
 
   And flash'd as those
   _Dull-coated_ things, _that making slide apart
   Their dusk wing cases, all beneath there burns
   A Jewell'd harness_, ere they pass and fly.
 
 --'Gareth and Lynette'.
 
 So again:--
 
 
   Wan-sallow, as _the plant that feeds itself,
   Root-bitten by white lichen_.
 
 --'Id'.
 
 
 And again:--
 
 
   All the _silvery gossamers_
   That _twinkle into green and gold_.
 
 --'In Memoriam'.
 
 
 His epithets are in themselves a study: "the _dewy-tassell'd_ wood,"
 "the _tender-pencill'd_ shadow," "_crimson-circl'd_ star," the "_hoary_
 clematis," "_creamy_ spray," "_dry-tongued_ laurels". But whatever he
 describes is described with the same felicitous vividness. How magical
 is this in the verses to Edward Lear:--
 
 
   Naiads oar'd
   A _glimmering shoulder_ under _gloom_
   Of _cavern pillars_.
 
 
 Or this:--
 
 
   She lock'd her lips: she left me where I stood:
   "Glory to God," she sang, and past afar,
   Thridding the sombre boskage of the wood,
   Toward the morning-star.
 
 --'A Dream of Fair Women'.
 
 
 But if in the world of Nature nothing escaped his sensitive and
 sympathetic observation,--and indeed it might be said of him as truly as
 of Shelley's 'Alastor'
 
 
   Every sight
   And sound from the vast earth and ambient air
   Sent to his heart its choicest impulses,
 
 
 --he had studied the world of books with not less sympathy and
 attention. In the sense of a profound and extensive acquaintance with
 all that is best in ancient and modern poetry, and in an extraordinarily
 wide knowledge of general literature, of philosophy and theology, of
 geography and travel, and of various branches of natural science, he is
 one of the most erudite of English poets. With the poetry of the Greek
 and Latin classics he was, like Milton and Gray, thoroughly saturated.
 Its influence penetrates his work, now in indirect reminiscence, now in
 direct imitation, now inspiring, now modifying, now moulding. He tells
 us in 'The Daisy' how when at Como "the rich Virgilian rustic measure of
 'Lari Maxume'" haunted him all day, and in a later fragment how, as he
 rowed from Desenzano to Sirmio, Catullus was with him. And they and
 their brethren, from Homer to Theocritus, from Lucretius to Claudian,
 always were with him. I have illustrated so fully in the notes and
 elsewhere [1] the influence of the Greek and Roman classics on the poems
 of 1842 that it is not necessary to go into detail here. But a few
 examples of the various ways in which they affected Tennyson's work
 generally may be given. Sometimes he transfers a happy epithet or
 expression in literal translation, as in:--
 
 
   On either _shining_ shoulder laid a hand,
 
 
 which is Homer's epithet for the shoulder--
 
 
   [Greek: ana phaidimps omps]
 
 --'Od'., xi., 128.
 
 
 
   It was the red cock _shouting_ to the light,
 
 
 exactly the
 
 
   [Greek: heos eboaesen alektor] (Until the cock _shouted_).
 
 --'Batrachomyomachia', 192.
 
 
 
   And all in passion utter'd a 'dry' shriek,
 
 
 which is the 'sicca vox' of the Roman poets. So in 'The Lotos Eaters':--
 
 
   His voice was _thin_ as voices from the grave,
 
 
 which is Theocritus' voice of Hylas from his watery grave:--
 
 
   [Greek: araia d' Iketo ph_ona]
 
   (_Thin_ came the voice).
 
 
 So in 'The Princess', sect. i.:--
 
 
   And _cook'd his spleen_,
 
 
 which is a phrase from the Greek, as in Homer, 'Il'., iv., 513:--
 
   [Greek: epi naeusi cholon thumalgea pessei]
 
   (At the ships he cooks his heart-grieving spleen).
 
 
 Again in 'The Princess', sect. iv.:--
 
   _Laugh'd with alien lips_,
 
 
 which is Homer's ('Od'., 69-70)--
 
   [Greek: did' aedae gnathmoisi gelps_on allotrioisi]
 
 
 So in 'Edwin Morris'--
 
   All perfect, finished _to the finger nail_,
 
 which is a phrase transferred from Latin through the Greek; 'cf.',
 Horace, 'Sat'., i., v., 32:--
 
   _Ad unguem_ Factus homo
 
   (A man fashioned to the finger nail).
 
 
 "The _brute_ earth," 'In Memoriam', cxxvii., which is Horace's
 
   _Bruta_ tellus.
 
 --'Odes', i., xxxiv., 9.
 
 
 So again:--
 
   A bevy of roses _apple-cheek'd_
 
 
 in 'The Island', which is Theocritus' [Greek: maloparaeos].
 The line in the 'Morte d'Arthur',
 
   This way and that, dividing the swift mind,
 
 
 is an almost literal translation of Virgil's 'Aen'., iv., 285:--
 
   Atque animum nunc huc celerem nunc dividit illuc
 
  (And this way and that he divides his swift mind).
 
 
 Another way in which they affect him is where, without direct imitation,
 they colour passages and poems as in 'Oenone', 'The Lotos Eaters',
 'Tithonus', 'Tiresias', 'The Death of Oenone', 'Demeter and Persephone',
 the passage beginning "From the woods" in 'The Gardener's Daughter',
 which is a parody of Theocritus, 'Id.', vii., 139 'seq.', while the
 Cyclops' invocation to Galatea in Theocritus, 'Id.', xi., 29-79, was
 plainly the model for the idyll, "Come down, O Maid," in the seventh
 section of 'The Princess', just as the tournament in the same poem
 recalls closely the epic of Homer and Virgil. Tennyson had a wonderful
 way of transfusing, as it were, the essence of some beautiful passage in
 a Greek or Roman poet into English. A striking illustration of this
 would be the influence of reminiscences of Virgil's fourth 'Aeneid' on
 the idyll of 'Elaine and Guinevere'. Compare, for instance, the
 following: he is describing the love-wasted Elaine, as she sits brooding
 in the lonely evening, with the shadow of the wished-for death falling
 on her:--
 
   But when they left her to herself again,
   Death, like a friend's voice from a distant field,
   Approaching through the darkness, call'd; the owls
   Wailing had power upon her, and she mix'd
   Her fancies with the sallow-rifted glooms
   Of evening and the moanings of the wind.
 
 
 How exactly does this recall, in a manner to be felt rather than exactly
 defined, a passage equally exquisite and equally pathetic in Virgil's
 picture of Dido, where, with the shadow of her death also falling upon
 her, she seems to hear the phantom voice of her dead husband, and "mixes
 her fancies" with the glooms of night and the owl's funereal wail:--
 
   Hinc exaudiri voces et verba vocantis
   Visa viri, nox quum terras obscura teneret;
   Solaque culminibus ferali carmine bubo
   Saepe queri, et longas in fletum ducere voces.
 
 --'Aen'., iv., 460.
 
   (From it she thought she clearly heard a voice, even the accents of
   her husband calling her when night was wrapping the earth with
   darkness; and on the roof the lonely owl in funereal strains kept oft
   complaining, drawing out into a wail its protracted notes.)
 
 Similar passages, though not so striking, would be the picture of
 Pindar's Elysium in 'Tiresias', the sentiment pervading 'The Lotos
 Eaters' transferred so faithfully from the Greek poets, the scenery in
 ''none' so crowded with details from Homer, Theocritus and Callimachus.
 Sometimes we find similes suggested by the classical poets, but enriched
 by touches from original observation, as here in 'The Princess':--
 
   As one that climbs a peak to gaze
   O'er land and main, and sees a great black cloud
   Drag inward from the deeps, a wall of night
   Blot out the slope of sea from verge to shore.
   ...
   And quenching lake by lake and tarn by tarn Expunge the world,
 
 
 which was plainly suggested by Homer, iv., 275:--
 
   [Greek: hos d' hot apo skopiaes eide nephos aipolos anaer
   erchomenon kata ponton hupo Zephuroio i_oaes tps de t' aneuthen eonti,
   melanteron aeute pissa, phainet ion kata ponton, agei de te lailapa
   pollaen.]
 
   (As when a goat-herd from some hill-peak sees a cloud coming across
   the deep with the blast of the west wind behind it; and to him, being
   as he is afar, it seems blacker, even as pitch, as it goes along the
   deep, bringing with it a great whirlwind.)
 
 
 So again the fine simile in 'Elaine', beginning
 
   Bare as a wild wave in the wide North Sea,
 
 
 is at least modelled on the simile in 'Iliad', xv., 381-4, with
 reminiscences of the same similes in 'Iliad', xv., 624, and 'Iliad',
 iv., 42-56. The simile in the first section of the 'Princess',
 
   As when a field of corn
   Bows all its ears before the roaring East,
 
 
 reminds us of Homer's
 
   [Greek: hos d' ote kinaesae Zephyros Bathulaeion, elthon labros,
   epaigixon, epi t' aemuei astachuessin]
 
   (As when the west wind tosses a deep cornfield rushing down with
   furious blast, and it bows with all its ears.)
 
 
 Nothing could be more happy than such an adaptation as the following--
 
   Ever fail'd to draw
   The quiet night into her blood,
 
 
 from Virgil, 'Aen'., iv., 530:--
 
   Neque unquam Solvitur in somnos _oculisve aut pectore noctem
   Accipit_.
 
   (And she never relaxes into sleep, or receives the night in eyes or
   bosom),
 
 
 or than the following (in 'Enid') from Theocritus:--
 
   Arms on which the standing muscle sloped,
   As slopes a wild brook o'er a little stone,
   Running too vehemently to break upon it.
 
   [Greek: en de mues stereoisi brachiosin akron hyp' _omon estasan,
   aeute petroi oloitrochoi ous te kylind_on cheimarrhous potamos
   megalais periexese dinais.]
 
 --'Idyll', xxii., 48 'seq.'
 
   (And the muscles on his brawny arms close under the shoulder stood out
   like boulders which the wintry torrent has rolled and worn smooth with
   the mighty eddies.)
 
 But there was another use to which Tennyson applied his accurate and
 intimate acquaintance with the classics. It lay in developing what was
 suggested by them, in unfolding, so to speak, what was furled in their
 imagery. Nothing is more striking in ancient classical poetry than its
 pregnant condensation. It often expresses in an epithet what might be
 expanded into a detailed picture, or calls up in a single phrase a whole
 scene or a whole position. Where in 'Merlin and Vivian' Tennyson
 described
 
   The _blind wave feeling round his long sea hall
   In silence_,
 
 
 he was merely unfolding to its full Homer's [Greek: kuma k_ophon]--"dumb
 wave"; just as the best of all comments on Horace's expression, "Vultus
 nimium lubricus aspici," 'Odes', I., xix., 8, is given us in Tennyson's
 picture of the Oread in Lucretius:--
 
 
   How the sun delights
   To _glance and shift about her slippery sides_.
 
 Or take again this passage in the 'Agamemnon', 404-5, describing
 Menelaus pining in his desolate palace for the lost Helen:--
 
   [Greek: pothoi d' uperpontias phasma doxei dom_on anassein.]
 
   (And in his yearning love for her who is over the sea a phantom will
   seem to reign over his palace.)
 
 
 What are the lines in 'Guinevere' but an expansion of what is latent but
 unfolded in the pregnant suggestiveness of the Greek poet:--
 
   And in thy bowers of Camelot or of Usk
   Thy shadow still would glide from room to room,
   And I should evermore be vex'd with thee
   In hanging robe or vacant ornament,
   Or ghostly foot-fall echoing on the stair--
 
 
 with a reminiscence also perhaps of Constance's speech in 'King John',
 III., iv.
 
 It need hardly be said that these particular passages, and possibly some
 of the others, may be mere coincidences, but they illustrate what
 numberless other passages which could be cited prove that Tennyson's
 careful and meditative study of the Greek and Roman poets enabled him to
 enrich his work by these felicitous adaptations.
 
 He used those poets as his master Virgil used his Greek predecessors,
 and what the elder Seneca said of Ovid, who had appropriated a line from
 Virgil, might exactly be applied to Tennyson: "Fecisse quod in multis
 aliis versibus Virgilius fecerat, non surripiendi causa sed palam
 imitandi, hoc animo ut vellet agnosci".[4]
 
 He had plainly studied with equal attention the chief Italian poets,
 especially Dante, Petrarch, Ariosto and Tasso. On a passage in Dante he
 founded his 'Ulysses', and imitations of that master are frequent
 throughout his poems. 'In Memoriam', both in its general scheme as
 well as in numberless particular passages, closely recalls Petrarch; and
 Ariosto and Tasso have each influenced his work. In the poetry of his
 own country nothing seems to have escaped him, either in the masters or
 the minor poets.[5] To apply the term plagiarism to Tennyson's use of
 his predecessors would be as absurd as to resolve some noble fabric into
 its stones and bricks, and confounding the one with the other to taunt
 the architect with appropriating an honour which belongs to the quarry
 and the potter. Tennyson's method was exactly the method of two of the
 greatest poets in the world, Virgil and Milton, of the poet who stands
 second to Virgil in Roman poetry, Horace, of one of the most illustrious
 of our own minor poets, Gray.
 
 An artist more fastidious than Tennyson never existed. As scrupulous a
 purist in language as Cicero, Chesterfield and Macaulay in prose, as
 Virgil, Milton, and Leopardi in verse, his care extended to the nicest
 minutiae of word-forms. Thus "ancle" is always spelt with a "c" when it
 stands alone, with a "k" when used in compounds; thus he spelt "Idylls"
 with one "l" in the short poems, with two "l's" in the epic poems; thus
 the employment of "through" or "thro'," of "bad" or "bade," and the
 retention or suppression of "e" in past participles are always carefully
 studied. He took immense pains to avoid the clash of "s" with "s," and
 to secure the predominance of open vowels when rhythm rendered them
 appropriate. Like the Greek painter with his partridge, he thought
 nothing of sacrificing good things if, in any way, they interfered with
 unity and symmetry, and thus, his son tells us, many stanzas, in
 themselves of exquisite beauty, have been lost to us.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 'De Sublimitate,' xvii.]
 
 [Footnote 2: Tennyson's blank verse in the _Idylls of the King_
 (excepting in the _Morte d'Arthur_ and in the grander passages), is
 obviously modelled in rhythm on that of Shakespeare's earlier style seen
 to perfection in _King John_. Compare the following lines with the
 rhythm say of _Elaine_ or _Guinevere_;--
 
   But now will canker sorrow eat my bud,
   And chase the native beauty from his cheek,
   And he will look as hollow as a ghost;
   As dim and meagre as an ague's fit:
   And so he'll die; and, rising so again,
   When I shall meet him in the court of heaven
   I shall not know him: therefore never, never
   Must I behold my pretty Arthur more.
 
 --_King John_, III., iv.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 'Illustrations of Tennyson'.]
 
 [Footnote 4: Seneca, third 'Suasoria'.]
 
 [Footnote 5: For fuller illustrations of all this, and for the influence
 of the ancient classics on Tennyson, I may perhaps venture to refer the
 reader to my 'Illustrations of Tennyson'. And may I here take the
 opportunity of pointing out that nothing could have been farther from my
 intention in that book than what has so often been most unfairly
 attributed to it, namely, an attempt to show that a charge of plagiarism
 might be justly urged against Tennyson. No honest critic, who had even
 cursorily inspected the book, could so utterly misrepresent its purpose.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 
 Tennyson's place is not among the "lords of the visionary eye," among
 seers, among prophets, but not the least part of the debt which his
 countrymen owe to him is his dedication of his art to the noblest
 purposes. At a time when poetry was beginning to degenerate into what it
 has now almost universally become--a mere sense-pampering siren, and
 when critics were telling us, as they are still telling us, that we are
 to understand by it "all literary production which attains the power of
 giving pleasure by its form as distinct from its matter," he remained
 true to the creed of his great predecessors. "L'art pour art," he would
 say, quoting Georges Sand, "est un vain mot: l'art pour le vrai, l'art
 pour le beau et le bon, voila la religion que je cherche." When he
 succeeded to the laureateship he was proud to remember that the wreath
 which had descended to him was
 
   greener from the brows
   Of him that utter'd nothing base,
 
 and he was a loyal disciple of that poet whose aim had been, in his own
 words, "to console the afflicted, to add sunshine to daylight by making
 the happy happier, to teach the young and the gracious of every age to
 see, to think, to feel, and therefore to become more actively and
 securely virtuous". [1] Wordsworth had said that he wished to be
 regarded as a teacher or as nothing, but unhappily he did not always
 distinguish between the way in which a poet and a philosopher should
 teach. He forgot that the didactic element in a poem should be, to
 employ a homely illustration, what garlic should be in a salad, "scarce
 suspected, animate the whole," that the poet teaches not as the moralist
 and the preacher teach, but as nature and life teach us. He taught us
 when he wrote 'The Fountain' and 'The Highland Reaper, The
 Leach-gatherer' and 'Michael', he merely wearied us when he sermonised
 in 'The Excursion' and in 'The Prelude'. Tennyson never makes this
 mistake. He is seldom directly didactic. Would he inculcate subjugation
 to the law of duty--he gives us the funeral ode on Wellington, 'The
 Charge of the Light Brigade', and 'Love and Duty'. Would he inculcate
 resignation to the will of God, and the moral efficacy of conventional
 Christianity--he gives us 'Enoch Arden'. Would he picture the endless
 struggle between the sensual and the spiritual, and the relation of
 ideals to life--he gives us the 'Idylls of the King'. Would he point to
 what atheism may lead--he gives us 'Lucretius'. Poems which are
 masterpieces of sensuous art, such as mere aesthetes, like Rosetti and
 his school, must contemplate with admiring despair, he makes vehicles of
 the most serious moral and spiritual teaching. 'The Vision of Sin' is
 worth a hundred sermons on the disastrous effects of unbridled
 profligacy. In 'The Palace of Art' we have the quintessence of 'The Book
 of Ecclesiastes' and much more besides. Even in 'The Lotos Eaters' we
 have the mirror held up to Hedonism. On the education of the affections
 and on the purity of domestic life must depend very largely, not merely
 the happiness of individuals, but the well-being of society, and how
 wide a space is filled by poems in Tennyson's works bearing
 influentially on these subjects is obvious. And they admit us into a
 pleasaunce with which it is good to be familiar, so pure and wholesome
 is their atmosphere, so tranquilly beautiful the world in which the
 characters move and the little dramas unfold themselves. They preach
 nothing, but deep into every heart must sink their silent lessons. "Upon
 the sacredness of home life," writes his son, "he would maintain that
 the stability and greatness of a nation largely depend; and one of the
 secrets of his power over mankind was his true joy in the family duties
 and affections." What sermons have we in 'The Miller's Daughter', in
 'Dora', in 'The Gardener's Daughter' and in 'Love and Duty'. 'The
 Princess' was a direct contribution to a social question of momentous
 importance to our time. 'Maud' had an immediate political purpose, while
 in 'In Memoriam' he became the interpreter and teacher of his generation
 in a still higher sense.
 
 Since Shakespeare no English poet has been so essentially patriotic, or
 appealed so directly to the political conscience of the nation. In his
 noble eulogies of the English constitution and of the virtue and wisdom
 of its architects, in his spirit-stirring pictures of the heroic actions
 of our forefathers and contemporaries both by land and sea, in his
 passionate denunciations of all that he believed would detract from
 England's greatness and be prejudicial to her real interests, in his
 hearty sympathy with every movement and with every measure which he
 believed would contribute to her honour and her power, in all this he
 stands alone among modern poets. But if he loved England as Shakespeare
 loved her, he had other lessons than Shakespeare's to teach her. The
 responsibilities imposed on the England of our time--and no poet knew
 this better--are very different from those imposed on the England of
 Elizabeth. An empire vaster and more populous than that of the Caesars
 has since then been added to our dominion. Millions, indeed, who are of
 the same blood as ourselves and who speak our language have, by the
 folly of common ancestors, become aliens. But how immense are the realms
 peopled by the colonies which are still loyal to us, and by the three
 hundred millions who in India own us as their rulers: of this vast
 empire England is now the capital and centre. That she should fulfil
 completely and honourably the duties to which destiny has called her
 will be the prayer of every patriot, that he should by his own efforts
 contribute all in his power to further such fulfilment must be his
 earnest desire. It would be no exaggeration to say that Tennyson
 contributed more than any man who has ever lived to what may be called
 the higher political education of the English-speaking races. Of
 imperial federation he was at once the apostle and the pioneer. In
 poetry which appealed as probably no other poetry has appealed to every
 class, wherever our language is spoken, he dwelt fondly on all that
 constitutes the greatness and glory of England, on her grandeur in the
 past, on the magnificent promise of the part she will play in the
 future, if her sons are true to her. There should be no distinction, for
 she recognises no distinction between her children at home and her
 children in her colonies. She is the common mother of a common race: one
 flag, one sceptre, the same proud ancestry, the same splendid
 inheritance. "How strange England cannot see," he once wrote, "that her
 true policy lies in a close union with her colonies."
 
   Sharers of our glorious past,
   Shall we not thro' good and ill
   Cleave to one another still?
   Britain's myriad voices call,
   Sons be welded all and all
   Into one imperial whole,
   One with Britain, heart and soul!
   One life, one flag, one fleet, one Throne!
 
 Thus did the poetry of Tennyson draw closer, and thus will it continue
 to draw closer those sentimental ties--ties, in Burke's phrase, "light
 as air, but strong as links of iron," which bind the colonies to the
 mother country; and in so doing, if he did not actually initiate, he
 furthered, as no other single man has furthered, the most important
 movement of our time. Nor has any man of genius in the present
 century--not Dickens, not Ruskin--been moved by a purer spirit of
 philanthropy, or done more to show how little the qualities and actions
 which dignify humanity depend, or need depend, on the accidents of
 fortune. He brought poetry into touch with the discoveries of science,
 and with the speculations of theology and metaphysics, and though, in
 treating such subjects, his power is not, perhaps, equal to his charm,
 the debt which his countrymen owe him, even intellectually, is
 incalculable.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: See Wordsworth's letter to Lady Beaumont, 'Prose Works',
 vol. ii., p. 176.]
 
 
 
 
 TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
 PREFACE
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 EARLY POEMS:--
   To the Queen
   Claribel: a Melody
   Lilian
   Isabel
   Mariana
   To----("Clear-headed friend, whose joyful scorn")
   Madeline
   Song--The Owl
   Second Song to the Same
   Recollections of the Arabian Nights
   Ode to Memory
   Song ("A spirit haunts the year's last hours")
   Adeline
   A Character
   The Poet
   The Poet's Mind
   The Sea-Fairies
   The Deserted House
   The Dying Swan
   A Dirge
   Love and Death
   The Ballad of Oriana
   Circumstance
   The Merman
   The Mermaid
   Sonnet to J. M. K.
   The Lady of Shalott
   Mariana in the South
   Eleaenore
   The Miller's Daughter
   Fatima *
   'none
   The Sisters
   To-----("I send you here a sort of allegory")
   The Palace of Art
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere
   The May Queen
   New Year's Eve
   Conclusion
   The Lotos-Eaters
   Dream of Fair Women
   Margaret
   The Blackbird
   The Death of the Old Year
   To J. S.
   "You ask me, why, tho' ill at ease"
   "Of old sat Freedom on the heights"
   "Love thou thy land, with love far-brought"
   The Goose
   The Epic
   Morte d'Arthur
   The Gardener's Daughter; or, The Pictures
   Dora
   Audley Court
   Walking to the Mail
   Edwin Morris; or, The Lake
   St. Simeon Stylites
   The Talking Oak
   Love and Duty
   The Golden Year
   Ulysses
   Locksley Hall
   Godiva
   The Two Voices
   The Day-Dream:--Prologue
   The Sleeping Palace
   The Sleeping Beauty
   The Arrival
   The Revival
   The Departure
   Moral
   L'Envoi
   Epilogue
   Amphion
   St. Agnes
   Sir Galahad
   Edward Gray
   Will Waterproofs Lyrical Monologue
   To----, after reading a Life and Letters
   To E.L., on his Travels in Greece
   Lady Clare
   The Lord of Burleigh
   Sir Launcelot and Queen Guinevere: a Fragment
   A Farewell
   The Beggar Maid
   The Vision of Sin
   "Come not, when I am dead"
   The Eagle
   "Move eastward, happy earth, and leave"
   "Break, break, break"
   The Poet's Song
 
 
 APPENDIX.--SUPPRESSED POEMS:--
 
   Elegiacs
   The "How" and the "Why"
   Supposed Confessions
   The Burial of Love
   To----("Sainted Juliet! dearest name !")
   Song ("I' the glooming light")
   Song ("The lintwhite and the throstlecock")
   Song ("Every day hath its night")
   Nothing will Die
   All Things will Die
   Hero to Leander
   The Mystic
   The Grasshopper
   Love, Pride and Forgetfulness
   Chorus ("The varied earth, the moving heaven")
   Lost Hope
   The Tears of Heaven
   Love and Sorrow
   To a Lady Sleeping
   Sonnet ("Could I outwear my present state of woe")
   Sonnet ("Though Night hath climbed her peak of highest noon")
   Sonnet ("Shall the hag Evil die with child of Good")
   Sonnet ("The pallid thunderstricken sigh for gain")
   Love
   The Kraken
   English War Song
   National Song
   Dualisms
   We are Free
   [Greek: oi rheontes]
   "Mine be the strength of spirit, full and free"
   To--("All good things have not kept aloof)
   Buonaparte
   Sonnet ("Oh, Beauty, passing beauty! sweetest Sweet!")
   The Hesperides
   Song ("The golden apple, the golden apple, the hallowed fruit")
   Rosalind
   Song ("Who can say")
   Kate
   Sonnet ("Blow ye the trumpet, gather from afar")
   Poland
   To--("As when with downcast eyes we muse and brood")
   O Darling Room
   To Christopher North
   The Skipping Rope
   Timbuctoo
 
 
 BIBLIOGRAPHY OF THE POEMS OF 1842
 
 
 
 
 
 TO THE QUEEN
 
 This dedication was first prefixed to the seventh edition of these poems
 in 1851, Tennyson having succeeded Wordsworth as Poet Laureate, 19th
 Nov., 1850.
 
   Revered, beloved [1]--O you that hold
   A nobler office upon earth
   Than arms, or power of brain, or birth
   Could give the warrior kings of old,
 
   Victoria, [2]--since your Royal grace
   To one of less desert allows
   This laurel greener from the brows
   Of him that utter'd nothing base;
 
   And should your greatness, and the care
   That yokes with empire, yield you time
   To make demand of modern rhyme
   If aught of ancient worth be there;
 
   Then--while [3] a sweeter music wakes,
   And thro' wild March the throstle calls,
   Where all about your palace-walls
   The sun-lit almond-blossom shakes--
 
   Take, Madam, this poor book of song;
   For tho' the faults were thick as dust
   In vacant chambers, I could trust
   Your kindness. [4] May you rule us long.
 
   And leave us rulers of your blood
   As noble till the latest day!
   May children of our children say,
   "She wrought her people lasting good; [5]
 
   "Her court was pure; her life serene;
   God gave her peace; her land reposed;
   A thousand claims to reverence closed
   In her as Mother, Wife and Queen;
 
   "And statesmen at her council met
   Who knew the seasons, when to take
   Occasion by the hand, and make
   The bounds of freedom wider yet [6]
 
   "By shaping some august decree,
   Which kept her throne unshaken still,
   Broad-based upon her people's will, [7]
   And compass'd by the inviolate sea."
 
   MARCH, 1851.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1851. Revered Victoria, you that hold.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1851. I thank you that your Royal grace.]
 
 [Footnote 3: This stanza added in 1853.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1851. Your sweetness.]
 
 [Footnote 5: In 1851 the following stanza referring to the first Crystal
 Palace, opened 1st May, 1851, was inserted here:--
 
   She brought a vast design to pass,
   When Europe and the scatter'd ends
   Of our fierce world were mixt as friends
   And brethren, in her halls of glass.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1851. Broader yet.]
 
 [Footnote 7: With this cf. Shelley, 'Ode to Liberty':--
 
   Athens diviner yet
   Gleam'd with its crest of columns _on the will_
   Of man.]
 
 
 
 
 
 CLARIBEL
 
 A MELODY
 
 
 First published in 1830.
 
 In 1830 and in 1842 edd. the poem is in one long stanza, with a full
 stop in 1830 ed. after line 8; 1842 ed. omits the full stop. The name
 "Claribel" may have been suggested by Spenser ('F. Q.', ii., iv., or
 Shakespeare, 'Tempest').
 
 
 1
 
   Where Claribel low-lieth
   The breezes pause and die,
   Letting the rose-leaves fall:
   But the solemn oak-tree sigheth,
   Thick-leaved, ambrosial,
   With an ancient melody
   Of an inward agony,
   Where Claribel low-lieth.
 
 2
 
   At eve the beetle boometh
   Athwart the thicket lone:
   At noon the wild bee [1] hummeth
   About the moss'd headstone:
   At midnight the moon cometh,
   And looketh down alone.
   Her song the lintwhite swelleth,
   The clear-voiced mavis dwelleth,
   The callow throstle [2] lispeth,
   The slumbrous wave outwelleth,
   The babbling runnel crispeth,
   The hollow grot replieth
   Where Claribel low-lieth.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. "Wild" omitted, and "low" inserted with a hyphen
 before "hummeth".]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1851 and all previous editions, "fledgling" for "callow".]
 
 
 
 
 
 LILIAN
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 1
 
   Airy, fairy Lilian,
   Flitting, fairy Lilian,
   When I ask her if she love me,
   Claps her tiny hands above me,
   Laughing all she can;
   She'll not tell me if she love me,
   Cruel little Lilian.
 
 
 2
 
   When my passion seeks
   Pleasance in love-sighs
   She, looking thro' and thro' [1] me
   Thoroughly to undo me,
   Smiling, never speaks:
   So innocent-arch, so cunning-simple,
   From beneath her gather'd wimple [2]
   Glancing with black-beaded eyes,
   Till the lightning laughters dimple
   The baby-roses in her cheeks;
   Then away she flies.
 
 
 3
 
   Prythee weep, May Lilian!
   Gaiety without eclipse
   Wearieth me, May Lilian:
   Thro' [3] my very heart it thrilleth
   When from crimson-threaded [4] lips
   Silver-treble laughter [5] trilleth:
   Prythee weep, May Lilian.
 
 
 4
 
   Praying all I can,
   If prayers will not hush thee,
   Airy Lilian,
   Like a rose-leaf I will crush thee,
   Fairy Lilian.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. Through and through me.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830. Purfled.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1830. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 4: With "crimson-threaded" 'cf.' Cleveland's 'Sing-song on
 Clarinda's Wedding', "Her 'lips those threads of scarlet dye'"; but the
 original is 'Solomons Song' iv. 3, "Thy lips are 'like a thread of
 scarlet'".]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1830. Silver treble-laughter.]
 
 
 
 
 
 ISABEL
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 Lord Tennyson tells us ('Life of Tennyson', i., 43) that in this poem
 his father more or less described his own mother, who was a "remarkable
 and saintly woman". In this as in the other poems elaborately painting
 women we may perhaps suspect the influence of Wordsworth's 'Triad',
 which should be compared with them.
 
 
 1
 
   Eyes not down-dropt nor over-bright, but fed
   With the clear-pointed flame of chastity,
   Clear, without heat, undying, tended by
   Pure vestal thoughts in the translucent fane
   Of her still spirit [1]; locks not wide-dispread,
   Madonna-wise on either side her head;
   Sweet lips whereon perpetually did reign
   The summer calm of golden charity,
   Were fixed shadows of thy fixed mood,
   Revered Isabel, the crown and head,
   The stately flower of female fortitude,
   Of perfect wifehood and pure lowlihead. [2]
 
 
 2
 
   The intuitive decision of a bright
   And thorough-edged intellect to part
   Error from crime; a prudence to withhold;
   The laws of marriage [3] character'd in gold
   Upon the blanched [4] tablets of her heart;
   A love still burning upward, giving light
   To read those laws; an accent very low
   In blandishment, but a most silver flow
   Of subtle-paced counsel in distress,
   Right to the heart and brain, tho' undescried,
   Winning its way with extreme gentleness
   Thro' [5] all the outworks of suspicious pride.
   A courage to endure and to obey;
   A hate of gossip parlance, and of sway,
   Crown'd Isabel, thro' [6] all her placid life,
   The queen of marriage, a most perfect wife.
 
 
 3
 
 
   The mellow'd reflex of a winter moon;
   A clear stream flowing with a muddy one,
   Till in its onward current it absorbs
   With swifter movement and in purer light
   The vexed eddies of its wayward brother:
   A leaning and upbearing parasite,
   Clothing the stem, which else had fallen quite,
   With cluster'd flower-bells and ambrosial orbs
   Of rich fruit-bunches leaning on each other--
   Shadow forth thee:--the world hath not another
   (Though all her fairest forms are types of thee,
   And thou of God in thy great charity)
   Of such a finish'd chasten'd purity,
 
 
 [Footnote 1: With these lines may be compared Shelley, 'Dedication to
 the Revolt of Islam':--
 
   And through thine eyes, e'en in thy soul, I see
   A lamp of vestal fire burning eternally.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: Lowlihead a favourite word with Chaucer and Spenser.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1830. Wifehood.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830. Blenched.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1830 and all before 1853. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1830. Through.]
 
 
 
 
 MARIANA
 
 "Mariana in the moated grange."--'Measure for Measure'.
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 
 This poem as we know from the motto prefixed to it was suggested by
 Shakespeare ('Measure for Measure', iii., 1, "at the moated grange
 resides this dejected Mariana,") but the poet may have had in his mind
 the  exquisite fragment of Sappho:--
 
   [Greek: deduke men ha selanna kai Plaeiades, mesai de nuktes, para d'
   erchet h'ora ego de mona kateud'o.]
 
   "The moon has set and the Pleiades, and it is midnight: the hour too
   is going by, but I sleep alone."
 
 It was long popularly supposed that the scene of the poem was a farm
 near Somersby known as Baumber's farm, but Tennyson denied this and said
 it was a purely "imaginary house in the fen," and that he "never so much
 as dreamed of Baumbers farm". See 'Life', i., 28.
 
 
 
   With blackest moss the flower-plots
   Were thickly crusted, one and all:
   The rusted nails fell from the knots
   That held the peach [1] to the garden-wall. [2]
   The broken sheds look'd sad and strange:
   Unlifted was the clinking latch;
   Weeded and worn the ancient thatch
   Upon the lonely moated grange.
   She only said, "My life is dreary,
   He cometh not," she said;
   She said, "I am aweary, aweary,
   I would that I were dead!"
 
   Her tears fell with the dews at even;
   Her tears fell ere the dews were dried; [3]
   She could not look on the sweet heaven,
   Either at morn or eventide.
   After the flitting of the bats,
   When thickest dark did trance the sky,
   She drew her casement-curtain by,
   And glanced athwart the glooming flats.
   She only said, "The night is dreary,
   He cometh not," she said;
   She said, "I am aweary, aweary,
   I would that I were dead!"
 
   Upon the middle of the night,
   Waking she heard the night-fowl crow:
   The cock sung out an hour ere light:
   From the dark fen the oxen's low
   Came to her: without hope of change,
   In sleep she seem'd to walk forlorn,
   Till cold winds woke the gray-eyed [4] morn
   About the lonely moated grange.
   She only said, "The day is dreary,
   He cometh not," she said;
   She said, "I am aweary, aweary,
   I would that I were dead!"
 
   About a stone-cast from the wall
   A sluice with blacken'd waters slept,
   And o'er it many, round and small,
   The cluster'd marish-mosses crept.
   Hard by a poplar shook alway,
   All silver-green with gnarled bark:
   For leagues no other tree did mark [5]
   The level waste, the rounding gray.[6]
   She only said, "My life is dreary,
   He cometh not," she said;
   She said, "I am aweary, aweary,
   I would that I were dead!"
 
   And ever when the moon was low,
   And the shrill winds were up and away,[7]
   In the white curtain, to and fro,
   She saw the gusty shadow sway.
   But when the moon was very low,
   And wild winds bound within their cell,
   The shadow of the poplar fell
   Upon her bed, across her brow.
   She only said, "The night is dreary,
   He cometh not," she said;
   She said, "I am aweary, aweary,
   I would that I were dead!"
 
   All day within the dreamy house,
   The doors upon their hinges creak'd;
   The blue fly sung in the pane; [8] the mouse
   Behind the mouldering wainscot shriek'd,
   Or from the crevice peer'd about.
   Old faces glimmer'd thro' the doors,
   Old footsteps trod the upper floors,
   Old voices called her from without.
   She only said, "My life is dreary,
   He cometh not," she said;
   She said, "I am aweary, aweary,
   I would that I were dead!"
 
   The sparrow's chirrup on the roof,
   The slow clock ticking, and the sound,
   Which to the wooing wind aloof
   The poplar made, did all confound
   Her sense; but most she loathed the hour
   When the thick-moted sunbeam lay
   Athwart the chambers, and the day
   Was sloping [9] toward his western bower.
   Then, said she, "I am very dreary,
   He will not come," she said;
   She wept, "I am aweary, aweary,
   O God, that I were dead!".
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1863. Pear.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1872. Gable-wall.]
 
 [Footnote 3: With this beautiful couplet may be compared a couplet of
 Helvius Cinna:--
 
   Te matutinus flentem conspexit Eous,
   Te flentem paullo vidit post Hesperus idem.
 --'Cinnae Reliq'. Ed. Mueller, p. 83.]
 
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830. _Grey_-eyed. 'Cf'. 'Romeo and Juliet', ii., 3,
   "The _grey morn_ smiles on the frowning night".]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1830, 1842, 1843. Dark.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1830. Grey.]
 
 [Footnote 7: 1830. An' away.]
 
 [Footnote 8: All editions before 1851. I' the pane. With this line
 'cf'. 'Maud', I., vi., 8, "and the shrieking rush of the wainscot
 mouse".]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1830. Downsloped was westering in his bower.]
 
 
 
 
 TO----
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 The friend to whom these verses were addressed was Joseph William
 Blakesley, third Classic and Senior Chancellor's Medallist in 1831, and
 afterwards Dean of Lincoln. Tennyson said of him: "He ought to be Lord
 Chancellor, for he is a subtle and powerful reasoner, and an honest
 man".--'Life', i., 65. He was a contributor to the 'Edinburgh' and
 'Quarterly Reviews', and died in April, 1885. See memoir of him in the
 'Dictionary of National Biography'.
 
 
 1
 
   Clear-headed friend, whose joyful scorn,
   Edged with sharp laughter, cuts atwain
   The knots that tangle human creeds, [1]
   The wounding cords that [2] bind and strain
   The heart until it bleeds,
   Ray-fringed eyelids of the morn
   Roof not a glance so keen as thine:
   If aught of prophecy be mine,
   Thou wilt not live in vain.
 
 
 2
 
   Low-cowering shall the Sophist sit;
   Falsehood shall bear her plaited brow:
   Fair-fronted Truth shall droop not now
   With shrilling shafts of subtle wit.
   Nor martyr-flames, nor trenchant swords
   Can do away that ancient lie;
   A gentler death shall Falsehood die,
   Shot thro' and thro'[3] with cunning words.
 
 
 3
 
   Weak Truth a-leaning on her crutch,
   Wan, wasted Truth in her utmost need,
   Thy kingly intellect shall feed,
   Until she be an athlete bold,
   And weary with a finger's touch
   Those writhed limbs of lightning speed;
   Like that strange angel [4] which of old,
   Until the breaking of the light,
   Wrestled with wandering Israel,
   Past Yabbok brook the livelong night,
   And heaven's mazed signs stood still
   In the dim tract of Penuel.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. The knotted lies of human creeds.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830. "Which" for "that".]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1830. Through and through.]
 
 [Footnote 4: The reference is to Genesis xxxii. 24-32.]
 
 
 
 
 MADELINE
 
 First published in 1830.
 
 
 1
 
 Thou art not steep'd in golden languors,
 No tranced summer calm is thine,
 Ever varying Madeline.
 Thro' [1] light and shadow thou dost range,
 Sudden glances, sweet and strange,
 Delicious spites and darling angers,
 And airy [2] forms of flitting change.
 
 
 2
 
 Smiling, frowning, evermore,
 Thou art perfect in love-lore.
 Revealings deep and clear are thine
 Of wealthy smiles: but who may know
 Whether smile or frown be fleeter?
 Whether smile or frown be sweeter,
 Who may know?
 Frowns perfect-sweet along the brow
 Light-glooming over eyes divine,
 Like little clouds sun-fringed, are thine,
 Ever varying Madeline.
 Thy smile and frown are not aloof
 From one another,
 Each to each is dearest brother;
 Hues of the silken sheeny woof
 Momently shot into each other.
 All the mystery is thine;
 Smiling, frowning, evermore,
 Thou art perfect in love-lore,
 Ever varying Madeline.
 
 
 3
 
 A subtle, sudden flame,
 By veering passion fann'd,
 About thee breaks and dances
 When I would kiss thy hand,
 The flush of anger'd shame
 O'erflows thy calmer glances,
 And o'er black brows drops down
 A sudden curved frown:
 But when I turn away,
 Thou, willing me to stay,
 Wooest not, nor vainly wranglest;
 But, looking fixedly the while,
 All my bounding heart entanglest
 In a golden-netted smile;
 Then in madness and in bliss,
 If my lips should dare to kiss
 Thy taper fingers amorously, [3]
 Again thou blushest angerly;
 And o'er black brows drops down
 A sudden-curved frown.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830. Aery.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1830. Three-times-three; though noted as an _erratum_ for
 amorously.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONG.--THE OWL
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 
 1
 
   When cats run home and light is come,
   And dew is cold upon the ground,
   And the far-off stream is dumb,
   And the whirring sail goes round,
   And the whirring sail goes round;
   Alone and warming his five wits,
   The white owl in the belfry sits.
 
 
 2
 
   When merry milkmaids click the latch,
   And rarely smells the new-mown hay,
   And the cock hath sung beneath the thatch
   Twice or thrice his roundelay,
   Twice or thrice his roundelay;
   Alone and warming his five wits,
   The white owl in the belfry sits.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SECOND SONG
 
 TO THE SAME.
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 
 1
 
   Thy tuwhits are lull'd I wot,
   Thy tuwhoos of yesternight,
   Which upon the dark afloat,
   So took echo with delight,
   So took echo with delight,
   That her voice untuneful grown,
   Wears all day a fainter tone.
 
 
 2
 
   I would mock thy chaunt anew;
   But I cannot mimick it;
   Not a whit of thy tuwhoo,
   Thee to woo to thy tuwhit,
   Thee to woo to thy tuwhit,
   With a lengthen'd loud halloo,
   Tuwhoo, tuwhit, tuwhit, tuwhoo-o-o.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 RECOLLECTIONS OF THE ARABIAN NIGHTS
 
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 With this poem should be compared the description of Harun al Rashid's
 Garden of Gladness in the story of Nur-al-din Ali and the damsel Anis al
 Talis in the Thirty-Sixth Night. The style appears to have been modelled
 on Coleridge's 'Kubla Khan' and 'Lewti', and the influence of Coleridge
 is very perceptible throughout the poem.
 
 
   When the breeze of a joyful dawn blew free
   In the silken sail of infancy,
   The tide of time flow'd back with me,
   The forward-flowing tide of time;
   And many a sheeny summer-morn,
   Adown the Tigris I was borne,
   By Bagdat's shrines of fretted gold,
   High-walled gardens green and old;
   True Mussulman was I and sworn,
   For it was in the golden prime [1]
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Anight my shallop, rustling thro' [2]
   The low and bloomed foliage, drove
   The fragrant, glistening deeps, and clove
   The citron-shadows in the blue:
   By garden porches on the brim,
   The costly doors flung open wide,
   Gold glittering thro' [3] lamplight dim,
   And broider'd sofas [4] on each side:
   In sooth it was a goodly time,
   For it was in the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Often, where clear-stemm'd platans guard
   The outlet, did I turn away
   The boat-head down a broad canal
   From the main river sluiced, where all
   The sloping of the moon-lit sward
   Was damask-work, and deep inlay
   Of braided blooms [5] unmown, which crept
   Adown to where the waters slept.
   A goodly place, a goodly time,
   For it was in the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   A motion from the river won
   Ridged the smooth level, bearing on
   My shallop thro' the star-strown calm,
   Until another night in night
   I enter'd, from the clearer light,
   Imbower'd vaults of pillar'd palm,
   Imprisoning sweets, which, as they clomb
   Heavenward, were stay'd beneath the dome
   Of hollow boughs.--A goodly time,
   For it was in the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Still onward; and the clear canal
   Is rounded to as clear a lake.
   From the green rivage many a fall
   Of diamond rillets musical,
   Thro' little crystal [6] arches low
   Down from the central fountain's flow
   Fall'n silver-chiming, seem'd to shake
   The sparkling flints beneath the prow.
   A goodly place, a goodly time,
   For it was in the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Above thro' [7] many a bowery turn
   A walk with vary-colour'd shells
   Wander'd engrain'd. On either side
   All round about the fragrant marge
   From fluted vase, and brazen urn
   In order, eastern flowers large,
   Some dropping low their crimson bells
   Half-closed, and others studded wide
   With disks and tiars, fed the time
   With odour in the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Far off, and where the lemon-grove
   In closest coverture upsprung,
   The living airs of middle night
   Died round the bulbul [8] as he sung;
   Not he: but something which possess'd
   The darkness of the world, delight,
   Life, anguish, death, immortal love,
   Ceasing not, mingled, unrepress'd.
   Apart from place, withholding [9] time,
   But flattering the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Black the [10] garden-bowers and grots
   Slumber'd: the solemn palms were ranged
   Above, unwoo'd of summer wind:
   A sudden splendour from behind
   Flush'd all the leaves with rich gold-green,
   And, flowing rapidly between
   Their interspaces, counterchanged
   The level lake with diamond-plots
   Of dark and bright. [11] A lovely time,
   For it was in the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Dark-blue the deep sphere overhead,
   Distinct with vivid stars inlaid, [12]
   Grew darker from that under-flame:
   So, leaping lightly from the boat,
   With silver anchor left afloat,
   In marvel whence that glory came
   Upon me, as in sleep I sank
   In cool soft turf upon the bank,
   Entranced with that place and time,
   So worthy of the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
 
   Thence thro' the garden I was drawn--[13]
   A realm of pleasance, many a mound,
   And many a shadow-chequer'd lawn
   Full of the city's stilly sound, [14]
   And deep myrrh-thickets blowing round
   The stately cedar, tamarisks,
   Thick rosaries [15] of scented thorn,
   Tall orient shrubs, and obelisks
   Graven with emblems of the time,
   In honour of the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   With dazed vision unawares
   From the long alley's latticed shade
   Emerged, I came upon the great
   Pavilion of the Caliphat.
   Right to the carven cedarn doors,
   Flung inward over spangled floors,
   Broad-based flights of marble stairs
   Ran up with golden balustrade,
   After the fashion of the time,
   And humour of the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   The fourscore windows all alight
   As with the quintessence of flame,
   A million tapers flaring bright
   From twisted silvers look'd [16] to shame
   The hollow-vaulted dark, and stream'd
   Upon the mooned domes aloof
   In inmost Bagdat, till there seem'd
   Hundreds of crescents on the roof
   Of night new-risen, that marvellous time,
   To celebrate the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Then stole I up, and trancedly
   Gazed on the Persian girl alone,
   Serene with argent-lidded eyes
   Amorous, and lashes like to rays
   Of darkness, and a brow of pearl
   Tressed with redolent ebony,
   In many a dark delicious curl,
   Flowing beneath [17] her rose-hued zone;
   The sweetest lady of the time,
   Well worthy of the golden prime
   Of good Haroun Alraschid.
 
   Six columns, three on either side,
   Pure silver, underpropt [18] a rich
   Throne of the [19] massive ore, from which
   Down-droop'd, in many a floating fold,
   Engarlanded and diaper'd
   With inwrought flowers, a cloth of gold.
   Thereon, his deep eye laughter-stirr'd
   With merriment of kingly pride,
   Sole star of all that place and time,
   I saw him--in his golden prime,
   THE GOOD HAROUN ALRASCHID!
 
 
 [Footnote 1: "Golden prime" from Shakespeare.
 
   "That cropp'd  the _golden prime_ of this sweet prince."
 
 --_Rich. III._, i., sc. ii., 248.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830. Through.]         [Footnote 3: 1830. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830 and 1842. Sophas.] [Footnote 5: 1830. Breaded blosms.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1830. Through crystal.] [Footnote 7: 1830. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 8: "Bulbul" is the Persian for nightingale. _Cf. Princes_,
 iv., 104:--
 
   "O Bulbul, any rose of Gulistan Shall brush her veil".]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1830. Witholding. So 1842, 1843, 1845.]
 
 [Footnote 10: 1830. Blackgreen.]  [Footnote 11: 1830. Of saffron light.]
 
 [Footnote 12: 1830. Unrayed.]     [Footnote 13: 1830. Through ... borne.]
 
 [Footnote 14: Shakespeare has the same expression:
 
   "The hum of either army _stilly sounds_".
 
 --_Henry V_., act iv., prol.]
 
 [Footnote 15: 1842. Roseries.]     [Footnote 16: 1830. Wreathed.]
 
 [Footnote 17: 1830. Below.]
 
 [Footnote 18: 1830. Underpropped. 1842. Underpropp'd.]
 
 [Footnote 19: 1830. O' the.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ODE TO MEMORY
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 After the title in 1830 ed. is "Written very early in life". The
 influence most perceptible in this poem is plainly Coleridge, on whose
 'Songs of the Pixies' it seems to have been modelled. Tennyson
 considered it, and no wonder, as one of the very best of "his early and
 peculiarly concentrated Nature-poems". See 'Life', i., 27. It is full
 of vivid and accurate pictures of his Lincolnshire home and haunts. See
 'Life', i., 25-48, 'passim'.
 
 
 1
 
   Thou who stealest fire,
   From the fountains of the past,
   To glorify the present; oh, haste,
   Visit my low desire!
   Strengthen me, enlighten me!
   I faint in this obscurity,
   Thou dewy dawn of memory.
 
 
 2
 
   Come not as thou camest [1] of late,
   Flinging the gloom of yesternight
   On the white day; but robed in soften'd light
   Of orient state.
   Whilome thou camest with the morning mist,
   Even as a maid, whose stately brow
   The dew-impearled winds of dawn have kiss'd, [2]
   When she, as thou,
   Stays on her floating locks the lovely freight
   Of overflowing blooms, and earliest shoots
   Of orient green, giving safe pledge of fruits,
   Which in wintertide shall star
   The black earth with brilliance rare.
 
 
 3
 
   Whilome thou camest with the morning mist.
   And with the evening cloud,
   Showering thy gleaned wealth into my open breast,
   (Those peerless flowers which in the rudest wind
   Never grow sere,
   When rooted in the garden of the mind,
   Because they are the earliest of the year).
   Nor was the night thy shroud.
   In sweet dreams softer than unbroken rest
   Thou leddest by the hand thine infant Hope.
   The eddying of her garments caught from thee
   The light of thy great presence; and the cope
   Of the half-attain'd futurity,
   Though deep not fathomless,
   Was cloven with the million stars which tremble
   O'er the deep mind of dauntless infancy.
   Small thought was there of life's distress;
   For sure she deem'd no mist of earth could dull
   Those spirit-thrilling eyes so keen and beautiful:
   Sure she was nigher to heaven's spheres,
   Listening the lordly music flowing from
   The illimitable years.[3]
   O strengthen me, enlighten me!
   I faint in this obscurity,
   Thou dewy dawn of memory.
 
 
 4
 
   Come forth I charge thee, arise,
   Thou of the many tongues, the myriad eyes!
   Thou comest not with shows of flaunting vines
   Unto mine inner eye,
   Divinest Memory!
   Thou wert not nursed by the waterfall
   Which ever sounds and shines
   A pillar of white light upon the wall
   Of purple cliffs, aloof descried:
   Come from the woods that belt the grey hill-side,
   The seven elms, the poplars [4] four
   That stand beside my father's door,
   And chiefly from the brook [5] that loves
   To purl o'er matted cress and ribbed sand,
   Or dimple in the dark of rushy coves,
   Drawing into his narrow earthen urn,
   In every elbow and turn,
   The filter'd tribute of the rough woodland.
   O! hither lead thy feet!
   Pour round mine ears the livelong bleat
   Of the thick-fleeced sheep from wattled folds,
   Upon the ridged wolds,
   When the first matin-song hath waken'd [6] loud
   Over the dark dewy earth forlorn,
   What time the amber morn
   Forth gushes from beneath a low-hung cloud.
 
 
 5
 
   Large dowries doth the raptured eye
   To the young spirit present
   When first she is wed;
   And like a bride of old
   In triumph led,
   With music and sweet showers
   Of festal flowers,
   Unto the dwelling she must sway.
   Well hast thou done, great artist Memory,
   In setting round thy first experiment
   With royal frame-work of wrought gold;
   Needs must thou dearly love thy first essay,
   And foremost in thy various gallery
   Place it, where sweetest sunlight falls
   Upon the storied walls;
   For the discovery
   And newness of thine art so pleased thee,
   That all which thou hast drawn of fairest
   Or boldest since, but lightly weighs
   With thee unto the love thou bearest
   The first-born of thy genius.
   Artist-like,
   Ever retiring thou dost gaze
   On the prime labour of thine early days:
   No matter what the sketch might be;
   Whether the high field on the bushless Pike,
   Or even a sand-built ridge
   Of heaped hills that mound the sea,
   Overblown with murmurs harsh,
   Or even a lowly cottage [7] whence we see
   Stretch'd wide and wild the waste enormous marsh,
   Where from the frequent bridge,
   Like emblems of infinity, [8]
   The trenched waters run from sky to sky;
   Or a garden bower'd close
   With plaited [9] alleys of the trailing rose,
   Long alleys falling down to twilight grots,
   Or opening upon level plots
   Of crowned lilies, standing near
   Purple-spiked lavender:
   Whither in after life retired
   From brawling storms,
   From weary wind,
   With youthful fancy reinspired,
   We may hold converse with all forms
   Of the many-sided mind,
   And those [10] whom passion hath not blinded,
   Subtle-thoughted, myriad-minded.
   My friend, with you [11] to live alone,
   Were how much [12] better than to own
   A crown, a sceptre, and a throne!
   O strengthen, enlighten me!
   I faint in this obscurity,
   Thou dewy dawn of memory.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. Cam'st.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830. Kist.]
 
 [Footnote 3:  Transferred from 'Timbuctoo'.
 
   And these with lavish'd sense
   Listenist the lordly music flowing from
   The illimitable years.]
 
 [Footnote 4:  The poplars have now disappeared but the seven elms are
 still to be seen in the garden behind the house. See Napier, 'The
 Laureate's County', pp. 22, 40-41.]
 
 [Footnote 5:  This is the Somersby brook which so often reappears in
 Tennyson's poetry, cf. 'Millers Daughter, A Farewell', and 'In
 Memoriam', 1 xxix. and c.]
 
 [Footnote 6:  1830. Waked. For the epithet "dew-impearled" 'cf'.
 Drayton, Ideas, sonnet liii., "amongst the dainty 'dew-impearled
 flowers'," where the epithet is more appropriate and intelligible.]
 
 [Footnote 7: 1830. The few.]
 
 [Footnote 8: 1830 and 1842. Thee.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1830. Methinks were, so till 1850, when it was altered to
 the present reading.]
 
 [Footnote 10: The cottage at Maplethorpe where the Tennysons used to
 spend the summer holidays. (See 'Life', i., 46.)]
 
 [Footnote 11: 1830. Emblems or Glimpses of Eternity.]
 
 [Footnote 12: 1830. Pleached. The whole of this passage is an exact
 description of the Parsonage garden at Somersby. See 'Life', i., 27.]
 
 
 
 
 SONG
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 The poem was written in the garden at the Old Rectory, Somersby; an
 autumn scene there which it faithfully describes. This poem seems to
 have haunted Poe, a fervent admirer of Tennyson's early poems.
 
 
 1
 
   A Spirit haunts the year's last hours
   Dwelling amid these yellowing bowers:
   To himself he talks;
   For at eventide, listening earnestly,
   At his work you may hear him sob and sigh
   In the walks;
   Earthward he boweth the heavy stalks
   Of the mouldering flowers:
   Heavily hangs the broad sunflower
   Over its grave i' the earth so chilly;
   Heavily hangs the hollyhock,
   Heavily hangs the tiger-lily.
 
 
 2
 
   The air is damp, and hush'd, and close,
   As a sick man's room when he taketh repose
   An hour before death;
   My very heart faints and my whole soul grieves
   At the moist rich smell of the rotting leaves,
   And the breath
   Of the fading edges of box beneath,
   And the year's last rose.
   Heavily hangs the broad sunflower
   Over its grave i' the earth so chilly;
   Heavily hangs the hollyhock,
   Heavily hangs the tiger-lily.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ADELINE
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 
 1
 
   Mystery of mysteries,
   Faintly smiling Adeline,
   Scarce of earth nor all divine,
   Nor unhappy, nor at rest,
   But beyond expression fair
   With thy floating flaxen hair;
   Thy rose-lips and full blue eyes
   Take the heart from out my breast.
   Wherefore those dim looks of thine,
   Shadowy, dreaming Adeline?
 
 
 2
 
   Whence that aery bloom of thine,
   Like a lily which the sun
   Looks thro' in his sad decline,
   And a rose-bush leans upon,
   Thou that faintly smilest still,
   As a Naiad in a well,
   Looking at the set of day,
   Or a phantom two hours old
   Of a maiden passed away,
   Ere the placid lips be cold?
   Wherefore those faint smiles of thine,
   Spiritual Adeline?
 
 
 3
 
   What hope or fear or joy is thine?
   Who talketh with thee, Adeline?
   For sure thou art not all alone:
   Do beating hearts of salient springs
   Keep measure with thine own?
   Hast thou heard the butterflies
   What they say betwixt their wings?
   Or in stillest evenings
   With what voice the violet woos
   To his heart the silver dews?
   Or when little airs arise,
   How the merry bluebell rings [1]
   To the mosses underneath?
   Hast thou look'd upon the breath
   Of the lilies at sunrise?
   Wherefore that faint smile of thine,
   Shadowy, dreaming Adeline?
 
 
 4
 
   Some honey-converse feeds thy mind,
   Some spirit of a crimson rose
   In love with thee forgets to close
   His curtains, wasting odorous sighs
   All night long on darkness blind.
   What aileth thee? whom waitest thou
   With thy soften'd, shadow'd brow,
   And those dew-lit eyes of thine, [2]
   Thou faint smiler, Adeline?
 
 
 5
 
   Lovest thou the doleful wind
   When thou gazest at the skies?
   Doth the low-tongued Orient [3]
   Wander from the side of [4] the morn,
   Dripping with Sabsean spice
   On thy pillow, lowly bent
   With melodious airs lovelorn,
   Breathing Light against thy face,
   While his locks a-dropping [5] twined
   Round thy neck in subtle ring
   Make a 'carcanet of rays',[6]
   And ye talk together still,
   In the language wherewith Spring
   Letters cowslips on the hill?
   Hence that look and smile of thine,
   Spiritual Adeline.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: This conceit seems to have been borrowed from Shelley,
 'Sensitive Plant', i.:--
 
   And the hyacinth, purple and white and blue,
   Which flung from its bells a sweet peal anew
   Of music.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 'Cf'. Collins, 'Ode to Pity', "and 'eyes of dewy light'".]
 
 [Footnote 3: What "the low-tongued Orient" may mean I cannot explain.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830 and all editions till 1853. O'.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1863. A-drooping.]
 
 [Footnote 6: A carcanet is a necklace, diminutive from old French
 "Carcan". Cf. 'Comedy of Errors', in., i, "To see the making of her
 'Carcanet".]
 
 
 
 
 
 A CHARACTER
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 The only authoritative light thrown on the person here described is what
 the present Lord Tennyson gives, who tells us that "the then well-known
 Cambridge orator S--was partly described". He was "a very plausible,
 parliament-like, self-satisfied speaker at the Union Debating Society ".
 The character reminds us of Wordsworth's Moralist. See 'Poet's Epitaph';--
 
   One to whose smooth-rubbed soul can cling,
   Nor form nor feeling, great nor small;
   A reasoning, self-sufficient thing,
   An intellectual all in all.
 
 Shakespeare's fop, too (Hotspur's speech, 'Henry IV.', i., i., 2), seems
 to have suggested a touch or two.
 
 
   With a half-glance upon the sky
   At night he said, "The wanderings
   Of this most intricate Universe
   Teach me the nothingness of things".
   Yet could not all creation pierce
   Beyond the bottom of his eye.
 
   He spake of beauty: that the dull
   Saw no divinity in grass,
   Life in dead stones, or spirit in air;
   Then looking as 'twere in a glass,
   He smooth'd his chin and sleek'd his hair,
   And said the earth was beautiful.
 
   He spake of virtue: not the gods
   More purely, when they wish to charm
   Pallas and Juno sitting by:
   And with a sweeping of the arm,
   And a lack-lustre dead-blue eye,
   Devolved his rounded periods.
 
   Most delicately hour by hour
   He canvass'd human mysteries,
   And trod on silk, as if the winds
   Blew his own praises in his eyes,
   And stood aloof from other minds
   In impotence of fancied power.
 
   With lips depress'd as he were meek,
   Himself unto himself he sold:
   Upon himself himself did feed:
   Quiet, dispassionate, and cold,
   And other than his form of creed,
   With chisell'd features clear and sleek.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE POET
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 In this poem we have the first grand note struck by Tennyson, the first
 poem exhibiting the [Greek: spoudaiotaes] of the true poet.
 
 
   The poet in a golden clime was born,
   With golden stars above;
   Dower'd with the hate of hate, the scorn of scorn,[1]
   The love of love.
 
   He saw thro' [2] life and death, thro' [2] good and ill,
   He saw thro' [2] his own soul.
   The marvel of the everlasting will,
   An open scroll,
 
   Before him lay: with echoing feet he threaded
   The secretest walks of fame:
   The viewless arrows of his thoughts were headed
   And wing'd with flame,--
 
   Like Indian reeds blown from his silver tongue,
   And of so fierce a flight,
   From Calpe unto Caucasus they sung,
   Filling with light
 
   And vagrant melodies the winds which bore
   Them earthward till they lit;
   Then, like the arrow-seeds of the field flower,
   The fruitful wit
 
   Cleaving, took root, and springing forth anew
   Where'er they fell, behold,
   Like to the mother plant in semblance, grew
   A flower all gold,
 
   And bravely furnish'd all abroad to fling
   The winged shafts of truth,
   To throng with stately blooms the breathing spring
   Of Hope and Youth.
 
   So many minds did gird their orbs with beams,
   Tho' [3] one did fling the fire.
   Heaven flow'd upon the soul in many dreams
   Of high desire.
 
   Thus truth was multiplied on truth, the world
   Like one [4] great garden show'd,
   And thro' the wreaths of floating dark upcurl'd,
   Rare sunrise flow'd.
 
   And Freedom rear'd in that august sunrise
   Her beautiful bold brow,
   When rites and forms before his burning eyes
   Melted like snow.
 
   There was no blood upon her maiden robes
   Sunn'd by those orient skies;
   But round about the circles of the globes
   Of her keen eyes
 
   And in her raiment's hem was traced in flame
   WISDOM, a name to shake
   All evil dreams of power--a sacred name. [5]
   And when she spake,
 
   Her words did gather thunder as they ran,
   And as the lightning to the thunder
   Which follows it, riving the spirit of man,
   Making earth wonder,
 
   So was their meaning to her words.
   No sword
   Of wrath her right arm whirl'd, [6]
   But one poor poet's scroll, and with 'his' word
   She shook the world.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: The expression, as is not uncommon with Tennyson, is
 extremely ambiguous; it may mean that he hated hatred, scorned scorn,
 and loved love, or that he had hatred, scorn and love as it were in
 quintessence, like Dante, and that is no doubt the meaning.]
 
 [Footnotes 2: 1830. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1830 till 1851. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 2 1830. A.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1830.
 
   And in the bordure of her robe was writ
   Wisdom, a name to shake
   Hoar anarchies, as with a thunderfit.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1830. Hurled.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE POET'S MIND
 
 First published in 1830.
 
 A companion poem to the preceding. After line 7
 in 1830 appears this stanza, afterwards omitted:--
 
   Clear as summer mountain streams,
   Bright as the inwoven beams,
   Which beneath their crisping sapphire
   In the midday, floating o'er
   The golden sands, make evermore
   To a blossom-starred shore.
   Hence away, unhallowed laughter!
 
 
 
 
 1
 
   Vex not thou the poet's mind
   With thy shallow wit:
   Vex not thou the poet's mind;
   For thou canst not fathom it.
   Clear and bright it should be ever,
   Flowing like a crystal river;
   Bright as light, and clear as wind.
 
 
 2
 
   Dark-brow'd sophist, come not anear;
   All the place [1] is holy ground;
   Hollow smile and frozen sneer
   Come not here.
   Holy water will I pour
   Into every spicy flower
   Of the laurel-shrubs that hedge it around.
   The flowers would faint at your cruel cheer.
   In your eye there is death,
   There is frost in your breath
   Which would blight the plants.
   Where you stand you cannot hear
   From the groves within
   The wild-bird's din.
   In the heart of the garden the merry bird chants,
   It would fall to the ground if you came in.
   In the middle leaps a fountain
   Like sheet lightning,
   Ever brightening
   With a low melodious thunder;
   All day and all night it is ever drawn
   From the brain of the purple mountain
   Which stands in the distance yonder:
   It springs on a level of bowery lawn,
   And the mountain draws it from Heaven above,
   And it sings a song of undying love;
   And yet, tho' [2] its voice be so clear and full,
   You never would hear it; your ears are so dull;
   So keep where you are: you are foul with sin;
   It would shrink to the earth if you came in.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. The poet's mind. With this may be compared the
 opening stanza of Gray's 'Installation Ode': "Hence! avaunt! 'tis holy
 ground," and for the sentiments 'cf'. Wordsworth's 'Poet's Epitaph.'
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830 to 1851. Though.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE SEA-FAIRIES
 
 First published in 1830 but excluded from all editions till its
 restoration, when it was greatly altered, in 1853. I here give the text
 as it appeared in 1830; where the present text is the same as that of
 1830 asterisks indicate it.
 
 This poem is a sort of prelude to the Lotus-Eaters, the burthen being
 the same, a siren song: "Why work, why toil, when all must be over so
 soon, and when at best there is so little to reward?"
 
 
   Slow sailed the weary mariners, and saw
   Between the green brink and the running foam
   White limbs unrobed in a chrystal air,
   Sweet faces, etc.
   ...
                     middle sea.
 
 
                  SONG.
 
   Whither away, whither away, whither away?
   Fly no more!
   Whither away wi' the singing sail? whither away wi' the oar?
   Whither away from the high green field and the happy blossoming shore?
   Weary mariners, hither away,
   One and all, one and all,
   Weary mariners, come and play;
   We will sing to you all the day;
   Furl the sail and the foam will fall
   From the prow! one and all
   Furl the sail! drop the oar!
   Leap ashore!
   Know danger and trouble and toil no more.
   Whither away wi' the sail and the oar?
   Drop the oar,
   Leap ashore,
   Fly no more!
   Whither away wi' the sail? whither away wi' the oar?
   Day and night to the billow, etc.
   ...
                                     over the lea;
   They freshen the silvery-crimson shells,
   And thick with white bells the cloverhill swells
   High over the full-toned sea.
   Merrily carol the revelling gales
   Over the islands free:
   From the green seabanks the rose downtrails
   To the happy brimmed sea.
   Come hither, come hither, and be our lords,
   For merry brides are we:
   We will kiss sweet kisses, etc.
   ...
   With pleasure and love and revelry;
   ...
                                       ridged sea.
   Ye will not find so happy a shore
   Weary mariners! all the world o'er;
   Oh! fly no more!
   Harken ye, harken ye, sorrow shall darken ye,
   Danger and trouble and toil no more;
   Whither away?
   Drop the oar;
   Hither away,
   Leap ashore;
   Oh! fly no more--no more.
   Whither away, whither away, whither away with the sail and the oar?
 
   Slow sail'd the weary mariners and saw,
   Betwixt the green brink and the running foam,
   Sweet faces, rounded arms, and bosoms prest
   To little harps of gold; and while they mused,
   Whispering to each other half in fear,
   Shrill music reach'd them on the middle sea.
 
   Whither away, whither away, whither away? fly no more.
   Whither away from the high green field, and the happy blossoming shore?
   Day and night to the billow the fountain calls;
   Down shower the gambolling waterfalls
   From wandering over the lea:
   Out of the live-green heart of the dells
   They freshen the silvery-crimsoned shells,
   And thick with white bells the clover-hill swells
   High over the full-toned sea:
   O hither, come hither and furl your sails,
   Come hither to me and to me:
   Hither, come hither and frolic and play;
   Here it is only the mew that wails;
   We will sing to you all the day:
   Mariner, mariner, furl your sails,
   For here are the blissful downs and dales,
   And merrily merrily carol the gales,
   And the spangle dances in bight [1] and bay,
   And the rainbow forms and flies on the land
   Over the islands free;
   And the rainbow lives in the curve of the sand;
   Hither, come hither and see;
   And the rainbow hangs on the poising wave,
   And sweet is the colour of cove and cave,
 
   And sweet shall your welcome be:
   O hither, come hither, and be our lords
   For merry brides are we:
   We will kiss sweet kisses, and speak sweet words:
   O listen, listen, your eyes shall glisten
   With pleasure and love and jubilee:
   O listen, listen, your eyes shall glisten
   When the sharp clear twang of the golden cords
   Runs up the ridged sea.
   Who can light on as happy a shore
   All the world o'er, all the world o'er?
   Whither away? listen and stay: mariner, mariner, fly no more.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Bight is properly the coil of a rope; it then came to mean
 a bend, and so a corner or bay. The same phrase occurs in the 'Voyage of
 Maledune', v.: "and flung them in bight and bay".]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE DESERTED HOUSE
 
 First printed in 1830, omitted in all the editions till 1848 when it was
 restored. The poem is of course allegorical, and is very much in the
 vein of many poems in Anglo-Saxon poetry.
 
 
 1
 
   Life and Thought have gone away
   Side by side,
   Leaving door and windows wide:
   Careless tenants they!
 
 
 2
 
   All within is dark as night:
   In the windows is no light;
   And no murmur at the door,
   So frequent on its hinge before.
 
 
 3
 
   Close the door, the shutters close,
   Or thro' [1] the windows we shall see
   The nakedness and vacancy
   Of the dark deserted house.
 
 
 4
 
   Come away: no more of mirth
   Is here or merry-making sound.
   The house was builded of the earth,
   And shall fall again to ground.
 
 
 5
 
   Come away: for Life and Thought
   Here no longer dwell;
   But in a city glorious--
   A great and distant city--have bought
   A mansion incorruptible.
   Would they could have stayed with us!
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1848 and 1851. Through.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE DYING SWAN
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 The superstition here assumed is so familiar from the Classics as well
 as from modern tradition that it scarcely needs illustration or
 commentary. But see Plato, 'Phaedrus', xxxi., and Shakespeare, 'King
 John', v., 7.
 
 
 1
 
   The plain was grassy, wild and bare,
   Wide, wild, and open to the air,
   Which had built up everywhere
   An under-roof of doleful gray. [1]
   With an inner voice the river ran,
   Adown it floated a dying swan,
   And [2] loudly did lament.
   It was the middle of the day.
   Ever the weary wind went on,
   And took the reed-tops as it went.
 
 
 2
 
   Some blue peaks in the distance rose,
   And white against the cold-white sky,
   Shone out their crowning snows.
   One willow over the water [3] wept,
   And shook the wave as the wind did sigh;
   Above in the wind was [4] the swallow,
   Chasing itself at its own wild will,
   And far thro' [5] the marish green and still
   The tangled water-courses slept,
   Shot over with purple, and green, and yellow.
 
 
 3
 
   The wild swan's death-hymn took the soul
   Of that waste place with joy
   Hidden in sorrow: at first to the ear
   The warble was low, and full and clear;
   And floating about the under-sky,
   Prevailing in weakness, the coronach [6] stole
   Sometimes afar, and sometimes anear;
   But anon her awful jubilant voice,
   With a music strange and manifold,
   Flow'd forth on a carol free and bold;
   As when a mighty people rejoice
   With shawms, and with cymbals, and harps of gold,
   And the tumult of their acclaim is roll'd
   Thro' [7] the open gates of the city afar,
   To the shepherd who watcheth the evening star.
   And the creeping mosses and clambering weeds,
   And the willow-branches hoar and dank,
   And the wavy swell of the soughing reeds,
   And the wave-worn horns of the echoing bank,
   And the silvery marish-flowers that throng
   The desolate creeks and pools among,
   Were flooded over with eddying song.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. Grey.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830 till 1848. Which.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1863. River.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830. Sung.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1830. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 6: A coronach is a funeral song or lamentation, from the
 Gaelic 'Corranach'. 'Cf'. Scott's 'Waverley', ch. xv.,
 
   "Their wives and daughters came clapping their hands and 'crying the
   coronach' and shrieking".]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: 1830 till 1851. Through.]
 
 
 
 
 
 A DIRGE
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 
 1
 
   Now is done thy long day's work;
   Fold thy palms across thy breast,
   Fold thine arms, turn to thy rest.
   Let them rave.
   Shadows of the silver birk [1]
   Sweep the green that folds thy grave.
   Let them rave.
 
 
 2
 
   Thee nor carketh [2] care nor slander;
   Nothing but the small cold worm
   Fretteth thine enshrouded form.
   Let them rave.
   Light and shadow ever wander
   O'er the green that folds thy grave.
   Let them rave.
 
 
 3
 
   Thou wilt not turn upon thy bed;
   Chaunteth not the brooding bee
   Sweeter tones than calumny?
   Let them rave.
   Thou wilt never raise thine head
   From the green that folds thy grave.
   Let them rave.
 
 
 4
 
   Crocodiles wept tears for thee;
   The woodbine and eglatere
   Drip sweeter dews than traitor's tear.
   Let them rave.
   Rain makes music in the tree
   O'er the green that folds thy grave.
   Let them rave.
 
 
 5
 
   Round thee blow, self-pleached [1] deep,
   Bramble-roses, faint and pale,
   And long purples [2] of the dale.
   Let them rave.
   These in every shower creep.
   Thro' [3] the green that folds thy grave.
   Let them rave.
 
 
 6
 
   The gold-eyed kingcups fine:
   The frail bluebell peereth over
   Rare broidry of the purple clover.
   Let them rave.
   Kings have no such couch as thine,
   As the green that folds thy grave.
   Let them rave.
 
 
 7
 
   Wild words wander here and there;
   God's great gift of speech abused
   Makes thy memory confused:
   But let them rave.
   The balm-cricket [4] carols clear
   In the green that folds thy grave.
   Let them rave.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Still used in the north of England for "birch".]
 
 [Footnote 2: Carketh. Here used transitively, "troubles," though in Old
 English it is generally intransitive, meaning to be careful or
 thoughtful; it is from the Anglo-Saxon 'Carian'; it became obsolete in
 the seventeenth century. The substantive cark, trouble or anxiety, is
 generally in Old English coupled with "care".]
 
 [Footnote 3: Self-pleached, self-entangled or intertwined. 'Cf'.
 Shakespeare, "pleached bower," 'Much Ado', iii., i., 7.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830. "'Long purples'," thus marking that the phrase is
 borrowed from Shakespeare, 'Hamlet', iv., vii., 169:--
 
   and 'long purples'
   That liberal shepherds give a grosser name.
   It is the purple-flowered orchis, 'orchis mascula'.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1830. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 6: Balm cricket, the tree cricket; 'balm' is a corruption of
 'baum'.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LOVE AND DEATH
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
   What time the mighty moon was gathering light [1]
   Love paced the thymy plots of Paradise,
   And all about him roll'd his lustrous eyes;
   When, turning round a cassia, full in view
   Death, walking all alone beneath a yew,
   And talking to himself, first met his sight:
   "You must begone," said Death, "these walks are mine".
   Love wept and spread his sheeny vans [2] for flight;
   Yet ere he parted said, "This hour is thine;
   Thou art the shadow of life, and as the tree
   Stands in the sun and shadows all beneath,
   So in the light of great eternity
   Life eminent creates the shade of death;
   The shadow passeth when the tree shall fall,
   But I shall reign for ever over all". [3]
 
 
 [Footnote 1: The expression is Virgil's, 'Georg'., i., 427: "Luna
 revertentes cum primum 'colligit ignes'".]
 
 [Footnote 2: Vans used also for "wings" by Milton, 'Paradise Lost', ii.,
 927-8:--
 
   His sail-broad 'vans'
   He spreads for flight.
 
 So also Tasso, 'Ger. Lib'., ix., 60:
 
   "Indi spiega al gran volo 'i vanni' aurati".]
 
 [Footnote 3: 'Cf. Lockley Hall Sixty Years After': "Love will conquer at
 the last".]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE BALLAD OF ORIANA
 
 First published in 1830, not in 1833.
 
 This fine ballad was evidently suggested by the old ballad of Helen of
 Kirkconnel, both poems being based on a similar incident, and both being
 the passionate soliloquy of the bereaved lover, though Tennyson's
 treatment of the subject is his own. Helen of Kirkconnel was one of the
 poems which he was fond of reciting, and Fitzgerald says that he used
 also to recite this poem, in a way not to be forgotten, at Cambridge
 tables. 'Life', i., p. 77.
 
   My heart is wasted with my woe, Oriana.
   There is no rest for me below, Oriana.
   When the long dun wolds are ribb'd with snow,
   And loud the Norland whirlwinds blow, Oriana,
   Alone I wander to and fro, Oriana.
 
   Ere the light on dark was growing, Oriana,
   At midnight the cock was crowing, Oriana:
   Winds were blowing, waters flowing,
   We heard the steeds to battle going, Oriana;
   Aloud the hollow bugle blowing, Oriana.
 
   In the yew-wood black as night, Oriana,
   Ere I rode into the fight, Oriana,
   While blissful tears blinded my sight
   By star-shine and by moonlight, Oriana,
   I to thee my troth did plight, Oriana.
 
   She stood upon the castle wall, Oriana:
   She watch'd my crest among them all, Oriana:
   She saw me fight, she heard me call,
   When forth there stept a foeman tall, Oriana,
   Atween me and the castle wall, Oriana.
 
   The bitter arrow went aside, Oriana:
   The false, false arrow went aside, Oriana:
   The damned arrow glanced aside,
   And pierced thy heart, my love, my bride, Oriana!
   Thy heart, my life, my love, my bride, Oriana!
 
   Oh! narrow, narrow was the space, Oriana.
   Loud, loud rung out the bugle's brays, Oriana.
   Oh! deathful stabs were dealt apace,
   The battle deepen'd in its place, Oriana;
   But I was down upon my face, Oriana.
 
   They should have stabb'd me where I lay, Oriana!
   How could I rise and come away, Oriana?
   How could I look upon the day?
   They should have stabb'd me where I lay, Oriana
   They should have trod me into clay, Oriana.
 
   O breaking heart that will not break, Oriana!
   O pale, pale face so sweet and meek, Oriana!
   Thou smilest, but thou dost not speak,
   And then the tears run down my cheek, Oriana:
   What wantest thou? whom dost thou seek, Oriana?
 
   I cry aloud: none hear my cries, Oriana.
   Thou comest atween me and the skies, Oriana.
   I feel the tears of blood arise
   Up from my heart unto my eyes, Oriana.
   Within my heart my arrow lies, Oriana.
 
   O cursed hand! O cursed blow! Oriana!
   O happy thou that liest low, Oriana!
   All night the silence seems to flow
   Beside me in my utter woe, Oriana.
   A weary, weary way I go, Oriana.
 
   When Norland winds pipe down the sea, Oriana,
   I walk, I dare not think of thee, Oriana.
   Thou liest beneath the greenwood tree,
   I dare not die and come to thee, Oriana.
   I hear the roaring of the sea, Oriana.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 CIRCUMSTANCE
 
 First published in 1830.
 
 
   Two children in two neighbour villages
   Playing mad pranks along the healthy leas;
   Two strangers meeting at a festival;
   Two lovers whispering by an orchard wall;
   Two lives bound fast in one with golden ease;
   Two graves grass-green beside a gray church-tower,
   Wash'd with still rains and daisy-blossomed;
   Two children in one hamlet born and bred;
   So runs [1] the round of life from hour to hour.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830. Fill up.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE MERMAN
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 
 1
 
   Who would be
   A merman bold,
   Sitting alone,
   Singing alone
   Under the sea,
   With a crown of gold,
   On a throne?
 
 
 2
 
   I would be a merman bold;
   I would sit and sing the whole of the day;
   I would fill the sea-halls with a voice of power;
   But at night I would roam abroad and play
   With the mermaids in and out of the rocks,
   Dressing their hair with the white sea-flower;
   And holding them back by their flowing locks
   I would kiss them often under the sea,
   And kiss them again till they kiss'd me
   Laughingly, laughingly;
   And then we would wander away, away
   To the pale-green sea-groves straight and high,
   Chasing each other merrily.
 
 
 3
 
   There would be neither moon nor star;
   But the wave would make music above us afar--
   Low thunder and light in the magic night--
   Neither moon nor star.
   We would call aloud in the dreamy dells,
   Call to each other and whoop and cry
   All night, merrily, merrily;
   They would pelt me with starry spangles and shells,
   Laughing and clapping their hands between,
   All night, merrily, merrily:
   But I would throw to them back in mine
   Turkis and agate and almondine: [1]
   Then leaping out upon them unseen
   I would kiss them often under the sea,
   And kiss them again till they kiss'd me
   Laughingly, laughingly.
   Oh! what a happy life were mine
   Under the hollow-hung ocean green!
   Soft are the moss-beds under the sea;
   We would live merrily, merrily.
 
 
 [Foootnote 1: Almondine. This should be "almandine," the word probably
 being a corruption of alabandina, a gem so called because found at
 Alabanda in Caria; it is a garnet of a violet or amethystine tint. 'Cf.'
 Browning, 'Fefine at the Fair', xv., "that string of mock-turquoise,
 these 'almandines' of glass".]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE MERMAID
 
 First printed in 1830.
 
 
 1
 
   Who would be
   A mermaid fair,
   Singing alone,
   Combing her hair
   Under the sea,
   In a golden curl
   With a comb of pearl,
   On a throne?
 
 
 2
 
   I would be a mermaid fair;
   I would sing to myself the whole of the day;
   With a comb of pearl I would comb my hair;
   And still as I comb'd I would sing and say,
   "Who is it loves me? who loves not me?"
   I would comb my hair till my ringlets would fall,
   Low adown, low adown,
   From under my starry sea-bud crown
   Low adown and around,
   And I should look like a fountain of gold
   Springing alone
   With a shrill inner sound,
   Over the throne
   In the midst of the hall;
   Till that [1] great sea-snake under the sea
   From his coiled sleeps in the central deeps
   Would slowly trail himself sevenfold
   Round the hall where I sate, and look in at the gate
   With his large calm eyes for the love of me.
   And all the mermen under the sea
   Would feel their [2] immortality
   Die in their hearts for the love of me.
 
 
 3
 
   But at night I would wander away, away,
   I would fling on each side my low-flowing locks,
   And lightly vault from the throne and play
   With the mermen in and out of the rocks;
   We would run to and fro, and hide and seek,
   On the broad sea-wolds in the [1] crimson shells,
   Whose silvery spikes are nighest the sea.
   But if any came near I would call, and shriek,
   And adown the steep like a wave I would leap
   From the diamond-ledges that jut from the dells;
   For I would not be kiss'd [2] by all who would list,
   Of the bold merry mermen under the sea;
   They would sue me, and woo me, and flatter me,
   In the purple twilights under the sea;
   But the king of them all would carry me,
   Woo me, and win me, and marry me,
   In the branching jaspers under the sea;
   Then all the dry pied things that be
   In the hueless mosses under the sea
   Would curl round my silver feet silently,
   All looking up for the love of me.
   And if I should carol aloud, from aloft
   All things that are forked, and horned, and soft
   Would lean out from the hollow sphere of the sea,
   All looking down for the love of me.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Till 1857. The.]
 
 [Footnote 2: Till 1857. The.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1830. 'I the. So till 1853.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830 Kist.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNET TO J. M. K.
 
 First printed in 1830, not in 1833.
 
 This sonnet was addressed to John Mitchell Kemble, the well-known Editor
 of the 'Beowulf' and other Anglo-Saxon poems. He intended to go into the
 Church, but was never ordained, and devoted his life to early English
 studies. See memoir of him in 'Dict, of Nat. Biography'.
 
 
   My hope and heart is with thee--thou wilt be
   A latter Luther, and a soldier-priest
   To scare church-harpies from the master's feast;
   Our dusted velvets have much need of thee:
   Thou art no Sabbath-drawler of old saws,
   Distill'd from some worm-canker'd homily;
   But spurr'd at heart with fieriest energy
   To embattail and to wall about thy cause
   With iron-worded proof, hating to hark
   The humming of the drowsy pulpit-drone
   Half God's good sabbath, while the worn-out clerk
   Brow-beats his desk below. Thou from a throne
   Mounted in heaven wilt shoot into the dark
   Arrows of lightnings. I will stand and mark.
 
 
 
 
 THE LADY OF SHALOTT
 
 First published in 1833.
 
 This poem was composed in its first form as early as May, 1832 or 1833,
 as we learn from Fitzgerald's note--of the exact year he was not certain
 ('Life of Tennyson', i., 147). The evolution of the poem is an
 interesting study. How greatly it was altered in the second edition of
 1842 will be evident from the collation which follows. The text of 1842
 became the permanent text, and in this no subsequent material
 alterations were made. The poem is more purely fanciful than Tennyson
 perhaps was willing to own; certainly his explanation of the allegory,
 as he gave it to Canon Ainger, is not very intelligible: "The new-born
 love for something, for some one in the wide world from which she has
 been so long excluded, takes her out of the region of shadows into that
 of realities". Poe's commentary is most to the point: "Why do some
 persons fatigue themselves in endeavours to unravel such phantasy pieces
 as the 'Lady of Shallot'? As well unweave the ventum
 textilem".--'Democratic Review', Dec., 1844, quoted by Mr. Herne
 Shepherd. Mr. Palgrave says (selection from the 'Lyric Poems of
 Tennyson', p. 257) the poem was suggested by an Italian romance upon the
 Donna di Scalotta. On what authority this is said I do not know, nor can
 I identify the novel. In Novella, lxxxi., a collection of novels printed
 at Milan in 1804, there is one which tells but very briefly the story of
 Elaine's love and death, "Qui conta come la Damigella di scalot mori per
 amore di Lancealotto di Lac," and as in this novel Camelot is placed
 near the sea, this may be the novel referred to. In any case the poem is
 a fanciful and possibly an allegorical variant of the story of Elaine,
 Shalott being a form, through the French, of Astolat.
 
 
 PART I
 
   On either side the river lie
   Long fields of barley and of rye,
   That clothe the wold and meet the sky;
   And thro' the field the road runs by
   To many-tower'd Camelot;
   And up and down the people go,
   Gazing where the lilies blow
   Round an island there below,
   The island of Shalott. [1]
 
   Willows whiten, aspens quiver, [2]
   Little breezes dusk and shiver
   Thro' the wave that runs for ever
   By the island in the river
   Flowing down to Camelot.
   Four gray walls, and four gray towers,
   Overlook a space of flowers,
   And the silent isle imbowers
   The Lady of Shalott.
 
   By the margin, willow-veil'd
   Slide the heavy barges trail'd
   By slow horses; and unhail'd
   The shallop flitteth silken-sail'd
   Skimming down to Camelot:
   But who hath seen her wave her hand?
   Or at the casement seen her stand?
   Or is she known in all the land,
   The Lady of Shalott? [3]
 
   Only reapers, reaping early
   In among the bearded barley,
   Hear a song that echoes cheerly
   From the river winding clearly,
   Down to tower'd Camelot:
   And by the moon the reaper weary,
   Piling sheaves in uplands airy,
   Listening, whispers "'Tis the fairy
   Lady of Shalott". [4]
 
 
 PART II
 
   There she weaves by night and day
   A magic web with colours gay.
   She has heard a whisper say,
   A curse is on her if she stay [5]
   To look down to Camelot.
   She knows not what the 'curse' may be,
   And so [6] she weaveth steadily,
   And little other care hath she,
   The Lady of Shalott.
 
   And moving thro' a mirror clear
   That hangs before her all the year,
   Shadows of the world appear.
   There she sees the highway near
   Winding down to Camelot:
   There the river eddy whirls,
   And there the surly village-churls, [7]
   And the red cloaks of market girls,
   Pass onward from Shalott.
 
   Sometimes a troop of damsels glad,
   An abbot on an ambling pad,
   Sometimes a curly shepherd-lad,
   Or long-hair'd page in crimson clad,
   Goes by to tower'd Camelot;
 
   And sometimes thro' the mirror blue
   The knights come riding two and two:
   She hath no loyal knight and true,
   The Lady of Shalott.
 
   But in her web she still delights
   To weave the mirror's magic sights,
   For often thro' the silent nights
   A funeral, with plumes and lights,
   And music, went to Camelot: [8]
   Or when the moon was overhead,
   Came two young lovers lately wed;
   "I am half-sick of shadows," said
   The Lady of Shalott. [9]
 
 
 
 PART III
 
   A bow-shot from her bower-eaves,
   He rode between the barley sheaves,
   The sun came dazzling thro' the leaves,
   And flamed upon the brazen greaves
   Of bold Sir Lancelot.
   A redcross knight for ever kneel'd
   To a lady in his shield,
   That sparkled on the yellow field,
   Beside remote Shalott.
 
   The gemmy bridle glitter'd free,
   Like to some branch of stars we see
   Hung in the golden Galaxy. [10]
   The bridle bells rang merrily
   As he rode down to [11] Camelot:
   And from his blazon'd baldric slung
   A mighty silver bugle hung,
   And as he rode his armour rung,
   Beside remote Shalott.
 
   All in the blue unclouded weather
   Thick-jewell'd shone the saddle-leather,
   The helmet and the helmet-feather
   Burn'd like one burning flame together,
   As he rode down to Camelot. [12]
   As often thro' the purple night,
   Below the starry clusters bright,
   Some bearded meteor, trailing light,
   Moves over still Shalott. [13]
 
   His broad clear brow in sunlight glow'd;
   On burnish'd hooves his war-horse trode;
   From underneath his helmet flow'd
   His coal-black curls as on he rode,
   As he rode down to Camelot. [14]
   From the bank and from the river
   He flashed into the crystal mirror,
   "Tirra lirra," by the river [15]
   Sang Sir Lancelot.
 
   She left the web, she left the loom;
   She made three paces thro' the room,
   She saw the water-lily [16] bloom,
   She saw the helmet and the plume,
   She look'd down to Camelot.
   Out flew the web and floated wide;
   The mirror crack'd from side to side;
   "The curse is come upon me," cried
   The Lady of Shalott.
 
 
 PART IV
 
   In the stormy east-wind straining,
   The pale yellow woods were waning,
   The broad stream in his banks complaining,
   Heavily the low sky raining
   Over tower'd Camelot;
   Down she came and found a boat
   Beneath a willow left afloat,
   And round about the prow she wrote
   'The Lady of Shalott.' [17]
 
   And down the river's dim expanse--
   Like some bold seer in a trance,
   Seeing all his own mischance--
   With a glassy countenance
   Did she look to Camelot.
   And at the closing of the day
   She loosed the chain, and down she lay;
   The broad stream bore her far away,
   The Lady of Shalott.
 
   Lying, robed in snowy white
   That loosely flew to left and right--
   The leaves upon her falling light--
   Thro' the noises of the night
   She floated down to Camelot;
   And as the boat-head wound along
   The willowy hills and fields among,
   They heard her singing her last song,
   The Lady of Shalott. [18]
 
   Heard a carol, mournful, holy,
   Chanted loudly, chanted lowly,
   Till her blood was frozen slowly,
   And her eyes were darken'd wholly, [19]
   Turn'd to tower'd Camelot;
   For ere she reach'd upon the tide
   The first house by the water-side,
   Singing in her song she died,
   The Lady of Shalott.
 
   Under tower and balcony,
   By garden-wall and gallery,
   A gleaming shape she floated by,
   Dead-pale [20] between the houses high,
   Silent into Camelot.
   Out upon the wharfs they came,
   Knight and burgher, lord and dame,
   And round the prow they read her name,
   'The Lady of Shalott' [21]
 
   Who is this? and what is here?
   And in the lighted palace near
   Died the sound of royal cheer;
   And they cross'd themselves for fear,
   All the knights at Camelot:
   But Lancelot [22] mused a little space;
   He said, "She has a lovely face;
   God in his mercy lend her grace,
   The Lady of Shalott". [23]
 
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833.
 
   To many towered Camelot
   The yellow leaved water lily,
   The green sheathed daffodilly,
   Tremble in the water chilly,
   Round about Shalott.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: 1833.
 
   shiver,
   The sunbeam-showers break and quiver
   In the stream that runneth ever
   By the island, etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: 1833.
 
   Underneath the bearded barley,
   The reaper, reaping late and early,
   Hears her ever chanting cheerly,
   Like an angel, singing clearly,
   O'er the stream of Camelot.
   Piling the sheaves in furrows airy,
   Beneath the moon, the reaper weary
   Listening whispers, "'tis the fairy
   Lady of Shalott".]
 
 
 [Footnote 4: 1833.
 
   The little isle is all inrailed
   With a rose-fence, and overtrailed
   With roses: by the marge unhailed
   The shallop flitteth silkensailed,
   Skimming down to Camelot.
   A pearl garland winds her head:
   She leaneth on a velvet bed,
   Full royally apparelled,
   The Lady of Shalott.]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: 1833.
 
   No time hath she to sport and play:
   A charmed web she weaves alway.
   A curse is on her, if she stay
   Her weaving, either night or day]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: 1833.
 
   Therefore
   ...
   Therefore
   ...
   The Lady of Shalott.]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: 1833.
 
   She lives with little joy or fear
   Over the water running near,
   The sheep bell tinkles in her ear,
   Before her hangs a mirror clear,
   Reflecting towered Camelot.
   And, as the mazy web she whirls,
   She sees the surly village-churls.]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: 1833. Came from Camelot.]
 
 [Footnote 9: In these lines are to be found, says the present Lord
 Tennyson, the key to the mystic symbolism of the poem. But it is not
 easy to see how death could be an advantageous exchange for
 fancy-haunted solitude. The allegory is clearer in lines 114-115, for
 love will so break up mere phantasy.]
 
 [Footnote 10: 1833. Hung in the golden galaxy.]
 
 [Footnote 11: 1833. From.]
 
 [Footnote 12: 1833. From Camelot.]
 
 [Footnote 13: 1833. Green Shalott.]
 
 [Footnote 14: 1833. From Camelot.]
 
 [Footnote 15: 1833. "Tirra lirra, tirra lirra."]
 
 [Footnote 16: 1833. Water flower.]
 
 [Footnote 17: 1833.
 
   Outside the isle a shallow boat
   Beneath a willow lay afloat,
   Below the carven stern she wrote,
   THE LADY OF SHALOTT.]
 
 
 [Footnote 18: 1833.
 
   A cloud-white crown of pearl she dight,
   All raimented in snowy white
   That loosely flew (her zone in sight,
   Clasped with one blinding diamond bright),
   Her wide eyes fixed on Camelot,
   Though the squally eastwind keenly
   Blew, with folded arms serenely
   By the water stood the queenly
   Lady of Shalott.
 
   With a steady, stony glance--
   Like some bold seer in a trance,
   Beholding all his own mischance,
   Mute, with a glassy countenance--
   She looked down to Camelot.
   It was the closing of the day,
   She loosed the chain, and down she lay,
   The broad stream bore her far away,
   The Lady of Shalott.
 
   As when to sailors while they roam,
   By creeks and outfalls far from home,
   Rising and dropping with the foam,
   From dying swans wild warblings come,
   Blown shoreward; so to Camelot
   Still as the boat-head wound along
   The willowy hills and fields among,
   They heard her chanting her death song,
   The Lady of Shalott.]
 
 
 [Footnote 19: 1833.
 
   A long drawn carol, mournful, holy,
   She chanted loudly, chanted lowly,
   Till her eyes were darkened wholly,
   And her smooth face sharpened slowly.]
 
 
 [Footnote 20: "A corse" (1853) is a variant for the "Dead-pale" of 1857.]
 
 [Footnote 21: 1833.
 
   A pale, pale corpse she floated by,
   Dead cold, between the houses high,
   Dead into towered Camelot.
   Knight and burgher, lord and dame,
   To the planked wharfage came:
   Below the stern they read her name,
   "The Lady of Shalott".]
 
 
 [Footnote 22: 1833. Spells it "Launcelot" all through.]
 
 [Footnote 23: 1833.
 
   They crossed themselves, their stars they blest,
   Knight, minstrel, abbot, squire and guest,
   There lay a parchment on her breast,
   That puzzled more than all the rest,
   The well-fed wits at Camelot.
   "'The web was woven curiously,
   The charm is broken utterly,
   Draw near and fear not--this is I,
   The Lady of Shalott.'"]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 MARIANA IN THE SOUTH
 
 First printed in 1833.
 
 This poem had been written as early as 1831 (see Arthur Hallam's letter,
 'Life', i., 284-5, Appendix), and Lord Tennyson tells us that it
 "came to my father as he was travelling between Narbonne and Perpignan";
 how vividly the characteristic features of Southern France are depicted
 must be obvious to every one who is familiar with them. It is
 interesting to compare it with the companion poem; the central position
 is the same in both, desolate loneliness, and the mood is the same, but
 the setting is far more picturesque and is therefore more dwelt upon.
 The poem was very greatly altered when re-published in 1842, that text
 being practically the final one, there being no important variants
 afterwards.
 
 In the edition of 1833 the poem opened with the following stanza, which
 was afterwards excised and the stanza of the present text substituted.
 
 
   Behind the barren hill upsprung
   With pointed rocks against the light,
   The crag sharpshadowed overhung
   Each glaring creek and inlet bright.
   Far, far, one light blue ridge was seen,
   Looming like baseless fairyland;
   Eastward a slip of burning sand,
   Dark-rimmed with sea, and bare of green,
   Down in the dry salt-marshes stood
   That house dark latticed. Not a breath
   Swayed the sick vineyard underneath,
   Or moved the dusty southernwood.
   "Madonna," with melodious moan
   Sang Mariana, night and morn,
   "Madonna! lo! I am all alone,
   Love-forgotten and love-forlorn."
 
   With one black shadow at its feet,
   The house thro' all the level shines,
   Close-latticed to the brooding heat,
   And silent in its dusty vines:
   A faint-blue ridge upon the right,
   An empty river-bed before,
   And shallows on a distant shore,
   In glaring sand and inlets bright.
   But "Ave Mary," made she moan,
   And "Ave Mary," night and morn,
   And "Ah," she sang, "to be all alone,
   To live forgotten, and love forlorn".
 
   She, as her carol sadder grew,
   From brow and bosom slowly down [1]
   Thro' rosy taper fingers drew
   Her streaming curls of deepest brown
   To left and right, [2] and made appear,
   Still-lighted in a secret shrine,
   Her melancholy eyes divine, [3]
   The home of woe without a tear.
   And "Ave Mary," was her moan, [4]
   "Madonna, sad is night and morn";
   And "Ah," she sang, "to be all alone,
   To live forgotten, and love forlorn".
 
   Till all the crimson changed, [5] and past
   Into deep orange o'er the sea,
   Low on her knees herself she cast,
   Before Our Lady murmur'd she;
   Complaining, "Mother, give me grace
   To help me of my weary load".
   And on the liquid mirror glow'd
   The clear perfection of her face.
   "Is this the form," she made her moan,
   "That won his praises night and morn?"
   And "Ah," she said, "but I wake alone,
   I sleep forgotten, I wake forlorn". [6]
 
   Nor bird would sing, nor lamb would bleat,
   Nor any cloud would cross the vault,
   But day increased from heat to heat,
   On stony drought and steaming salt;
   Till now at noon she slept again,
   And seem'd knee-deep in mountain grass,
   And heard her native breezes pass,
   And runlets babbling down the glen.
   She breathed in sleep a lower moan,
   And murmuring, as at night and morn,
   She thought, "My spirit is here alone,
   Walks forgotten, and is forlorn". [7]
 
   Dreaming, she knew it was a dream:
   She felt he was and was not there, [8]
   She woke: the babble of the stream
   Fell, and without the steady glare
   Shrank one sick willow [9] sere and small.
   The river-bed was dusty-white;
   And all the furnace of the light
   Struck up against the blinding wall. [10]
   She whisper'd, with a stifled moan
   More inward than at night or morn,
   "Sweet Mother, let me not here alone
   Live forgotten, and die forlorn". [11]
 
   [12] And rising, from her bosom drew
   Old letters, breathing of her worth,
   For "Love," they said, "must needs be true,
   To what is loveliest upon earth".
   An image seem'd to pass the door,
   To look at her with slight, and say,
   "But now thy beauty flows away,
   So be alone for evermore".
   "O cruel heart," she changed her tone,
   "And cruel love, whose end is scorn,
   Is this the end to be left alone,
   To live forgotten, and die forlorn!"
 
   But sometimes in the falling day
   An image seem'd to pass the door,
   To look into her eyes and say,
   "But thou shalt be alone no more".
   And flaming downward over all
   From heat to heat the day decreased,
   And slowly rounded to the east
   The one black shadow from the wall.
   "The day to night," she made her moan,
   "The day to night, the night to morn,
   And day and night I am left alone
   To live forgotten, and love forlorn."
 
   At eve a dry cicala sung,
   There came a sound as of the sea;
   Backward the lattice-blind she flung,
   And lean'd upon the balcony.
   There all in spaces rosy-bright
   Large Hesper glitter'd on her tears,
   And deepening thro' the silent spheres,
   Heaven over Heaven rose the night.
   And weeping then she made her moan,
   "The night comes on that knows not morn,
   When I shall cease to be all alone,
   To live forgotten, and love forlorn". [13]
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833 From her warm brow and bosom down.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1833. On either side.]
 
 [Footnote 3: Compare Keats, 'Eve of St. Agnes', "her maiden eyes
 divine".]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1833. "Madonna," with melodious moan Sang Mariana, etc.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1833. When the dawncrimson changed.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1833.
 
   Unto our Lady prayed she.
   She moved her lips, she prayed alone,
   She praying disarrayed and warm
   From slumber, deep her wavy form
   In the dark-lustrous mirror shone.
   "Madonna," in a low clear tone
   Said Mariana, night and morn,
   Low she mourned, "I am all alone,
   Love-forgotten, and love-forlorn".]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: 1833.
 
   At noon she slumbered. All along
   The silvery field, the large leaves talked
   With one another, as among
   The spiked maize in dreams she walked.
   The lizard leapt: the sunlight played:
   She heard the callow nestling lisp,
   And brimful meadow-runnels crisp.
   In the full-leaved platan-shade.
   In sleep she breathed in a lower tone,
   Murmuring as at night and morn,
   "Madonna! lo! I am all alone.
   Love-forgotten and love-forlorn".]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: 1835. Most false: he was and was not there.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1833. The sick olive. So the text remained till 1850, when
 "one" was substituted.]
 
 [Footnote 10: 1833.
 
   From the bald rock the blinding light
   Beat ever on the sunwhite wall.]
 
 
 [Footnote 11: 1833.
 
   "Madonna, leave me not all alone,
   To die forgotten and live forlorn."]
 
 
 [Footnote 12: This stanza and the next not in 1833.]
 
 [Footnote 13: 1833.
 
   One dry cicala's summer song
   At night filled all the gallery.
   Ever the low wave seemed to roll
   Up to the coast: far on, alone
   In the East, large Hesper overshone
   The mourning gulf, and on her soul
   Poured divine solace, or the rise
   Of moonlight from the margin gleamed,
   Volcano-like, afar, and streamed
   On her white arm, and heavenward eyes.
   Not all alone she made her moan,
   Yet ever sang she, night and morn,
   "Madonna! lo! I am all alone,
   Love-forgotten and love-forlorn".]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ELEAeNORE
 
 First printed in 1833. When reprinted in 1842 the alterations noted were
 then made, and after that the text remained unchanged.
 
 
 1
 
   Thy dark eyes open'd not,
   Nor first reveal'd themselves to English air,
   For there is nothing here,
   Which, from the outward to the inward brought,
   Moulded thy baby thought.
   Far off from human neighbourhood,
   Thou wert born, on a summer morn,
   A mile beneath the cedar-wood.
   Thy bounteous forehead was not fann'd
   With breezes from our oaken glades,
   But thou wert nursed in some delicious land
   Of lavish lights, and floating shades:
   And flattering thy childish thought
   The oriental fairy brought,
   At the moment of thy birth,
   From old well-heads of haunted rills,
   And the hearts of purple hills,
   And shadow'd coves on a sunny shore,
   The choicest wealth of all the earth,
   Jewel or shell, or starry ore,
   To deck thy cradle, Eleaenore. [1]
 
 
 2
 
   Or the yellow-banded bees, [2]
   Thro' [3] half-open lattices
   Coming in the scented breeze,
   Fed thee, a child, lying alone,
   With whitest honey in fairy gardens cull'd--
   A glorious child, dreaming alone,
   In silk-soft folds, upon yielding down,
   With the hum of swarming bees
   Into dreamful slumber lull'd.
 
 
 3
 
   Who may minister to thee?
   Summer herself should minister
   To thee, with fruitage golden-rinded
   On golden salvers, or it may be,
   Youngest Autumn, in a bower
   Grape-thicken'd from the light, and blinded
   With many a deep-hued bell-like flower
   Of fragrant trailers, when the air
   Sleepeth over all the heaven,
   And the crag that fronts the Even,
   All along the shadowing shore,
   Crimsons over an inland [4] mere,
   [5] Eleaenore!
 
 
 4
 
   How may full-sail'd verse express,
   How may measured words adore
   The full-flowing harmony
   Of thy swan-like stateliness,
   Eleaenore?
   The luxuriant symmetry
   Of thy floating gracefulness,
   Eleaenore?
   Every turn and glance of thine,
   Every lineament divine,
   Eleaenore,
   And the steady sunset glow,
   That stays upon thee? For in thee
   Is nothing sudden, nothing single;
   Like two streams of incense free
   From one censer, in one shrine,
   Thought and motion mingle,
   Mingle ever. Motions flow
   To one another, even as tho' [6]
   They were modulated so
   To an unheard melody,
   Which lives about thee, and a sweep
   Of richest pauses, evermore
   Drawn from each other mellow-deep;
   Who may express thee, Eleaenore?
 
 
 5
 
   I stand before thee, Eleanore;
   I see thy beauty gradually unfold,
   Daily and hourly, more and more.
   I muse, as in a trance, the while
   Slowly, as from a cloud of gold,
   Comes out thy deep ambrosial smile. [7]
   I muse, as in a trance, whene'er
   The languors of thy love-deep eyes
   Float on to me. _I_ would _I_ were
   So tranced, so rapt in ecstacies,
   To stand apart, and to adore,
   Gazing on thee for evermore,
   Serene, imperial Eleanore!
 
 
 6
 
   Sometimes, with most intensity
   Gazing, I seem to see
   Thought folded over thought, smiling asleep,
   Slowly awaken'd, grow so full and deep
   In thy large eyes, that, overpower'd quite,
   I cannot veil, or droop my sight,
   But am as nothing in its light:
   As tho' [8] a star, in inmost heaven set,
   Ev'n while we gaze on it,
   Should slowly round his orb, and slowly grow
   To a full face, there like a sun remain
   Fix'd--then as slowly fade again,
   And draw itself to what it was before;
   So full, so deep, so slow,
   Thought seems to come and go
   In thy large eyes, imperial Eleanore.
 
 
 7
 
   As thunder-clouds that, hung on high,
   Roof'd the world with doubt and fear, [9]
   Floating thro' an evening atmosphere,
   Grow golden all about the sky;
   In thee all passion becomes passionless,
   Touch'd by thy spirit's mellowness,
   Losing his fire and active might
   In a silent meditation,
   Falling into a still delight,
   And luxury of contemplation:
   As waves that up a quiet cove
   Rolling slide, and lying still
   Shadow forth the banks at will: [10]
   Or sometimes they swell and move,
   Pressing up against the land,
   With motions of the outer sea:
   And the self-same influence
   Controlleth all the soul and sense
   Of Passion gazing upon thee.
   His bow-string slacken'd, languid Love,
   Leaning his cheek upon his hand, [11]
   Droops both his wings, regarding thee,
   And so would languish evermore,
   Serene, imperial Eleaenore.
 
 
 8
 
   But when I see thee roam, with tresses unconfined,
   While the amorous, odorous wind
   Breathes low between the sunset and the moon;
   Or, in a shadowy saloon,
   On silken cushions half reclined;
   I watch thy grace; and in its place
   My heart a charmed slumber keeps, [12]
   While I muse upon thy face;
   And a languid fire creeps
   Thro' my veins to all my frame,
   Dissolvingly and slowly: soon
   From thy rose-red lips MY name
   Floweth; and then, as in a swoon, [13]
   With dinning sound my ears are rife,
   My tremulous tongue faltereth,
   I lose my colour, I lose my breath,
   I drink the cup of a costly death,
   Brimm'd with delirious draughts of warmest life.
   I die with my delight, before
   I hear what I would hear from thee;
   Yet tell my name again to me,
   I _would_ [14] be dying evermore,
   So dying ever, Eleaenore.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: With the picture of Eleaenore may be compared the
 description which Ibycus gives of Euryalus. See Bergk's 'Anthologia
 Lyrica' (Ibycus), p. 396.]
 
 [Footnote 2: With yellow banded bees 'cf'. Keats's "yellow girted bees,"
 'Endymion', i. With this may be compared Pindar's beautiful picture of
 lamus, who was also fed on honey, 'Olympian', vi., 50-80.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1833 and 1842. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 4: Till 1857. Island.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1833. Meer.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1842 and 1843. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 7: Ambrosial, the Greek sense of [Greek: ambrosios], divine.]
 
 [Footnote 8: 1833 to 1851. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1833. Did roof noonday with doubt and fear.]
 
 [Footnote 10: 1833.
 
   As waves that from the outer deep
   Roll into a quiet cove,
   There fall away, and lying still,
   Having glorious dreams in sleep,
   Shadow forth the banks at will.]
 
 
 [Footnote 11: 'Cf.' Horace, 'Odes', iii., xxvii., 66-8:
 
   Aderat querenti
   Perfidum ridens Venus, et _remisso_
   Filius _arcu_.]
 
 
 [Footnote 12: 1833.
 
   I gaze on thee the cloudless noon
   Of mortal beauty.]
 
 
 [Footnote 13: 1833. Then I faint, I swoon. The latter part of the eighth
 stanza is little more than an adaptation of Sappho's famous Ode,
 filtered perhaps through the version of Catullus.]
 
 [Footnote 14: It is curious that a poet so scrupulous as Tennyson should
 have retained to the last the italics.]
 
 
 
 
 THE MILLER'S DAUGHTER
 
 
 First published in 1833. It was greatly altered when republished in
 1842, and in some respects, so Fitzgerald thought, not for the better.
 No alterations of much importance were made in it after 1842. The
 characters as well as the scenery were, it seems, purely imaginary.
 Tennyson said that if he thought of any mill it was that of Trumpington,
 near Cambridge, which bears a general resemblance to the picture here
 given.
 
 In the first edition the poem opened with the following stanza, which
 the 'Quarterly' ridiculed, and which was afterwards excised. Its
 omission is surely not to be regretted, whatever Fitzgerald may have
 thought.
 
   I met in all the close green ways,
   While walking with my line and rod,
   The wealthy miller's mealy face,
   Like the moon in an ivy-tod.
   He looked so jolly and so good--
   While fishing in the milldam-water,
   I laughed to see him as he stood,
   And dreamt not of the miller's daughter.
 
   *       *       *       *       *      *
 
 
   I see the wealthy miller yet,
   His double chin, his portly size,
   And who that knew him could forget
   The busy wrinkles round his eyes?
   The slow wise smile that, round about
   His dusty forehead drily curl'd,
   Seem'd half-within and half-without,
   And full of dealings with the world?
 
   In yonder chair I see him sit,
   Three fingers round the old silver cup--
   I see his gray eyes twinkle yet
   At his own jest--gray eyes lit up
   With summer lightnings of a soul
   So full of summer warmth, so glad,
   So healthy, sound, and clear and whole,
   His memory scarce can make me [1] sad.
 
   Yet fill my glass: give me one kiss:
   My own sweet [2] Alice, we must die.
   There's somewhat in this world amiss
   Shall be unriddled by and by.
   There's somewhat flows to us in life,
   But more is taken quite away.
   Pray, Alice, pray, my darling wife, [3]
   That we may die the self-same day.
 
   Have I not found a happy earth?
   I least should breathe a thought of pain.
   Would God renew me from my birth
   I'd almost live my life again.
   So sweet it seems with thee to walk,
   And once again to woo thee mine--
   It seems in after-dinner talk
   Across the walnuts and the wine--[4]
 
   To be the long and listless boy
   Late-left an orphan of the squire,
   Where this old mansion mounted high
   Looks down upon the village spire: [5]
   For even here, [6] where I and you
   Have lived and loved alone so long,
   Each morn my sleep was broken thro'
   By some wild skylark's matin song.
 
   And oft I heard the tender dove
   In firry woodlands making moan; [7]
   But ere I saw your eyes, my love,
   I had no motion of my own.
   For scarce my life with fancy play'd
   Before I dream'd that pleasant dream--
   Still hither thither idly sway'd
   Like those long mosses [8] in the stream.
 
   Or from the bridge I lean'd to hear
   The milldam rushing down with noise,
   And see the minnows everywhere
   In crystal eddies glance and poise,
   The tall flag-flowers when [9] they sprung
   Below the range of stepping-stones,
   Or those three chestnuts near, that hung
   In masses thick with milky cones. [10]
 
   But, Alice, what an hour was that,
   When after roving in the woods
   ('Twas April then), I came and sat
   Below the chestnuts, when their buds
   Were glistening to the breezy blue;
   And on the slope, an absent fool,
   I cast me down, nor thought of you,
   But angled in the higher pool. [11]
 
   A love-song I had somewhere read,
   An echo from a measured strain,
   Beat time to nothing in my head
   From some odd corner of the brain.
   It haunted me, the morning long,
   With weary sameness in the rhymes,
   The phantom of a silent song,
   That went and came a thousand times.
 
   Then leapt a trout. In lazy mood
   I watch'd the little circles die;
   They past into the level flood,
   And there a vision caught my eye;
   The reflex of a beauteous form,
   A glowing arm, a gleaming neck,
   As when a sunbeam wavers warm
   Within the dark and dimpled beck. [12]
 
   For you remember, you had set,
   That morning, on the casement's edge [13]
   A long green box of mignonette,
   And you were leaning from the ledge:
   And when I raised my eyes, above
   They met with two so full and bright--
   Such eyes! I swear to you, my love,
   That these have never lost their light. [14]
 
   I loved, and love dispell'd the fear
   That I should die an early death:
   For love possess'd the atmosphere,
   And filled the breast with purer breath.
   My mother thought, What ails the boy?
   For I was alter'd, and began
   To move about the house with joy,
   And with the certain step of man.
 
   I loved the brimming wave that swam
   Thro' quiet meadows round the mill,
   The sleepy pool above the dam,
   The pool beneath it never still,
   The meal-sacks on the whiten'd floor,
   The dark round of the dripping wheel,
   The very air about the door
   Made misty with the floating meal.
 
   And oft in ramblings on the wold,
   When April nights begin to blow,
   And April's crescent glimmer'd cold,
   I saw the village lights below;
   I knew your taper far away,
   And full at heart of trembling hope,
   From off the wold I came, and lay
   Upon the freshly-flower'd slope. [15]
 
   The deep brook groan'd beneath the mill;
   And "by that lamp," I thought "she sits!"
   The white chalk-quarry [16] from the hill
   Gleam'd to the flying moon by fits.
   "O that I were beside her now!
   O will she answer if I call?
   O would she give me vow for vow,
   Sweet Alice, if I told her all?" [17]
 
   Sometimes I saw you sit and spin;
   And, in the pauses of the wind,
   Sometimes I heard you sing within;
   Sometimes your shadow cross'd the blind.
   At last you rose and moved the light,
   And the long shadow of the chair
   Flitted across into the night,
   And all the casement darken'd there.
 
   But when at last I dared to speak,
   The lanes, you know, were white with may,
   Your ripe lips moved not, but your cheek
   Flush'd like the coming of the day; [18]
   And so it was--half-sly, half-shy, [19]
   You would, and would not, little one!
   Although I pleaded tenderly,
   And you and I were all alone.
 
   And slowly was my mother brought
   To yield consent to my desire:
   She wish'd me happy, but she thought
   I might have look'd a little higher;
   And I was young--too young to wed:
   "Yet must I love her for your sake;
   Go fetch your Alice here," she said:
   Her eyelid quiver'd as she spake.
 
   And down I went to fetch my bride:
   But, Alice, you were ill at ease;
   This dress and that by turns you tried,
   Too fearful that you should not please.
   I loved you better for your fears,
   I knew you could not look but well;
   And dews, that would have fall'n in tears,
   I kiss'd away before they fell. [20]
 
   I watch'd the little flutterings,
   The doubt my mother would not see;
   She spoke at large of many things,
   And at the last she spoke of me;
   And turning look'd upon your face,
   As near this door you sat apart,
   And rose, and, with a silent grace
   Approaching, press'd you heart to heart. [21]
 
   Ah, well--but sing the foolish song
   I gave you, Alice, on the day [22]
   When, arm in arm, we went along,
   A pensive pair, and you were gay,
   With bridal flowers--that I may seem,
   As in the nights of old, to lie
   Beside the mill-wheel in the stream,
   While those full chestnuts whisper by. [23]
 
   It is the miller's daughter,
   And she is grown so dear, so dear,
   That I would be the jewel
   That trembles at [24] her ear:
   For hid in ringlets day and night,
   I'd touch her neck so warm and white.
 
   And I would be the girdle
   About her dainty, dainty waist,
   And her heart would beat against me,
   In sorrow and in rest:
   And I should know if it beat right,
   I'd clasp it round so close and tight. [25]
 
   And I would be the necklace,
   And all day long to fall and rise [26]
   Upon her balmy bosom,
   With her laughter or her sighs,
   And I would lie so light, so light, [27]
   I scarce should be [28] unclasp'd at night.
 
   A trifle, sweet! which true love spells
   True love interprets--right alone.
   His light upon the letter dwells,
   For all the spirit is his own. [29]
   So, if I waste words now, in truth
   You must blame Love. His early rage
   Had force to make me rhyme in youth
   And makes me talk too much in age. [30]
 
   And now those vivid hours are gone,
   Like mine own life to me thou art,
   Where Past and Present, wound in one,
   Do make a garland for the heart:
   So sing [31] that other song I made,
   Half anger'd with my happy lot,
   The day, when in the chestnut shade
   I found the blue Forget-me-not. [32]
 
   Love that hath us in the net, [33]
   Can he pass, and we forget?
   Many suns arise and set.
   Many a chance the years beget.
   Love the gift is Love the debt.
   Even so.
   Love is hurt with jar and fret.
   Love is made a vague regret.
   Eyes with idle tears are wet.
   Idle habit links us yet.
   What is love? for we forget:
   Ah, no! no!  [34]
 
   Look thro' mine eyes with thine. True wife,
   Round my true heart thine arms entwine;
   My other dearer life in life,
   Look thro' my very soul with thine!
   Untouch'd with any shade of years,
   May those kind eyes for ever dwell!
   They have not shed a many tears,
   Dear eyes, since first I knew them well.
 
   Yet tears they shed: they had their part
   Of sorrow: for when time was ripe,
   The still affection of the heart
   Became an outward breathing type,
   That into stillness past again,
   And left a want unknown before;
   Although the loss that brought us pain,
   That loss but made us love the more.
 
   With farther lookings on. The kiss,
   The woven arms, seem but to be
   Weak symbols of the settled bliss,
   The comfort, I have found in thee:
   But that God bless thee, dear--who wrought
   Two spirits to one equal mind--
   With blessings beyond hope or thought,
   With blessings which no words can find.
 
   Arise, and let us wander forth,
   To yon old mill across the wolds;
   For look, the sunset, south and north, [35]
   Winds all the vale in rosy folds,
   And fires your narrow casement glass,
   Touching the sullen pool below:
   On the chalk-hill the bearded grass
   Is dry and dewless. Let us go.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833. Scarce makes me.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1833. Darling.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1833. Own sweet wife.]
 
 [Footnote 4: This stanza was added in 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1833.
 
   My father's mansion, mounted high
   Looked down upon the village spire.
   I was a long and listless boy,
   And son and heir unto the squire.]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: 1833. In these dear walls.]
 
 [Footnote 7:  1833.
 
   I often heard the cooing dove
   In firry woodlands mourn alone.]
 
 
 [Footnote 8:  1833.  The long mosses.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1842-1851.  Where.]
 
 [Footnote 10:  This stanza was added in 1842, taking the place of the
 following which was excised:--
 
   Sometimes I whistled in the wind,
   Sometimes I angled, thought and deed
   Torpid, as swallows left behind
   That winter 'neath the floating weed:
   At will to wander every way
   From brook to brook my sole delight,
   As lithe eels over meadows gray
   Oft shift their glimmering pool by night.
 
 In 1833 this stanza ran thus:--
 
   I loved from off the bridge to hear
   The rushing sound the water made,
   And see the fish that everywhere
   In the back-current glanced and played;
   Low down the tall flag-flower that sprung
   Beside the noisy stepping-stones,
   And the massed chestnut boughs that hung
   Thick-studded over with white cones,]
 
 
 [Footnote 11: In 1833 the following took the place of the above stanza
 which was added in 1842:--
 
   How dear to me in youth, my love,
   Was everything about the mill,
   The black and silent pool above,
   The pool beneath that ne'er stood still,
   The meal sacks on the whitened floor,
   The dark round of the dripping wheel,
   The very air about the door--
   Made misty with the floating meal!
 
 Thus in 1833:--
 
   Remember you that pleasant day
   When, after roving in the woods,
   ('Twas April then) I came and lay
   Beneath those gummy chestnut bud
   That glistened in the April blue,
   Upon the slope so smooth and cool,
   I lay and never thought of _you_,
   But angled in the deep mill pool.]
 
 
 [Footnote 12: Thus in 1833:--
 
   A water-rat from off the bank
   Plunged in the stream. With idle care,
   Downlooking thro' the sedges rank,
   I saw your troubled image there.
   Upon the dark and dimpled beck
   It wandered like a floating light,
   A full fair form, a warm white neck,
   And two white arms--how rosy white!]
 
 
 [Footnote 13: 1872. Casement-edge.]
 
 [Footnote 14: Thus in 1833:--
 
   If you remember, you had set
   Upon the narrow casement-edge
   A long green box of mignonette,
   And you were leaning from the ledge.
   I raised my eyes at once: above
   They met two eyes so blue and bright,
   Such eyes! I swear to you, my love,
   That they have never lost their light.
 
 After this stanza the following was inserted in 1833 but excised in
 1842:--
 
   That slope beneath the chestnut tall
   Is wooed with choicest breaths of air:
   Methinks that I could tell you all
   The cowslips and the kingcups there.
   Each coltsfoot down the grassy bent,
   Whose round leaves hold the gathered shower,
   Each quaintly-folded cuckoo pint,
   And silver-paly cuckoo flower.]
 
 
 [Footnote 15: Thus in 1833:--
 
   In rambling on the eastern wold,
   When thro' the showery April nights
   Their hueless crescent glimmered cold,
   From all the other village lights
   I knew your taper far away.
   My heart was full of trembling hope,
   Down from the wold I came and lay
   Upon the dewy-swarded slope.]
 
 
 [Footnote 16; Mr. Cuming Walters in his interesting volume 'In Tennyson
 Land', p. 75, notices that the white chalk quarry at Thetford can be
 seen from Stockworth Mill, which seems to show that if Tennyson did take
 the mill from Trumpington he must also have had his mind on Thetford
 Mill. Tennyson seems to have taken delight in baffling those who wished
 to localise his scenes. He went out of his way to say that the
 topographical studies of Messrs. Church and Napier were the only ones
 which could be relied upon. But Mr. Cuming Walters' book is far more
 satisfactory than their thin studies.]
 
 [Footnote 17: Thus in 1833:--
 
   The white chalk quarry from the hill
   Upon the broken ripple gleamed,
   I murmured lowly, sitting still,
   While round my feet the eddy streamed:
   "Oh! that I were the wreath she wreathes,
   The mirror where her sight she feeds,
   The song she sings, the air she breathes,
   The letters of the books she reads".]
 
 
 [Footnote 18: 1833.
 
   I loved, but when I dared to speak
   My love, the lanes were white with May
   Your ripe lips moved not, but your cheek
   Flushed like the coming of the day.]
 
 
 [Footnote 19: 1833. Rosecheekt, roselipt, half-sly, half-shy.]
 
 [Footnote 20: Cf. Milton, 'Paradise Lost';--
 
   Two other precious drops that ready stood
   He, ere they fell, kiss'd.]
 
 
 [Footnote 21: These three stanzas were added in 1842, the following
 being excised:--
 
   Remember you the clear moonlight,
   That whitened all the eastern ridge,
   When o'er the water, dancing white,
   I stepped upon the old mill-bridge.
   I heard you whisper from above
   A lute-toned whisper, "I am here";
   I murmured, "Speak again, my love,
   The stream is loud: I cannot hear ".
 
   I heard, as I have seemed to hear,
   When all the under-air was still,
   The low voice of the glad new year
   Call to the freshly-flowered hill.
   I heard, as I have often heard
   The nightingale in leavy woods
   Call to its mate, when nothing stirred
   To left or right but falling floods.]
 
 
 [Footnote 22: 1842. I gave you on the joyful day.]
 
 [Footnote 23: In 1833 the following stanza took the place of the one
 here substituted in 1842:--
 
   Come, Alice, sing to me the song
   I made you on our marriage day,
   When, arm in arm, we went along
   Half-tearfully, and you were gay
   With brooch and ring: for I shall seem,
   The while you sing that song, to hear
   The mill-wheel turning in the stream,
   And the green chestnut whisper near.
 
 In 1833 the song began thus, the present stanza taking its place in
 1842:--
 
   I wish I were her earring,
   Ambushed in auburn ringlets sleek,
   (So might my shadow tremble
   Over her downy cheek),
   Hid in her hair, all day and night,
   Touching her neck so warm and white.]
 
 
 [Footnote 24: 1872. In.]
 
 [Footnote 25: 1833.
 
   I wish I were the girdle
   Buckled about her dainty waist,
   That her heart might beat against me,
   In sorrow and in rest.
   I should know well if it beat right,
   I'd clasp it round so close and tight.
 
 This stanza bears so close a resemblance to a stanza in Joshua
 Sylvester's 'Woodman's Bear' (see Sylvester's 'Works', ed. 1641, p. 616)
 that a correspondent asked Tennyson whether Sylvester had suggested it.
 Tennyson replied that he had never seen Sylvester's lines ('Life of
 Tennyson', iii., 51). The lines are:--
 
   But her slender virgin waste
   Made mee beare her girdle spight
   Which the same by day imbrac't
   Though it were cast off by night
   That I wisht, I dare not say,
   To be girdle night and day.
 
 For other parallels see the present Editor's 'Illustrations of
 Tennyson', p. 39.]
 
 
 [Footnote 26: 1833.
 
   I wish I were her necklace,
   So might I ever fall and rise.]
 
 
 [Footnote 27: 1833. So warm and light.]
 
 [Footnote 28: 1833. I would not be.]
 
 [Footnote 29: 1833.
 
   For o'er each letter broods and dwells,
   (Like light from running waters thrown
   On flowery swaths) the blissful flame
   Of his sweet eyes, that, day and night,
   With pulses thrilling thro' his frame
   Do inly tremble, starry bright.]
 
 
 [Footnote 30: Thus in 1833:--
 
   How I waste language--yet in truth
   You must blame love, whose early rage
   Made me a rhymster in my youth,
   And over-garrulous in age.]
 
 
 [Footnote 31: 1833. Sing me.]
 
 [Footnote 32: 1833.
 
   When in the breezy limewood-shade.
   I found the blue forget-me-not.]
 
 
 [Footnote 33: In 1833 the following song took the place of the song in
 the text:--
 
   All yesternight you met me not,
   My ladylove, forget me not.
   When I am gone, regret me not.
   But, here or there, forget me not.
   With your arched eyebrow threat me not,
   And tremulous eyes, like April skies,
   That seem to say, "forget me not,"
   I pray you, love, forget me not.
 
   In idle sorrow set me not;
   Regret me not; forget me not;
   Oh! leave me not: oh, let me not
   Wear quite away;--forget me not.
   With roguish laughter fret me not.
   From dewy eyes, like April skies,
   That ever _look_, "forget me not".
   Blue as the blue forget-me-not.]
 
 
 [Footnote 34: These two stanzas were added in 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 35: 1833.
 
   I've half a mind to walk, my love,
   To the old mill across the wolds
   For look! the sunset from above,]
 
 
 
 
 
 FATIMA
 
 First printed in 1833.
 
 The 1833 edition has no title but this quotation from Sappho prefixed:--
 
 'Phainetai moi kaenos isos theoisin Emmen anaer'--SAPPHO.
 
 The title was prefixed in 1842; it is a name taken from 'The Arabian
 Nights' or from the Moallakat. The poem was evidently inspired by
 Sappho's great ode. 'Cf.' also Fragment I. of Ibycus. In the intensity
 of the passion it stands alone among Tennyson's poems.
 
 
   O Love, Love, Love! O withering might!
   O sun, that from [1] thy noonday height
   Shudderest when I strain my sight,
   Throbbing thro' all thy heat and light,
   Lo, falling from my constant mind,
   Lo, parch'd and wither'd, deaf and blind,
   I whirl like leaves in roaring wind.
 
   Last night I wasted hateful hours
   Below the city's eastern towers:
   I thirsted for the brooks, the showers:
   I roll'd among the tender flowers:
   I crush'd them on my breast, my mouth:
   I look'd athwart the burning drouth
   Of that long desert to the south. [2]
 
   Last night, when some one spoke his name, [3]
   From my swift blood that went and came
   A thousand little shafts of flame.
   Were shiver'd in my narrow frame
   O Love, O fire! once he drew
   With one long kiss, my whole soul thro'
   My lips, as sunlight drinketh dew. [4]
 
   Before he mounts the hill, I know
   He cometh quickly: from below
   Sweet gales, as from deep gardens, blow
   Before him, striking on my brow.
   In my dry brain my spirit soon,
   Down-deepening from swoon to swoon,
   Faints like a dazzled morning moon.
 
   The wind sounds like a silver wire,
   And from beyond the noon a fire
   Is pour'd upon the hills, and nigher
   The skies stoop down in their desire;
   And, isled in sudden seas of light,
   My heart, pierced thro' with fierce delight,
   Bursts into blossom in his sight.
 
   My whole soul waiting silently,
   All naked in a sultry sky,
   Droops blinded with his shining eye:
   I 'will' possess him or will die.
   I will grow round him in his place,
   Grow, live, die looking on his face,
   Die, dying clasp'd in his embrace.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833. At.]
 
 [Footnote 2: This stanza was added in 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 'Cf.' Byron, 'Occasional Pieces':--
 
 They name thee before me A knell to mine ear, A shudder comes o'er me,
 Why wert thou so dear?]
 
 
 [Footnote 4: 'Cf,' Achilles Tatius, 'Clitophon and Leucippe', bk. i., I:
 
 [Greek: 'AEde (psyche) tarachtheisa tps philaemati palletai, ei de
 mae tois splagchnois in dedemenae aekolouthaesen an elkaetheisa ano tois
 philaemasin.']
 
 (Her soul, distracted by the kiss, throbs, and had it not been close
 bound by the flesh would have followed, drawn upward by the kisses.)]
 
 
 
 
 'NONE
 
 First published in 1833, On being republished in 1842 this poem was
 practically rewritten, the alterations and additions so transforming the
 poem as to make it almost a new work. I have therefore printed a
 complete transcript of the edition of 1833, which the reader can
 compare. The final text is, with the exception of one alteration which
 will be noticed, precisely that of 1842, so there is no trouble with
 variants. ''none' is the first of Tennyson's fine classical studies. The
 poem is modelled partly on the Alexandrian Idyll, such an Idyll for
 instance as the second Idyll of Theocritus or the 'Megara' or 'Europa'
 of Moschus, and partly perhaps on the narratives in the 'Metamorphoses'
 of Ovid, to which the opening bears a typical resemblance. It is
 possible that the poem may have been suggested by Beattie's 'Judgment of
 Paris' which tells the same story, and tells it on the same lines on
 which it is told here, though it is not placed in the mouth of 'none.
 Beattie's poem opens with an elaborate description of Ida and of Troy in
 the distance. Paris, the husband of 'none, is one afternoon confronted
 with the three goddesses who are, as in Tennyson's Idyll, elaborately
 delineated as symbolising what they here symbolise. Each makes her
 speech and each offers what she has to offer, worldly dominion, wisdom,
 sensual pleasure. There is, of course, no comparison in point of merit
 between the two poems, Beattie's being in truth perfectly commonplace.
 In its symbolic aspect the poem may be compared with the temptations to
 which Christ is submitted in 'Paradise Regained'. See books iii. and iv.
 
 
   There lies a vale in Ida, lovelier [1]
   Than all the valleys of Ionian hills.
   The swimming vapour slopes athwart the glen,
   Puts forth an arm, and creeps from pine to pine,
   And loiters, slowly drawn. On either hand
   The lawns and meadow-ledges midway down
   Hang rich in flowers, and far below them roars
   The long brook falling thro' the clov'n ravine
   In cataract after cataract to the sea.
   Behind the valley topmost Gargarus [2]
   Stands up and takes the morning: but in front
   The gorges, opening wide apart, reveal
   Troas and Ilion's column'd citadel,
   The crown of Troas.
 
   Hither came at noon
   Mournful 'none, wandering forlorn
   Of Paris, once her playmate on the hills.
   Her cheek had lost the rose, and round her neck
   Floated her hair or seem'd to float in rest.
   She, leaning on a fragment twined with vine,
   Sang to the stillness, till the mountain-shade
   Sloped downward to her seat from the upper cliff.
 
   "O mother Ida, many-fountain'd [3] Ida,
   Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   For now the noonday quiet holds the hill: [4]
   The grasshopper is silent in the grass;
   The lizard, with his shadow on the stone, [5]
   Rests like a shadow, and the cicala sleeps. [6]
   The purple flowers droop: the golden bee
   Is lily-cradled: I alone awake.
   My eyes are full of tears, my heart of love,
   My heart is breaking, and my eyes are dim, [7]
   And I am all aweary of my life.
 
   "O mother Ida, many-fountain'd Ida,
   Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   Hear me O Earth, hear me O Hills, O Caves
   That house the cold crown'd snake! O mountain brooks,
   I am the daughter of a River-God, [8]
   Hear me, for I will speak, and build up all
   My sorrow with my song, as yonder walls
   Rose slowly to a music slowly breathed, [9]
   A cloud that gather'd shape: for it may be
   That, while I speak of it, a little while
   My heart may wander from its deeper woe.
 
   "O mother Ida, many-fountain'd Ida,
   Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   I waited underneath the dawning hills,
   Aloft the mountain lawn was dewy-dark,
   And dewy-dark aloft the mountain pine:
   Beautiful Paris, evil-hearted Paris,
   Leading a jet-black goat white-horn'd, white-hooved,
   Came up from reedy Simois [10] all alone.
 
   "O mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   Far-off the torrent call'd me from the cleft:
   Far up the solitary morning smote
   The streaks of virgin snow. With down-dropt eyes
   I sat alone: white-breasted like a star
   Fronting the dawn he moved; a leopard skin
   Droop'd from his shoulder, but his sunny hair
   Cluster'd about his temples like a God's;
   And his cheek brighten'd as the foam-bow brightens
   When the wind blows the foam, and all my heart
   Went forth to embrace him coming ere he came.
 
   "Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   He smiled, and opening out his milk-white palm
   Disclosed a fruit of pure Hesperian gold,
   That smelt ambrosially, and while I look'd
   And listen'd, the full-flowing river of speech
   Came down upon my heart.
 
   "'My own 'none,
   Beautiful-brow'd 'none, my own soul,
   Behold this fruit, whose gleaming rind ingrav'n
   "For the most fair," would seem to award it thine,
   As lovelier than whatever Oread haunt
   The knolls of Ida, loveliest in all grace
   Of movement, and the charm of married brows.'[11]
 
   "Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   He prest the blossom of his lips to mine,
   And added 'This was cast upon the board,
   When all the full-faced presence of the Gods
   Ranged in the halls of Peleus; whereupon
   Rose feud, with question unto whom 'twere due:
   But light-foot Iris brought it yester-eve,
   Delivering, that to me, by common voice
   Elected umpire, Here comes to-day,
   Pallas and Aphrodite, claiming each
   This meed of fairest. Thou, within the cave
   Behind yon whispering tuft of oldest pine,
   Mayst well behold them unbeheld, unheard
   Hear all, and see thy Paris judge of Gods.'
 
   "Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   It was the deep midnoon: one silvery cloud
   Had lost his way between the piney sides
   Of this long glen. Then to the bower they came,
   Naked they came to that smooth-swarded bower,
   And at their feet the crocus brake like fire,[12]
   Violet, amaracus, and asphodel,
   Lotos and lilies: and a wind arose,
   And overhead the wandering ivy and vine,
   This way and that, in many a wild festoon
   Ran riot, garlanding the gnarled boughs
   With bunch and berry and flower thro' and thro'.
 
   "O mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   On the tree-tops a crested peacock lit,
   And o'er him flow'd a golden cloud, and lean'd
   Upon him, slowing dropping fragrant dew.
   Then first I heard the voice of her, to whom
   Coming thro' Heaven, like a light that grows
   Larger and clearer, with one mind the Gods
   Rise up for reverence. She to Paris made
   Proffer of royal power, ample rule
   Unquestion'd, overflowing revenue
   Wherewith to embellish state, 'from many a vale
   And river-sunder'd champaign clothed with corn,
   Or labour'd mines undrainable of ore.
   Honour,' she said, 'and homage, tax and toll,
   From many an inland town and haven large,
   Mast-throng'd beneath her shadowing citadel
   In glassy bays among her tallest towers.'
 
   "O mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   Still she spake on and still she spake of power,
   'Which in all action is the end of all;
   Power fitted to the season; wisdom-bred
   And throned of wisdom--from all neighbour crowns
   Alliance and allegiance, till thy hand
   Fail from the sceptre staff. Such boon from me,
   From me, Heaven's Queen, Paris to thee king-born,
   A shepherd all thy life but yet king-born,
   Should come most welcome, seeing men, in power
   Only, are likest gods, who have attain'd
   Rest in a happy place and quiet seats
   Above the thunder, with undying bliss
   In knowledge of their own supremacy.'
 
   "Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   She ceased, and Paris held the costly fruit
   Out at arm's-length, so much the thought of power
   Flatter'd his spirit; but Pallas where she stood
   Somewhat apart, her clear and bared limbs
   O'erthwarted with the brazen-headed spear
   Upon her pearly shoulder leaning cold,
   The while, above, her full and earnest eye
   Over her snow-cold breast and angry cheek [13]
   Kept watch, waiting decision, made reply.
 
   "'Self-reverence, self-knowledge, self-control,
   These three alone lead life to sovereign power.
   Yet not for power, (power of herself
   Would come uncall'd for) but to live by law,
   Acting the law we live by without fear;
   And, because right is right, to follow right [14]
   Were wisdom in the scorn of consequence.'
 
   "Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   Again she said: 'I woo thee not with gifts.
   Sequel of guerdon could not alter me
   To fairer. Judge thou me by what I am,
   So shalt thou find me fairest. Yet indeed,
 
   If gazing on divinity disrobed
   Thy mortal eyes are frail to judge of fair,
   Unbiass'd by self-profit, oh! rest thee sure
   That I shall love thee well and cleave to thee,
 
   So that my vigour, wedded to thy blood, [15]
   Shall strike within thy pulses, like a God's,
   To push thee forward thro' a life of shocks,
   Dangers, and deeds, until endurance grow
   Sinew'd with action, and the full-grown will.
   Circled thro' all experiences, pure law,
   Commeasure perfect freedom.' "Here she ceased,
   And Paris ponder'd, and I cried, 'O Paris,
   Give it to Pallas!' but he heard me not,
   Or hearing would not hear me, woe is me!
 
   "O mother Ida, many-fountain'd Ida.
   Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   Idalian Aphrodite, beautiful,
   Fresh as the foam, new-bathed in Paphian [16] wells,
   With rosy slender fingers backward drew
   From her warm brows and bosom [17] her deep hair
   Ambrosial, golden round her lucid throat
   And shoulder: from the violets her light foot
   Shone rosy-white, and o'er her rounded form
   Between the shadows of the vine-bunches
   Floated the glowing sunlights, as she moved.
 
   "Dear mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   She with a subtle smile in her mild eyes,
   The herald of her triumph, drawing nigh
   Half-whisper'd in his ear, 'I promise thee
   The fairest and most loving wife in Greece'.
   She spoke and laugh'd: I shut my sight for fear:
   But when I look'd, Paris had raised his arm,
   And I beheld great Here's angry eyes,
   As she withdrew into the golden cloud,
   And I was left alone within the bower;
   And from that time to this I am alone,
   And I shall be alone until I die.
 
   "Yet, mother Ida, harken ere I die.
   Fairest--why fairest wife? am I not fair?
   My love hath told me so a thousand times.
   Methinks I must be fair, for yesterday,
   When I past by, a wild and wanton pard,
   Eyed like the evening star, with playful tail
   Crouch'd fawning in the weed. Most loving is she?
   Ah me, my mountain shepherd, that my arms
   Were wound about thee, and my hot lips prest
   Close, close to thine in that quick-falling dew
   Of fruitful kisses, thick as Autumn rains
   Flash in the pools of whirling Simois.
 
   "O mother, hear me yet before I die.
   They came, they cut away my tallest pines,
   My dark tall pines, that plumed the craggy ledge
   High over the blue gorge, and all between
   The snowy peak and snow-white cataract
   Foster'd the callow eaglet--from beneath
   Whose thick mysterious boughs in the dark morn
   The panther's roar came muffled, while I sat
   Low in the valley. Never, never more
   Shall lone 'none see the morning mist
   Sweep thro' them; never see them overlaid
   With narrow moon-lit slips of silver cloud,
   Between the loud stream and the trembling stars.
 
   "O mother, here me yet before I die.
   I wish that somewhere in the ruin'd folds,
   Among the fragments tumbled from the glens,
   Or the dry thickets, I could meet with her,
   The Abominable, [18] that uninvited came
   Into the fair Peleian banquet-hall,
   And cast the golden fruit upon the board,
   And bred this change; that I might speak my mind,
   And tell her to her face how much I hate
   Her presence, hated both of Gods and men.
 
   "O mother, here me yet before I die.
   Hath he not sworn his love a thousand times,
   In this green valley, under this green hill,
   Ev'n on this hand, and sitting on this stone?
   Seal'd it with kisses? water'd it with tears?
   O happy tears, and how unlike to these!
   O happy Heaven, how canst thou see my face?
   O happy earth, how canst thou bear my weight?
   O death, death, death, thou ever-floating cloud,
   There are enough unhappy on this earth,
   Pass by the happy souls, that love to live:
   I pray thee, pass before my light of life,
   And shadow all my soul, that I may die.
   Thou weighest heavy on the heart within,
   Weigh heavy on my eyelids: let me die.
 
   "O mother, hear me yet before I die.
   I will not die alone, for fiery thoughts
   Do shape themselves within me, more and more,
   Whereof I catch the issue, as I hear
   Dead sounds at night come from the inmost hills,
   Like footsteps upon wool. I dimly see
   My far-off doubtful purpose, as a mother
   Conjectures of the features of her child
   Ere it is born: her child!--a shudder comes
   Across me: never child be born of me,
   Unblest, to vex me with his father's eyes!
 
   "O mother, hear me yet before I die.
   Hear me, O earth. I will not die alone,
   Lest their shrill happy laughter come to me
   Walking the cold and starless road of
   Death Uncomforted, leaving my ancient love
   With the Greek woman. [19] I will rise and go
   Down into Troy, and ere the stars come forth
   Talk with the wild Cassandra, [20] for she says
   A fire dances before her, and a sound
   Rings ever in her ears of armed men.
   What this may be I know not, but I know
   That, wheresoe'er I am by night and day,
   All earth and air seem only burning fire."
 
 
 
 [1833.]
 
   There is a dale in Ida, lovelier
   Than any in old Ionia, beautiful
   With emerald slopes of sunny sward, that lean
   Above the loud glenriver, which hath worn
   A path thro' steepdown granite walls below
   Mantled with flowering tendriltwine. In front
   The cedarshadowy valleys open wide.
   Far-seen, high over all the God-built wall
   And many a snowycolumned range divine,
   Mounted with awful sculptures--men and Gods,
   The work of Gods--bright on the dark-blue sky
   The windy citadel of Ilion
   Shone, like the crown of Troas. Hither came
   Mournful 'none wandering forlorn
   Of Paris, once her playmate. Round her neck,
   Her neck all marblewhite and marblecold,
   Floated her hair or seemed to float in rest.
   She, leaning on a vine-entwined stone,
   Sang to the stillness, till the mountain-shadow
   Sloped downward to her seat from the upper cliff.
 
   "O mother Ida, manyfountained Ida,
   Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   The grasshopper is silent in the grass,
   The lizard with his shadow on the stone
   Sleeps like a shadow, and the scarletwinged [21]
   Cicala in the noonday leapeth not
   Along the water-rounded granite-rock.
   The purple flower droops: the golden bee
   Is lilycradled: I alone awake.
   My eyes are full of tears, my heart of love,
   My heart is breaking and my eyes are dim,
   And I am all aweary of my life.
 
   "O mother Ida, manyfountained Ida,
   Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   Hear me O Earth, hear me O Hills, O Caves
   That house the cold crowned snake! O mountain brooks,
   I am the daughter of a River-God,
   Hear me, for I will speak, and build up all
   My sorrow with my song, as yonder walls
   Rose slowly to a music slowly breathed,
   A cloud that gathered shape: for it may be
   That, while I speak of it, a little while
   My heart may wander from its deeper woe.
 
   "O mother Ida, manyfountained Ida,
   Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   Aloft the mountain lawn was dewydark,
   And dewydark aloft the mountain pine;
   Beautiful Paris, evil-hearted Paris,
   Leading a jetblack goat whitehorned, whitehooved,
   Came up from reedy Simois all alone.
 
   "O mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   I sate alone: the goldensandalled morn
   Rosehued the scornful hills: I sate alone
   With downdropt eyes: white-breasted like a star
   Fronting the dawn he came: a leopard skin
   From his white shoulder drooped: his sunny hair
   Clustered about his temples like a God's:
   And his cheek brightened, as the foambow brightens
   When the wind blows the foam; and I called out,
   'Welcome Apollo, welcome home Apollo,
   Apollo, my Apollo, loved Apollo'.
 
   "Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   He, mildly smiling, in his milk-white palm
   Close-held a golden apple, lightningbright
   With changeful flashes, dropt with dew of Heaven
   Ambrosially smelling. From his lip,
   Curved crimson, the full-flowing river of speech
   Came down upon my heart.
 
                            "' My own 'none,
   Beautifulbrowed 'none, mine own soul,
   Behold this fruit, whose gleaming rind ingrav'n
   "For the most fair," in aftertime may breed
   Deep evilwilledness of heaven and sore
   Heartburning toward hallowed Ilion;
   And all the colour of my afterlife
   Will be the shadow of to-day. To-day
   Hera and Pallas and the floating grace
   Of laughter-loving Aphrodite meet
   In manyfolded Ida to receive
   This meed of beauty, she to whom my hand
   Award the palm. Within the green hillside,
   Under yon whispering tuft of oldest pine,
   Is an ingoing grotto, strown with spar
   And ivymatted at the mouth, wherein
   Thou unbeholden may'st behold, unheard
   Hear all, and see thy Paris judge of Gods.'
 
   "Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   It was the deep midnoon: one silvery cloud
   Had lost his way between the piney hills.
   They came--all three--the Olympian goddesses.
   Naked they came to the smoothswarded bower,
   Lustrous with lilyflower, violeteyed
   Both white and blue, with lotetree-fruit thickset,
   Shadowed with singing-pine; and all the while,
   Above, the overwandering ivy and vine
   This way and that in many a wild festoon
   Ran riot, garlanding the gnarled boughs
   With bunch and berry and flower thro' and thro'.
   On the treetops a golden glorious cloud
   Leaned, slowly dropping down ambrosial dew.
   How beautiful they were, too beautiful
   To look upon! but Paris was to me
   More lovelier than all the world beside.
 
   "O mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   First spake the imperial Olympian
   With arched eyebrow smiling sovranly,
   Fulleyed here. She to Paris made
   Proffer of royal power, ample rule
   Unquestioned, overflowing revenue
   Wherewith to embellish state, 'from many a vale
   And river-sundered champaign clothed with corn,
   Or upland glebe wealthy in oil and wine--
   Honour and homage, tribute, tax and toll,
   From many an inland town and haven large,
   Mast-thronged below her shadowing citadel
   In glassy bays among her tallest towers.'
 
   "O mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   Still she spake on and still she spake of power
   'Which in all action is the end of all.
   Power fitted to the season, measured by
   The height of the general feeling, wisdomborn
   And throned of wisdom--from all neighbour crowns
   Alliance and allegiance evermore. Such boon from me
   Heaven's Queen to thee kingborn,
   A shepherd all thy life and yet kingborn,
   Should come most welcome, seeing men, in this
   Only are likest gods, who have attained
   Rest in a happy place and quiet seats
   Above the thunder, with undying bliss
   In knowledge of their own supremacy;
   The changeless calm of undisputed right,
   The highest height and topmost strength of power.'
 
   "Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   She ceased, and Paris held the costly fruit
   Out at arm's length, so much the thought of power
   Flattered his heart: but Pallas where she stood
   Somewhat apart, her clear and bared limbs
   O'erthwarted with the brazen-headed spear
   Upon her pearly shoulder leaning cold;
   The while, above, her full and earnest eye
   Over her snowcold breast and angry cheek
   Kept watch, waiting decision, made reply.
 
   "'Selfreverence, selfknowledge, selfcontrol
   Are the three hinges of the gates of Life,
   That open into power, everyway
   Without horizon, bound or shadow or cloud.
   Yet not for power (power of herself
   Will come uncalled-for) but to live by law
   Acting the law we live by without fear,
   And, because right is right, to follow right
   Were wisdom, in the scorn of consequence.
 
   (Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.)
   Not as men value gold because it tricks
   And blazons outward Life with ornament,
   But rather as the miser, for itself.
   Good for selfgood doth half destroy selfgood.
   The means and end, like two coiled snakes, infect
   Each other, bound in one with hateful love.
   So both into the fountain and the stream
   A drop of poison falls. Come hearken to me,
   And look upon me and consider me,
   So shall thou find me fairest, so endurance,
   Like to an athlete's arm, shall still become
   Sinewed with motion, till thine active will
   (As the dark body of the Sun robed round
   With his own ever-emanating lights)
   Be flooded o'er with her own effluences,
   And thereby grow to freedom.' "Here she ceased
   And Paris pondered. I cried out, 'Oh, Paris,
   Give it to Pallas!' but he heard me not,
   Or hearing would not hear me, woe is me!
 
   "O mother Ida, manyfountained Ida,
   Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   Idalian Aphrodite oceanborn,
   Fresh as the foam, newbathed in Paphian wells,
   With rosy slender fingers upward drew
   From her warm brow and bosom her dark hair
   Fragrant and thick, and on her head upbound
   In a purple band: below her lucid neck
   Shone ivorylike, and from the ground her foot
   Gleamed rosywhite, and o'er her rounded form
   Between the shadows of the vine-bunches
   Floated the glowing sunlights, as she moved.
 
   "Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   She with a subtle smile in her mild eyes,
   The herald of her triumph, drawing nigh
   Half-whispered in his ear, 'I promise thee
   The fairest and most loving wife in Greece'.
   I only saw my Paris raise his arm:
   I only saw great Here's angry eyes,
   As she withdrew into the golden cloud,
   And I was left alone within the bower;
   And from that time to this I am alone.
   And I shall be alone until I die.
 
   "Yet, mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   Fairest--why fairest wife? am I not fair?
   My love hath told me so a thousand times.
   Methinks I must be fair, for yesterday,
   When I passed by, a wild and wanton pard,
   Eyed like the evening star, with playful tail
   Crouched fawning in the weed. Most loving is she?
   Ah me, my mountain shepherd, that my arms
   Were wound about thee, and my hot lips prest
   Close-close to thine in that quickfalling dew
   Of fruitful kisses, thick as Autumn rains
   Flash in the pools of whirling Simois.
 
   "Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   They came, they cut away my tallest pines--
   My dark tall pines, that plumed the craggy ledge
   High over the blue gorge, or lower down
   Filling greengulphed Ida, all between
   The snowy peak and snowwhite cataract
   Fostered the callow eaglet--from beneath
   Whose thick mysterious boughs in the dark
   The panther's roar came muffled, while I sat
   Low in the valley. Never, nevermore
   Shall lone 'none see the morning mist
   Sweep thro' them--never see them overlaid
   With narrow moon-lit slips of silver cloud,
   Between the loud stream and the trembling stars.
 
   "Oh! mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   Hath he not sworn his love a thousand times,
   In this green valley, under this green hill,
   Ev'n on this hand, and sitting on this stone?
   Sealed it with kisses? watered it with tears?
   Oh happy tears, and how unlike to these!
   Oh happy Heaven, how can'st thou see my face?
   Oh happy earth, how can'st thou bear my weight?
   O death, death, death, thou ever-floating cloud,
   There are enough unhappy on this earth,
   Pass by the happy souls, that love to live:
   I pray thee, pass before my light of life.
   And shadow all my soul, that I may die.
   Thou weighest heavy on the heart within,
   Weigh heavy on my eyelids--let me die.
 
   "Yet, mother Ida, hear me ere I die.
   I will not die alone, for fiery thoughts
   Do shape themselves within me, more and more,
   Whereof I catch the issue, as I hear
   Dead sounds at night come from the inmost hills,
   Like footsteps upon wool. I dimly see
   My far-off doubtful purpose, as a mother
   Conjectures of the features of her child
   Ere it is born. I will not die alone.
 
   "Dear mother Ida, hearken ere I die.
   Hear me, O earth. I will not die alone,
   Lest their shrill, happy laughter, etc.
 
   (Same as last stanza of subsequent editions.)
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Tennyson, as we learn from his 'Life' (vol. i., p. 83),
 began ''none' while he and Arthur Hallam were in Spain, whither they
 went with money for the insurgent allies of Torrigos in the summer of
 1830. He wrote part of it in the valley of Cauteretz in the Pyrenees,
 the picturesque beauty of which fascinated him and not only suggested
 the scenery of this Idyll, but inspired many years afterwards the poem
 'All along the valley'. The exquisite scene with which the Idyll opens
 bears no resemblance at all to Mount Ida and the Troad.]
 
 [Footnote 2: Gargarus or Gargaron is the highest peak of the Ida range,
 rising about 4650 feet above the level of the sea.]
 
 [Footnote 3: The epithet many-fountain'd [Greek:'polpidax'] is Homer's
 stock epithet for Ida. 'Cf. Iliad', viii., 47; xiv., 283, etc., etc.]
 
 [Footnote 4: A literal translation from a line in Callimachus, 'Lavacrum
 Palladis', 72:
 
   [Greek: 'mesambrinae d'eich horos haesuchia']
   (noonday quiet held the hill).]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: So Theocritus, 'Idyll', vii., 22:--
 
   [Greek: 'Anika dae kai sauros eph aimasiaisi katheudei.']
   (When indeed the very lizard is sleeping on the loose stones of the
   wall.)]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: This extraordinary mistake in natural history (the cicala
 being of course loudest in mid noonday when the heat is greatest)
 Tennyson allowed to stand, till securing accuracy at the heavy price of
 a pointless pleonasm, he substituted in 1884 "and the winds are dead".]
 
 [Footnote 7: An echo from 'Henry VI.', part ii., act ii., se.
 iii.:--
 
   Mine eyes arc full of tears, my heart of grief.]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: 'none was the daughter of the River-God Kebren.]
 
 [Footnote 9: For the myth here referred to see Ovid, 'Heroides',
 xvi., 179-80:--
 
   Ilion aspicies, firmataque turribus altis Moenia,
   Phoeboeae; structa canore lyrae.
 
 It was probably an application of the Theban legend of Amphion, and
 arose from the association of Apollo with Poseidon in founding Troy.
 
 A fabric huge 'Rose like an exhalation,'
 
 --Milton's 'Paradise Lost', i., 710-11.
 
 'Cf. Gareth and Lynette', 254-7.]
 
 
 [Footnote 10: The river Simois, so often referred to in the 'Iliad',
 had its origin in Mount Cotylus, and passing by Ilion joined the
 Scamander below the city.]
 
 [Footnote 11: 'Cf'. the [Greek: synophrys kora](the maid of the meeting
 brows) of Theocritus, 'Id'., viii., 72. This was considered a great
 beauty among the Greeks, Romans and Orientals. Ovid, 'Ars. Amat'., iii.,
 201, speaks of women effecting this by art: "Arte, supercilii confinia
 nuda repletis".]
 
 [Footnote 12: The whole of this gorgeous passage is taken, with one or
 two additions and alterations in the names of the flowers, from
 'Iliad', xiv., 347-52, with a reminiscence no doubt of Milton,
 'Paradise Lost', iv., 695-702.]
 
 [Footnote 13: The "'angry' cheek" is a fine touch.]
 
 [Footnote 14: This fine sentiment is, of course, a commonplace among
 ancient philosophers, but it may be interesting to put beside it a
 passage from Cicero, 'De Finibus', ii., 14, 45:
 
   "Honestum id intelligimus quod tale est ut, detracta omni utilitate,
   sine ullis praemiis fructibusve per se ipsum possit jure laudari".
 
   We are to understand by the truly honourable that which, setting aside
   all consideration of utility, may be rightly praised in itself,
   exclusive of any prospect of reward or compensation.]
 
 
 [Footnote 15: This passage is very obscurely expressed, but the general
 meaning is clear: "Until endurance grow sinewed with action, and the
 full-grown will, circled through all experiences grow or become law, be
 identified with law, and commeasure perfect freedom". The true moral
 ideal is to bring the will into absolute harmony with law, so that
 virtuous action becomes an instinct, the will no longer rebelling
 against the law, "service" being in very truth "perfect freedom".]
 
 [Footnote 16: The Paphos referred to is the old Paphos which was sacred
 to Aphrodite; it was on the south-west extremity of Cyprus.]
 
 [Footnote 17: Adopted from a line excised in 'Mariana in the South'.
 See 'supra'.]
 
 [Footnote 18: This was Eris.]
 
 [Footnote 19: Helen.]
 
 [Footnote 20: With these verses should be compared Schiller's fine lyric
 'Kassandra', and with the line, "All earth and air seem only
 burning fire,' from Webster's 'Duchess of Malfi':--
 
   The heaven o'er my head seems made of molten brass,
   The earth of flaming sulphur.]
 
 
 [Footnote 21: In the Pyrenees, where part of this poem was written, I saw
 a very beautiful species of Cicala, which had scarlet wings spotted with
 black. Probably nothing of the kind exists in Mount Ida.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE SISTERS
 
 
 First published in 1833.
 
 The only alterations which have been made in it since have simply
 consisted in the alteration of "'an'" for "and" in the third line of
 each stanza, and "through and through" for "thro' and thro'" in line 29,
 and "wrapt" for "wrapped" in line 34. It is curious that in 1842 the
 original "bad" was altered to "bade," but all subsequent editions keep
 to the original. It has been said that this poem was founded on the old
 Scotch ballad "The Twa Sisters" (see for that ballad Sharpe's 'Ballad
 Book', No. x., p. 30), but there is no resemblance at all between the
 ballad and this poem beyond the fact that in each there are two sisters
 who are both loved by a certain squire, the elder in jealousy pushing
 the younger into a river and drowning her.
 
 
   We were two daughters of one race:
   She was the fairest in the face:
   The wind is blowing in turret and tree.
   They were together and she fell;
   Therefore revenge became me well.
   O the Earl was fair to see!
 
   She died: she went to burning flame:
   She mix'd her ancient blood with shame.
   The wind is howling in turret and tree.
   Whole weeks and months, and early and late,
   To win his love I lay in wait:
   O the Earl was fair to see!
 
   I made a feast; I bad him come;
   I won his love, I brought him home.
   The wind is roaring in turret and tree.
   And after supper, on a bed,
   Upon my lap he laid his head:
   O the Earl was fair to see!
 
   I kiss'd his eyelids into rest:
   His ruddy cheek upon my breast.
   The wind is raging in turret and tree.
   I hated him with the hate of hell,
   But I loved his beauty passing well.
   O the Earl was fair to see!
 
   I rose up in the silent night:
   I made my dagger sharp and bright.
   The wind is raving in turret and tree.
   As half-asleep his breath he drew,
   Three times I stabb'd him thro' and thro'.
   O the Earl was fair to see!
 
   I curl'd and comb'd his comely head,
   He look'd so grand when he was dead.
   The wind is blowing in turret and tree.
   I wrapt his body in the sheet,
   And laid him at his mother's feet.
   O the Earl was fair to see!
 
 
 
 
 
 TO-----
 
 WITH THE FOLLOWING POEM
 
 I have not been able to ascertain to whom this dedication was addressed.
 Sir Franklin Lushington tells me that he thinks it was an imaginary
 person. The dedication explains the allegory intended. The poem appears
 to have been suggested, as we learn from 'Tennyson's Life' (vol. i., p.
 150), by a remark of Trench to Tennyson when they were undergraduates at
 Trinity: "We cannot live in art". It was the embodiment Tennyson added
 of his belief "that the God-like life is with man and for man". 'Cf.'
 his own lines in 'Love and Duty':--$
 
   For a man is not as God,
   But then most God-like being most a man.
 
 It is a companion poem to the 'Vision of Sin'; in that poem is traced
 the effect of indulgence in the grosser pleasures of sense, in this the
 effect of the indulgence in the more refined pleasures of sense.
 
 
   I send you here a sort of allegory,
   (For you will understand it) of a soul, [1]
   A sinful soul possess'd of many gifts,
   A spacious garden full of flowering weeds,
   A glorious Devil, large in heart and brain,
   That did love Beauty only, (Beauty seen
   In all varieties of mould and mind)
   And Knowledge for its beauty; or if Good,
   Good only for its beauty, seeing not
   That beauty, Good, and Knowledge, are three sisters
   That doat upon each other, friends to man,
   Living together under the same roof,
   And never can be sunder'd without tears.
   And he that shuts Love out, in turn shall be
   Shut out from Love, and on her threshold lie
   Howling in outer darkness. Not for this
   Was common clay ta'en from the common earth,
   Moulded by God, and temper'd with the tears
   Of angels to the perfect shape of man.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833.
 
 I send you, Friend, a sort of allegory,
 (You are an artist and will understand
 Its many lesser meanings) of a soul.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE PALACE OF ART
 
 First published in 1833, but altered so extensively on its republication
 in 1842 as to be practically rewritten. The alterations in it after 1842
 were not numerous, consisting chiefly in the deletion of two stanzas
 after line 192 and the insertion of the three stanzas which follow in
 the present text, together with other minor verbal corrections, all of
 which have been noted. No alterations were made in the text after 1853.
 The allegory Tennyson explains in the dedicatory verses, but the
 framework of the poem was evidently suggested by 'Ecclesiastes' ii.
 1-17. The position of the hero is precisely that of Solomon. Both began
 by assuming that man is self-sufficing and the world sufficient; the
 verdict of the one in consequence being "vanity of vanities, all is
 vanity," of the other what the poet here records. An admirable
 commentary on the poem is afforded by Matthew Arnold's picture of the
 Romans before Christ taught the secret of the only real happiness
 possible to man. See 'Obermann Once More'. The teaching of the poem
 has been admirably explained by Spedding. It "represents allegorically
 the condition of a mind which, in the love of beauty and the triumphant
 consciousness of knowledge and intellectual supremacy, in the intense
 enjoyment of its own power and glory, has lost sight of its relation to
 man and God". See 'Tennyson's Life', vol. i., p. 226.
 
 
 
   I built my soul a lordly pleasure-house
   Wherein at ease for aye to dwell.
   I said, "O Soul, make merry and carouse,
   Dear soul, for all is well".
 
   A huge crag-platform, smooth as burnish'd brass,
   I chose. The ranged ramparts bright
   From level meadow-bases of deep grass [1]
   Suddenly scaled the light.
 
   Thereon I built it firm. Of ledge or shelf
   The rock rose clear, or winding stair.
   My soul would live alone unto herself
   In her high palace there.
 
   And "while the world [2] runs round and round,"
   I said, "Reign thou apart, a quiet king,
   Still as, while Saturn [3] whirls, his stedfast [4] shade
   Sleeps on his luminous [5] ring."
 
   To which my soul made answer readily:
   "Trust me, in bliss I shall abide
   In this great mansion, that is built for me,
   So royal-rich and wide"
 
   *       *       *       *      *
 
   Four courts I made, East, West and South and North,
   In each a squared lawn, wherefrom
   The golden gorge of dragons spouted forth
   A flood of fountain-foam. [6]
 
   And round the cool green courts there ran a row
   Of cloisters, branch'd like mighty woods,
   Echoing all night to that sonorous flow
   Of spouted fountain-floods. [6]
 
   And round the roofs a gilded gallery
   That lent broad verge to distant lands,
   Far as the wild swan wings, to where the sky
   Dipt down to sea and sands. [6]
 
   From those four jets four currents in one swell
   Across the mountain stream'd below
   In misty folds, that floating as they fell
   Lit up a torrent-bow. [6]
 
   And high on every peak a statue seem'd
   To hang on tiptoe, tossing up
   A cloud of incense of all odour steam'd
   From out a golden cup. [6]
 
   So that she thought, "And who shall gaze upon
   My palace with unblinded eyes,
   While this great bow will waver in the sun,
   And that sweet incense rise?" [6]
 
   For that sweet incense rose and never fail'd,
   And, while day sank or mounted higher,
   The light aerial gallery, golden-rail'd,
   Burnt like a fringe of fire. [6]
 
   Likewise the deep-set windows, stain'd and traced,
   Would seem slow-flaming crimson fires
   From shadow'd grots of arches interlaced,
   And tipt with frost-like spires. [6]
 
   *       *       *       *       *
 
   Full of long-sounding corridors it was,
   That over-vaulted grateful gloom, [7]
   Thro' which the livelong day my soul did pass,
   Well-pleased, from room to room.
 
   Full of great rooms and small the palace stood,
   All various, each a perfect whole
   From living Nature, fit for every mood [8]
   And change of my still soul.
 
   For some were hung with arras green and blue,
   Showing a gaudy summer-morn,
   Where with puff'd cheek the belted hunter blew
   His wreathed bugle-horn. [9]
 
   One seem'd all dark and red--a tract of sand,
   And some one pacing there alone,
   Who paced for ever in a glimmering land,
   Lit with a low large moon. [10]
 
   One show'd an iron coast and angry waves.
   You seem'd to hear them climb and fall
   And roar rock-thwarted under bellowing caves,
   Beneath the windy wall. [11]
 
   And one, a full-fed river winding slow
   By herds upon an endless plain,
   The ragged rims of thunder brooding low,
   With shadow-streaks of rain. [11]
 
   And one, the reapers at their sultry toil.
   In front they bound the sheaves.
   Behind Were realms of upland, prodigal in oil,
   And hoary to the wind. [11]
 
   And one, a foreground black with stones and slags,
   Beyond, a line of heights, and higher
   All barr'd with long white cloud the scornful crags,
   And highest, snow and fire. [12]
 
   And one, an English home--gray twilight pour'd
   On dewy pastures, dewy trees,
   Softer than sleep--all things in order stored,
   A haunt of ancient Peace. [13]
 
   Nor these alone, but every landscape fair,
   As fit for every mood of mind,
   Or gay, or grave, or sweet, or stern, was there,
   Not less than truth design'd. [14]
 
   *          *          *          *
 
   Or the maid-mother by a crucifix,
   In tracts of pasture sunny-warm,
   Beneath branch-work of costly sardonyx
   Sat smiling, babe in arm. [15]
 
   Or in a clear-wall'd city on the sea,
   Near gilded organ-pipes, her hair
   Wound with white roses, slept St. Cecily;
   An angel look'd at her.
 
   Or thronging all one porch of Paradise,
   A group of Houris bow'd to see
   The dying Islamite, with hands and eyes
   That said, We wait for thee. [16]
 
   Or mythic Uther's deeply-wounded son
   In some fair space of sloping greens
   Lay, dozing in the vale of Avalon,
   And watch'd by weeping queens. [17]
 
   Or hollowing one hand against his ear,
   To list a foot-fall, ere he saw
   The wood-nymph, stay'd the Ausonian king to hear
   Of wisdom and of law. [18]
 
   Or over hills with peaky tops engrail'd,
   And many a tract of palm and rice,
   The throne of Indian Cama [19] slowly sail'd
   A summer fann'd with spice.
 
   Or sweet Europa's [20] mantle blew unclasp'd,
   From off her shoulder backward borne:
   From one hand droop'd a crocus: one hand grasp'd
   The mild bull's golden horn. [21]
 
   Or else flush'd Ganymede, his rosy thigh
   Half-buried in the Eagle's down,
   Sole as a flying star shot thro' the sky
   Above [22] the pillar'd town.
 
   Nor [23] these alone: but every [24] legend fair
   Which the supreme Caucasian mind [25]
   Carved out of Nature for itself, was there,
   Not less than life, design'd. [26]
 
    *       *       *       *
 
   Then in the towers I placed great bells that swung,
   Moved of themselves, with silver sound;
   And with choice paintings of wise men I hung
   The royal dais round.
 
   For there was Milton like a seraph strong,
   Beside him Shakespeare bland and mild;
   And there the world-worn Dante grasp'd his song,
   And somewhat grimly smiled. [27]
 
   And there the Ionian father of the rest; [28]
   A million wrinkles carved his skin;
   A hundred winters snow'd upon his breast,
   From cheek and throat and chin. [29]
 
   Above, the fair hall-ceiling stately set
   Many an arch high up did lift,
   And angels rising and descending met
   With interchange of gift. [29]
 
   Below was all mosaic choicely plann'd
   With cycles of the human tale
   Of this wide world, the times of every land
   So wrought, they will not fail. [29]
 
   The people here, a beast of burden slow,
   Toil'd onward, prick'd with goads and stings;
   Here play'd, a tiger, rolling to and fro
   The heads and crowns of kings; [29]
 
   Here rose, an athlete, strong to break or bind
   All force in bonds that might endure,
   And here once more like some sick man declined,
   And trusted any cure. [29]
 
   But over these she trod: and those great bells
   Began to chime. She took her throne:
   She sat betwixt the shining Oriels,
   To sing her songs alone. [29]
 
   And thro' the topmost Oriels' colour'd flame
   Two godlike faces gazed below;
   Plato the wise, and large-brow'd Verulam,
   The first of those who know. [29]
 
   And all those names, that in their motion were
   Full-welling fountain-heads of change,
   Betwixt the slender shafts were blazon'd fair
   In diverse raiment strange: [30]
 
   Thro' which the lights, rose, amber, emerald, blue,
   Flush'd in her temples and her eyes,
   And from her lips, as morn from Memnon, [31] drew
   Rivers of melodies.
 
   No nightingale delighteth to prolong
   Her low preamble all alone,
   More than my soul to hear her echo'd song
   Throb thro' the ribbed stone;
 
   Singing and murmuring in her feastful mirth,
   Joying to feel herself alive,
   Lord over Nature, Lord of [32] the visible earth,
   Lord of the senses five;
 
   Communing with herself: "All these are mine,
   And let the world have peace or wars,
   Tis one to me". She--when young night divine
   Crown'd dying day with stars,
 
   Making sweet close of his delicious toils--
   Lit light in wreaths and anadems,
   And pure quintessences of precious oils
   In hollow'd moons of gems,
 
   To mimic heaven; and clapt her hands and cried,
   "I marvel if my still delight
   In this great house so royal-rich, and wide,
   Be flatter'd to the height. [33]
 
   "O all things fair to sate my various eyes!
   O shapes and hues that please me well!
   O silent faces of the Great and Wise,
   My Gods, with whom I dwell! [34]
 
   "O God-like isolation which art mine,
   I can but count thee perfect gain,
   What time I watch the darkening droves of swine
   That range on yonder plain. [34]
 
   "In filthy sloughs they roll a prurient skin,
   They graze and wallow, breed and sleep;
   And oft some brainless devil enters in,
   And drives them to the deep." [34]
 
   Then of the moral instinct would she prate,
   And of the rising from the dead,
   As hers by right of full-accomplish'd Fate;
   And at the last she said:
 
   "I take possession of man's mind and deed.
   I care not what the sects may brawl,
   I sit as God holding no form of creed,
   But contemplating all." [35]
 
       *          *          *
 
   Full oft [36] the riddle of the painful earth
   Flash'd thro' her as she sat alone,
   Yet not the less held she her solemn mirth,
   And intellectual throne.
 
   And so she throve and prosper'd: so three years
   She prosper'd: on the fourth she fell, [37]
   Like Herod, [38] when the shout was in his ears,
   Struck thro' with pangs of hell.
 
   Lest she should fail and perish utterly,
   God, before whom ever lie bare
   The abysmal deeps of Personality, [39]
   Plagued her with sore despair.
 
   When she would think, where'er she turn'd her sight,
   The airy hand confusion wrought,
   Wrote "Mene, mene," and divided quite
   The kingdom of her thought. [40]
 
   Deep dread and loathing of her solitude
   Fell on her, from which mood was born
   Scorn of herself; again, from out that mood
   Laughter at her self-scorn. [41]
 
   "What! is not this my place of strength," she said,
   "My spacious mansion built for me,
   Whereof the strong foundation-stones were laid
   Since my first memory?"
 
   But in dark corners of her palace stood
   Uncertain shapes; and unawares
   On white-eyed phantasms weeping tears of blood,
   And horrible nightmares,
 
   And hollow shades enclosing hearts of flame,
   And, with dim fretted foreheads all,
   On corpses three-months-old at noon she came,
   That stood against the wall.
 
   A spot of dull stagnation, without light
   Or power of movement, seem'd my soul,
   'Mid onward-sloping [42] motions infinite
   Making for one sure goal.
 
   A still salt pool, lock'd in with bars of sand;
   Left on the shore; that hears all night
   The plunging seas draw backward from the land
   Their moon-led waters white.
 
   A star that with the choral starry dance
   Join'd not, but stood, and standing saw
   The hollow orb of moving Circumstance
   Roll'd round by one fix'd law.
 
   Back on herself her serpent pride had curl'd.
   "No voice," she shriek'd in that lone hall,
   "No voice breaks thro' the stillness of this world:
   One deep, deep silence all!"
 
   She, mouldering with the dull earth's mouldering sod,
   Inwrapt tenfold in slothful shame,
   Lay there exiled from eternal God,
   Lost to her place and name;
 
   And death and life she hated equally,
   And nothing saw, for her despair,
   But dreadful time, dreadful eternity,
   No comfort anywhere;
 
   Remaining utterly confused with fears,
   And ever worse with growing time,
   And ever unrelieved by dismal tears,
   And all alone in crime:
 
   Shut up as in a crumbling tomb, girt round
   With blackness as a solid wall,
   Far off she seem'd to hear the dully sound
   Of human footsteps fall.
 
   As in strange lands a traveller walking slow,
   In doubt and great perplexity,
   A little before moon-rise hears the low
   Moan of an unknown sea;
 
   And knows not if it be thunder or a sound
   Of rocks [43] thrown down, or one deep cry
   Of great wild beasts; then thinketh, "I have found
   A new land, but I die".
 
   She howl'd aloud, "I am on fire within.
   There comes no murmur of reply.
   What is it that will take away my sin,
   And save me lest I die?"
 
   So when four years were wholly finished,
   She threw her royal robes away.
   "Make me a cottage in the vale," she said,
   "Where I may mourn and pray. [44]
 
   "Yet pull not down my palace towers, that are
   So lightly, beautifully built:
   Perchance I may return with others there
   When I have purged my guilt." [45]
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833.
 
   I chose, whose ranged ramparts bright
   From great broad meadow bases of deep grass.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: 1833. "While the great world."]
 
 [Footnote 3: "The shadow of Saturn thrown upon the bright ring that
 surrounds the planet appears motionless, though the body of the planet
 revolves. Saturn rotates on its axis in the short period of ten and a
 half hours, but the shadow of this swiftly whirling mass shows no more
 motion than is seen in the shadow of a top spinning so rapidly that it
 seems to be standing still." Rowe and Webb's note, which I gladly
 borrow.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1833 and 1842. Steadfast.]
 
 [Footnote 5: After this stanza in 1833 this, deleted in 1842:--
 
   "And richly feast within thy palace hall,
   Like to the dainty bird that sups,
   Lodged in the lustrous crown-imperial,
   Draining the honey cups."]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: In 1833 these eight stanzas were inserted after the stanza
 beginning, "I take possession of men's minds and deeds"; in 1842 they
 were transferred, greatly altered, to their present position. For the
 alterations on them see 'infra.']
 
 [Footnote 7: 1833.
 
   Gloom,
   Roofed with thick plates of green and orange glass
   Ending in stately rooms.]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: 1833.
 
   All various, all beautiful,
   Looking all ways, fitted to every mood.]
 
 
 [Footnote 9: Here in 1833 was inserted the stanza, "One showed an
 English home," afterwards transferred to its present position 85-88.]
 
 [Footnote 10: 1833.
 
   Some were all dark and red, a glimmering land
   Lit with a low round moon,
   Among brown rocks a man upon the sand
   Went weeping all alone.]
 
 
 [Footnote 11: These three stanzas were added in 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 12: Thus in 1833:--
 
   One seemed a foreground black with stones and slags,
   Below sun-smitten icy spires
   Rose striped with long white cloud the scornful crags,
   Deep trenched with thunder fires.]
 
 
 [Footnote 13: Not inserted here in 1833, but the following in its
 place:--
 
   Some showed far-off thick woods mounted with towers,
   Nearer, a flood of mild sunshine
   Poured on long walks and lawns and beds and bowers
   Trellised with bunchy vine.]
 
 [Footnote 14: Inserted in 1842.]
 
 
 [Footnote 15: Thus in 1833, followed by the note:--
 
   Or the maid-mother by a crucifix,
   In yellow pastures sunny-warm,
   Beneath branch-work of costly sardonyx,
   Sat smiling, babe in arm.
 
 
 When I first conceived the plan of the Palace of Art, I intended to
 have introduced both sculptures and paintings into it; but it is the
 most difficult of all things to 'devise' a statue in verse. Judge
 whether I have succeeded in the statues of Elijah and Olympias.
 
 
   One was the Tishbite whom the raven fed,
   As when he stood on Carmel steeps,
   With one arm stretched out bare, and mocked and said,
   "Come cry aloud-he sleeps".
 
   Tall, eager, lean and strong, his cloak wind-borne
   Behind, his forehead heavenly bright
   From the clear marble pouring glorious scorn,
   Lit as with inner light.
 
   One, was Olympias: the floating snake
   Rolled round her ancles, round her waist
   Knotted, and folded once about her neck,
   Her perfect lips to taste.
 
   Round by the shoulder moved: she seeming blythe
   Declined her head: on every side
   The dragon's curves melted and mingled with
   The woman's youthful pride
   Of rounded limbs.
 
   Or Venus in a snowy shell alone,
   Deep-shadowed in the glassy brine,
   Moonlike glowed double on the blue, and shone
   A naked shape divine.]
 
 
 [Footnote 16: Inserted in 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 17: Thus in 1833:--
 
   Or that deep-wounded child of Pendragon
   Mid misty woods on sloping greens
   Dozed in the valley of Avilion,
   Tended by crowned queens.
 
 The present reading is that of 1842. The reference is, of course, to
 King Arthur, the supposed son of Uther Pendragon.
 
 In 1833 the following stanza, excised in 1842, followed:--
 
   Or blue-eyed Kriemhilt from a craggy hold,
   Athwart the light-green rows of vine,
   Poured blazing hoards of Nibelungen gold,
   Down to the gulfy Rhine.]
 
 
 [Footnote 18: Inserted in 1842 thus:--
 
   Or hollowing one hand against his ear,
   To listen for a footfall, ere he saw
   The wood-nymph, stay'd the Tuscan king to hear
   Of wisdom and of law.
 
 List a footfall, 1843. Ausonian for Tuscan, 1850. The reference is to
 Egeria and Numa Pompilius. 'Cf.' Juvenal, iii., 11-18:--
 
   Hic ubi nocturnae
   Numa constituebat amicae
   ...
   In vallem AEgeriae descendimus et speluneas
   Dissimiles veris.
 
 and the beautiful passage in Byron's 'Childe Harold', iv., st.
 cxv.-cxix.]
 
 
 [Footnote 19: This is Camadev or Camadeo, the Cupid or God of Love of the
 Hindu mythology.]
 
 [Footnote 20: This picture of Europa seems to have been suggested by
 Moschus, 'Idyll', ii., 121-5:--
 
   [Greek: Hae d' ar ephezomenae Zaenos Boeois epi n_otois tae men echen
   taurou dolichon keras, en cheri d' allae eirue porphyreas kolpou
   ptuchas.]
 
   "Then, seated on the back of the divine bull, with one hand did she
   grasp the bull's long horn and with the other she was catching up the
   purple folds of her garment, and the robe on her shoulders was swelled
   out."
 
 See, too, the beautiful picture of the same scene in Achilles
 Tatius, 'Clitophon and Leucippe', lib. i., 'ad init.;' and in Politian's
 finely picturesque poem.]
 
 
 [Footnote 21: In 1833 thus:--
 
   Europa's scarf blew in an arch, unclasped,
   From her bare shoulder backward borne.
 
 Off inserted in 1842. Here in 1833 follows a stanza, excised in 1842:--
 
   He thro' the streaming crystal swam, and rolled
   Ambrosial breaths that seemed to float
   In light-wreathed curls. She from the ripple cold
   Updrew her sandalled foot.]
 
 
 [Footnote 22: 1833. Over.]
 
 [Footnote 23: 1833. Not.]
 
 [Footnote 24: 1833. Many a.]
 
 [Footnote 25: The Caucasian range forms the north-west margin of the
 great tableland of Western Asia, and as it was the home of those races
 who afterwards peopled Europe and Western Asia and so became the fathers
 of civilisation and culture, the "Supreme Caucasian mind" is a
 historically correct but certainly recondite expression for the
 intellectual flower of the human race, for the perfection of human
 ability.]
 
 
 [Footnote 26: 1833. Broidered in screen and blind.
 
 In the edition of 1833 appear the following stanzas, excised in 1842:--
 
   So that my soul beholding in her pride
   All these, from room to room did pass;
   And all things that she saw, she multiplied,
   A many-faced glass.
 
   And, being both the sower and the seed,
   Remaining in herself became
   All that she saw, Madonna, Ganymede,
   Or the Asiatic dame--
 
   Still changing, as a lighthouse in the night
   Changeth athwart the gleaming main,
   From red to yellow, yellow to pale white,
   Then back to red again.
 
   "From change to change four times within the womb
   The brain is moulded," she began,
   "So thro' all phases of all thought I come
   Into the perfect man.
 
   "All nature widens upward: evermore
   The simpler essence lower lies,
   More complex is more perfect, owning more
   Discourse, more widely wise.
 
   "I take possession of men's minds and deeds.
   I live in all things great and small.
   I dwell apart, holding no forms of creeds,
   But contemplating all."
 
   Four ample courts there were, East, West, South, North,
   In each a squared lawn where from
   A golden-gorged dragon spouted forth
   The fountain's diamond foam.
 
   All round the cool green courts there ran a row
   Of cloisters, branched like mighty woods,
   Echoing all night to that sonorous flow
   Of spouted fountain floods.
 
   From those four jets four currents in one swell
   Over the black rock streamed below
   In steamy folds, that, floating as they fell,
   Lit up a torrent bow.
 
   And round the roofs ran gilded galleries
   That gave large view to distant lands,
   Tall towns and mounds, and close beneath the skies
   Long lines of amber sands.
 
   Huge incense-urns along the balustrade,
   Hollowed of solid amethyst,
   Each with a different odour fuming, made
   The air a silver mist.
 
   Far-off 'twas wonderful to look upon
   Those sumptuous towers between the gleam
   Of that great foam-bow trembling in the sun,
   And the argent incense-steam;
 
   And round the terraces and round the walls,
   While day sank lower or rose higher,
   To see those rails with all their knobs and balls,
   Burn like a fringe of fire.
 
   Likewise the deepset windows, stained and traced.
   Burned, like slow-flaming crimson fires,
   From shadowed grots of arches interlaced,
   And topped with frostlike spires.]
 
 
 [Footnote 27: 1833.
 
   There deep-haired Milton like an angel tall
   Stood limned, Shakspeare bland and mild,
   Grim Dante pressed his lips, and from the wall
   The bald blind Homer smiled.
 
 Recast in its present form in
 1842. After this stanza in 1833 appear the following stanzas, excised in
 1842:--
 
   And underneath fresh carved in cedar wood,
   Somewhat alike in form and face,
   The Genii of every climate stood,
   All brothers of one race:
 
   Angels who sway the seasons by their art,
   And mould all shapes in earth and sea;
   And with great effort build the human heart
   From earliest infancy.
 
   And in the sun-pierced Oriels' coloured flame
   Immortal Michael Angelo
   Looked down, bold Luther, large-browed Verulam,
   The King of those who know. [A]
 
   Cervantes, the bright face of Calderon,
   Robed David touching holy strings,
   The Halicarnassean, and alone,
   Alfred the flower of kings.
 
   Isaiah with fierce Ezekiel,
   Swarth Moses by the Coptic sea,
   Plato, Petrarca, Livy, and Raphael,
   And eastern Confutzer.
 
     [Sub-Footnote A: Il maestro di color chi sanno.--Dante, 'Inf.',
     iii.]]
 
 
 [Footnote 28: Homer. 'Cf.' Pope's 'Temple of Fame', 183-7:--
 
   Father of verse in holy fillets dress'd,
   His silver beard wav'd gently o'er his breast,
   Though blind a boldness in his looks appears,
   In years he seem'd but not impaired by years.]
 
 
 [Footnote 29: All these stanzas were added in 1842. In 1833 appear the
 following stanzas, excised in 1842:--
 
   As some rich tropic mountain, that infolds
   All change, from flats of scattered palms
   Sloping thro' five great zones of climate, holds
   His head in snows and calms--
 
   Full of her own delight and nothing else,
   My vain-glorious, gorgeous soul
   Sat throned between the shining oriels,
   In pomp beyond control;
 
   With piles of flavorous fruits in basket-twine
   Of gold, upheaped, crushing down
   Musk-scented blooms--all taste--grape, gourd or pine--
   In bunch, or single grown--
 
   Our growths, and such as brooding Indian heats
   Make out of crimson blossoms deep,
   Ambrosial pulps and juices, sweets from sweets
   Sun-changed, when sea-winds sleep.
 
   With graceful chalices of curious wine,
   Wonders of art--and costly jars,
   And bossed salvers. Ere young night divine
   Crowned dying day with stars,
 
   Making sweet close of his delicious toils,
   She lit white streams of dazzling gas,
   And soft and fragrant flames of precious oils
   In moons of purple glass
 
   Ranged on the fretted woodwork to the ground.
   Thus her intense untold delight,
   In deep or vivid colour, smell and sound,
   Was nattered day and night. [A]
 
     [Sub-Footnote A: If the poem were not already too long, I should
     have inserted in the text the following stanzas, expressive of the
     joy wherewith the soul contemplated the results of astronomical
     experiment. In the centre of the four quadrangles rose an immense
     tower.
 
     Hither, when all the deep unsounded skies
     Shuddered with silent stars she clomb,
     And as with optic glasses her keen eyes
     Pierced thro' the mystic dome,
 
     Regions of lucid matter taking forms,
     Brushes of fire, hazy gleams,
     Clusters and beds of worlds, and bee-like swarms
     Of suns, and starry streams.
 
     She saw the snowy poles of moonless Mars,
     That marvellous round of milky light
     Below Orion, and those double stars
     Whereof the one more bright
 
     Is circled by the other, etc.]
 
 
 
 [Footnote 30: Thus in 1833:--
 
   And many more, that in their lifetime were
   Full-welling fountain heads of change,
   Between the stone shafts glimmered, blazoned fair
   In divers raiment strange.]
 
 [Footnote 31: The statue of Memnon near Thebes in Egypt when first
 struck by the rays of the rising sun is said to have become vocal, to
 have emitted responsive sounds. See for an account of this 'Pausanias',
 i., 42; Tacitus, 'Annals', ii., 61; and Juvenal, 'Sat.', xv., 5:
 
   "Dimidio magicae resonant ubi Memnone Chordae,"
 
 and compare Akenside's verses,
 'Plea. of Imag.', i., 109-113:--
 
   Old Memnon's image, long renown'd
   By fabling Nilus: to the quivering touch
   Of Titan's ray, with each repulsive string
   Consenting, sounded thro' the warbling air
   Unbidden strains.]
 
 
 [Footnote 32: 1833. O'.]
 
 [Footnote 33: Here added in 1842 and remaining till 1851 when they were
 excised are two stanzas:--
 
   "From shape to shape at first within the womb
   The brain is modell'd," she began,
   "And thro' all phases of all thought I come
   Into the perfect man.
 
   "All nature widens upward. Evermore
   The simpler essence lower lies:
   More complex is more perfect, owning more
   Discourse, more widely wise."]
 
 
 [Footnote 34: These stanzas were added in 1851.]
 
 [Footnote 35: Added in
 1842, with the following variants which remained till 1851, when the
 present text was substituted:--
 
   "I take possession of men's minds and deeds.
   I live in all things great and small.
   I sit apart holding no forms of creeds,
   But contemplating all."]
 
 
 [Footnote 36: 1833. Sometimes.]
 
 [Footnote 37:
 
   And intellectual throne
   Of full-sphered contemplation. So three years
   She throve, but on the fourth she fell.
 
 And so the text remained till 1850, when the present
 reading was substituted.]
 
 
 [Footnote 38: For the reference to Herod see
 'Acts' xii. 21-23.]
 
 [Footnote 39: Cf. Hallam's 'Remains', p.
 132: "That, i.e. Redemption," is in the power of God's election with
 whom alone rest 'the abysmal secrets of personality'.]
 
 [Footnote 40:
 See 'Daniel' v. 24-27.]
 
 [Footnote 41: In 1833 the following stanza,
 excised in 1842:--
 
   "Who hath drawn dry the fountains of delight,
   That from my deep heart everywhere
   Moved in my blood and dwelt, as power and might
   Abode in Sampson's hair?"]
 
 
 [Footnote 42: 1833. Downward-sloping.]
 
 [Footnote 43: 1833.
 
   Or the sound
   Of stones.
 
 So till 1851, when "a sound of rocks" was substituted.]
 
 
 [Footnote 44: 1833. "Dying the death I die?" Present reading substituted
 in 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 45: Because intellectual and aesthetic pleasures are
 'abused' and their purpose and scope mistaken, there is no reason
 why they should not be enjoyed. See the allegory in 'In Memoriam',
 ciii., stanzas 12-13.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LADY CLARA VERE DE VERE
 
 Though this is placed among the poems published in 1833 it first
 appeared in print in 1842. The subsequent alterations were very slight,
 and after 1848 none at all were made.
 
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere,
   Of me you shall not win renown:
   You thought to break a country heart
   For pastime, ere you went to town.
   At me you smiled, but unbeguiled
   I saw the snare, and I retired:
   The daughter of a hundred Earls,
   You are not one to be desired.
 
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere,
   I know you proud to bear your name,
   Your pride is yet no mate for mine,
   Too proud to care from whence I came.
   Nor would I break for your sweet sake
   A heart that doats on truer charms.
   A simple maiden in her flower
   Is worth a hundred coats-of-arms.
 
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere,
   Some meeker pupil you must find,
   For were you queen of all that is,
   I could not stoop to such a mind.
   You sought to prove how I could love,
   And my disdain is my reply.
   The lion on your old stone gates
   Is not more cold to you than I.
 
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere,
   You put strange memories in my head.
   Not thrice your branching limes have blown
   Since I beheld young Laurence dead.
   Oh your sweet eyes, your low replies:
   A great enchantress you may be;
   But there was that across his throat
   Which you hardly cared to see.
 
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere,
   When thus he met his mother's view,
   She had the passions of her kind,
   She spake some certain truths of you.
 
   Indeed I heard one bitter word
   That scarce is fit for you to hear;
   Her manners had not that repose
   Which stamps the caste of Vere de Vere.
 
   Lady Clara Vere de Vere,
   There stands a spectre in your hall:
   The guilt of blood is at your door:
   You changed a wholesome heart to gall.
   You held your course without remorse,
   To make him trust his modest worth,
   And, last, you fix'd a vacant stare,
   And slew him with your noble birth.
 
   Trust me, Clara Vere de Vere,
   From yon blue heavens above us bent
   The grand old gardener and his wife [1]
   Smile at the claims of long descent.
   Howe'er it be, it seems to me,
   'Tis only noble to be good.
   Kind hearts are more than coronets,
   And simple faith than Norman blood.
 
   I know you, Clara Vere de Vere:
   You pine among your halls and towers:
   The languid light of your proud eyes
   Is wearied of the rolling hours.
   In glowing health, with boundless wealth,
   But sickening of a vague disease,
   You know so ill to deal with time,
   You needs must play such pranks as these.
 
   Clara, Clara Vere de Vere,
   If Time be heavy on your hands,
   Are there no beggars at your gate,
   Nor any poor about your lands?
   Oh! teach the orphan-boy to read,
   Or teach the orphan-girl to sew,
   Pray Heaven for a human heart,
   And let the foolish yoeman go.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 and 1843. "The gardener Adam and his wife." In 1845 it
 was altered to the present text.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE MAY QUEEN
 
 The first two parts were first published in 1833.
 
 The scenery is typical of Lincolnshire; in Fitzgerald's phrase, it is
 all Lincolnshire inland, as 'Locksley Hall' is seaboard.
 
   You must wake and call me early, call me early, mother dear;
   To-morrow 'ill be the happiest time of all the glad [1] New-year;
   Of all the glad New-year, mother, the maddest merriest day;
   For I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   There's many a black, black eye, they say, but none so bright as mine;
   There's Margaret and Mary, there's Kate and Caroline:
   But none so fair as little Alice in all the land they say,
   So I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   I sleep so sound all night, mother, that I shall never wake,
   If you [2] do not call me loud when the day begins to break:
   But I must gather knots of flowers, and buds and garlands gay,
   For I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   As I came up the valley whom think ye should I see,
   But Robin [3] leaning on the bridge beneath the hazel-tree?
   He thought of that sharp look, mother, I gave him yesterday,--
   But I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   He thought I was a ghost, mother, for I was all in white,
   And I ran by him without speaking, like a flash of light.
   They call me cruel-hearted, but I care not what they say,
   For I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   They say he's dying all for love, but that can never be:
   They say his heart is breaking, mother--what is that to me?
   There's many a bolder lad 'ill woo me any summer day,
   And I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   Little Effie shall go with me to-morrow to the green,
   And you'll be there, too, mother, to see me made the Queen;
   For the shepherd lads on every side 'ill come from far away,
   And I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   The honeysuckle round the porch has wov'n its wavy bowers,
   And by the meadow-trenches blow the faint sweet cuckoo-flowers;
   And the wild marsh-marigold shines like fire in swamps and hollows gray,
   And I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   The night-winds come and go, mother, upon the meadow-grass,
   And the happy stars above them seem to brighten as they pass;
   There will not be a drop of rain the whole of the live-long day,
   And I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   All the valley, mother, 'ill be fresh and green and still,
   And the cowslip and the crowfoot are over all the hill,
   And the rivulet in the flowery dale 'ill merrily glance and play,
   For I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
   So you must wake and call me early, call me early, mother dear,
   To-morrow 'ill be the happiest time of all the glad New-year:
   To-morrow 'ill be of all the year the maddest merriest day,
   For I'm to be Queen o' the May, mother, I'm to be Queen o' the May.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833. "Blythe" for "glad".]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1883. Ye.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842. Robert. This is a curious illustration of Tennyson's
 scrupulousness about trifles: in 1833 it was "Robin," in 1842 "Robert,"
 then in 1843 and afterwards he returned to "Robin".]
 
 
 
 
 
 NEW-YEAR'S EVE
 
   If you're waking call me early, call me early, mother dear,
   For I would see the sun rise upon the glad New-year.
   It is the last New-year that I shall ever see,
   Then you may lay me low i' the mould and think no more of me.
 
   To-night I saw the sun set: he set and left behind
   The good old year, the dear old time, and all my peace of mind;
   And the New-year's coming up, mother, but I shall never see
   The blossom on [1] the blackthorn, the leaf upon the tree.
 
   Last May we made a crown of flowers: we had a merry day;
   Beneath the hawthorn on the green they made me Queen of May;
   And we danced about the may-pole and in the hazel copse,
   Till Charles's Wain came out above the tall white chimney-tops.
 
   There's not a flower on all the hills: the frost is on the pane:
   I only wish to live till the snowdrops come again:
   I wish the snow would melt and the sun come out on high:
   I long to see a flower so before the day I die.
 
   The building rook'll caw from the windy tall elm-tree,
   And the tufted plover pipe along the fallow lea,
   And the swallow'll come back again with summer o'er the wave.
   But I shall lie alone, mother, within the mouldering grave.
 
   Upon the chancel-casement, and upon that grave of mine,
   In the early, early morning the summer sun'll shine,
   Before the red cock crows from the farm upon the hill,
   When you are warm-asleep, mother, and all the world is still.
 
   When the flowers come again, mother, beneath the waning light
   You'll never see me more in the long gray fields at night;
   When from the dry dark wold the summer airs blow cool
   On the oat-grass and the sword-grass, and the bulrush in the pool.
 
   You'll bury me, [2] my mother, just beneath the hawthorn shade,
   And you'll come [3] sometimes and see me where I am lowly laid.
   I shall not forget you, mother, I shall hear you when you pass,[4]
   With your feet above my head in the long and pleasant grass.
 
   I have been wild and wayward, but you'll forgive [5] me now;
   You'll kiss me, my own mother, and forgive me ere I go; [6]
   Nay, nay, you must not weep, [7] nor let your grief be wild,
   You should not fret for me, mother, you [8] have another child.
 
   If I can I'll come again, mother, from out my resting-place;
   Tho' you'll [9] not see me, mother, I shall look upon your face;
   Tho' I cannot speak a word, 1 shall harken what you [10] say,
   And be often, often with you when you think [11] I'm far away.
 
   Good-night, good-night, when I have said good-night for evermore,
   And you [12] see me carried out from the threshold of the door;
   Don't let Effie come to see me till my grave be growing green:
   She'll be a better child to you than ever I have been.
 
   She'll find my garden-tools upon the granary floor:
   Let her take 'em: they are hers: I shall never garden more:
   But tell her, when I'm gone, to train the rose-bush that I set
   About the parlour-window and the box of mignonette.
 
   Good-night, sweet mother: call me before the day is born. [13]
   All night I lie awake, but I fall asleep at morn;
   But I would see the sun rise upon the glad New-year,
   So, if your waking, call me, call me early, mother dear.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833. The may upon.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1833. Ye'll bury me.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1833. And ye'll come.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1833. I shall not forget ye, mother, I shall hear ye when
 ye pass.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1833. But ye'll forgive.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1833. Ye'll kiss me, my own mother, upon my cheek and brow.
 1850. And foregive me ere I go.]
 
 [Footnote 7: 1833. Ye must not weep.]
 
 [Footnote 8: 1833. Ye ... ye.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1833. Ye'll.]
 
 [Footnote 10: 1833. Ye.]
 
 [Footnote 11: 1833. Ye when ye think.]
 
 [Footnote 12: 1833. Ye.]
 
 [Footnote 13: 1833. Call me when it begins to dawn. 1842. Before the day
 is born.]
 
 
 
 
 CONCLUSION
 
 Added in 1842.
 
   I thought to pass away before, and yet alive I am;
   And in the fields all round I hear the bleating of the lamb.
   How sadly, I remember, rose the morning of the year!
   To die before the snowdrop came, and now the violet's here.
 
   O sweet is the new violet, that comes beneath the skies,
   And sweeter is the young lamb's voice to me that cannot rise,
   And sweet is all the land about, and all the flowers that blow,
   And sweeter far is death than life to me that long to go.
 
   It seem'd so hard at first, mother, to leave the blessed sun,
   And now it seems as hard to stay, and yet His will be done!
   But still I think it can't be long before I find release;
   And that good man, the clergyman, has told me words of peace. [1]
 
   O blessings on his kindly voice and on his silver hair!
   And blessings on his whole life long, until he meet me there!
   O blessings on his kindly heart and on his silver head!
   A thousand times I blest him, as he knelt beside my bed.
 
   He taught me all the mercy, for he show'd [2] me all the sin.
   Now, tho' my lamp was lighted late, there's One will let me in:
   Nor would I now be well, mother, again, if that could be,
   For my desire is but to pass to Him that died for me.
 
   I did not hear the dog howl, mother, or the death-watch beat,
   There came a sweeter token when the night and morning meet:
   But sit beside my bed, mother, and put your hand in mine,
   And Effie on the other side, and I will tell the sign.
 
   All in the wild March-morning I heard the angels call;
   It was when the moon was setting, and the dark was over all;
   The trees began to whisper, and the wind began to roll,
   And in the wild March-morning I heard them call my soul.
 
   For lying broad awake I thought of you and Effie dear;
   I saw you sitting in the house, and I no longer here;
   With all my strength I pray'd for both, and so I felt resign'd,
   And up the valley came a swell of music on the wind.
 
   I thought that it was fancy, and I listen'd in my bed,
   And then did something speak to me--I know not what was said;
   For great delight and shuddering took hold of all my mind,
   And up the valley came again the music on the wind.
 
   But you were sleeping; and I said, "It's not for them: it's mine".
   And if it comes [3] three times, I thought, I take it for a sign.
   And once again it came, and close beside the window-bars,
   Then seem'd to go right up to Heaven and die among the stars.
 
   So now I think my time is near. I trust it is. I know
   The blessed music went that way my soul will have to go.
   And for myself, indeed, I care not if I go to-day.
   But, Effie, you must comfort _her_ when I am past away.
 
   And say to Robin [4] a kind word, and tell him not to fret;
   There's many worthier than I, would make him happy yet.
   If I had lived--I cannot tell--I might have been his wife;
   But all these things have ceased to be, with my desire of life.
 
   O look! the sun begins to rise, the heavens are in a glow;
   He shines upon a hundred fields, and all of them I know.
   And there I move no longer now, and there his light may shine--
   Wild flowers in the valley for other hands than mine.
 
   O sweet and strange it seems to me, that ere this day is done
   The voice, that now is speaking, may be beyond the sun--
   For ever and for ever with those just souls and true--
   And what is life, that we should moan? why make we such ado?
 
   For ever and for ever, all in a blessed home--
   And there to wait a little while till you and Effie come--
   To lie within the light of God, as I lie upon your breast--
   And the wicked cease from troubling, and the weary are at rest.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842.
 
   But still it can't be long, mother, before I find release;
   And that good man, the clergyman, he preaches words of peace.
 
 Present reading 1843.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: 1842-1848.
 
   He show'd me all the mercy, for he taught me all the sin.
   Now, though, etc.
 
 1850. For show'd he me all the sin.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: 1889. Come.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1842. Robert. 1843. Robin restored.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE LOTOS-EATERS
 
 First published in 1833, but when republished in 1842 the alterations in
 the way of excision, alteration, and addition were very extensive. The
 text of 1842 is practically the final text. This charming poem is
 founded on 'Odyssey', ix., 82 'seq.'
 
   "On the tenth day we set foot on the land of the lotos-eaters who eat
   a flowery food. So we stepped ashore and drew water... When we had
   tasted meat and drink I sent forth certain of my company to go and
   make search what manner of men they were who here live upon the earth
   by bread... Then straightway they went and mixed with the men of the
   lotos-eaters, and so it was that the lotos-eaters devised not death
   for our fellows but gave them of the lotos to taste. Now whosoever of
   them did eat the honey-sweet fruit of the lotos had no more wish to
   bring tidings nor to come back, but there he chose to abide with the
   lotos-eating men ever feeding on the lotos and forgetful of his
   homeward way. Therefore I led them back to the ships weeping and sore
   against their will ... lest haply any should eat of the lotos and be
   forgetful of returning."
 
   (Lang and Butcher's translation.)
 
 But in the details of his poem Tennyson has laid many other poets under
 contribution, notably Moschus, 'Idyll', v.; Bion, 'Idyll', v.; Spenser,
 'Faerie Queen', II. vi. (description of the 'Idle Lake'), and Thomson's
 'Castle of Indolence'.
 
 
   "Courage!" he said, and pointed toward the land,
   "This mounting wave will roll us shoreward soon."
   In the afternoon they came unto a land,
   In which it seemed always afternoon.
   All round the coast the languid air did swoon,
   Breathing like one that hath a weary dream.
   Full-faced above the valley stood the moon; [1]
   And like a downward smoke, the slender stream
   Along the cliff to fall and pause and fall did seem.
 
   A land of streams! some, like a downward smoke,
   Slow-dropping veils of thinnest lawn, did go;
   And some thro' wavering lights and shadows broke,
   Rolling a slumbrous sheet of foam below.
   They saw the gleaming river seaward flow [2]
   From the inner land: far off, three mountain-tops,
   Three silent pinnacles of aged snow, [3]
   Stood sunset-flush'd: and, dew'd with showery drops,
   Up-clomb the shadowy pine above the woven copse.
 
   The charmed sunset linger'd low adown
   In the red West: thro' mountain clefts the dale
   Was seen far inland, and the yellow down
   Border'd with palm, and many a winding vale
   And meadow, set with slender galingale;
   A land where all things always seem'd the same!
   And round about the keel with faces pale,
   Dark faces pale against that rosy flame,
   The mild-eyed melancholy Lotos-eaters came.
 
   Branches they bore of that enchanted stem,
   Laden with flower and fruit, whereof they gave
   To each, but whoso did receive of them,
   And taste, to him the gushing of the wave
   Far far away did seem to mourn and rave
   On alien shores; and if his fellow spake,
   His voice was thin, as voices from the grave;
   And deep-asleep he seem'd, yet all awake,
   And music in his ears his beating heart did make.
 
   They sat them down upon the yellow sand,
   Between the sun and moon upon the shore;
   And sweet it was to dream of Father-land,
   Of child, and wife, and slave; but evermore
   Most weary seem'd the sea, weary the oar,
   Weary the wandering fields of barren foam.
   Then some one said, "We will return no more";
   And all at once they sang, "Our island home
   Is far beyond the wave; we will no longer roam".
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1883. Above the valley burned the golden moon.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1883. River's seaward flow.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1833. Three thunder-cloven thrones of oldest snow.]
 
 
 
   CHORIC SONG
 
   1
 
     There is sweet music here that softer falls
     Than petals from blown roses on the grass,
     Or night-dews on still waters between walls
     Of shadowy granite, in a gleaming pass;
     Music that gentlier on the spirit lies,
     Than tir'd eyelids upon tir'd eyes;
     Music that brings sweet sleep down from the blissful skies.
     Here are cool mosses deep,
     And thro' the moss the ivies creep,
     And in the stream the long-leaved flowers weep,
     And from the craggy ledge the poppy hangs in sleep.
 
 
   2
 
     Why are we weigh'd upon with heaviness,
     And utterly consumed with sharp distress,
     While all things else have rest from weariness?
     All things have rest: why should we toil alone,
     We only toil, who are the first of things,
     And make perpetual moan,
     Still from one sorrow to another thrown:
     Nor ever fold our wings,
     And cease from wanderings,
     Nor steep our brows in slumber's holy balm;
     Nor harken what the inner spirit sings,
     "There is no joy but calm!"
     Why should we only toil, the roof and crown of things?
 
 
   3
 
     Lo! in the middle of the wood,
     The folded leaf is woo'd from out the bud
     With winds upon the branch, and there
     Grows green and broad, and takes no care,
     Sun-steep'd at noon, and in the moon
     Nightly dew-fed; and turning yellow
     Falls, and floats adown the air.
     Lo! sweeten'd with the summer light,
     The full-juiced apple, waxing over-mellow,
     Drops in a silent autumn night.
     All its allotted length of days,
     The flower ripens in its place,
     Ripens and fades, and falls, and hath no toil,
     Fast-rooted in the fruitful soil.
 
 
   4
 
     Hateful is the dark-blue sky,
     Vaulted o'er the dark-blue sea. [1]
     Death is the end of life; ah, why
     Should life all labour be?
     Let us alone.
     Time driveth onward fast,
     And in a little while our lips are dumb.
     Let us alone.
     What is it that will last?
     All things are taken from us, and become
     Portions and parcels of the dreadful Past.
     Let us alone.
     What pleasure can we have
     To war with evil? Is there any peace
     In ever climbing up the climbing wave? [2]
     All things have rest, and ripen toward the grave [3]
     In silence; ripen, fall and cease:
     Give us long rest or death, dark death, or dreamful ease.
 
 
   5
 
     How sweet it were, hearing the downward stream,
     With half-shut eyes ever to seem
     Falling asleep in a half-dream!
     To dream and dream, like yonder amber light,
     Which will not leave the myrrh-bush on the height;
     To hear each other's whisper'd speech:
     Eating the Lotos day by day,
     To watch the crisping ripples on the beach,
     And tender curving lines of creamy spray;
     To lend our hearts and spirits wholly
     To the influence of mild-minded melancholy;
     To muse and brood and live again in memory,
     With those [4] old faces of our infancy
     Heap'd over with a mound of grass,
     Two handfuls of white dust, shut in an urn of brass!
 
 
   6
 
     Dear is the memory of our wedded lives,
     And dear the last embraces of our wives
     And their warm tears: but all hath suffer'd change;
     For surely now our household hearths are cold:
     Our sons inherit us: our looks are strange:
     And we should come like ghosts to trouble joy.
     Or else the island princes over-bold
     Have eat our substance, and the minstrel sings
     Before them of the ten-years' war in Troy,
     And our great deeds, as half-forgotten things.
     Is there confusion in the little isle? [5]
     Let what is broken so remain.
     The Gods are hard to reconcile:
     'Tis hard to settle order once again.
     There 'is' confusion worse than death,
     Trouble on trouble, pain on pain,
     Long labour unto aged breath,
     Sore task to hearts worn out with [6] many wars
     And eyes grow dim with gazing on the pilot-stars.[7]
 
 
   7
 
     But, propt on beds [8] of amaranth and moly,
     How sweet (while warm airs lull us, blowing lowly)
     With half-dropt eyelids still,
     Beneath a heaven dark and holy,
     To watch the long bright river drawing slowly
     His waters from the purple hill--
     To hear the dewy echoes calling
     From cave to cave thro' the thick-twined vine--
     To watch [9] the emerald-colour'd water falling
     Thro' many a wov'n acanthus-wreath divine!
     Only to hear and see the far-off sparkling brine,
     Only to hear were sweet, stretch'd out beneath the pine.
 
 
   8
 
     The Lotos blooms below the barren peak: [9]
     The Lotos blows by every winding creek:
     All day the wind breathes low with mellower tone:
     Thro' every hollow cave and alley lone
     Round and round the spicy downs the yellow Lotos-dust is blown.
     We have had enough of action, and of motion we,
     Roll'd to starboard, roll'd to larboard, when the surge was seething
       free,
     Where the wallowing monster spouted his foam-fountains in the sea.
     Let us swear an oath, and keep it with an equal mind,
     In the hollow Lotos-land to live and lie reclined
     On the hills like Gods together, careless of mankind.
     For they lie beside their nectar, and the bolts are hurl'd
     Far below them in the valleys, and the clouds are lightly curl'd
     Round their golden houses, girdled with the gleaming world:
     Where they smile in secret, looking over wasted lands,
     Blight and famine, plague and earthquake, roaring deeps and fiery
       sands,
     Clanging fights, and flaming towns, and sinking ships and praying
       hands.
     But they smile, they find a music centred in a doleful song
     Steaming up, a lamentation and an ancient tale of wrong,
     Like a tale of little meaning tho' the words are strong;
     Chanted from an ill-used race of men that cleave the soil,
     Sow the seed, and reap the harvest with enduring toil,
     Storing yearly little dues of wheat, and wine and oil;
     Till they perish and they suffer--some,'tis whisper'd--down in hell
     Suffer endless anguish, others in Elysian valleys dwell,
     Resting weary limbs at last on beds of asphodel.
     Surely, surely, slumber is more sweet than toil, the shore
     Than labour in the deep mid-ocean, wind and wave and oar;
     Oh rest ye, brother mariners, we will not wander more. [10]
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 'Cf.' Virgil, AEn., iv., 451:--
 
   Taedet caeli convexa tueri.
 
 Paraphrased from Moschus, 'Idyll', v., 11-15.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: For climbing up the wave 'cf.' Virgil, 'AEn.',
 i., 381: "Conscendi navilus aequor," and 'cf.' generally Bion,
 'Idyll', v., 11-15.]
 
 [Footnote 3: From Moschus, 'Idyll', v.,'passim'.
 
 [Footnote 4: 1833. The.]
 
 [Footnote 5: The little isle, 'i. e.', Ithaca.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1863 By.]
 
 [Footnote 7: Added in 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 8: 1833. Or, propt on lavish beds.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1833 to 1850 inclusive. Hear.]
 
 [Footnote 10: 1833 to 1850 inclusive. Flowery peak.]
 
 [Footnote 11: In 1833 we have the following, which in 1842 was excised
 and the present text substituted:--
 
   We have had enough of motion,
   Weariness and wild alarm,
   Tossing on the tossing ocean,
   Where the tusked sea-horse walloweth
   In a stripe of grass-green calm,
   At noontide beneath the lee;
   And the monstrous narwhale swalloweth
   His foam-fountains in the sea.
   Long enough the wine-dark wave our weary bark did carry.
   This is lovelier and sweeter,
   Men of Ithaca, this is meeter,
   In the hollow rosy vale to tarry,
   Like a dreamy Lotos-eater, a delirious Lotos-eater!
   We will eat the Lotos, sweet
   As the yellow honeycomb,
   In the valley some, and some
   On the ancient heights divine;
   And no more roam,
   On the loud hoar foam,
   To the melancholy home
   At the limit of the brine,
   The little isle of Ithaca, beneath the day's decline.
   We'll lift no more the shattered oar,
   No more unfurl the straining sail;
   With the blissful Lotos-eaters pale
   We will abide in the golden vale
   Of the Lotos-land till the Lotos fail;
   We will not wander more.
   Hark! how sweet the horned ewes bleat
   On the solitary steeps,
   And the merry lizard leaps,
   And the foam-white waters pour;
   And the dark pine weeps,
   And the lithe vine creeps,
   And the heavy melon sleeps
   On the level of the shore:
   Oh! islanders of Ithaca, we will not wander more,
   Surely, surely slumber is more sweet than toil, the shore
   Than labour in the ocean, and rowing with the oar,
   Oh! islanders of Ithaca, we will return no more.
 
 The fine picture in the text of the gods of Epicurus was no doubt
 immediately suggested by 'Lucretius', iii., 15 'seq.', while the
 'Icaromenippus' of Lucian furnishes an excellent commentary on
 Tennyson's picture of those gods and what they see. 'Cf.' too the Song
 of the Parcae in Goethe's 'Iphigenie auf Tauris', iv., 5.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 A DREAM OF FAIR WOMEN
 
 First published in 1833 but very extensively altered on its
 republication in 1842. It had been written by June, 1832, and appears to
 have been originally entitled 'Legend of Fair Women' (see Spedding's
 letter dated 21st June, 1832, 'Life', i., 116). In nearly every edition
 between 1833 and 1853 it was revised, and perhaps no poem proves more
 strikingly the scrupulous care which Tennyson took to improve what he
 thought susceptible of improvement. The work which inspired it,
 Chaucer's 'Legend of Good Women', was written about 1384, thus
 "preluding" by nearly two hundred years the "spacious times of great
 Elizabeth". There is no resemblance between the poems beyond the fact
 that both are visions and both have as their heroines illustrious women
 who have been unfortunate. Cleopatra is the only one common to the two
 poems. Tennyson's is an exquisite work of art--the transition from the
 anarchy of dreams to the dreamland landscape and to the sharply denned
 figures--the skill with which the heroines (what could be more perfect
 that Cleopatra and Jephtha's daughter?) are chosen and contrasted--the
 wonderful way in which the Iphigenia of Euripides and Lucretius and the
 Cleopatra of Shakespeare are realised are alike admirable. The poem
 opened in 1833 with the following strangely irrelevant verses, excised
 in 1842, which as Fitzgerald observed "make a perfect poem by themselves
 without affecting the 'dream '":--
 
     As when a man, that sails in a balloon,
     Downlooking sees the solid shining ground
     Stream from beneath him in the broad blue noon,
     Tilth, hamlet, mead and mound:
 
     And takes his flags and waves them to the mob,
     That shout below, all faces turned to where
     Glows ruby-like the far up crimson globe,
     Filled with a finer air:
 
     So lifted high, the Poet at his will
     Lets the great world flit from him, seeing all,
     Higher thro' secret splendours mounting still,
     Self-poised, nor fears to fall.
 
 
 
   Hearing apart the echoes of his fame.
   While I spoke thus, the seedsman, memory,
   Sowed my deepfurrowed thought with many a name,
   Whose glory will not die.
 
   I read, before my eyelids dropt their shade,
   "The Legend of Good Women," long ago
   Sung by the morning star [1] of song, who made
   His music heard below;
 
   Dan Chaucer, the first warbler, whose sweet breath
   Preluded those melodious bursts, that fill
   The spacious times of great Elizabeth
   With sounds that echo still.
 
   And, for a while, the knowledge of his art
   Held me above the subject, as strong gales
   Hold swollen clouds from raining, tho' my heart,
   Brimful of those wild tales,
 
   Charged both mine eyes with tears.
   In every land I saw, wherever light illumineth,
   Beauty and anguish walking hand in hand
   The downward slope to death. [2]
 
   Those far-renowned brides of ancient song
   Peopled the hollow dark, like burning stars,
   And I heard sounds of insult, shame, and wrong,
   And trumpets blown for wars;
 
   And clattering flints batter'd with clanging hoofs:
   And I saw crowds in column'd sanctuaries;
   And forms that pass'd [3] at windows and on roofs
   Of marble palaces;
 
   Corpses across the threshold; heroes tall
   Dislodging pinnacle and parapet
   Upon the tortoise creeping to the wall; [4]
   Lances in ambush set;
 
   And high shrine-doors burst thro' with heated blasts
   That run before the fluttering tongues of fire;
   White surf wind-scatter'd over sails and masts,
   And ever climbing higher;
 
   Squadrons and squares of men in brazen plates,
   Scaffolds, still sheets of water, divers woes,
   Ranges of glimmering vaults with iron grates,
   And hush'd seraglios.
 
   So shape chased shape as swift as, when to land
   Bluster the winds and tides the self-same way,
   Crisp foam-flakes scud along the level sand,
   Torn from the fringe of spray.
 
   I started once, or seem'd to start in pain,
   Resolved on noble things, and strove to speak,
   As when a great thought strikes along the brain,
   And flushes all the cheek.
 
   And once my arm was lifted to hew down,
   A cavalier from off his saddle-bow,
   That bore a lady from a leaguer'd town;
   And then, I know not how,
 
   All those sharp fancies, by down-lapsing thought
   Stream'd onward, lost their edges, and did creep
   Roll'd on each other, rounded, smooth'd and brought
   Into the gulfs of sleep.
 
   At last methought that I had wander'd far
   In an old wood: fresh-wash'd in coolest dew,
   The maiden splendours of the morning star
   Shook in the steadfast [5] blue.
 
   Enormous elmtree-boles did stoop and lean
   Upon the dusky brushwood underneath
   Their broad curved branches, fledged with clearest green,
   New from its silken sheath.
 
   The dim red morn had died, her journey done,
   And with dead lips smiled at the twilight plain,
   Half-fall'n across the threshold of the sun,
   Never to rise again.
 
   There was no motion in the dumb dead air,
   Not any song of bird or sound of rill;
   Gross darkness of the inner sepulchre
   Is not so deadly still
 
   As that wide forest.
   Growths of jasmine turn'd
   Their humid arms festooning tree to tree, [6]
   And at the root thro' lush green grasses burn'd
   The red anemone.
 
   I knew the flowers, I knew the leaves, I knew
   The tearful glimmer of the languid dawn
   On those long, rank, dark wood-walks, drench'd in dew,
   Leading from lawn to lawn.
 
   The smell of violets, hidden in the green,
   Pour'd back into my empty soul and frame
   The times when I remember to have been
   Joyful and free from blame.
 
   And from within me a clear under-tone
   Thrill'd thro' mine ears in that unblissful clime
   "Pass freely thro': the wood is all thine own,
   Until the end of time".
 
   At length I saw a lady [7] within call,
   Stiller than chisell'd marble, standing there;
   A daughter of the gods, divinely tall, [8]
   And most divinely fair.
 
   Her loveliness with shame and with surprise
   Froze my swift speech: she turning on my face
   The star-like sorrows of immortal eyes,
   Spoke slowly in her place.
 
   "I had great beauty: ask thou not my name:
   No one can be more wise than destiny.
   Many drew swords and died.
   Where'er I came I brought calamity."
 
   "No marvel, sovereign lady [9]: in fair field
   Myself for such a face had boldly died," [10]
   I answer'd free; and turning I appeal'd
   To one [11] that stood beside.
 
   But she, with sick and scornful looks averse,
   To her full height her stately stature draws;
   "My youth," she said, "was blasted with a curse:
   This woman was the cause.
 
   "I was cut off from hope in that sad place, [12]
   Which yet to name my spirit loathes and fears: [13]
   My father held his hand upon his face;
   I, blinded with my tears,
 
   "Still strove to speak: my voice was thick with sighs
   As in a dream. Dimly I could descry
   The stern black-bearded kings with wolfish eyes,
   Waiting to see me die.
 
   "The high masts flicker'd as they lay afloat;
   The crowds, the temples, waver'd, and the shore;
   The bright death quiver'd at the victim's throat;
   Touch'd; and I knew no more." [14]
 
   Whereto the other with a downward brow:
   "I would the white cold heavy-plunging foam, [15]
   Whirl'd by the wind, had roll'd me deep below,
   Then when I left my home."
 
   Her slow full words sank thro' the silence drear,
   As thunder-drops fall on a sleeping sea:
   Sudden I heard a voice that cried, "Come here,
   That I may look on thee".
 
   I turning saw, throned on a flowery rise,
   One sitting on a crimson scarf unroll'd;
   A queen, with swarthy cheeks [16] and bold black eyes,
   Brow-bound with burning gold.
 
   She, flashing forth a haughty smile, began:
   "I govern'd men by change, and so I sway'd
   All moods. Tis long since I have seen a man.
   Once, like the moon, I made
 
   "The ever-shifting currents of the blood
   According to my humour ebb and flow.
   I have no men to govern in this wood:
   That makes my only woe.
 
   "Nay--yet it chafes me that I could not bend
   One will; nor tame and tutor with mine eye
   That dull cold-blooded Caesar. Prythee, friend,
   Where is Mark Antony? [17]
 
   "The man, my lover, with whom I rode sublime
   On Fortune's neck: we sat as God by God:
   The Nilus would have risen before his time
   And flooded at our nod. [18]
 
   "We drank the Libyan [19] Sun to sleep, and lit
   Lamps which outburn'd Canopus. O my life In Egypt!
   O the dalliance and the wit,
   The flattery and the strife, [20]
 
   "And the wild kiss, when fresh from war's alarms, [21]
   My Hercules, my Roman Antony,
   My mailed Bacchus leapt into my arms,
   Contented there to die!
 
   "And there he died: and when I heard my name
   Sigh'd forth with life, I would not brook my fear [22]
   Of the other: with a worm I balk'd his fame.
   What else was left? look here!"
 
   (With that she tore her robe apart, and half
   The polish'd argent of her breast to sight
   Laid bare. Thereto she pointed with a laugh,
   Showing the aspick's bite.)
 
   "I died a Queen. The Roman soldier found [23]
   Me lying dead, my crown about my brows,
   A name for ever!--lying robed and crown'd,
   Worthy a Roman spouse."
 
   Her warbling voice, a lyre of widest range
   Struck [24] by all passion, did fall down and glance
   From tone to tone, and glided thro' all change
   Of liveliest utterance.
 
   When she made pause I knew not for delight;
   Because with sudden motion from the ground
   She raised her piercing orbs, and fill'd with light
   The interval of sound.
 
   Still with their fires Love tipt his keenest darts;
   As once they drew into two burning rings
   All beams of Love, melting the mighty hearts
   Of captains and of kings.
 
   Slowly my sense undazzled. Then I heard
   A noise of some one coming thro' the lawn,
   And singing clearer than the crested bird,
   That claps his wings at dawn.
 
   "The torrent brooks of hallow'd Israel
   From craggy hollows pouring, late and soon,
   Sound all night long, in falling thro' the dell,
   Far-heard beneath the moon.
 
   "The balmy moon of blessed Israel
   Floods all the deep-blue gloom with beams divine:
   All night the splinter'd crags that wall the dell
   With spires of silver shine."
 
   As one that museth where broad sunshine laves
   The lawn by some cathedral, thro' the door
   Hearing the holy organ rolling waves
   Of sound on roof and floor,
 
   Within, and anthem sung, is charm'd and tied
   To where he stands,--so stood I, when that flow
   Of music left the lips of her that died
   To save her father's vow;
 
   The daughter of the warrior Gileadite, [25]
   A maiden pure; as when she went along
   From Mizpeh's tower'd gate with welcome light,
   With timbrel and with song.
 
   My words leapt forth: "Heaven heads the count of crimes
   With that wild oath". She render'd answer high:
   "Not so, nor once alone; a thousand times
   I would be born and die.
 
   "Single I grew, like some green plant, whose root
   Creeps to the garden water-pipes beneath,
   Feeding the flower; but ere my flower to fruit
   Changed, I was ripe for death.
 
   "My God, my land, my father--these did move
   Me from my bliss of life, that Nature gave,
   Lower'd softly with a threefold cord of love
   Down to a silent grave.
 
   "And I went mourning, 'No fair Hebrew boy
   Shall smile away my maiden blame among
   The Hebrew mothers'--emptied of all joy,
   Leaving the dance and song,
 
   "Leaving the olive-gardens far below,
   Leaving the promise of my bridal bower,
   The valleys of grape-loaded vines that glow
   Beneath the battled tower
 
   "The light white cloud swam over us. Anon
   We heard the lion roaring from his den; [26]
   We saw the large white stars rise one by one,
   Or, from the darken'd glen,
 
   "Saw God divide the night with flying flame,
   And thunder on the everlasting hills.
   I heard Him, for He spake, and grief became
   A solemn scorn of ills.
 
   "When the next moon was roll'd into the sky,
   Strength came to me that equall'd my desire.
   How beautiful a thing it was to die
   For God and for my sire!
 
   "It comforts me in this one thought to dwell,
   That I subdued me to my father's will;
   Because the kiss he gave me, ere I fell,
   Sweetens the spirit still.
 
   "Moreover it is written that my race
   Hew'd Ammon, hip and thigh, from Aroer [27]
   On Arnon unto Minneth." Here her face
   Glow'd, as I look'd at her.
 
   She lock'd her lips: she left me where I stood:
   "Glory to God," she sang, and past afar,
   Thridding the sombre boskage of the wood,
   Toward the morning-star.
 
   Losing her carol I stood pensively,
   As one that from a casement leans his head,
   When midnight bells cease ringing suddenly,
   And the old year is dead.
 
   "Alas! alas!" a low voice, full of care,
   Murmur'd beside me: "Turn and look on me:
   I am that Rosamond, whom men call fair,
   If what I was I be.
 
   "Would I had been some maiden coarse and poor!
   O me, that I should ever see the light!
   Those dragon eyes of anger'd Eleanor
   Do haunt me, day and night."
 
   She ceased in tears, fallen from hope and trust:
   To whom the Egyptian: "O, you tamely died!
   You should have clung to Fulvia's waist, and thrust
   The dagger thro' her side".
 
   With that sharp sound the white dawn's creeping beams,
   Stol'n to my brain, dissolved the mystery
   Of folded sleep. The captain of my dreams
   Ruled in the eastern sky.
 
   Morn broaden'd on the borders of the dark,
   Ere I saw her, who clasp'd in her last trance
   Her murder'd father's head, or Joan of Arc, [28]
   A light of ancient France;
 
   Or her, who knew that Love can vanquish Death,
   Who kneeling, with one arm about her king,
   Drew forth the poison with her balmy breath, [29]
   Sweet as new buds in Spring.
 
   No memory labours longer from the deep
   Gold-mines of thought to lift the hidden ore
   That glimpses, moving up, than I from sleep
   To gather and tell o'er
 
   Each little sound and sight. With what dull pain
   Compass'd, how eagerly I sought to strike
   Into that wondrous track of dreams again!
   But no two dreams are like.
 
   As when a soul laments, which hath been blest,
   Desiring what is mingled with past years,
   In yearnings that can never be exprest
   By sighs or groans or tears;
 
   Because all words, tho' cull'd [30] with choicest art,
   Failing to give the bitter of the sweet,
   Wither beneath the palate, and the heart
   Faints, faded by its heat.
 
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Suggested apparently by Denham, 'Verses on Cowley's
 Death':--
 
   Old Chaucer, like the morning star
   To us discovers
   Day from far.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: Here follow in 1833 two stanzas excised in 1842:--
 
   In every land I thought that, more or less,
   The stronger sterner nature overbore
   The softer, uncontrolled by gentleness
   And selfish evermore:
 
   And whether there were any means whereby,
   In some far aftertime, the gentler mind
   Might reassume its just and full degree
   Of rule among mankind.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: 1833. Screamed.]
 
 [Footnote 4: The Latin 'testudo' formed of the shields of soldiers
 held over their heads.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1883 to 1848 inclusive. Stedfast.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1833.
 
   Clasping jasmine turned
   Its twined arms festooning tree to tree.
 
 Altered to present reading, 1842.]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: A lady, i.e., Helen.]
 
 [Footnote 8: Tennyson has here noticed what is so often emphasised by
 Greek writers, that tallness was a great beauty in women. See Aristotle,
 'Ethics', iv., 3, and Homer, 'passim, Odyssey', viii., 416;
 xviii., 190 and 248; xxi., 6. So Xenophon in describing Panthea
 emphasises her tallness, 'Cyroped.', v.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1883. Sovran lady.]
 
 [Footnote 10: As the old men say, 'Iliad', iii., 156-8.]
 
 [Footnote 11: The one is Iphigenia.]
 
 [Footnote 12: Aulis.]
 
 [Footnote 13: It was not till 1884 that this line was altered to the
 reading of the final edition, 'i.e.', "Which men called Aulis in
 those iron years". For the "iron years" of that reading 'cf.'
 Thomson, 'Spring', 384, "'iron' times".]
 
 [Footnote 14: From 1833 till 1853 this stanza ran:--
 
   "The tall masts quivered as they lay afloat,
   The temples and the people and the shore,
   One drew a sharp knife thro' my tender throat
   Slowly,--and nothing more".
 
 It is curious that Tennyson should have allowed the last line to stand
 so long; possibly it may have been to defy Lockhart's sarcastic
 commentary: "What touching simplicity, what pathetic resignation--he cut
 my throat, nothing more!" With Tennyson's picture should be compared
 AEschylus, 'Agamem.', 225-49, and Lucretius, i., 85-100. For the bold and
 picturesque substitution of the effect for the cause in the "bright
 death quiver'd" 'cf.' Sophocles, 'Electra', 1395,
 
   [Greek: 'neakonaeton aima cheiroin ech_on,']
 
 "with the newly-whetted blood on his hands". So "vulnus" is frequently
 used by Virgil, and 'cf.' Silius Italicus, 'Punica', ix.,
 368-9:--
 
   Per pectora 'saevas'
   Exceptat 'mortes'.]
 
 
 
 [Footnote 15: She expresses the same wish in 'Iliad', iii., 73-4.]
 
 [Footnote 16: Cleopatra. The skill with which Tennyson has here given us,
 in quintessence as it were, Shakespeare's superb creation needs no
 commentary, but it is somewhat surprising to find an accurate scholar
 like Tennyson guilty of the absurdity of representing Cleopatra as of
 gipsy complexion. The daughter of Ptolemy Aulates and a lady of Pontus,
 she was of Greek descent, and had no taint at all of African
 intermixtures. See Peacock's remarks in 'Gryll Grange', p. 206, 7th
 edit., 1861.]
 
 [Footnote 17: After this in 1833 and in 1842 are the following stanzas,
 afterwards excised:--
 
   "By him great Pompey dwarfs and suffers pain,
   A mortal man before immortal Mars;
   The glories of great Julius lapse and wane,
   And shrink from suns to stars.
 
   "That man of all the men I ever knew
   Most touched my fancy.
   O! what days and nights
   We had in Egypt, ever reaping new
   Harvest of ripe delights.
 
   "Realm-draining revels! Life was one long feast,
   What wit! what words! what sweet words, only made
   Less sweet by the kiss that broke 'em, liking best
   To be so richly stayed!
 
   "What dainty strifes, when fresh from war's alarms,
   My Hercules, my gallant Antony,
   My mailed captain leapt into my arms,
   Contented there to die!
 
   "And in those arms he died: I heard my name
   Sighed forth with life: then I shook off all fear:
   Oh, what a little snake stole Caesar's fame!
   What else was left? look here!"
 
   "With that she tore her robe apart," etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote l8: This stanza was added in 1843.]
 
 [Footnote 19: 1845-1848. Lybian.]
 
 [Footnote 20: Added in 1845 as a substitute for
 
 "What nights we had in Egypt! I could hit
 His humours while I crossed them:
 O the life I led him, and the dalliance and the wit,
 The flattery and the strife,
 
 which is the reading of 1843. Canopus is a star in Argo, not visible in
 the West, but a conspicuous feature in the sky when seen from Egypt, as
 Pliny notices, 'Hist. Nat.', vi., xxiv. "Fatentes Canopum noctibus
 sidus ingens et clarum". 'Cf.' Manilius, 'Astron.', i.,
 216-17, "Nusquam invenies fulgere Canopum donec Niliacas per pontum
 veneris oras," and Lucan, 'Pharsal.', viii., 181-3.]
 
 [Footnote 21: Substituted in 1843 for the reading of 1833 and 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 22: Substituted in 1845 for
 the reading of 1833, 1842, 1843, which ran as recorded 'supra'.
 1845 to 1848. Lybian. And for the reading of 1843
 
   Sigh'd forth with life I had no further fear,
   O what a little worm stole Caesar's fame!]
 
 [Footnote 23: A splendid transfusion of Horace's lines about her, Ode I.,
 xxxvii.
 
   Invidens Privata deduci superto
   Non humilis mulier triumpho.]
 
 
 [Footnote 24: 1833 and 1842. Touched.]
 
 [Footnote 25: For the story of Jephtha's daughter see Judges, chap. xi.]
 
 [Footnote 26: All editions up to and including 1851. In his den.]
 
 [Footnote 27: For reference see Judges xi, 33.]
 
 [Footnote 28: 1833.
 
 Ere I saw her, that in her latest trance
 Clasped her dead father's heart, or Joan of Arc.
 
 The reference is, of course, to the well-known story of Margaret Roper,
 the daughter of Sir Thomas More, who is said to have taken his head when
 he was executed and preserved it till her death.]
 
 [Footnote 29: Eleanor, the wife of Edward I., is said to have thus saved
 his life when he was stabbed at Acre with a poisoned dagger.]
 
 [Footnote 30: The earliest and latest editions, 'i.e.', 1833 and
 1853, have "tho'," and all the editions between "though". "Though
 culled," etc.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 MARGARET
 
 First printed in 1833.
 
 Another of Tennyson's delicious fancy portraits, the twin sister to
 Adeline.
 
 
   1
 
   O sweet pale Margaret,
   O rare pale Margaret,
   What lit your eyes with tearful power,
   Like moonlight on a falling shower?
   Who lent you, love, your mortal dower
   Of pensive thought and aspect pale,
   Your melancholy sweet and frail
   As perfume of the cuckoo-flower?
   From the westward-winding flood,
   From the evening-lighted wood,
   From all things outward you have won
   A tearful grace, as tho' [1] you stood
   Between the rainbow and the sun.
   The very smile before you speak,
   That dimples your transparent cheek,
   Encircles all the heart, and feedeth
   The senses with a still delight
   Of dainty sorrow without sound,
   Like the tender amber round,
   Which the moon about her spreadeth,
   Moving thro' a fleecy night.
 
 
   2
 
   You love, remaining peacefully,
   To hear the murmur of the strife,
   But enter not the toil of life.
   Your spirit is the calmed sea,
   Laid by the tumult of the fight.
   You are the evening star, alway
   Remaining betwixt dark and bright:
   Lull'd echoes of laborious day
   Come to you, gleams of mellow light
   Float by you on the verge of night.
 
 
   3
 
   What can it matter, Margaret,
   What songs below the waning stars
   The lion-heart, Plantagenet, [2]
   Sang looking thro' his prison bars?
   Exquisite Margaret, who can tell
   The last wild thought of Chatelet, [3]
   Just ere the falling axe did part
   The burning brain from the true heart,
   Even in her sight he loved so well?
 
 
   4
 
   A fairy shield your Genius made
   And gave you on your natal day.
   Your sorrow, only sorrow's shade,
   Keeps real sorrow far away.
   You move not in such solitudes,
   You are not less divine,
   But more human in your moods,
   Than your twin-sister, Adeline.
   Your hair is darker, and your eyes
   Touch'd with a somewhat darker hue,
   And less aerially blue,
   But ever trembling thro' the dew [4]
   Of dainty-woeful sympathies.
 
 
   5
 
   O sweet pale Margaret,
   O rare pale Margaret,
   Come down, come down, and hear me speak:
   Tie up the ringlets on your cheek:
   The sun is just about to set.
   The arching lines are tall and shady,
   And faint, rainy lights are seen,
   Moving in the leavy beech.
   Rise from the feast of sorrow, lady,
   Where all day long you sit between
   Joy and woe, and whisper each.
   Or only look across the lawn,
   Look out below your bower-eaves,
   Look down, and let your blue eyes dawn
   Upon me thro' the jasmine-leaves. [5]
 
 
 [Footnote 1: All editions except 1833 and 1853. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1833. Lion-souled Plantagenet. For songs supposed to have
 been composed by Richard I. during the time of his captivity see
 Sismondi, 'Litterature du Midi de l'Europe', vol. i., p. 149, and
 'La Tour Tenebreuse' (1705), which contains a poem said to have
 been written by Richard and Blondel in mixed Romance and Provencal, and
 a love-song in Norman French, which have frequently been reprinted. See,
 too, Barney's 'Hist. of Music', vol. ii., p. 238, and Walpole's
 'Royal and Noble Authors', sub.-tit. "Richard I.," and the fourth
 volume of Reynouard's 'Choix des Poesies des Troubadours'. All
 these poems are probably spurious.]
 
 [Footnote 3: Chatelet was a poet-squire in the suite of the Marshal
 Damville, who was executed for a supposed intrigue with Mary Queen of
 Scots. See Tytler, 'History of Scotland', vi., p. 319, and Mr.
 Swinburne's tragedy.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1833.
 
 And more aerially blue,
 And ever trembling thro' the dew.]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: 1833. Jasmin-leaves.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE BLACKBIRD.
 
 Not in 1833.
 
 This is another poem placed among the poems of 1833, but not printed
 till 1842.
 
 O blackbird! sing me something well:
 While all the neighbours shoot thee round,
 I keep smooth plats of fruitful ground,
 Where thou may'st warble, eat and dwell.
 
   The espaliers and the standards all
   Are thine; the range of lawn and park:
   The unnetted black-hearts ripen dark,
   All thine, against the garden wall.
 
   Yet, tho' I spared thee all the spring, [1]
   Thy sole delight is, sitting still,
   With that gold dagger of thy bill
   To fret the summer jenneting. [2]
 
   A golden bill! the silver tongue,
   Cold February loved, is dry:
   Plenty corrupts the melody
   That made thee famous once, when young:
 
   And in the sultry garden-squares, [3]
   Now thy flute-notes are changed to coarse,
   I hear thee not at all, [4] or hoarse
   As when a hawker hawks his wares.
 
   Take warning! he that will not sing
   While yon sun prospers in the blue,
   Shall sing for want, ere leaves are new,
   Caught in the frozen palms of Spring.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842. Yet, though I spared thee kith and kin. And so till
 1853, when it was altered to the present reading.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1842 to 1851. Jennetin, altered in 1853 to present
 reading.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842. I better brook the drawling stares. Altered, 1843.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1842. Not hearing thee at all. Altered, 1843.]
 
 
 
 
 THE DEATH OF THE OLD YEAR
 
 First printed in 1833.
 
 Only one alteration has been made in this poem, in line 41, where in
 1842 "one' was altered to" twelve ".
 
   Full knee-deep lies the winter snow,
   And the winter winds are wearily sighing:
   Toll ye the church-bell sad and slow,
   And tread softly and speak low,
   For the old year lies a-dying.
   Old year, you must not die;
   You came to us so readily,
   You lived with us so steadily,
   Old year, you shall not die.
 
   He lieth still: he doth not move:
   He will not see the dawn of day.
   He hath no other life above.
   He gave me a friend, and a true, true-love,
   And the New-year will take 'em away.
   Old year, you must not go;
   So long as you have been with us,
   Such joy as you have seen with us,
   Old year, you shall not go.
 
   He froth'd his bumpers to the brim;
   A jollier year we shall not see.
   But tho' his eyes are waxing dim,
   And tho' his foes speak ill of him,
   He was a friend to me.
   Old year, you shall not die;
   We did so laugh and cry with you,
   I've half a mind to die with you,
   Old year, if you must die.
 
   He was full of joke and jest,
   But all his merry quips are o'er.
   To see him die, across the waste
   His son and heir doth ride post-haste,
   But he'll be dead before.
   Every one for his own.
   The night is starry and cold, my friend,
   And the New-year blithe and bold, my friend,
   Comes up to take his own.
 
   How hard he breathes! over the snow
   I heard just now the crowing cock.
   The shadows flicker to and fro:
   The cricket chirps: the light burns low:
   'Tis nearly twelve [1] o'clock.
   Shake hands, before you die.
   Old year, we'll dearly rue for you:
   What is it we can do for you?
   Speak out before you die.
 
   His face is growing sharp and thin.
   Alack! our friend is gone.
   Close up his eyes: tie up his chin:
   Step from the corpse, and let him in
   That standeth there alone,
   And waiteth at the door.
   There's a new foot on the floor, my friend,
   And a new face at the door, my friend,
   A new face at the door.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1833. One.]
 
 
 
 
 
 TO J. S.
 
 First published in 1833.
 
 This beautiful poem was addressed to James Spedding on the death of his
 brother Edward.
 
   The wind, that beats the mountain, blows
   More softly round the open wold, [1]
   And gently comes the world to those
   That are cast in gentle mould.
 
   And me this knowledge bolder made,
   Or else I had not dared to flow [2]
   In these words toward you, and invade
   Even with a verse your holy woe.
 
   'Tis strange that those we lean on most,
   Those in whose laps our limbs are nursed,
   Fall into shadow, soonest lost:
   Those we love first are taken first.
 
   God gives us love. Something to love
   He lends us; but, when love is grown
   To ripeness, that on which it throve
   Falls off, and love is left alone.
 
   This is the curse of time. Alas!
   In grief I am not all unlearn'd;
   Once thro' mine own doors Death did pass; [3]
   One went, who never hath return'd.
 
   He will not smile--nor speak to me
   Once more. Two years his chair is seen
   Empty before us. That was he
   Without whose life I had not been.
 
   Your loss is rarer; for this star
   Rose with you thro' a little arc
   Of heaven, nor having wander'd far
   Shot on the sudden into dark.
 
   I knew your brother: his mute dust
   I honour and his living worth:
   A man more pure and bold [4] and just
   Was never born into the earth.
 
   I have not look'd upon you nigh,
   Since that dear soul hath fall'n asleep.
   Great Nature is more wise than I:
   I will not tell you not to weep.
 
   And tho' mine own eyes fill with dew,
   Drawn from the spirit thro' the brain, [5]
   I will not even preach to you,
   "Weep, weeping dulls the inward pain".
 
   Let Grief be her own mistress still.
   She loveth her own anguish deep
   More than much pleasure. Let her will
   Be done--to weep or not to weep.
 
   I will not say "God's ordinance
   Of Death is blown in every wind";
   For that is not a common chance
   That takes away a noble mind.
 
   His memory long will live alone
   In all our hearts, as mournful light
   That broods above the fallen sun, [6]
   And dwells in heaven half the night.
 
   Vain solace! Memory standing near
   Cast down her eyes, and in her throat
   Her voice seem'd distant, and a tear
   Dropt on the letters [7] as I wrote.
 
   I wrote I know not what. In truth,
   How _should_ I soothe you anyway,
   Who miss the brother of your youth?
   Yet something I did wish to say:
 
   For he too was a friend to me:
   Both are my friends, and my true breast
   Bleedeth for both; yet it may be
   That only [8] silence suiteth best.
 
   Words weaker than your grief would make
   Grief more. 'Twere better I should cease;
   Although myself could almost take [9]
   The place of him that sleeps in peace.
 
   Sleep sweetly, tender heart, in peace:
   Sleep, holy spirit, blessed soul,
   While the stars burn, the moons increase,
   And the great ages onward roll.
 
   Sleep till the end, true soul and sweet.
   Nothing comes to thee new or strange.
   Sleep full of rest from head to feet;
   Lie still, dry dust, secure of change.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Possibly suggested by Tasso, 'Gerus.', lib. xx., st.
 lviii.:--
 
   Qual vento a cui s'oppone o selva o colle
   Doppia nella contesa i soffi e l' ira;
   Ma con fiato piu placido e piu molle
   Per le compagne libere poi spira.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: 1833.
 
   My heart this knowledge bolder made,
   Or else it had not dared to flow.
 
 Altered in 1842.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: Tennyson's father died in March, 1831.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1833. Mild.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 'Cf.' Gray's Alcaic stanza on West's death:--
 
   O lacrymarum fons tenero sacros
   'Ducentium ortus ex animo'.]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: 1833. Sunken sun. Altered to present reading, 1842. The
 image may have been suggested by Henry Vaughan, 'Beyond the Veil':--
 
   Their very memory is fair and bright,
   ...
   It glows and glitters in my cloudy breast Like stars
   ...
   Or those faint beams in which the hill is drest
   After the sun's remove.]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: 1833, 1842, 1843. My tablets. This affected phrase was
 altered to the present reading in 1845.]
 
 [Footnote 8: 1833. Holy. Altered to "only," 1842.]
 
 [Footnote 9: 1833. Altho' to calm you I would take. Altered to present
 reading, 1842.]
 
 
 
 
 
 "YOU ASK ME WHY, THO' ILL AT EASE..."
 
 This is another poem which, though included among those belonging to
 1833, was not published till 1842. It is an interesting illustration,
 like the next poem but one, of Tennyson's political opinions; he was, he
 said, "of the same politics as Shakespeare, Bacon and every sane man".
 He was either ignorant of the politics of Shakespeare and Bacon or did
 himself great injustice by the remark. It would have been more true to
 say--for all his works illustrate it--that he was of the same politics
 as Burke. He is here, and in all his poems, a Liberal-Conservative in
 the proper sense of the term. At the time this trio of poems was written
 England was passing through the throes which preceded, accompanied and
 followed the Reform Bill, and the lessons which Tennyson preaches in
 them were particularly appropriate. He belonged to the Liberal Party
 rather in relation to social and religious than to political questions.
 Thus he ardently supported the Anti-slavery Convention and advocated the
 measure for abolishing subscription to the Thirty-nine Articles, but he
 was, as a politician, on the side of Canning, Peel and the Duke of
 Wellington, regarding as they did the new-born democracy with mingled
 feelings of apprehension and perplexity. His exact attitude is indicated
 by some verses written about this time published by his son ('Life', i.,
 69-70). If Mr. Aubrey de Vere is correct this and the following poem
 were occasioned by some popular demonstrations connected with the Reform
 Bill and its rejection by the House of Lords. See 'Life of Tennyson',
 vol. i., appendix.
 
   You ask me, why, tho' [1] ill at ease,
   Within this region I subsist,
   Whose spirits falter in the mist, [2]
   And languish for the purple seas?
 
   It is the land that freemen till,
   That sober-suited Freedom chose,
   The land, where girt with friends or foes
   A man may speak the thing he will;
 
   A land of settled government,
   A land of just and old renown,
   Where Freedom broadens slowly down
   From precedent to precedent:
 
   Where faction seldom gathers head,
   But by degrees to fulness wrought,
   The strength of some diffusive thought
   Hath time and space to work and spread.
 
   Should banded unions persecute
   Opinion, and induce a time
   When single thought is civil crime,
   And individual freedom mute;
 
   Tho' Power should make from land to land [3]
   The name of Britain trebly great--
   Tho' every channel [4] of the State
   Should almost choke with golden sand--
 
   Yet waft me from the harbour-mouth,
   Wild wind! I seek a warmer sky,
   And I will see before I die
   The palms and temples of the South.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 and 1851. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1842 to 1843. Whose spirits fail within the mist. Altered
 to present reading in 1845.]
 
 [Footnote 3: All editions up to and including 1851. Though Power, etc.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1842-1850. Though every channel.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 "OF OLD SAT FREEDOM ON THE HEIGHTS..."
 
 
 First published in 1842, but it seems to have been written in 1834. The
 fourth and fifth stanzas are given in a postscript of a letter from
 Tennyson to James Spedding, dated 1834.
 
   Of old sat Freedom on the heights,
   The thunders breaking at her feet:
   Above her shook the starry lights:
   She heard the torrents meet.
 
   There in her place [1] she did rejoice,
   Self-gather'd in her prophet-mind,
   But fragments of her mighty voice
   Came rolling on the wind.
 
   Then stept she down thro' town and field
   To mingle with the human race,
   And part by part to men reveal'd
   The fullness of her face--
 
   Grave mother of majestic works,
   From her isle-altar gazing down,
   Who, God-like, grasps the triple forks, [2]
   And, King-like, wears the crown:
 
   Her open eyes desire the truth.
   The wisdom of a thousand years
   Is in them. May perpetual youth
   Keep dry their light from tears;
 
   That her fair form may stand and shine,
   Make bright our days and light our dreams,
   Turning to scorn with lips divine
   The falsehood of extremes!
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 to 1850 inclusive. Within her place. Altered to
 present reading, 1850.]
 
 [Footnote 2: The "trisulci ignes" or "trisulca tela" of the Roman
 poets.]
 
 
 
 
 "LOVE THOU THY LAND, WITH LOVE FAR-BROUGHT..."
 
 First published in 1842.
 
 This poem had been written by 1834, for Tennyson sends it in a letter
 dated that year to James Spedding (see 'Life',, i., 173).
 
   Love thou thy land, with love far-brought
   From out the storied Past, and used
   Within the Present, but transfused
   Thro' future time by power of thought.
 
   True love turn'd round on fixed poles,
   Love, that endures not sordid ends,
   For English natures, freemen, friends,
   Thy brothers and immortal souls.
 
   But pamper not a hasty time,
   Nor feed with crude imaginings
   The herd, wild hearts and feeble wings,
   That every sophister can lime.
 
   Deliver not the tasks of might
   To weakness, neither hide the ray
   From those, not blind, who wait for day,
   Tho' [1] sitting girt with doubtful light.
 
   Make knowledge [2] circle with the winds;
   But let her herald, Reverence, fly
   Before her to whatever sky
   Bear seed of men and growth [3] of minds.
 
   Watch what main-currents draw the years:
   Cut Prejudice against the grain:
   But gentle words are always gain:
   Regard the weakness of thy peers:
 
   Nor toil for title, place, or touch
   Of pension, neither count on praise:
   It grows to guerdon after-days:
   Nor deal in watch-words overmuch;
 
   Not clinging to some ancient saw;
   Not master'd by some modern term;
   Not swift nor slow to change, but firm:
   And in its season bring the law;
 
   That from Discussion's lip may fall
   With Life, that, working strongly, binds--
   Set in all lights by many minds,
   To close the interests of all.
 
   For Nature also, cold and warm,
   And moist and dry, devising long,
   Thro' many agents making strong,
   Matures the individual form.
 
   Meet is it changes should control
   Our being, lest we rust in ease.
   We all are changed by still degrees,
   All but the basis of the soul.
 
   So let the change which comes be free
   To ingroove itself with that, which flies,
   And work, a joint of state, that plies
   Its office, moved with sympathy.
 
   A saying, hard to shape an act;
   For all the past of Time reveals
   A bridal dawn of thunder-peals,
   Wherever Thought hath wedded Fact.
 
   Ev'n now we hear with inward strife
   A motion toiling in the gloom--
   The Spirit of the years to come
   Yearning to mix himself with Life.
 
   A slow-develop'd strength awaits
   Completion in a painful school;
   Phantoms of other forms of rule,
   New Majesties of mighty States--
 
   The warders of the growing hour,
   But vague in vapour, hard to mark;
   And round them sea and air are dark
   With great contrivances of Power.
 
   Of many changes, aptly join'd,
   Is bodied forth the second whole,
   Regard gradation, lest the soul
   Of Discord race the rising wind;
 
   A wind to puff your idol-fires,
   And heap their ashes on the head;
   To shame the boast so often made, [4]
   That we are wiser than our sires.
 
   Oh, yet, if Nature's evil star
   Drive men in manhood, as in youth,
   To follow flying steps of Truth
   Across the brazen bridge of war--[5]
 
   If New and Old, disastrous feud,
   Must ever shock, like armed foes,
   And this be true, till Time shall close,
   That Principles are rain'd in blood;
 
   Not yet the wise of heart would cease
   To hold his hope thro' shame and guilt,
   But with his hand against the hilt,
   Would pace the troubled land, like Peace;
 
   Not less, tho' dogs of Faction bay, [6]
   Would serve his kind in deed and word,
   Certain, if knowledge bring the sword,
   That knowledge takes the sword away--
 
   Would love the gleams of good that broke
   From either side, nor veil his eyes;
   And if some dreadful need should rise
   Would strike, and firmly, and one stroke:
 
   To-morrow yet would reap to-day,
   As we bear blossom of the dead;
   Earn well the thrifty months, nor wed
   Raw haste, half-sister to Delay.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 and so till 1851. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1842. Knowledge is spelt with a capital K.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842. Or growth.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1842. The boasting words we said.]
 
 [Footnote 5: Possibly suggested by Homer's expression, [Greek: ana
 ptolemoio gephuras], 'Il'., viii., 549, and elsewhere; but Homer's
 and Tennyson's meaning can hardly be the same. In Homer the "bridges of
 war" seem to mean the spaces between the lines of tents in a bivouac: in
 Tennyson the meaning is probably the obvious one.]
 
 [Footnote 6: All up to and including 1851. Not less, though dogs of
 Faction bay.]
 
 
 
 
 
 THE GOOSE
 
 This was first published in 1842. No alteration has since been made in
 it.
 
 This poem, which was written at the time of the Reform Bill agitation,
 is a political allegory showing how illusory were the supposed
 advantages held out by the Radicals to the poor and labouring classes.
 The old woman typifies these classes, the stranger the Radicals, the
 goose the Radical programme, Free Trade and the like, the eggs such
 advantages as the proposed Radical measures might for a time seem to
 confer, the cluttering goose, the storm and whirlwind the heavy price
 which would have to be paid for them in the social anarchy resulting
 from triumphant Radicalism. The allegory may be narrowed to the Free
 Trade question.
 
 
   I knew an old wife lean and poor,
   Her rags scarce held together;
   There strode a stranger to the door,
   And it was windy weather.
 
   He held a goose upon his arm,
   He utter'd rhyme and reason,
   "Here, take the goose, and keep you warm,
   It is a stormy season".
 
   She caught the white goose by the leg,
   A goose--'twas no great matter.
   The goose let fall a golden egg
   With cackle and with clatter.
 
   She dropt the goose, and caught the pelf,
   And ran to tell her neighbours;
   And bless'd herself, and cursed herself,
   And rested from her labours.
 
   And feeding high, and living soft,
   Grew plump and able-bodied;
   Until the grave churchwarden doff'd,
   The parson smirk'd and nodded.
 
   So sitting, served by man and maid,
   She felt her heart grow prouder:
   But, ah! the more the white goose laid
   It clack'd and cackled louder.
 
   It clutter'd here, it chuckled there;
   It stirr'd the old wife's mettle:
   She shifted in her elbow-chair,
   And hurl'd the pan and kettle.
 
   "A quinsy choke thy cursed note!"
   Then wax'd her anger stronger:
   "Go, take the goose, and wring her throat,
   I will not bear it longer".
 
   Then yelp'd the cur, and yawl'd the cat;
   Ran Gaffer, stumbled Gammer.
   The goose flew this way and flew that,
   And fill'd the house with clamour.
 
   As head and heels upon the floor
   They flounder'd all together,
   There strode a stranger to the door,
   And it was windy weather:
 
   He took the goose upon his arm,
   He utter'd words of scorning;
   "So keep you cold, or keep you warm,
   It is a stormy morning".
 
   The wild wind rang from park and plain,
   And round the attics rumbled,
   Till all the tables danced again,
   And half the chimneys tumbled.
 
   The glass blew in, the fire blew out,
   The blast was hard and harder.
   Her cap blew off, her gown blew up,
   And a whirlwind clear'd the larder;
 
   And while on all sides breaking loose
   Her household fled the danger,
   Quoth she, "The Devil take the goose,
   And God forget the stranger!"
 
 
 
 
 
 THE EPIC
 
 First published in 1842; "tho'" for "though" in line 44 has been the
 only alteration made since 1850.
 
 This Prologue was written, like the Epilogue, after "The Epic" had been
 composed, being added, Fitzgerald says, to anticipate or excuse "the
 faint Homeric echoes," to give a reason for telling an old-world tale.
 The poet "mouthing out his hollow oes and aes" is, we are told, a good
 description of Tennyson's tone and manner of reading.
 
 
   At Francis Allen's on the Christmas-eve,--
   The game of forfeits done--the girls all kiss'd
   Beneath the sacred bush and past away--
   The parson Holmes, the poet Everard Hall,
   The host, and I sat round the wassail-bowl,
   Then half-way ebb'd: and there we held a talk,
   How all the old honour had from Christmas gone,
   Or gone, or dwindled down to some odd games
   In some odd nooks like this; till I, tired out
   With cutting eights that day upon the pond,
   Where, three times slipping from the outer edge,
   I bump'd the ice into three several stars,
   Fell in a doze; and half-awake I heard
   The parson taking wide and wider sweeps,
   Now harping on the church-commissioners, [1]
   Now hawking at Geology and schism;
   Until I woke, and found him settled down
   Upon the general decay of faith
   Right thro' the world, "at home was little left,
   And none abroad: there was no anchor, none,
   To hold by". Francis, laughing, clapt his hand
   On Everard's shoulder, with "I hold by him".
   "And I," quoth Everard, "by the wassail-bowl."
   "Why, yes," I said, "we knew your gift that way
   At college: but another which you had,
   I mean of verse (for so we held it then),
   What came of that?"  "You know," said Frank, "he burnt
   His epic, his King Arthur, some twelve books "--[2]
   And then to me demanding why? "Oh, sir,
   He thought that nothing new was said, or else
   Something so said 'twas nothing--that a truth
   Looks freshest in the fashion of the day:
   God knows: he has a mint of reasons: ask.
   It pleased _me_ well enough." "Nay, nay," said Hall,
   "Why take the style of those heroic times?
   For nature brings not back the Mastodon,
   Nor we those times; and why should any man
   Remodel models? these twelve books of mine [3]
   Were faint Homeric echoes, nothing-worth,
   Mere chaff and draff, much better burnt."
   "But I," Said Francis, "pick'd the eleventh from this hearth,
   And have it: keep a thing its use will come.
   I hoard it as a sugar-plum for Holmes."
   He laugh'd, and I, though sleepy, like a horse
   That hears the corn-bin open, prick'd my ears;
   For I remember'd Everard's college fame
   When we were Freshmen: then at my request
   He brought it; and the poet little urged,
   But with some prelude of disparagement,
   Read, mouthing out his hollow oes and aes,
   Deep-chested music, and to this result.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: A burning topic with the clergy in and about 1833.]
 
 [Footnote 2:  1842 to 1844. "You know," said Frank, "he flung His epic
 of King Arthur in the fire!" The present reading, 1850.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842, 1843.
 
   Remodel models rather than the life?
   And these twelve books of mine (to speak the truth).
 
 Present reading, 1845.]
 
 
 
 
 MORTE D'ARTHUR
 
 This is Tennyson's first study from Malory's 'Morte d'Arthur'. We learn
 from Fitzgerald that it was written as early as the spring of 1835, for
 in that year Tennyson read it to Fitzgerald and Spedding, "out of a MS.
 in a little red book," and again we learn that he repeated some lines of
 it at the end of May, 1835, one calm day on Windermere, adding "Not bad
 that, Fitz., is it?" ('Life', i., 184). It is here represented as the
 eleventh book of an Epic, the rest of which had been destroyed, though
 Tennyson afterwards incorporated it, adding introductory lines, with
 what was virtually to prove an Epic in twelve books, 'The Idylls of the
 King'. The substance of the poem is drawn from the third, fourth and
 fifth chapters of the twenty-first book of Malory's 'Romance', which is
 followed very closely. It is called "an Homeric echo," but the diction
 bears a much closer resemblance to that of Virgil than to that of Homer,
 though the rhythm is perhaps more Homeric than Virgilian. It is
 Tennyson's masterpiece in "the grand style," and is indeed as near
 perfection as any work of this kind could be. In spite of its singular
 mixture of simplicity, purely Homeric, and artificiality, at times
 ultra-Virgilian, the incongruity never shocks, so noble and impressive
 is the general effect. The text of 1842 was never subsequently altered
 except in the spelling of "mere" and "though" in lines 37, 77, 147, 155,
 162, 272, and in the insertion in 1853 of the line:--
 
     "Across the ridge and pac'd beside the mere."
 
 
 
   So all day long the noise of battle roll'd
   Among the mountains by the winter sea;
   Until King Arthur's table, man by man,
   Had fall'n in Lyonness about their Lord,
   King Arthur: then, because his wound was deep,
   The bold Sir Bedivere uplifted him,
   Sir Bedivere, the last of all his knights,
   And bore him to a chapel nigh the field, [1]
   A broken chancel with a broken cross,
   That stood on a dark strait of barren land.
   On one side lay the Ocean, and on one
   Lay a great water, and the moon was full.
   Then spake King Arthur to Sir Bedivere:
   "The sequel of to-day unsolders all
   The goodliest fellowship of famous knights
   Whereof this world holds record. Such a sleep
   They sleep--the men I loved. I think that we
   Shall never more, at any future time,
   Delight our souls with talk of knightly deeds,
   Walking about the gardens and the halls
   Of Camelot, as in the days that were.
   I perish by this people which I made,--
   Tho' Merlin sware that I should come again
   To rule once more--but let what will be, be,
   I am so deeply smitten thro' the helm
   That without help I cannot last till morn.
   Thou therefore take my brand [2] Excalibur,
   Which was my pride: for thou rememberest how
   In those old days, one summer noon, an arm
   Rose up from out the bosom of the lake,
   Clothed in white samite, mystic, wonderful,
   Holding the sword--and how I row'd across
   And took it, and have worn it, like a king:
   And, wheresoever I am sung or told
   In aftertime, this also shall be known:
   But now delay not: take Excalibur,
   And fling him far into the middle mere:
   Watch what thou seest, and lightly bring me word."
   To him replied the bold Sir Bedivere:
   "It is not meet, Sir King, to leave thee thus,
   Aidless, alone, and smitten thro' the helm.
   A little thing may harm a wounded man.
   Yet I thy hest will all perform at full,
   Watch what I see, and lightly bring thee word."
   So saying, from the ruin'd shrine he stept
   And in the moon athwart the place of tombs,
   Where lay the mighty bones of ancient men,
   Old knights, and over them the sea-wind sang
   Shrill, chill, with flakes of foam. He, stepping down
   By zig-zag paths, and juts of pointed rock,
   Came on the shining levels of the lake.
   There drew he forth the brand Excalibur,
   And o'er him, drawing it, the winter moon,
   Brightening the skirts of a long cloud, ran forth
   And sparkled keen with frost against the hilt:
   For all the haft twinkled with diamond sparks, [3]
   Myriads of topaz-lights, and jacinth-work
   Of subtlest jewellery. He gazed so long
   That both his eyes were dazzled, as he stood,
   This way and that dividing the swift mind, [4]
   In act to throw: but at the last it seem'd
   Better to leave Excalibur conceal'd
   There in the many-knotted waterflags,
   That whistled stiff and dry about the marge.
   So strode he back slow to the wounded king.
   Then spake King Arthur to Sir Bedivere:
   "Hast thou perform'd my mission which I gave?
   What is it thou hast seen? or what hast heard?"
   And answer made the bold Sir Bedivere:
   "I heard the ripple washing in the reeds, [5]
   And the wild water lapping on the crag."
   To whom replied King Arthur, faint and pale:
   "Thou hast betray'd thy nature and thy name,
   Not rendering true answer, as beseem'd
   Thy fealty, nor like a noble knight:
   For surer sign had follow'd, either hand,
   Or voice, or else a motion of the mere.
   This is a shameful thing for men to lie.
   Yet now, I charge thee, quickly go again [6]
   As thou art lief and dear, and do the thing
   I bade thee, watch, and lightly bring me word."
   Then went Sir Bedivere the second time
   Across the ridge, and paced beside the mere, [7]
   Counting the dewy pebbles, fix'd in thought;
   But when he saw the wonder of the hilt,
   How curiously and strangely chased, he smote
   His palms together, and he cried aloud,
   "And if indeed I cast the brand away,
   Surely a precious thing, one worthy note,
   Should thus be lost for ever from the earth,
   Which might have pleased the eyes of many men.
   What good should follow this, if this were done?
   What harm, undone? deep harm to disobey,
   Seeing obedience is the bond of rule,
   Were it well to obey then, if a king demand
   An act unprofitable against himself?
   The king is sick, and knows not what he does.
   What record, or what relic of my lord
   Should be to aftertime, but empty breath
   And rumours of a doubt? but were this kept,
   Stored in some treasure-house of mighty kings,
   Some one might show it at a joust of arms,
   Saying, 'King Arthur's sword, Excalibur,
   Wrought by the lonely maiden of the Lake.
   Nine years she wrought it, sitting in the deeps
   Upon the hidden bases of the hills."
   So might some old man speak in the aftertime
   To all the people, winning reverence.
   But now much honour and much fame were lost."
   So spake he, clouded with his own conceit,
   And hid Excalibur the second time,
   And so strode back slow to the wounded King.
   Then spoke King Arthur, breathing heavily:
   "What is it thou hast seen? or what hast heard?"
   And answer made the bold Sir Bedivere:
   "I heard the water lapping on the crag,
   And the long ripple washing in the reeds."
   To whom replied King Arthur, much in wrath:
   "Ah, miserable and unkind, untrue, [8]
   Unknightly, traitor-hearted! Woe is me!
   Authority forgets a dying king, [9]
   Laid widow'd of the power in his eye
   That bow'd the will. I see thee what thou art,
   For thou, the latest-left of all my knights,
   In whom should meet the offices of all,
   Thou wouldst betray me for the precious hilt;
   Either from lust of gold, or like a girl
   Valuing the giddy pleasure of the eyes.
   Yet, for a man may fail in duty twice,
   And the third time may prosper, get thee hence:
   But, if thou spare to fling Excalibur,
   I will arise and slay thee with my hands."
   Then quickly rose Sir Bedivere, and ran, [10]
   And, leaping down the ridges lightly, plunged
   Among the bulrush-beds, and clutch'd the sword,
   And strongly wheel'd and threw it. The great brand
   Made lightnings in the splendour of the moon,
   And flashing round and round, and whirl'd in an arch,
   Shot like a streamer of the northern morn,
   Seen where the moving isles of winter shock
   By night, with noises of the northern sea.
   So flash'd and fell the brand Excalibur:
   But ere he dipt the surface, rose an arm
   Clothed in white samite, mystic, wonderful,
   And caught him by the hilt, and brandish'd him
   Three times, and drew him under in the mere.
   And lightly went the other to the King.
   Then spoke King Arthur, drawing thicker breath:
   "Now see I by thine eyes that this is done.
   Speak out: what is it thou hast heard, or seen?"
   And answer made the bold Sir Bedivere:
   "Sir King, I closed mine eyelids, lest the gems
   Should blind my purpose, for I never saw,
   Nor shall see, here or elsewhere, till I die,
   Not tho' I live three lives of mortal men,
   So great a miracle as yonder hilt.
   Then with both hands I flung him, wheeling him;
   But when I look'd again, behold an arm,
   Clothed in white samite, mystic, wonderful,
   That caught him by the hilt, and brandish'd him
   Three times, and drew him under in the mere."
   And answer made King Arthur, breathing hard:
   "My end draws nigh;'tis time that I were gone.
   Make broad thy shoulders to receive my weight,
   And bear me to the margin; yet I fear [11]
   My wound hath taken cold, and I shall die."
   So saying, from the pavement he hath rose,
   Slowly, with pain, reclining on his arm,
   And looking wistfully with wide blue eyes
   As in a picture. Him Sir Bedivere
   Remorsefully regarded thro' his tears,
   And would have spoken, but he found not words,
   Then took with care, and kneeling on one knee,
   O'er both his shoulders drew the languid hands,
   And rising bore him thro' the place of tombs.
   But, as he walk'd, King Arthur panted hard,
   Like one that feels a nightmare on his bed
   When all the house is mute. So sigh'd the King,
   Muttering and murmuring at his ear"
   Quick, quick! I fear it is too late, and I shall die ".
   But the other swiftly strode from ridge to ridge,
   Clothed with his breath, and looking, as he walk'd,
   Larger than human on the frozen hills.
   He heard the deep behind him, and a cry
   Before. His own thought drove him like a goad.
   Dry clash'd his harness in the icy caves
   And barren chasms, and all to left and right
   The bare black cliff clang'd round him, as he based
   His feet on juts of slippery crag that rang
   Sharp-smitten with the dint of armed heels--
   And on a sudden, lo! the level lake,
   And the long glories of the winter moon.
   Then saw they how there hove a dusky barge, [12]
   Dark as a funeral scarf from stem to stern,
   Beneath them; and descending they were ware
   That all the decks were dense with stately forms
   Black-stoled, black-hooded, like a dream--by these
   Three Queens with crowns of gold--and from them rose
   A cry that shiver'd to the tingling stars,
   And, as it were one voice, an agony
   Of lamentation, like a wind, that shrills
   All night in a waste land, where no one comes,
   Or hath come, since the making of the world.
   Then murmur'd Arthur, "Place me in the barge,"
   And to the barge they came. There those three Queens
   Put forth their hands, and took the King, and wept.
   But she, that rose the tallest of them all
   And fairest, laid his head upon her lap,
   And loosed the shatter'd casque, and chafed his hands,
   And call'd him by his name, complaining loud,
   And dropping bitter tears against his brow
   Striped with dark blood: for all his face was white
   And colourless, and like the wither'd moon
   Smote by the fresh beam of the springing east;
   And all his greaves and cuisses dash'd with drops
   Of onset; and the light and lustrous curls--
   That made his forehead like a rising sun
   High from the daeis-throne--were parch'd with dust;
   Or, clotted into points and hanging loose,
   Mix'd with the knightly growth that fringed his lips.
   So like a shatter'd column lay the King;
   Not like that Arthur who, with lance in rest,
   From spur to plume a star of tournament,
   Shot thro' the lists at Camelot, and charged
   Before the eyes of ladies and of kings.
   Then loudly cried the bold Sir Bedivere, [13]
   "Ah! my Lord Arthur, whither shall I go?
   Where shall I hide my forehead and my eyes?
   For now I see the true old times are dead,
   When every morning brought a noble chance,
   And every chance brought out a noble knight.
   Such times have been not since the light that led
   The holy Elders with the gift of myrrh.
   But now the whole ROUND TABLE is dissolved
   Which was an image of the mighty world;
   And I, the last, go forth companionless.
   And the days darken round me, and the years,
   Among new men, strange faces, other minds."
   And slowly answer'd Arthur from the barge:
   "The old order changeth, yielding place to new,
   And God fulfils Himself in many ways, [14]
   Lest one good custom should corrupt the world.
   Comfort thyself: what comfort is in me?
   I have lived my life, and that which I have done
   May He within Himself make pure! but thou,
   If thou shouldst never see my face again,
   Pray for my soul. More things are wrought by prayer
   Than this world dreams of. Wherefore, let thy voice
   Rise like a fountain for me night and day.
   For what are men better than sheep or goats
   That nourish a blind life within the brain,
   If, knowing God, they lift not hands of prayer
   Both for themselves and those who call them friend?
   For so the whole round earth is every way
   Bound by gold chains [15] about the feet of God.
   But now farewell. I am going a long way
   With these thou seest--if indeed I go--
   (For all my mind is clouded with a doubt)
   To the island-valley of Avilion;
   Where falls not hail, or rain, [16] or any snow,
   Nor ever wind blows loudly; but it lies
   Deep-meadow'd, happy, fair with orchard-lawns
   And bowery hollows crown'd with summer sea, [17]
   Where I will heal me of my grievous wound."
   So said he, and the barge with oar and sail
   Moved from the brink, like some full-breasted swan
   That, fluting a wild carol ere her death,
   Ruffles her pure cold plume, and takes the flood
   With swarthy webs. Long stood Sir Bedivere
   Revolving many memories, till the hull
   Look'd one black dot against the verge of dawn.
   And on the mere the wailing died away.
 
   Here ended Hall, and our last light, that long
   Had wink'd and threaten'd darkness, flared and fell:
   At which the Parson, sent to sleep with sound,
   And waked with silence, grunted "Good!" but we
   Sat rapt: It was the tone with which he read--
   Perhaps some modern touches here and there
   Redeem'd it from the charge of nothingness--
   Or else we loved the man, and prized his work;
   I know not: but we sitting, as I said,
   The cock crew loud; as at that time of year
   The lusty bird takes every hour for dawn:
   Then Francis, muttering, like a man ill-used,
   "There now--that's nothing!" drew a little back,
   And drove his heel into the smoulder'd log,
   That sent a blast of sparkles up the flue;
   And so to bed; where yet in sleep I seem'd
   To sail with Arthur under looming shores.
   Point after point; till on to dawn, when dreams
   Begin to feel the truth and stir of day,
   To me, methought, who waited with a crowd,
   There came a bark that, blowing forward, bore,
   King Arthur, like a modern gentleman
   Of stateliest port; and all the people cried,
   "Arthur is come again: he cannot die".
   Then those that stood upon the hills behind
   Repeated--"Come again, and thrice as fair";
   And, further inland, voices echoed--
   "Come With all good things, and war shall be no more".
   At this a hundred bells began to peal,
   That with the sound I woke, and heard indeed
   The clear church-bells ring in the Christmas morn.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 'Cf. Morte d'Arthur', xxxi., iv.: "They led him betwixt
 them to a little chapel from the not far seaside".]
 
 [Footnote 2: 'Cf. Id.', v.:
 
   "'Therefore,' said Arthur, 'take thou my good sword Excalibur and go
   with it to yonder waterside. And when thou comest there I charge thee
   throw my sword on that water and come again and tell me what thou
   there seest.'
 
   'My lord,' said Bedivere, 'your commandment shall be done and lightly
   will I bring thee word again.'
 
   So Sir Bedivere departed and by the way he beheld that noble sword,
   that the pommel and the haft were all of precious stones, and then he
   said to himself, 'If I throw this rich sword in the water, thereof
   shall never come to good but harm and loss'. And then Sir Bedivere hid
   Excalibur under a tree."]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842-1853. Studs.]
 
 [Footnote 4: Literally from Virgil ('AEn.', iv., 285).
 
   "Atque animum nunc huc celerem nunc dividit illuc."]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: 'Cf. Romance, Id.', v.:
 
   "'I saw nothing but the waters wap and the waves wan.'"]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: 'Romance, Id.', v.:
 
   "'That is untruly said of thee,' said the king, 'therefore go thou
   lightly again and do my command as thou to me art lief and dear; spare
   not, but throw in.'
 
   Then Sir Bedivere returned again and took the sword in his hand, and
   then him thought sin and shame to throw away that noble sword, and so
   eft he hid the sword and returned again, and told the king that he had
   been to the water and done his commandment."]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: This line was not inserted till 1853.]
 
 [Footnote 8: 'Romance, Id.', v.:
 
   "'Ah, traitor untrue!' said King Arthur, 'now thou hast betrayed me
   twice. Who would have weened that thou that hast been so lief and
   dear, and thou that art named a noble knight, would betray me for the
   riches of the sword. But now go again lightly.... And but if thou do
   not now as I bid thee, if ever I may see thee I shall slay thee with
   mine own hands."']
 
 
 [Footnote 9: There is a curious illustration of this in an anecdote told
 of Queen Elizabeth. "Cecil intimated that she must go to bed, if it were
 only to satisfy her people.
 
   'Must!' she exclaimed; 'is must a word to be addressed to princes?
   Little man, little man, thy father if he had been alive durst not have
   used that word, but thou hast grown presumptuous because thou knowest
   that I shall die.'"
 
 Lingard, 'Hist'., vol. vi., p. 316.]
 
 
 [Footnote 10: 'Romance, Id'., v.:
 
   "Then Sir Bedivere departed and went to the sword and lightly took it
   up and went to the waterside, and then he bound the girdle about the
   hilt and then he threw the sword as far into the water as he might,
   and then came an arm and a hand above the water, and met it and caught
   it and so shook it thrice and brandished it, and then vanished away
   the hand with the sword in the water."]
 
 
 [Footnote 11: 'Romance, Id.', v.:
 
   "'Alas,' said the king, 'help me hence for I dread me I have tarried
   over long'.
 
   Then Sir Bedivere took the king upon his back and so went with him to
   that water."]
 
 
 [Footnote 12: 'Romance, Id'., v.:
 
   "And when they were at the waterside even fast by the bank hoved a
   little barge and many fair ladies in it, and among them all was a
   queen and all they had black hoods and all they wept and shrieked when
   they saw King Arthur. 'Now put me into the barge,' said the king, and
   so they did softly. And there received him three queens with great
   mourning, and so they set him down and in one of their laps King
   Arthur laid his head; and then that queen said: 'Ah, dear brother, why
   have ye tarried so long from me?'"]
 
 
 [Footnote 13: 'Romance, Id'., v.:
 
   "Then Sir Bedivere cried: 'Ah, my Lord Arthur, what shall become of me
   now ye go from me and leave me here alone among mine enemies?'
 
   'Comfort thyself,' said the king, 'and do as well as thou mayest, for
   in me is no trust to trust in. For I will unto the vale of Avilion to
   heal me of my grievous wound. And if thou never hear more of me, pray
   for my soul.'"]
 
 
 [Footnote 14: With this 'cf>/i>. Greene, 'James IV'., v., 4:--
 
   "Should all things still remain in one estate
   Should not in greatest arts some scars be found
   Were all upright nor chang'd what world were this?
   A chaos made of quiet, yet no world."
 
   And 'cf'. Shakespeare, 'Coriolanus', ii., iii.:--
 
   What custom wills in all things should we do it,
   The dust on antique Time would be unswept,
   And mountainous error too highly heaped
   For Truth to overpeer.]
 
 
 [Footnote 15: 'Cf.' Archdeacon Hare's "Sermon on the Law of
 Self-Sacrifice".
 
   "This is the golden chain of love whereby the whole creation is bound
   to the throne of the Creator."
 
 For further illustrations see 'Illust. of Tennyson', p. 158.]
 
 
 [Footnote 16: Paraphrased from 'Odyssey', vi., 42-5, or 'Lucretius',
 iii., 18-22.]
 
 [Footnote 17: The expression "'crowned' with summer 'sea'" from
 'Odyssey', x., 195: [Greek: naeson taen peri pontos apeiritos
 estaphan_otai.]]
 
 
 
 
 
 THE GARDENER'S DAUGHTER; OR, THE PICTURES
 
 First published in 1842.
 
 
 In the 'Gardener's Daughter' we have the first of that delightful series
 of poems dealing with scenes and characters from ordinary English life,
 and named appropriately 'English Idylls'. The originator of this species
 of poetry in England was Southey, in his 'English Eclogues', written
 before 1799. In the preface to these eclogues, which are in blank verse,
 Southey says: "The following eclogues, I believe, bear no resemblance to
 any poems in our language. This species of composition has become
 popular in Germany, and I was induced to attempt it by an account of the
 German idylls given me in conversation." Southey's eclogues are eight in
 number: 'The Old Mansion House', 'The Grandmother's Tale', 'Hannah',
 'The Sailor's Mother', 'The Witch', 'The Ruined Cottage', 'The Last of
 the Family' and 'The Alderman's Funeral'. Southey was followed by
 Wordsworth in 'The Brothers' and 'Michael'. Southey has nothing of the
 charm, grace and classical finish of his disciple, but how nearly
 Tennyson follows him, as copy and model, may be seen by anyone who
 compares Tennyson's studies with 'The Ruined Cottage'. But Tennyson's
 real master was Theocritus, whose influence pervades these poems not so
 much directly in definite imitation as indirectly in colour and tone.
 
 'The Gardener's Daughter' was written as early as 1835, as it was read
 to Fitzgerald in that year ('Life of Tennyson', i., 182). Tennyson
 originally intended to insert a prologue to be entitled 'The
 Antechamber', which contained an elaborate picture of himself, but he
 afterwards suppressed it. It is given in the 'Life', i., 233-4. This
 poem stands alone among the Idylls in being somewhat overloaded with
 ornament. The text of 1842 remained unaltered through all the subsequent
 editions except in line 235. After 1851 the form "tho'" is substituted
 for "though".
 
 
   This morning is the morning of the day,
   When I and Eustace from the city went
   To see the Gardener's Daughter; I and he,
   Brothers in Art; a friendship so complete
   Portion'd in halves between us, that we grew
   The fable of the city where we dwelt.
   My Eustace might have sat for Hercules;
   So muscular he spread, so broad of breast.
   He, by some law that holds in love, and draws
   The greater to the lesser, long desired
   A certain miracle of symmetry,
   A miniature of loveliness, all grace
   Summ'd up and closed in little;--Juliet, she [1]
   So light of foot, so light of spirit--oh, she
   To me myself, for some three careless moons,
   The summer pilot of an empty heart
   Unto the shores of nothing! Know you not
   Such touches are but embassies of love,
   To tamper with the feelings, ere he found
   Empire for life? but Eustace painted her,
   And said to me, she sitting with us then,
   "When will _you_ paint like this?" and I replied,
   (My words were half in earnest, half in jest),
   "'Tis not your work, but Love's. Love, unperceived,
   A more ideal Artist he than all,
   Came, drew your pencil from you, made those eyes
   Darker than darkest pansies, and that hair
   More black than ashbuds in the front of March."
   And Juliet answer'd laughing, "Go and see
   The Gardener's daughter: trust me, after that,
   You scarce can fail to match his masterpiece ".
   And up we rose, and on the spur we went.
   Not wholly in the busy world, nor quite
   Beyond it, blooms the garden that I love.
   News from the humming city comes to it
   In sound of funeral or of marriage bells;
   And, sitting muffled in dark leaves, you hear
   The windy clanging of the minster clock;
   Although between it and the garden lies
   A league of grass, wash'd by a slow broad stream,
   That, stirr'd with languid pulses of the oar,
   Waves all its lazy lilies, and creeps on,
   Barge-laden, to three arches of a bridge
   Crown'd with the minster-towers.
 
                                   The fields between
   Are dewy-fresh, browsed by deep-udder'd kine,
   And all about the large lime feathers low,
   The lime a summer home of murmurous wings. [2]
   In that still place she, hoarded in herself,
   Grew, seldom seen: not less among us lived
   Her fame from lip to lip. Who had not heard
   Of Rose, the Gardener's daughter? Where was he,
   So blunt in memory, so old at heart,
   At such a distance from his youth in grief,
   That, having seen, forgot? The common mouth,
   So gross to express delight, in praise of her
   Grew oratory. Such a lord is Love,
   And Beauty such a mistress of the world.
   And if I said that Fancy, led by Love,
   Would play with flying forms and images,
   Yet this is also true, that, long before
   I look'd upon her, when I heard her name
   My heart was like a prophet to my heart,
   And told me I should love. A crowd of hopes,
   That sought to sow themselves like winged seeds,
   Born out of everything I heard and saw,
   Flutter'd about my senses and my soul;
   And vague desires, like fitful blasts of balm
   To one that travels quickly, made the air
   Of Life delicious, and all kinds of thought,
   That verged upon them sweeter than the dream
   Dream'd by a happy man, when the dark East,
   Unseen, is brightening to his bridal morn.
   And sure this orbit of the memory folds
   For ever in itself the day we went
   To see her. All the land in flowery squares,
   Beneath a broad and equal-blowing wind,
   Smelt of the coming summer, as one large cloud [3]
   Drew downward: but all else of heaven was pure
   Up to the Sun, and May from verge to verge,
   And May with me from head to heel. And now,
   As tho' 'twere yesterday, as tho' it were
   The hour just flown, that morn with all its sound
   (For those old Mays had thrice the life of these),
   Rings in mine ears. The steer forgot to graze,
   And, where the hedge-row cuts the pathway, stood,
   Leaning his horns into the neighbour field,
   And lowing to his fellows. From the woods
   Came voices of the well-contented doves.
   The lark could scarce get out his notes for joy,
   But shook his song together as he near'd
   His happy home, the ground. To left and right,
   The cuckoo told his name to all the hills;
   The mellow ouzel fluted in the elm;
   The redcap [4] whistled; [5] and the nightingale
   Sang loud, as tho' he were the bird of day.
   And Eustace turn'd, and smiling said to me,
   "Hear how the bushes echo! by my life,
   These birds have joyful thoughts. Think you they sing
   Like poets, from the vanity of song?
   Or have they any sense of why they sing?
   And would they praise the heavens for what they have?"
   And I made answer, "Were there nothing else
   For which to praise the heavens but only love,
   That only love were cause enough for praise".
   Lightly he laugh'd, as one that read my thought,
   And on we went; but ere an hour had pass'd,
   We reach'd a meadow slanting to the North;
   Down which a well-worn pathway courted us
   To one green wicket in a privet hedge;
   This, yielding, gave into a grassy walk
   Thro' crowded lilac-ambush trimly pruned;
   And one warm gust, full-fed with perfume, blew
   Beyond us, as we enter'd in the cool.
   The garden stretches southward. In the midst
   A cedar spread his dark-green layers of shade.
   The garden-glasses shone, and momently
   The twinkling laurel scatter'd silver lights.
   "Eustace," I said, "This wonder keeps the house."
   He nodded, but a moment afterwards
   He cried, "Look! look!" Before he ceased I turn'd,
   And, ere a star can wink, beheld her there.
   For up the porch there grew an Eastern rose,
   That, flowering high, the last night's gale had caught,
   And blown across the walk. One arm aloft--
   Gown'd in pure white, that fitted to the shape--
   Holding the bush, to fix it back, she stood.
   A single stream of all her soft brown hair
   Pour'd on one side: the shadow of the flowers
   Stole all the golden gloss, and, wavering
   Lovingly lower, trembled on her waist--
   Ah, happy shade--and still went wavering down,
   But, ere it touch'd a foot, that might have danced
   The greensward into greener circles, dipt,
   And mix'd with shadows of the common ground!
   But the full day dwelt on her brows, and sunn'd
   Her violet eyes, and all her Hebe-bloom,
   And doubled his own warmth against her lips,
   And on the bounteous wave of such a breast
   As never pencil drew. Half light, half shade,
   She stood, a sight to make an old man young.
   So rapt, we near'd the house; but she, a Rose
   In roses, mingled with her fragrant toil,
   Nor heard us come, nor from her tendance turn'd
   Into the world without; till close at hand,
   And almost ere I knew mine own intent,
   This murmur broke the stillness of that air
   Which brooded round about her: "Ah, one rose,
   One rose, but one, by those fair fingers cull'd,
   Were worth a hundred kisses press'd on lips
   Less exquisite than thine." She look'd: but all
   Suffused with blushes--neither self-possess'd
   Nor startled, but betwixt this mood and that,
   Divided in a graceful quiet--paused,
   And dropt the branch she held, and turning, wound
   Her looser hair in braid, and stirr'd her lips
   For some sweet answer, tho' no answer came,
   Nor yet refused the rose, but granted it,
   And moved away, and left me, statue-like,
   In act to render thanks. I, that whole day,
   Saw her no more, altho' I linger'd there
   Till every daisy slept, and Love's white star
   Beam'd thro' the thicken'd cedar in the dusk.
   So home we went, and all the livelong way
   With solemn gibe did Eustace banter me.
   "Now," said he, "will you climb the top of Art;
   You cannot fail but work in hues to dim
   The Titianic Flora. Will you match
   My Juliet? you, not you,--the Master,
   Love, A more ideal Artist he than all."
 
   So home I went, but could not sleep for joy,
   Reading her perfect features in the gloom,
   Kissing the rose she gave me o'er and o'er,
   And shaping faithful record of the glance
   That graced the giving--such a noise of life
   Swarm'd in the golden present, such a voice
   Call'd to me from the years to come, and such
   A length of bright horizon rimm'd the dark.
   And all that night I heard the watchmen peal
   The sliding season: all that night I heard
   The heavy clocks knolling the drowsy hours.
   The drowsy hours, dispensers of all good,
   O'er the mute city stole with folded wings,
   Distilling odours on me as they went
   To greet their fairer sisters of the East.
 
   Love at first sight, first-born, and heir to all,
   Made this night thus. Henceforward squall nor storm
   Could keep me from that Eden where she dwelt.
   Light pretexts drew me: sometimes a
   Dutch love For tulips; then for roses, moss or musk,
   To grace my city-rooms; or fruits and cream
   Served in the weeping elm; and more and more
   A word could bring the colour to my cheek;
   A thought would fill my eyes with happy dew;
   Love trebled life within me, and with each
   The year increased. The daughters of the year,
   One after one, thro' that still garden pass'd:
   Each garlanded with her peculiar flower
   Danced into light, and died into the shade;
   And each in passing touch'd with some new grace
   Or seem'd to touch her, so that day by day,
   Like one that never can be wholly known, [6]
   Her beauty grew; till Autumn brought an hour
   For Eustace, when I heard his deep "I will,"
   Breathed, like the covenant of a God, to hold
   From thence thro' all the worlds: but I rose up
   Full of his bliss, and following her dark eyes
   Felt earth as air beneath me, [7] till I reach'd
   The wicket-gate, and found her standing there.
   There sat we down upon a garden mound,
   Two mutually enfolded; Love, the third,
   Between us, in the circle of his arms
   Enwound us both; and over many a range
   Of waning lime the gray cathedral towers,
   Across a hazy glimmer of the west,
   Reveal'd their shining windows: from them clash'd
   The bells; we listen'd; with the time we play'd;
   We spoke of other things; we coursed about
   The subject most at heart, more near and near,
   Like doves about a dovecote, wheeling round
   The central wish, until we settled there. [8]
   Then, in that time and place, I spoke to her,
   Requiring, tho' I knew it was mine own,
   Yet for the pleasure that I took to hear,
   Requiring at her hand the greatest gift,
   A woman's heart, the heart of her I loved;
   And in that time and place she answer'd me,
   And in the compass of three little words,
   More musical than ever came in one,
   The silver fragments of a broken voice,
   Made me most happy, faltering [9] "I am thine".
   Shall I cease here? Is this enough to say
   That my desire, like all strongest hopes,
   By its own energy fulfilled itself,
   Merged in completion? Would you learn at full
   How passion rose thro' circumstantial grades
   Beyond all grades develop'd? and indeed
   I had not staid so long to tell you all,
   But while I mused came Memory with sad eyes,
   Holding the folded annals of my youth;
   And while I mused, Love with knit brows went by,
   And with a flying finger swept my lips,
   And spake, "Be wise: not easily forgiven
   Are those, who setting wide the doors, that bar
   The secret bridal chambers of the heart.
   Let in the day". Here, then, my words have end.
   Yet might I tell of meetings, of farewells--
   Of that which came between, more sweet than each,
   In whispers, like the whispers of the leaves
   That tremble round a nightingale--in sighs
   Which perfect Joy, perplex'd for utterance,
   Stole from her [10] sister Sorrow. Might I not tell
   Of difference, reconcilement, pledges given,
   And vows, where there was never need of vows,
   And kisses, where the heart on one wild leap
   Hung tranced from all pulsation, as above
   The heavens between their fairy fleeces pale
   Sow'd all their mystic gulfs with fleeting stars;
   Or while the balmy glooming, crescent-lit,
   Spread the light haze along the river-shores,
   And in the hollows; or as once we met
   Unheedful, tho' beneath a whispering rain
   Night slid down one long stream of sighing wind,
   And in her bosom bore the baby, Sleep.
   But this whole hour your eyes have been intent
   On that veil'd picture--veil'd, for what it holds
   May not be dwelt on by the common day.
   This prelude has prepared thee. Raise thy soul;
   Make thine heart ready with thine eyes: the time
   Is come to raise the veil. Behold her there,
   As I beheld her ere she knew my heart,
   My first, last love; the idol of my youth,
   The darling of my manhood, and, alas!
   Now the most blessed memory of mine age.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 'Cf. Romeo and Juliet', ii., vi.:--
 
   O so light a foot
   Will ne'er wear out the everlasting flint.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: 'Cf.' Keats, 'Ode to Nightingale':--
 
   The murmurous haunt of flies on summer eves.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: 'Cf'. Theocritus, 'Id'., vii., 143:--
 
   [Greek: pant' _osden thereos mala pionos.]]
 
 
 [Footnote 4: Provincial name for the goldfinch. See Tennyson's letter to
 the Duke of Argyll, 'Life', ii., 221.]
 
 [Footnote 5: This passage is imitated from Theocritus, vii., 143
 'seqq'.]
 
 [Footnote 6: This passage originally ran:--$
 
   Her beauty grew till drawn in narrowing arcs
   The southing autumn touch'd with sallower gleams
   The granges on the fallows. At that time,
   Tir'd of the noisy town I wander'd there.
   The bell toll'd four, and by the time I reach'd
   The wicket-gate I found her by herself.
 
 But Fitzgerald pointing out that the autumn landscape was taken from the
 background of Titian (Lord Ellesmere's 'Ages of Man') Tennyson struck
 out the passage. If this was the reason he must have been in an
 unusually scrupulous mood. See his 'Life', i., 232.]
 
 [Footnote 7: So Massinger, 'City Madam', iii., 3:--
 
 I am sublim'd.
 Gross earth
 Supports me not.
 'I walk on air'.]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: Cf. Dante, 'Inferno', v., 81-83:--
 
 Quali columbe dal desio chiamate,
 Con 1' ali aperte e ferme, al dolce nido Volan.]
 
 
 [Footnote 9: 1842-1850. Lisping.]
 
 [Footnote 10: In privately printed volume 1842. His.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 DORA
 
 First published in 1842.
 
 This poem had been written as early as 1835, when it was read to
 Fitzgerald and Spedding ('Life', i., 182). No alterations were made in
 the text after 1853. The story in this poem was taken even to the
 minutest details from a prosestory of Miss Mitford's, namely, 'The Tale
 of Dora Creswell' ('Our Village', vol. in., 242-53), the only
 alterations being in the names, Farmer Cresswell, Dora Creswell, Walter
 Cresswell, and Mary Hay becoming respectively Allan, Dora, William, and
 Mary Morrison. How carefully the poet has preserved the picturesque
 touches of the original may be seen by comparing the following two
 passages:--
 
     And Dora took the child, and went her way
     Across the wheat, and sat upon a mound
     That was unsown, where many poppies grew.
     ...
     She rose and took
     The child once more, and sat upon the mound;
     And made a little wreath of all the flowers
     That grew about, and tied it round his hat.
 
     "A beautiful child lay on the ground at some distance, whilst a
     young girl, resting from the labour of reaping, was twisting a
     rustic wreath of enamelled cornflowers, brilliant poppies ... round
     its hat."
 
 The style is evidently modelled closely on that of the 'Odyssey'.
 
 
   With farmer Allan at the farm abode
   William and Dora. William was his son,
   And she his niece. He often look'd at them,
   And often thought "I'll make them man and wife".
   Now Dora felt her uncle's will in all,
   And yearn'd towards William; but the youth, because
   He had been always with her in the house,
   Thought not of Dora. Then there came a day
   When Allan call'd his son, and said,
   "My son: I married late, but I would wish to see
   My grandchild on my knees before I die:
   And I have set my heart upon a match.
   Now therefore look to Dora; she is well
   To look to; thrifty too beyond her age.
   She is my brother's daughter: he and I
   Had once hard words, and parted, and he died
   In foreign lands; but for his sake I bred
   His daughter Dora: take her for your wife;
   For I have wish'd this marriage, night and day,
   For many years." But William answer'd short;
   "I cannot marry Dora; by my life,
   I will not marry Dora". Then the old man
   Was wroth, and doubled up his hands, and said:
   "You will not, boy! you dare to answer thus!
   But in my time a father's word was law,
   And so it shall be now for me. Look to it;
   Consider, William: take a month to think,
   And let me have an answer to my wish;
   Or, by the Lord that made me, you shall pack,
   And never more darken my doors again."
   But William answer'd madly; bit his lips,
   And broke away. [1] The more he look'd at her
   The less he liked her; and his ways were harsh;
   But Dora bore them meekly. Then before
   The month was out he left his father's house,
   And hired himself to work within the fields;
   And half in love, half spite, he woo'd and wed
   A labourer's daughter, Mary Morrison.
 
   Then, when the bells were ringing,
   Allan call'd His niece and said: "My girl, I love you well;
   But if you speak with him that was my son,
   Or change a word with her he calls his wife,
   My home is none of yours. My will is law."
   And Dora promised, being meek. She thought,
   "It cannot be: my uncle's mind will change!"
 
   And days went on, and there was born a boy
   To William; then distresses came on him;
   And day by day he pass'd his father's gate,
   Heart-broken, and his father helped him not.
   But Dora stored what little she could save,
   And sent it them by stealth, nor did they know
   Who sent it; till at last a fever seized
   On William, and in harvest time he died.
 
   Then Dora went to Mary. Mary sat
   And look'd with tears upon her boy, and thought
   Hard things of Dora. Dora came and said:
   "I have obey'd my uncle until now,
   And I have sinn'd, for it was all thro' me
   This evil came on William at the first.
   But, Mary, for the sake of him that's gone,
   And for your sake, the woman that he chose,
   And for this orphan, I am come to you:
   You know there has not been for these five years
   So full a harvest, let me take the boy,
   And I will set him in my uncle's eye
   Among the wheat; that when his heart is glad
   Of the full harvest, he may see the boy,
   And bless him for the sake of him that's gone."
   And Dora took the child, and went her way
   Across the wheat, and sat upon a mound
   That was unsown, where many poppies grew.
   Far off the farmer came into the field
   And spied her not; for none of all his men
   Dare tell him Dora waited with the child;
   And Dora would have risen and gone to him,
   But her heart fail'd her; and the reapers reap'd
   And the sun fell, and all the land was dark.
   But when the morrow came, she rose and took
   The child once more, and sat upon the mound;
   And made a little wreath of all the flowers
   That grew about, and tied it round his hat
   To make him pleasing in her uncle's eye.
   Then when the farmer passed into the field
   He spied her, and he left his men at work,
   And came and said: "Where were you yesterday?
   Whose child is that? What are you doing here?"
   So Dora cast her eyes upon the ground,
   And answer'd softly, "This is William's child?"
   "And did I not," said Allan, "did I not
   Forbid you, Dora?" Dora said again:
   "Do with me as you will, but take the child
   And bless him for the sake of him that's gone!"
   And Allan said: "I see it is a trick
   Got up betwixt you and the woman there.
   I must be taught my duty, and by you!
   You knew my word was law, and yet you dared
   To slight it. Well--for I will take the boy;
   But go you hence, and never see me more."
   So saying, he took the boy, that cried aloud
   And struggled hard. The wreath of flowers fell
   At Dora's feet. She bow'd upon her hands,
   And the boy's cry came to her from the field,
   More and more distant. She bow'd down her head,
   Remembering the day when first she came,
   And all the things that had been. She bow'd down
   And wept in secret; and the reapers reap'd,
   And the sun fell, and all the land was dark.
   Then Dora went to Mary's house, and stood
   Upon the threshold. Mary saw the boy
   Was not with Dora. She broke out in praise
   To God, that help'd her in her widowhood.
   And Dora said, "My uncle took the boy;
   But, Mary, let me live and work with you:
   He says that he will never see me more".
   Then answer'd Mary, "This shall never be,
   That thou shouldst take my trouble on thyself:
   And, now, I think, he shall not have the boy,
   For he will teach him hardness, and to slight
   His mother; therefore thou and I will go,
   And I will have my boy, and bring him home;
   And I will beg of him to take thee back;
   But if he will not take thee back again,
   Then thou and I will live within one house,
   And work for William's child until he grows
   Of age to help us." So the women kiss'd
   Each other, and set out, and reach'd the farm.
   The door was off the latch: they peep'd, and saw
   The boy set up betwixt his grandsire's knees,
   Who thrust him in the hollows of his arm,
   And clapt him on the hands and on the cheeks,
   Like one that loved him; and the lad stretch'd out
   And babbled for the golden seal, that hung
   From Allan's watch, and sparkled by the fire.
   Then they came in: but when the boy beheld
   His mother, he cried out to come to her:
   And Allan set him down, and Mary said:
   "O Father!--if you let me call you so--
   I never came a-begging for myself,
   Or William, or this child; but now I come
   For Dora: take her back; she loves you well.
   O Sir, when William died, he died at peace
   With all men; for I ask'd him, and he said,
   He could not ever rue his marrying me--
   I have been a patient wife: but, Sir, he said
   That he was wrong to cross his father thus:
   'God bless him!' he said, 'and may he never know
   The troubles I have gone thro'!' Then he turn'd
   His face and pass'd--unhappy that I am!
   But now, Sir, let me have my boy, for you
   Will make him hard, and he will learn to slight
   His father's memory; and take Dora back,
   And let all this be as it was before."
   So Mary said, and Dora hid her face
   By Mary. There was silence in the room;
   And all at once the old man burst in sobs:
   "I have been to blame--to blame. I have kill'd my son.
   I have kill'd him--but I loved him--my dear son.
   May God forgive me!--I have been to blame.
   Kiss me, my children."  Then they clung about
   The old man's neck, and kiss'd him many times.
   And all the man was broken with remorse;
   And all his love came back a hundredfold;
   And for three hours he sobb'd o'er William's child,
   Thinking of William. So those four abode
   Within one house together; and as years
   Went forward, Mary took another mate;
   But Dora lived unmarried till her death.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: In 1842 thus:--
 
   "Look to't,
   Consider: take a month to think, and give
   An answer to my wish; or by the Lord
   That made me, you shall pack, and nevermore
   Darken my doors again." And William heard,
   And answered something madly; bit his lips,
   And broke away.
 
 All editions previous to 1853 have
 
   "Look to't.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 AUDLEY COURT
 
 First published in 1842.
 
 Only four alterations were made in the text after 1842, all of which are
 duly noted. Tennyson told his son that the poem was partially suggested
 by Abbey Park at Torquay where it was written, and that the last lines
 described the scene from the hill looking over the bay. He saw he said
 "a star of phosphorescence made by the buoy appearing and disappearing
 in the dark sea," but it is curious that the line describing that was
 not inserted till long after the poem had been published. The poem,
 though a trifle, is a triumph of felicitous description and expression,
 whether we regard the pie or the moonlit bay.
 
 
   "The Bull, the Fleece are cramm'd, and not a room
   For love or money. Let us picnic there
   At Audley Court." I spoke, while Audley feast
   Humm'd like a hive all round the narrow quay,
   To Francis, with a basket on his arm,
   To Francis just alighted from the boat,
   And breathing of the sea. "With all my heart,"
   Said Francis. Then we shoulder'd thro' [1] the swarm,
   And rounded by the stillness of the beach
   To where the bay runs up its latest horn.
   We left the dying ebb that faintly lipp'd
   The flat red granite; so by many a sweep
   Of meadow smooth from aftermath we reach'd
   The griffin-guarded gates and pass'd thro' all
   The pillar'd dusk [2] of sounding sycamores
   And cross'd the garden to the gardener's lodge,
   With all its casements bedded, and its walls
   And chimneys muffled in the leafy vine.
   There, on a slope of orchard, Francis laid
   A damask napkin wrought with horse and hound,
   Brought out a dusky loaf that smelt of home,
   And, half-cut-down, a pasty costly-made,
   Where quail and pigeon, lark and leveret lay,
   Like fossils of the rock, with golden yolks [3]
   Imbedded and injellied; last with these,
   A flask of cider from his father's vats,
   Prime, which I knew; and so we sat and eat
   And talk'd old matters over; who was dead,
   Who married, who was like to be, and how
   The races went, and who would rent the hall:
   Then touch'd upon the game, how scarce it was
   This season; glancing thence, discuss'd the farm,
   The fourfield system, and the price of grain; [4]
   And struck upon the corn-laws, where we split,
   And came again together on the king
   With heated faces; till he laugh'd aloud;
   And, while the blackbird on the pippin hung
   To hear him, clapt his hand in mine and sang--
   "Oh! who would fight and march and counter-march,
   Be shot for sixpence in a battle-field,
   And shovell'd up into a [5] bloody trench
   Where no one knows? but let me live my life.
   "Oh! who would cast and balance at a desk,
   Perch'd like a crow upon a three-legg'd stool,
   Till all his juice is dried, and all his joints
   Are full of chalk? but let me live my life.
   "Who'd serve the state? for if I carved my name
   Upon the cliffs that guard my native land,
   I might as well have traced it in the sands;
   The sea wastes all: but let me live my life.
   "Oh! who would love? I wooed a woman once,
   But she was sharper than an eastern wind,
   And all my heart turn'd from her, as a thorn
   Turns from the sea: but let me live my life."
   He sang his song, and I replied with mine:
   I found it in a volume, all of songs,
   Knock'd down to me, when old Sir Robert's pride,
   His books--the more the pity, so I said--
   Came to the hammer here in March--and this--
   I set the words, and added names I knew.
   "Sleep, Ellen Aubrey, sleep and dream of me:
   Sleep, Ellen, folded in thy sister's arm,
   And sleeping, haply dream her arm is mine.
   "Sleep, Ellen, folded in Emilia's arm;
   Emilia, fairer than all else but thou,
   For thou art fairer than all else that is.
   "Sleep, breathing health and peace upon her breast:
   Sleep, breathing love and trust against her lip:
   I go to-night: I come to-morrow morn.
   "I go, but I return: I would I were
   The pilot of the darkness and the dream.
   Sleep, Ellen Aubrey, love, and dream of me."
   So sang we each to either, Francis Hale,
   The farmer's son who lived across the bay,
   My friend; and I, that having wherewithal,
   And in the fallow leisure of my life
   A rolling stone of here and everywhere, [6]
   Did what I would; but ere the night we rose
   And saunter'd home beneath a moon that, just
   In crescent, dimly rain'd about the leaf
   Twilights of airy silver, till we reach'd
   The limit of the hills; and as we sank
   From rock to rock upon the gloomy quay,
   The town was hush'd beneath us: lower down
   The bay was oily-calm: the harbour buoy
   With one green sparkle ever and anon [7]
   Dipt by itself, and we were glad at heart. [8]
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 to 1850. Through.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 'cf'. Milton, 'Paradise Lost', ix., 1106-7:--
 
   A pillar'd shade
   High overarch'd.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842. Golden yokes.]
 
 [Footnote 4: That is planting turnips, barley, clover and wheat, by
 which land is kept constantly fresh and vigorous.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1872. Some.]
 
 [Footnote 6: Inserted in 1857.]
 
 [Footnote 7: Here was inserted, in 1872, the line--Sole star of
 phosphorescence in the calm.]
 
 [Footnote 8: Like the shepherd in Homer at the moonlit landscape,
 'gegaethe de te phrena poimaen', 'Il'., viii., 559.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 WALKING TO THE MAIL
 
 First published in 1842. Not altered in any respect after 1853.
 
 
 'John'.  I'm glad I walk'd.
          How fresh the meadows look
          Above the river, and, but a month ago,
          The whole hill-side was redder than a fox.
          Is yon plantation where this byway joins
          The turnpike? [1]
 
 'James'. Yes.
 
 'John'.  And when does this come by?
 
 'James'. The mail? At one o'clock.
 
 'John'.  What is it now?
 
 James'.  A quarter to.
 
 'John'.  Whose house is that I see? [2]
          No, not the County Member's with the vane:
          Up higher with the yewtree by it, and half
          A score of gables.
 
 'James'. That? Sir Edward Head's:
          But he's abroad: the place is to be sold.
 
 'John'.  Oh, his. He was not broken?
 
 'James'. No, sir, he,
          Vex'd with a morbid devil in his blood
          That veil'd the world with jaundice, hid his face
          From all men, and commercing with himself,
          He lost the sense that handles daily life--
          That keeps us all in order more or less--
          And sick of home went overseas for change.
 
 'John'.  And whither?
 
 'James'. Nay, who knows? he's here and there.
          But let him go; his devil goes with him,
          As well as with his tenant, Jockey Dawes.
 
 'John'.  What's that?
 
 'James-. You saw the man--on Monday, was it?--[3]
          There by the hump-back'd willow; half stands up
          And bristles; half has fall'n and made a bridge;
          And there he caught the younker tickling trout--
          Caught in 'flagrante'--what's the Latin word?--
          'Delicto'; but his house, for so they say,
          Was haunted with a jolly ghost, that shook
          The curtains, whined in lobbies, tapt at doors,
          And rummaged like a rat: no servant stay'd:
          The farmer vext packs up his beds and chairs,
          And all his household stuff; and with his boy
          Betwixt his knees, his wife upon the tilt,
          Sets out, [4] and meets a friend who hails him,
          "What! You're flitting!" "Yes, we're flitting," says the ghost
          (For they had pack'd the thing among the beds).
          "Oh, well," says he, "you flitting with us too--
          Jack, turn the horses' heads and home again". [5]
 
 'John'.  He left 'his' wife behind; for so I heard.
 
 'James'. He left her, yes. I met my lady once:
          A woman like a butt, and harsh as crabs.
 
 'John'.  Oh, yet, but I remember, ten years back--
          'Tis now at least ten years--and then she was--
          You could not light upon a sweeter thing:
          A body slight and round and like a pear
          In growing, modest eyes, a hand a foot
          Lessening in perfect cadence, and a skin
          As clean and white as privet when it flowers.
 
 'James'. Ay, ay, the blossom fades and they that loved
          At first like dove and dove were cat and dog.
          She was the daughter of a cottager,
          Out of her sphere. What betwixt shame and pride,
          New things and old, himself and her, she sour'd
          To what she is: a nature never kind!
          Like men, like manners: like breeds like, they say.
          Kind nature is the best: those manners next
          That fit us like a nature second-hand;
          Which are indeed the manners of the great.
 
 'John'.  But I had heard it was this bill that past,
          And fear of change at home, that drove him hence.
 
 'James'. That was the last drop in the cup of gall.
          I once was near him, when his bailiff brought
          A Chartist pike. You should have seen him wince
          As from a venomous thing: he thought himself
          A mark for all, and shudder'd, lest a cry
          Should break his sleep by night, and his nice eyes
          Should see the raw mechanic's bloody thumbs
          Sweat on his blazon'd chairs; but, sir, you know
          That these two parties still divide the world--
          Of those that want, and those that have: and still
          The same old sore breaks out from age to age
          With much the same result. Now I myself, [6]
          A Tory to the quick, was as a boy
          Destructive, when I had not what I would.
          I was at school--a college in the South:
          There lived a flayflint near; we stole his fruit,
          His hens, his eggs; but there was law for 'us';
          We paid in person. He had a sow, sir. She,
          With meditative grunts of much content, [7]
          Lay great with pig, wallowing in sun and mud.
          By night we dragg'd her to the college tower
          From her warm bed, and up the corkscrew stair
          With hand and rope we haled the groaning sow,
          And on the leads we kept her till she pigg'd.
          Large range of prospect had the mother sow,
          And but for daily loss of one she loved,
          As one by one we took them--but for this--
          As never sow was higher in this world--
          Might have been happy: but what lot is pure!
          We took them all, till she was left alone
          Upon her tower, the Niobe of swine,
          And so return'd unfarrowed to her sty.
 
 'John.'  They found you out?
 
 'James.' Not they.
 
 'John.'  Well--after all--What know we of the secret of a man?
          His nerves were wrong. What ails us, who are sound,
          That we should mimic this raw fool the world,
          Which charts us all in its coarse blacks or whites,
          As ruthless as a baby with a worm,
          As cruel as a schoolboy ere he grows
          To Pity--more from ignorance than will,
          But put your best foot forward, or I fear
          That we shall miss the mail: and here it comes
          With five at top: as quaint a four-in-hand
          As you shall see--three pyebalds and a roan.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842.
 
 'John'.  I'm glad I walk'd. How fresh the country looks!
          Is yonder planting where this byway joins
          The turnpike?]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: Thus 1843 to 1850:--
 
 'John'.  Whose house is that I see
          Beyond the watermills?
 
 'James'. Sir Edward Head's: But he's abroad, etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: Thus 1842 to 1851:--
 
 'James'. You saw the man but yesterday:
          He pick'd the pebble from your horse's foot.
          His house was haunted by a jolly ghost
          That rummaged like a rat.]
 
 
 [Footnote 4: 1842. Sets forth. Added in 1853.]
 
 [Footnote 5: This is a folk-lore story which has its variants, Mr.
 Alfred Nutt tells me, in almost every country in Europe. The
 Lincolnshire version of it is given in Miss Peacock's MS. collection of
 Lincolnshire folk-lore, of which she has most kindly sent me a copy, and
 it runs thus:--"There is a house in East Halton which is haunted by a
 hob-thrush.... Some years ago, it is said, a family who had lived in the
 house for more than a hundred years were much annoyed by it, and
 determined to quit the dwelling. They had placed their goods on a
 waggon, and were just on the point of starting when a neighbour asked
 the farmer whether he was leaving. On this the hobthrush put his head
 out of the splash-churn, which was amongst the household stuff, and
 said, 'Ay, we're flitting'. Whereupon the farmer decided to give up the
 attempt to escape from it and remain where he was." The same story is
 told of a Cluricaune in Croker's 'Fairy Legends and Traditions' in the
 South of Ireland. See 'The Haunted Cellar' in p. 81 of the edition of
 1862, and as Tennyson has elsewhere in 'Guinevere' borrowed a passage
 from the same story (see 'Illustrations of Tennyson', p. 152) it is
 probable that that was the source of the story here, though there the
 Cluricaune uses the expression, "Here we go altogether".]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1842 and 1843. I that am. Now, I that am.]
 
 [Footnote 7: 1842.
 
          scored upon the part
          Which cherubs want.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE EARLY POEMS OF
 
 EDWIN MORRIS;
 
 OR, THE LAKE
 
 This poem first appeared in the seventh edition of the Poems, 1851. It
 was written at Llanberis. Several alterations were made in the eighth
 edition of 1853, since then none, with the exception of "breath" for
 "breaths" in line 66.
 
 
   O Me, my pleasant rambles by the lake,
   My sweet, wild, fresh three-quarters of a year,
   My one Oasis in the dust and drouth
   Of city life! I was a sketcher then:
   See here, my doing: curves of mountain, bridge,
   Boat, island, ruins of a castle, built
   When men knew how to build, upon a rock,
   With turrets lichen-gilded like a rock:
   And here, new-comers in an ancient hold,
   New-comers from the Mersey, millionaires,
   Here lived the Hills--a Tudor-chimnied bulk
   Of mellow brickwork on an isle of bowers.
   O me, my pleasant rambles by the lake
   With Edwin Morris and with Edward Bull
   The curate; he was fatter than his cure.
 
   But Edwin Morris, he that knew the names,
   Long-learned names of agaric, moss and fern, [1]
   Who forged a thousand theories of the rocks,
   Who taught me how to skate, to row, to swim,
   Who read me rhymes elaborately good,
   His own--I call'd him Crichton, for he seem'd
   All-perfect, finish'd to the finger nail.[2]
   And once I ask'd him of his early life,
   And his first passion; and he answer'd me;
   And well his words became him: was he not
   A full-cell'd honeycomb of eloquence
   Stored from all flowers? Poet-like he spoke.
 
   "My love for Nature is as old as I;
   But thirty moons, one honeymoon to that,
   And three rich sennights more, my love for her.
   My love for Nature and my love for her,
   Of different ages, like twin-sisters grew, [3]
   Twin-sisters differently beautiful.
   To some full music rose and sank the sun,
   And some full music seem'd to move and change
   With all the varied changes of the dark,
   And either twilight and the day between;
   For daily hope fulfill'd, to rise again
   Revolving toward fulfilment, made it sweet
   To walk, to sit, to sleep, to wake, to breathe." [4]
 
   Or this or something like to this he spoke.
   Then said the fat-faced curate Edward Bull,
   "I take it, God made the woman for the man,
   And for the good and increase of the world,
   A pretty face is well, and this is well,
   To have a dame indoors, that trims us up,
   And keeps us tight; but these unreal ways
   Seem but the theme of writers, and indeed
   Worn threadbare. Man is made of solid stuff.
   I say, God made the woman for the man,
   And for the good and increase of the world."
 
   "Parson," said I, "you pitch the pipe too low:
   But I have sudden touches, and can run
   My faith beyond my practice into his:
   Tho' if, in dancing after Letty Hill,
   I do not hear the bells upon my cap,
   I scarce hear [5] other music: yet say on.
   What should one give to light on such a dream?"
   I ask'd him half-sardonically.
   "Give? Give all thou art," he answer'd, and a light
   Of laughter dimpled in his swarthy cheek;
   "I would have hid her needle in my heart,
   To save her little finger from a scratch
   No deeper than the skin: my ears could hear
   Her lightest breaths: her least remark was worth
   The experience of the wise. I went and came;
   Her voice fled always thro' the summer land;
   I spoke her name alone. Thrice-happy days!
   The flower of each, those moments when we met,
   The crown of all, we met to part no more."
 
   Were not his words delicious, I a beast
   To take them as I did? but something jarr'd;
   Whether he spoke too largely; that there seem'd
   A touch of something false, some self-conceit,
   Or over-smoothness: howsoe'er it was,
   He scarcely hit my humour, and I said:--
 
   "Friend Edwin, do not think yourself alone
   Of all men happy. Shall not Love to me,
   As in the Latin song I learnt at school,
   Sneeze out a full God-bless-you right and left? [6]
   But you can talk: yours is a kindly vein:
   I have I think--Heaven knows--as much within;
   Have or should have, but for a thought or two,
   That like a purple beech [7] among the greens
   Looks out of place: 'tis from no want in her:
   It is my shyness, or my self-distrust,
   Or something of a wayward modern mind
   Dissecting passion. Time will set me right."
 
   So spoke I knowing not the things that were.
   Then said the fat-faced curate, Edward Bull:
   "God made the woman for the use of man,
   And for the good and increase of the world".
   And I and Edwin laugh'd; and now we paused
   About the windings of the marge to hear
   The soft wind blowing over meadowy holms
   And alders, garden-isles [8]; and now we left
   The clerk behind us, I and he, and ran
   By ripply shallows of the lisping lake,
   Delighted with the freshness and the sound.
   But, when the bracken rusted on their crags,
   My suit had wither'd, nipt to death by him
   That was a God, and is a lawyer's clerk,
   The rentroll Cupid of our rainy isles. [9]
 
   'Tis true, we met; one hour I had, no more:
   She sent a note, the seal an _Elle vous suit_, [10]
   The close "Your Letty, only yours"; and this
   Thrice underscored. The friendly mist of morn
   Clung to the lake. I boated over, ran
   My craft aground, and heard with beating heart
   The Sweet-Gale rustle round the shelving keel;
   And out I stept, and up I crept: she moved,
   Like Proserpine in Enna, gathering flowers: [11]
   Then low and sweet I whistled thrice; and she,
   She turn'd, we closed, we kiss'd, swore faith, I breathed
   In some new planet: a silent cousin stole
   Upon us and departed: "Leave," she cried,
   "O leave me!" "Never, dearest, never: here
   I brave the worst:" and while we stood like fools
   Embracing, all at once a score of pugs
   And poodles yell'd within, and out they came
   Trustees and Aunts and Uncles. "What, with him!
   "Go" (shrill'd the cottonspinning chorus) "him!"
   I choked. Again they shriek'd the burthen "Him!"
   Again with hands of wild rejection "Go!--
   Girl, get you in!" She went--and in one month [12]
   They wedded her to sixty thousand pounds,
   To lands in Kent and messuages in York,
   And slight Sir Robert with his watery smile
   And educated whisker. But for me,
   They set an ancient creditor to work:
   It seems I broke a close with force and arms:
   There came a mystic token from the king
   To greet the sheriff, needless courtesy!
   I read, and fled by night, and flying turn'd:
   Her taper glimmer'd in the lake below:
   I turn'd once more, close-button'd to the storm;
   So left the place, [13] left Edwin, nor have seen
   Him since, nor heard of her, nor cared to hear.
   Nor cared to hear? perhaps; yet long ago
   I have pardon'd little Letty; not indeed,
   It may be, for her own dear sake but this,
   She seems a part of those fresh days to me;
   For in the dust and drouth of London life
   She moves among my visions of the lake,
   While the prime swallow dips his wing, or then
   While the gold-lily blows, and overhead
   The light cloud smoulders on the summer crag.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Agaric (some varieties are deadly) is properly the fungus
 on the larch; it then came to mean fungus generally. Minshew calls it "a
 white soft mushroom". See Halliwell, 'Dict. of Archaic and Provincial
 Words, sub vocent'.]
 
 [Footnote 2: The Latin factus 'ad unguem'. For Crichton, a half-mythical
 figure, see Tytler's 'Life' of him.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1851. Of different ages, like twin-sisters throve.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1853. To breathe, to wake.]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1872. Have.]
 
 [Footnote 6: The reference is to the 'Acme' and 'Septimius' of Catullus,
 xliv.--
 
   Hoc ut dixit,
   Amor, sinistram, ut ante,
   Dextram sternuit approbationem.]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: 1851. That like a copper beech.]
 
 [Footnote 8: 1851.
 
   garden-isles; and now we ran
   By ripply shallows.]
 
 
 [Footnote 9: 1851. The rainy isles.]
 
 [Footnote 10: Cf. Byron, 'Don Juan', i., xcvii.:--
 
   The seal a sunflower--'elle vous suit partout'.]
 
 
 [Footnote 11: 'Cf'. Milton, 'Par. Lost', iv., 268-9:--
 
   Not that fair field
   Of Enna where Proserpine gathering flowers
   ...
   Was gather'd.]
 
 
 [Footnote 12: 1851.
 
   "Go Sir!" Again they shrieked the burthen "Him!"
   Again with hands of wild rejection "Go!
   Girl, get you in" to her--and in one month, etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote 13: 1851.
 
   I read and wish'd to crush the race of man,
   And fled by night; turn'd once upon the hills;
   Her taper glimmer'd in the lake; and then
   I left the place, etc.]
 
 
 
 
 ST. SIMEON STYLITES
 
 First published in 1842, reprinted in all the subsequent editions of the
 poems but with no alterations in the text, except that in eighth line
 from the end "my" was substituted for "mine" in 1846. Tennyson informed
 a friend that it was not from the 'Acta Sanctorum', but from Hone's
 'Every-Day Book', vol. i., pp. 35-36, that he got the material for this
 poem, and a comparison with the narrative in Hone and the poem seems to
 show that this was the case.
 
 It is not easy to identify the St. Simeon Stylites of Hone's narrative
 and Tennyson's poem, whether he is to be identified with St. Simeon the
 Elder, of whom there are three memoirs given in the 'Acta Sanctorum',
 tom. i., 5th January, 261-286, or with St. Simeon Stylites, Junior, of
 whom there is an elaborate biography in Greek by Nicephorus printed with
 a Latin translation and notes in the 'Acta Sanctorum', tom. v., 24th
 May, 298-401. It seems clear that whoever compiled the account
 popularised by Hone had read both and amalgamated them. The main lines
 in the story of both saints are exactly the same. Both stood on columns,
 both tortured themselves in the same ways, both wrought miracles, and
 both died at their posts of penance. St. Simeon the Elder was born at
 Sisan in Syria about A.D. 390, and was buried at Antioch in A.D. 459 or
 460. The Simeon the Younger was born at Antioch A. D. 521 and died in
 A.D. 592. His life, which is of singular interest, is much more
 elaborately related.
 
 This poem is not simply a dramatic study. It bears very directly on
 Tennyson's philosophy of life. In these early poems he has given us four
 studies in the morbid anatomy of character: 'The Palace of Art', which
 illustrates the abuse of aesthetic and intellectual enjoyment of self;
 'The Vision of Sin', which illustrates the effects of similar indulgence
 in the grosser pleasures of the senses; 'The Two Voices', which
 illustrates the mischief of despondent self-absorption, while the
 present poem illustrates the equally pernicious indulgence in an
 opposite extreme, asceticism affected for the mere gratification of
 personal vanity.
 
 
   Altho' I be the basest of mankind,
   From scalp to sole one slough and crust of sin,
   Unfit for earth, unfit for heaven, scarce meet
   For troops of devils, mad with blasphemy,
   I will not cease to grasp the hope I hold
   Of saintdom, and to clamour, morn and sob,
   Battering the gates of heaven with storms of prayer,
   Have mercy, Lord, and take away my sin.
   Let this avail, just, dreadful, mighty God,
   This not be all in vain that thrice ten years,
   Thrice multiplied by superhuman pangs,
   In hungers and in thirsts, fevers and cold,
   In coughs, aches, stitches, ulcerous throes and cramps,
   A sign betwixt the meadow and the cloud,
   Patient on this tall pillar I have borne
   Rain, wind, frost, heat, hail, damp, and sleet, and snow;
   And I had hoped that ere this period closed
   Thou wouldst have caught me up into Thy rest,
   Denying not these weather-beaten limbs
   The meed of saints, the white robe and the palm.
   O take the meaning, Lord: I do not breathe,
   Not whisper, any murmur of complaint.
   Pain heap'd ten-hundred-fold to this, were still
   Less burthen, by ten-hundred-fold, to bear,
   Than were those lead-like tons of sin, that crush'd
   My spirit flat before thee. O Lord, Lord,
   Thou knowest I bore this better at the first,
   For I was strong and hale of body then;
   And tho' my teeth, which now are dropt away,
   Would chatter with the cold, and all my beard
   Was tagg'd with icy fringes in the moon,
   I drown'd the whoopings of the owl with sound
   Of pious hymns and psalms, and sometimes saw
   An angel stand and watch me, as I sang.
   Now am I feeble grown; my end draws nigh;
   I hope my end draws nigh: half deaf I am,
   So that I scarce can hear the people hum
   About the column's base, and almost blind,
   And scarce can recognise the fields I know;
   And both my thighs are rotted with the dew;
   Yet cease I not to clamour and to cry,
   While my stiff spine can hold my weary head,
   Till all my limbs drop piecemeal from the stone,
   Have mercy, mercy: take away my sin.
   O Jesus, if thou wilt not save my soul,
   Who may be saved? who is it may be saved?
   Who may be made a saint, if I fail here?
   Show me the man hath suffered more than I.
   For did not all thy martyrs die one death?
   For either they were stoned, or crucified,
   Or burn'd in fire, or boil'd in oil, or sawn
   In twain beneath the ribs; but I die here
   To-day, and whole years long, a life of death.
   Bear witness, if I could have found a way
   (And heedfully I sifted all my thought)
   More slowly-painful to subdue this home
   Of sin, my flesh, which I despise and hate,
   I had not stinted practice, O my God.
   For not alone this pillar-punishment, [1]
   Not this alone I bore: but while I lived
   In the white convent down the valley there,
   For many weeks about my loins I wore
   The rope that haled the buckets from the well,
   Twisted as tight as I could knot the noose;
   And spake not of it to a single soul,
   Until the ulcer, eating thro' my skin,
   Betray'd my secret penance, so that all
   My brethren marvell'd greatly. More than this
   I bore, whereof, O God, thou knowest all.[2]
   Three winters, that my soul might grow to thee,
   I lived up there on yonder mountain side.
   My right leg chain'd into the crag, I lay
   Pent in a roofless close of ragged stones;
   Inswathed sometimes in wandering mist, and twice
   Black'd with thy branding thunder, and sometimes
   Sucking the damps for drink, and eating not,
   Except the spare chance-gift of those that came
   To touch my body and be heal'd, and live:
   And they say then that I work'd miracles,
   Whereof my fame is loud amongst mankind,
   Cured lameness, palsies, cancers. Thou, O God,
   Knowest alone whether this was or no.
   Have mercy, mercy; cover all my sin.
 
   Then, that I might be more alone with thee, [3]
   Three years I lived upon a pillar, high
   Six cubits, and three years on one of twelve;
   And twice three years I crouch'd on one that rose
   Twenty by measure; last of all, I grew
   Twice ten long weary weary years to this,
   That numbers forty cubits from the soil.
   I think that I have borne as much as this--
   Or else I dream--and for so long a time,
   If I may measure time by yon slow light,
   And this high dial, which my sorrow crowns--
   So much--even so. And yet I know not well,
   For that the evil ones comes here, and say,
   "Fall down, O Simeon: thou hast suffer'd long
   For ages and for ages!" then they prate
   Of penances I cannot have gone thro',
   Perplexing me with lies; and oft I fall,
   Maybe for months, in such blind lethargies,
   That Heaven, and Earth, and Time are choked. But yet
   Bethink thee, Lord, while thou and all the saints
   Enjoy themselves in Heaven, and men on earth
   House in the shade of comfortable roofs,
   Sit with their wives by fires, eat wholesome food,
   And wear warm clothes, and even beasts have stalls,
   I, 'tween the spring and downfall of the light,
   Bow down one thousand and two hundred times,
   To Christ, the Virgin Mother, and the Saints;
   Or in the night, after a little sleep,
   I wake: the chill stars sparkle; I am wet
   With drenching dews, or stiff with crackling frost.
   I wear an undress'd goatskin on my back;
   A grazing iron collar grinds my neck;
   And in my weak, lean arms I lift the cross,
   And strive and wrestle with thee till I die:
   O mercy, mercy! wash away my sin.
   O Lord, thou knowest what a man I am;
   A sinful man, conceived and born in sin:
   'Tis their own doing; this is none of mine;
   Lay it not to me. Am I to blame for this,
   That here come those that worship me? Ha! ha!
   They think that I am somewhat. What am I?
   The silly people take me for a saint,
   And bring me offerings of fruit and flowers:
   And I, in truth (thou wilt bear witness here)
   Have all in all endured as much, and more
   Than many just and holy men, whose names
   Are register'd and calendar'd for saints.
   Good people, you do ill to kneel to me.
   What is it I can have done to merit this?
   I am a sinner viler than you all.
   It may be I have wrought some miracles, [4]
   And cured some halt and maim'd; but what of that?
   It may be, no one, even among the saints,
   May match his pains with mine; but what of that?
   Yet do not rise: for you may look on me,
   And in your looking you may kneel to God.
   Speak! is there any of you halt or maim'd?
   I think you know I have some power with Heaven
   From my long penance: let him speak his wish.
   Yes, I can heal. Power goes forth from me.
   They say that they are heal'd. Ah, hark! they shout
   "St. Simeon Stylites". Why, if so,
   God reaps a harvest in me. O my soul,
   God reaps a harvest in thee. If this be,
   Can I work miracles and not be saved?
   This is not told of any. They were saints.
   It cannot be but that I shall be saved;
   Yea, crown'd a saint. They shout, "Behold a saint!"
   And lower voices saint me from above.
   Courage, St. Simeon! This dull chrysalis
   Cracks into shining wings, and hope ere death
   Spreads more and more and more, that God hath now
   Sponged and made blank of crimeful record all
   My mortal archives. O my sons, my sons,
   I, Simeon of the pillar, by surname Stylites, among men;
   I, Simeon, The watcher on the column till the end;
   I, Simeon, whose brain the sunshine bakes;
   I, whose bald brows in silent hours become
   Unnaturally hoar with rime, do now
   From my high nest of penance here proclaim
   That Pontius and Iscariot by my side
   Show'd like fair seraphs. On the coals I lay,
   A vessel full of sin: all hell beneath
   Made me boil over. Devils pluck'd my sleeve; [5]
   Abaddon and Asmodeus caught at me.
   I smote them with the cross; they swarm'd again.
   In bed like monstrous apes they crush'd my chest:
   They flapp'd my light out as I read: I saw
   Their faces grow between me and my book:
   With colt-like whinny and with hoggish whine
   They burst my prayer. Yet this way was left,
   And by this way I'scaped them. Mortify
   Your flesh, like me, with scourges and with thorns;
   Smite, shrink not, spare not. If it may be, fast
   Whole Lents, and pray. I hardly, with slow steps,
   With slow, faint steps, and much exceeding pain,
   Have scrambled past those pits of fire, that still
   Sing in mine ears. But yield not me the praise:
   God only thro' his bounty hath thought fit,
   Among the powers and princes of this world,
   To make me an example to mankind,
   Which few can reach to. Yet I do not say
   But that a time may come--yea, even now,
   Now, now, his footsteps smite the threshold stairs
   Of life--I say, that time is at the doors
   When you may worship me without reproach;
   For I will leave my relics in your land,
   And you may carve a shrine about my dust,
   And burn a fragrant lamp before my bones,
   When I am gather'd to the glorious saints.
   While I spake then, a sting of shrewdest pain
   Ran shrivelling thro' me, and a cloudlike change,
   In passing, with a grosser film made thick
   These heavy, horny eyes. The end! the end!
   Surely the end! What's here? a shape, a shade,
   A flash of light. Is that the angel there
   That holds a crown? Come, blessed brother, come,
   I know thy glittering face. I waited long;
   My brows are ready. What! deny it now?
   Nay, draw, draw, draw nigh. So I clutch it. Christ!
   'Tis gone: 'tis here again; the crown! the crown! [6]
   So now 'tis fitted on and grows to me,
   And from it melt the dews of Paradise,
   Sweet! sweet! spikenard, and balm, and frankincense.
   Ah! let me not be fool'd, sweet saints: I trust
   That I am whole, and clean, and meet for Heaven.
   Speak, if there be a priest, a man of God,
   Among you there, and let him presently
   Approach, and lean a ladder on the shaft,
   And climbing up into my airy home,
   Deliver me the blessed sacrament;
   For by the warning of the Holy Ghost,
   I prophesy that I shall die to-night,
   A quarter before twelve. [7] But thou, O Lord,
   Aid all this foolish people; let them take
   Example, pattern: lead them to thy light.
 
 [Footnote 1: For this incident 'cf. Acta', v., 317:
 
   "Petit aliquando ab aliquo ad se invisente funem, acceptumque circa
   corpus convolvit constringitque tarn arete ut, exesa carne, quae istuc
   mollis admodum ac tenera est, nudae costae exstarent".
 
 The same is told also of the younger Stylites, where the incident of
 concealing the torture is added, 'Acta', i., 265.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: For this retirement to a mountain see 'Acta', i., 270, and
 it is referred to in the other lives:
 
   "Post haec egressus occulte perrexit in montem non longe a monasterio,
   ibique sibi clausulam de sicca petra fecit, et stetit sic annos
   tres."]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: In accurate accordance with the third life, 'Acta',
 i., 277:
 
   "Primum quidem columna ad sex erecta cubitos est, deinde ad duodecim,
   post ad vigenti extensa est";
 
 but for the thirty-six cubits which is assigned as the height of the
 last column Tennyson's authority, drawing on another account ('Id'.,
 271), substitutes forty:
 
   "Fecerunt illi columnam habentem cubitos quadraginta".]
 
 
 [Footnote 4: For the miracles wrought by him see all the lives.]
 
 [Footnote 5:  These details seem taken from the well-known stories about
 Luther and Bunyan. All that the 'Acta' say about St. Simeon is that
 he was pestered by devils.]
 
 [Footnote 6: The 'Acta' say nothing about the crown, but dwell on the
 supernatural fragrance which exhaled from the saint.]
 
 [Footnote 7: Tennyson has given a very poor substitute for the
 beautifully pathetic account given of the death of St. Simeon in 'Acta',
 i., 168, and again in the ninth chapter of the second Life, 'Ibid'.,
 273. But this is to be explained perhaps by the moral purpose of the
 poem.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE TALKING OAK
 
 First published in 1842, and republished in all subsequent editions with
 only two slight alterations: in line 113 a mere variant in spelling, and
 in line 185, where in place of the present reading the editions between
 1842 and 1848 read, "For, ah! the Dryad-days were brief".
 
 Tennyson told Mr. Aubrey de Vere that the poem was an experiment meant
 to test the degree in which it is in the power of poetry to humanise
 external nature. Tennyson might have remembered that Ovid had made the
 same experiment nearly two thousand years ago, while Goethe had
 immediately anticipated him in his charming 'Der Junggesett und der
 Muehlbach'. There was certainly no novelty in such an attempt. The poem
 is in parts charmingly written, but the oak is certainly "garrulously
 given," and comes perilously near to tediousness.
 
 
   Once more the gate behind me falls;
   Once more before my face
   I see the moulder'd Abbey-walls,
   That stand within the chace.
 
   Beyond the lodge the city lies,
   Beneath its drift of smoke;
   And ah! with what delighted eyes
   I turn to yonder oak.
 
   For when my passion first began,
   Ere that, which in me burn'd,
   The love, that makes me thrice a man,
   Could hope itself return'd;
 
   To yonder oak within the field
   I spoke without restraint,
   And with a larger faith appeal'd
   Than Papist unto Saint.
 
   For oft I talk'd with him apart,
   And told him of my choice,
   Until he plagiarised a heart,
   And answer'd with a voice.
 
   Tho' what he whisper'd, under Heaven
   None else could understand;
   I found him garrulously given,
   A babbler in the land.
 
   But since I heard him make reply
   Is many a weary hour;
   'Twere well to question him, and try
   If yet he keeps the power.
 
   Hail, hidden to the knees in fern,
   Broad Oak of Sumner-chace,
   Whose topmost branches can discern
   The roofs of Sumner-place!
 
   Say thou, whereon I carved her name,
   If ever maid or spouse,
   As fair as my Olivia, came
   To rest beneath thy boughs.--
 
   "O Walter, I have shelter'd here
   Whatever maiden grace
   The good old Summers, year by year,
   Made ripe in Sumner-chace:
 
   "Old Summers, when the monk was fat,
   And, issuing shorn and sleek,
   Would twist his girdle tight, and pat
   The girls upon the cheek.
 
   "Ere yet, in scorn of Peter's-pence,
   And number'd bead, and shrift,
   Bluff Harry broke into the spence, [1]
   And turn'd the cowls adrift:
 
   "And I have seen some score of those
   Fresh faces, that would thrive
   When his man-minded offset rose
   To chase the deer at five;
 
   "And all that from the town would stroll,
   Till that wild wind made work
   In which the gloomy brewer's soul
   Went by me, like a stork:
 
   "The slight she-slips of loyal blood,
   And others, passing praise,
   Strait-laced, but all too full in bud
   For puritanic stays: [2]
 
   "And I have shadow'd many a group
   Of beauties, that were born
   In teacup-times of hood and hoop,
   Or while the patch was worn;
 
   "And, leg and arm with love-knots gay,
   About me leap'd and laugh'd
   The Modish Cupid of the day,
   And shrill'd his tinsel shaft.
 
   "I swear (and else may insects prick
   Each leaf into a gall)
   This girl, for whom your heart is sick,
   Is three times worth them all;
 
   "For those and theirs, by Nature's law,
   Have faded long ago;
   But in these latter springs I saw
   Your own Olivia blow,
 
   "From when she gamboll'd on the greens,
   A baby-germ, to when
   The maiden blossoms of her teens
   Could number five from ten.
 
   "I swear, by leaf, and wind, and rain
   (And hear me with thine ears),
   That, tho' I circle in the grain
   Five hundred rings of years--
 
   "Yet, since I first could cast a shade,
   Did never creature pass
   So slightly, musically made,
   So light upon the grass:
 
   "For as to fairies, that will flit
   To make the greensward fresh,
   I hold them exquisitely knit,
   But far too spare of flesh."
 
   Oh, hide thy knotted knees in fern,
   And overlook the chace;
   And from thy topmost branch discern
   The roofs of Sumner-place.
 
   But thou, whereon I carved her name,
   That oft hast heard my vows,
   Declare when last Olivia came
   To sport beneath thy boughs.
 
   "O yesterday, you know, the fair
   Was holden at the town;
   Her father left his good arm-chair,
   And rode his hunter down.
 
   "And with him Albert came on his.
   I look'd at him with joy:
   As cowslip unto oxlip is,
   So seems she to the boy.
 
   "An hour had past--and, sitting straight
   Within the low-wheel'd chaise,
   Her mother trundled to the gate
   Behind the dappled grays.
 
   "But, as for her, she stay'd [3] at home,
   And on the roof she went,
   And down the way you use to come,
   She look'd with discontent.
 
   "She left the novel half-uncut
   Upon the rosewood shelf;
   She left the new piano shut:
   She could not please herself.
 
   "Then ran she, gamesome as the colt,
   And livelier than a lark
   She sent her voice thro' all the holt
   Before her, and the park.
 
   "A light wind chased her on the wing,
   And in the chase grew wild,
   As close as might be would he cling
   About the darling child:
 
   "But light as any wind that blows
   So fleetly did she stir,
   The flower she touch'd on dipt and rose,
   And turn'd to look at her.
 
   "And here she came, and round me play'd,
   And sang to me the whole
   Of those three stanzas that you made
   About my 'giant bole';
 
   "And in a fit of frolic mirth
   She strove to span my waist:
   Alas, I was so broad of girth,
   I could not be embraced.
 
   "I wish'd myself the fair young beech
   That here beside me stands,
   That round me, clasping each in each,
   She might have lock'd her hands.
 
   "Yet seem'd the pressure thrice as sweet
   As woodbine's fragile hold,
   Or when I feel about my feet
   The berried briony fold."
 
   O muffle round thy knees with fern,
   And shadow Sumner-chace!
   Long may thy topmost branch discern
   The roofs of Sumner-place!
 
   But tell me, did she read the name
   I carved with many vows
   When last with throbbing heart I came
   To rest beneath thy boughs?
 
   "O yes, she wander'd round and round
   These knotted knees of mine,
   And found, and kiss'd the name she found,
   And sweetly murmur'd thine.
 
   "A teardrop trembled from its source,
   And down my surface crept.
   My sense of touch is something coarse,
   But I believe she wept.
 
   "Then flush'd her cheek with rosy light,
   She glanced across the plain;
   But not a creature was in sight:
   She kiss'd me once again.
 
   "Her kisses were so close and kind,
   That, trust me on my word,
   Hard wood I am, and wrinkled rind,
   But yet my sap was stirr'd:
 
   "And even into my inmost ring
   A pleasure I discern'd
   Like those blind motions of the Spring,
   That show the year is turn'd.
 
   "Thrice-happy he that may caress
   The ringlet's waving balm
   The cushions of whose touch may press
   The maiden's tender palm.
 
   "I, rooted here among the groves,
   But languidly adjust
   My vapid vegetable loves [4]
   With anthers and with dust:
 
   "For, ah! my friend, the days were brief [5]
   Whereof the poets talk,
   When that, which breathes within the leaf,
   Could slip its bark and walk.
 
   "But could I, as in times foregone,
   From spray, and branch, and stem,
   Have suck'd and gather'd into one
   The life that spreads in them,
 
   "She had not found me so remiss;
   But lightly issuing thro',
   I would have paid her kiss for kiss
   With usury thereto."
 
   O flourish high, with leafy towers,
   And overlook the lea,
   Pursue thy loves among the bowers,
   But leave thou mine to me.
 
   O flourish, hidden deep in fern,
   Old oak, I love thee well;
   A thousand thanks for what I learn
   And what remains to tell.
 
   "'Tis little more: the day was warm;
   At last, tired out with play,
   She sank her head upon her arm,
   And at my feet she lay.
 
   "Her eyelids dropp'd their silken eaves.
   I breathed upon her eyes
   Thro' all the summer of my leaves
   A welcome mix'd with sighs.
 
   "I took the swarming sound of life--
   The music from the town--
   The murmurs of the drum and fife
   And lull'd them in my own.
 
   "Sometimes I let a sunbeam slip,
   To light her shaded eye;
   A second flutter'd round her lip
   Like a golden butterfly;
 
   "A third would glimmer on her neck
   To make the necklace shine;
   Another slid, a sunny fleck,
   From head to ancle fine.
 
   "Then close and dark my arms I spread,
   And shadow'd all her rest--
   Dropt dews upon her golden head,
   An acorn in her breast.
 
   "But in a pet she started up,
   And pluck'd it out, and drew
   My little oakling from the cup,
   And flung him in the dew.
 
   "And yet it was a graceful gift--
   I felt a pang within
   As when I see the woodman lift
   His axe to slay my kin.
 
   "I shook him down because he was
   The finest on the tree.
   He lies beside thee on the grass.
   O kiss him once for me.
 
   "O kiss him twice and thrice for me,
   That have no lips to kiss,
   For never yet was oak on lea
   Shall grow so fair as this."
 
   Step deeper yet in herb and fern,
   Look further thro' the chace,
   Spread upward till thy boughs discern
   The front of Sumner-place.
 
   This fruit of thine by Love is blest,
   That but a moment lay
   Where fairer fruit of Love may rest
   Some happy future day.
 
   I kiss it twice, I kiss it thrice,
   The warmth it thence shall win
   To riper life may magnetise
   The baby-oak within.
 
   But thou, while kingdoms overset,
   Or lapse from hand to hand,
   Thy leaf shall never fail, nor yet
   Thine acorn in the land.
 
   May never saw dismember thee,
   Nor wielded axe disjoint,
   That art the fairest-spoken tree
   From here to Lizard-point.
 
   O rock upon thy towery top
   All throats that gurgle sweet!
   All starry culmination drop
   Balm-dews to bathe thy feet!
 
   All grass of silky feather grow--
   And while he sinks or swells
   The full south-breeze around thee blow
   The sound of minster bells.
 
   The fat earth feed thy branchy root,
   That under deeply strikes!
   The northern morning o'er thee shoot
   High up, in silver spikes!
 
   Nor ever lightning char thy grain,
   But, rolling as in sleep,
   Low thunders bring the mellow rain,
   That makes thee broad and deep!
 
   And hear me swear a solemn oath,
   That only by thy side
   Will I to Olive plight my troth,
   And gain her for my bride.
 
   And when my marriage morn may fall,
   She, Dryad-like, shall wear
   Alternate leaf and acorn-ball
   In wreath about her hair.
 
   And I will work in prose and rhyme,
   And praise thee more in both
   Than bard has honour'd beech or lime,
   Or that Thessalian growth, [6]
 
   In which the swarthy ringdove sat,
   And mystic sentence spoke;
   And more than England honours that,
   Thy famous brother-oak,
 
   Wherein the younger Charles abode
   Till all the paths were dim,
   And far below the Roundhead rode,
   And humm'd a surly hymn.
 
 [Footnote 1: Spence is a larder and buttery. In the 'Promptorium
 Parverum it is defined as "cellarium promptuarium".]
 
 [Footnote 2: Cf. Burns' "godly laces," 'To the Unco Righteous'.]
 
 [Footnote 3: All editions previous to 1853 have 'staid'.]
 
 [Footnote 4: The phrase is Marvell's. 'Cf. To his Coy Mistress' (a
 favourite poem of Tennyson's), "my vegetable loves should grow".]
 
 [Footnote 5: 1842 to 1850. "For, ah! the Dryad-days were brief.]
 
 [Footnote 6: A reference to the oracular oaks of Dodona which was, of
 course, in Epirus, but the Ancients believed, no doubt erroneously, that
 there was another Dodona in Thessaly. See the article "Dodona" in
 Smith's 'Dict. of Greek and Roman Geography'.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LOVE AND DUTY
 
 Published first in 1842.
 
 Whether this beautiful poem is autobiographical and has reference to the
 compulsory separation of Tennyson and Miss Emily Sellwood, afterwards
 his wife, in 1840, it is impossible for this editor to say, as Lord
 Tennyson in his 'Life' of his father is silent on the subject.
 
 
   Of love that never found his earthly close,
   What sequel? Streaming eyes and breaking hearts?
   Or all the same as if he had not been?
   Not so. Shall Error in the round of time
   Still father Truth? O shall the braggart shout [1]
   For some blind glimpse of freedom work itself
   Thro' madness, hated by the wise, to law
   System and empire? Sin itself be found
   The cloudy porch oft opening on the Sun?
   And only he, this wonder, dead, become
   Mere highway dust? or year by year alone
   Sit brooding in the ruins of a life,
   Nightmare of youth, the spectre of himself!
   If this were thus, if this, indeed, were all,
   Better the narrow brain, the stony heart,
   The staring eye glazed o'er with sapless days,
   The long mechanic pacings to and fro,
   The set gray life, and apathetic end.
   But am I not the nobler thro' thy love?
   O three times less unworthy! likewise thou
   Art more thro' Love, and greater than thy years.
   The Sun will run his orbit, and the Moon
   Her circle. Wait, and Love himself will bring
   The drooping flower of knowledge changed to fruit
   Of wisdom. [2] Wait: my faith is large in Time,
   And that which shapes it to some perfect end.
   Will some one say, then why not ill for good?
   Why took ye not your pastime? To that man
   My work shall answer, since I knew the right
   And did it; for a man is not as God,
   But then most Godlike being most a man.--
   So let me think 'tis well for thee and me--
   Ill-fated that I am, what lot is mine
   Whose foresight preaches peace, my heart so slow
   To feel it! For how hard it seem'd to me,
   When eyes, love-languid thro' half-tears, would dwell
   One earnest, earnest moment upon mine,
   Then not to dare to see! when thy low voice,
   Faltering, would break its syllables, to keep
   My own full-tuned,--hold passion in a leash,
   And not leap forth and fall about thy neck,
   And on thy bosom, (deep-desired relief!)
   Rain out the heavy mist of tears, that weigh'd
   Upon my brain, my senses, and my soul!
   For love himself took part against himself
   To warn us off, and Duty loved of Love--
   O this world's curse--beloved but hated--came Like
   Death betwixt thy dear embrace and mine,
   And crying, "Who is this? behold thy bride,"
   She push'd me from thee.
 
                           If the sense is hard
   To alien ears, I did not speak to these--
   No, not to thee, but to thyself in me:
   Hard is my doom and thine: thou knowest it all.
   Could Love part thus? was it not well to speak,
   To have spoken once? It could not but be well.
   The slow sweet hours that bring us all things good, [3]
   The slow sad hours that bring us all things ill,
   And all good things from evil, brought the night
   In which we sat together and alone,
   And to the want, that hollow'd all the heart,
   Gave utterance by the yearning of an eye,
   That burn'd upon its object thro' such tears
   As flow but once a life. The trance gave way
   To those caresses, when a hundred times
   In that last kiss, which never was the last,
   Farewell, like endless welcome, lived and died.
   Then follow'd counsel, comfort and the words
   That make a man feel strong in speaking truth;
   Till now the dark was worn, and overhead
   The lights of sunset and of sunrise mix'd
   In that brief night; the summer night, that paused
   Among her stars to hear us; stars that hung
   Love-charm'd to listen: all the wheels of Time
   Spun round in station, but the end had come.
   O then like those, who clench [4] their nerves to rush
   Upon their dissolution, we two rose,
   There-closing like an individual life--
   In one blind cry of passion and of pain,
   Like bitter accusation ev'n to death,
   Caught up the whole of love and utter'd it,
   And bade adieu for ever. Live--yet live--
   Shall sharpest pathos blight us, knowing all
   Life needs for life is possible to will--
   Live happy; tend thy flowers; be tended by
   My blessing! Should my Shadow cross thy thoughts
   Too sadly for their peace, remand it thou
   For calmer hours to Memory's darkest hold, [5]
   If not to be forgotten--not at once--
   Not all forgotten. Should it cross thy dreams,
   O might it come like one that looks content,
   With quiet eyes unfaithful to the truth,
   And point thee forward to a distant light,
   Or seem to lift a burthen from thy heart
   And leave thee freer, till thou wake refresh'd,
   Then when the first low matin-chirp hath grown
   Full quire, and morning driv'n her plow of pearl [6]
   Far furrowing into light the mounded rack,
   Beyond the fair green field and eastern sea.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: As this passage is a little obscure, it may not be
 superfluous to point out that "shout" is a substantive.]
 
 [Footnote 2: The distinction between "knowledge" and "wisdom" is a
 favourite one with Tennyson. See 'In Memoriam', cxiv.; 'Locksley
 Hall', 141, and for the same distinction see Cowper, 'Task',
 vi., 88-99.]
 
 [Footnote 3: Suggested by Theocritus, 'Id'., xv., 104-5.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1842 to 1845. O then like those, that clench.]
 
 [Footnote 5: Pathos, in the Greek sense, "suffering". All editions up to
 and including 1850 have a small "s" and a small "m" for Shadow and
 Memory, and read thus:--
 
   Too sadly for their peace, so put it back
   For calmer hours in memory's darkest hold,
   If unforgotten! should it cross thy dreams,
   So might it come, etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: 'Cf. Princess', iii.:--
 
   Morn in the white wake of the morning star
   Came furrowing all the orient into gold,
 
 and with both cf. Greene, 'Orlando Furioso', i., 2:--
 
   Seest thou not Lycaon's son?
   The hardy plough-swain unto mighty Jove
   Hath _trac'd his silver furrows in the heaven_,
 
 which in its turn is borrowed from Ariosto, 'Orl. Fur.', xx.,
 lxxxii.:--
 
   Apena avea Licaonia prole
   Per li solchi del ciel volto
   L'aratro.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE GOLDEN YEAR
 
 This poem was first published in the fourth edition of the poems 1846.
 No alterations were made in it after 1851. The poem had a message for
 the time at which it was written. The country was in a very troubled
 state. The contest between the Protectionists and Free-traders was at
 its acutest stage. The Maynooth endowment and the "godless colleges" had
 brought into prominence questions of the gravest moment in religion and
 education, while the Corn Bill and the Coercion Bill had inflamed the
 passions of party politicians almost to madness. Tennyson, his son tells
 us, entered heartily into these questions, believing that the remedies
 for these distempers lay in the spread of education, a more catholic
 spirit in the press, a partial adoption of Free Trade principles, and
 union as far as possible among the different sections of Christianity.
 
 
   Well, you shall have that song which Leonard wrote:
   It was last summer on a tour in Wales:
   Old James was with me: we that day had been
   Up Snowdon; and I wish'd for Leonard there,
   And found him in Llanberis: [1] then we crost
   Between the lakes, and clamber'd half-way up
   The counterside; and that same song of his
   He told me; for I banter'd him, and swore
   They said he lived shut up within himself,
   A tongue-tied Poet in the feverous days,
   That, setting the _how much_ before the _how_,
   Cry, like the daughters of the horseleech, "Give, [2]
   Cram us with all," but count not me the herd!
   To which "They call me what they will," he said:
   "But I was born too late: the fair new forms,
   That float about the threshold of an age,
   Like truths of Science waiting to be caught--
   Catch me who can, and make the catcher crown'd--
   Are taken by the forelock. Let it be.
   But if you care indeed to listen, hear
   These measured words, my work of yestermorn.
   "We sleep and wake and sleep, but all things move;
   The Sun flies forward to his brother Sun;
   The dark Earth follows wheel'd in her ellipse;
   And human things returning on themselves
   Move onward, leading up the golden year.
   "Ah, tho' the times, when some new thought can bud,
   Are but as poets' seasons when they flower,
   Yet seas, that daily gain upon the shore, [3]
   Have ebb and flow conditioning their march,
   And slow and sure comes up the golden year.
   "When wealth no more shall rest in mounded heaps,
   But smit with freer light shall slowly melt
   In many streams to fatten lower lands,
   And light shall spread, and man be liker man
   Thro' all the season of the golden year.
   "Shall eagles not be eagles? wrens be wrens?
   If all the world were falcons, what of that?
   The wonder of the eagle were the less,
   But he not less the eagle. Happy days
   Roll onward, leading up the golden year.
   "Fly happy happy sails and bear the Press;
   Fly happy with the mission of the Cross;
   Knit land to land, and blowing havenward
   With silks, and fruits, and spices, clear of toll,
   Enrich the markets of the golden year.
   "But we grow old! Ah! when shall all men's good
   Be each man's rule, and universal Peace
   Lie like a shaft of light across the land,
   And like a lane of beams athwart the sea,
   Thro' all the circle of the golden year?"
   Thus far he flow'd, and ended; whereupon
   "Ah, folly!" in mimic cadence answer'd James--
   "Ah, folly! for it lies so far away.
   Not in our time, nor in our children's time,
   'Tis like the second world to us that live;
   'Twere all as one to fix our hopes on Heaven
   As on this vision of the golden year."
   With that he struck his staff against the rocks
   And broke it,--James,--you know him,--old, but full
   Of force and choler, and firm upon his feet,
   And like an oaken stock in winter woods,
   O'erflourished with the hoary clematis:
   Then added, all in heat: "What stuff is this!
   Old writers push'd the happy season back,--
   The more fools they,--we forward: dreamers both:
   You most, that in an age, when every hour
   Must sweat her sixty minutes to the death,
   Live on, God love us, as if the seedsman, rapt
   Upon the teeming harvest, should not dip [4]
   His hand into the bag: but well I know
   That unto him who works, and feels he works,
   This same grand year is ever at the doors."
   He spoke; and, high above, I heard them blast
   The steep slate-quarry, and the great echo flap
   And buffet round the hills from bluff to bluff.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1846 to 1850.
 
   And joined him in Llanberis; and that same song
   He told me, etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: Proverbs xxx. 15:
 
   "The horseleach hath two daughters, crying,
   Give, give".]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: 1890. Altered to "Yet oceans daily gaining on the land".]
 
 [Footnote 4: 'Selections', 1865. Plunge.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ULYSSES
 
 First published in 1842, no alterations were made in it subsequently.
 
 This noble poem, which is said to have induced Sir Robert Peel to give
 Tennyson his pension, was written soon after Arthur Hallam's death,
 presumably therefore in 1833. "It gave my feeling," Tennyson said to his
 son, "about the need of going forward and braving the struggle of life
 perhaps more simply than anything in 'In Memoriam'." It is not the
 'Ulysses' of Homer, nor was it suggested by the 'Odyssey'. The germ, the
 spirit and the sentiment of the poem are from the twenty-sixth canto of
 Dante's 'Inferno', where Ulysses in the Limbo of the Deceivers speaks
 from the flame which swathes him. I give a literal version of the
 passage:--
 
   "Neither fondness for my son nor reverence for my aged sire nor the
   due love which ought to have gladdened Penelope could conquer in me
   the ardour which I had to become experienced in the world and in human
   vice and worth. I put out into the deep open sea with but one ship and
   with that small company which had not deserted me.... I and my
   companions were old and tardy when we came to that narrow pass where
   Hercules assigned his landmarks. 'O brothers,' I said, 'who through a
   hundred thousand dangers have reached the West deny not to this the
   brief vigil of your senses that remain, experience of the unpeopled
   world beyond the sun. Consider your origin, ye were not formed to live
   like Brutes but to follow virtue and knowledge.... Night already saw
   the other pole with all its stars and ours so low that it rose not
   from the ocean floor'"
 
   ('Inferno', xxvi., 94-126).
 
 But if the germ is here the expansion is Tennyson's; he has added
 elaboration and symmetry, fine touches, magical images and magical
 diction. There is nothing in Dante which answers to--
 
   Yet all experience is an arch wherethro'
   Gleams that untravell'd world, whose margin fades
   For ever and for ever when I move.
 
 or
 
   It may be that the gulfs will wash us down:
   It may be we shall touch the Happy Isles,
   And see the great Achilles, whom we knew.
 
 Of these lines well does Carlyle say what so many will feel: "These
 lines do not make me weep, but there is in me what would till whole
 Lacrymatorics as I read".
 
 
   It little profits that an idle king,
   By this still hearth, among these barren crags,
   Match'd with an aged wife, I mete and dole
   Unequal laws unto a savage race,
   That hoard, and sleep, and feed, and know not me.
   I cannot rest from travel: I will drink
   Life to the lees: all times I have enjoy'd
   Greatly, have suffer'd greatly, both with those
   That loved me, and alone; on shore, and when
   Thro' scudding drifts the rainy Hyades [1]
   Vext the dim sea: I am become a name;
   For always roaming with a hungry heart
   Much have I seen and known; cities of men
   And manners, climates, councils, governments, [2]
   Myself not least, but honour'd of them all;
   And drunk delight of battle with my peers,
   Far on the ringing plains of windy Troy.
   I am a part of all that I have met;
   Yet all experience is an arch wherethro'
   Gleams that untravell'd world, whose margin fades
   For ever and for ever when I move.
   How dull it is to pause, to make an end, [3]
   To rust unburnish'd, not to shine in use!
   As tho' to breathe were life. Life piled on life
   Were all too little, and of one to me
   Little remains: but every hour is saved
   From that eternal silence, something more,
   A bringer of new things; and vile it were
   For some three suns to store and hoard myself,
   And this gray spirit yearning in desire
   To follow knowledge, like a sinking star,
   Beyond the utmost bound of human thought.
 
   This is my son, mine own Telemachus, [4]
   To whom I leave the sceptre and the isle--
   Well-loved of me, discerning to fulfil
   This labour, by slow prudence to make mild
   A rugged people, and thro' soft degrees
   Subdue them to the useful and the good.
   Most blameless is he, centred in the sphere
   Of common duties, decent not to fail
   In offices of tenderness, and pay
   Meet adoration to my household gods,
   When I am gone. He works his work, I mine.
   There lies the port: the vessel puffs her sail:
   There gloom the dark broad seas. My mariners,
   Souls that have toil'd and wrought, and thought with me--
   That ever with a frolic welcome took
   The thunder and the sunshine, and opposed
   Free hearts, free foreheads--you and I are old;
   Old age hath yet his honour and his toil;
   Death closes all; but something ere the end,
   Some work of noble note, may yet be done,
   Not unbecoming men that strove with Gods.
   The lights begin to twinkle from the rocks:
   The long day wanes: the slow moon climbs: the deep
   Moans round with many voices. Come, my friends,
   'Tis not too late to seek a newer world.
   Push off, and sitting well in order smite
   The sounding furrows; for my purpose holds
   To sail beyond the sunset, and the baths
   Of all the western stars, until I die.
   It may be that the gulfs will wash us down:
   It may be we shall touch the Happy Isles, [5]
   And see the great Achilles, whom we knew.
   Tho' much is taken, much abides; and tho'
   We are not now that strength which in old days
   Moved earth and heaven; that which we are, we are;
   One equal temper of heroic hearts,
   Made weak by time and fate, but strong in will
   To strive, to seek, to find, and not to yield.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Virgil, 'AEn'., i., 748, and iii., 516.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 'Odyssey', i., 1-4.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 'Cf'. Shakespeare, 'Troilus and Cressida':--
 
   Perseverance, dear, my lord,
   Keeps honour bright: To have done, is to hang
   Quite out of fashion, like a rusty nail
   In monumental mockery.]
 
 
 [Footnote 4: How admirably has Tennyson touched off the character of the
 Telemachus of the 'Odyssey'.]
 
 [Footnote 5: The Happy Isles, the 'Fortunatae Insulae' of the Romans and
 the
 
   [Greek: ai t_on Makar_on naesoi]
 
 of the Greeks, have been identified by geographers as those islands in
 the Atlantic off the west coast of Africa; some take them to mean the
 Canary Islands, the Madeira group and the Azores, while they may have
 included the Cape de Verde Islands as well. What seems certain is that
 these places with their soft delicious climate and lovely scenery gave
 the poets an idea of a happy abode for departed spirits, and so the
 conception of the _Elysian Fields_. The _loci classici_ on these abodes
 are Homer, Odyssey, iv., 563 _seqq_.:--
 
   [Greek: alla s' es Elysion pedion kai peirata gaiaes athanatoi
   pempsousin, hothi xanthos Rhadamanthus tae per rhaeistae biotae pelei
   anthr_opoisin, ou niphetos, out' ar cheim_on polus, oute pot' ombros
   all' aiei Zephuroio ligu pneiontas aaetas _okeanos aniaesin
   anapsuchein anthr_opous.
 
   [But the Immortals will convey thee to the Elysian plain and the
   world's limits where is Rhadamanthus of the golden hair, where life is
   easiest for man; no snow is there, no nor no great storm, nor any
   rain, but always ocean sendeth forth the shrilly breezes of the West
   to cool and refresh men],
 
 and Pindar, 'Olymp'., ii., 178 'seqq'., compared with the splendid
 fragment at the beginning of the 'Dirges'. Elysium was afterwards placed
 in the netherworld, as by Virgil. Thus, as so often the suggestion was
 from the facts of geography, the rest soon became an allegorical myth,
 and to attempt to identify and localise "the Happy Isles" is as great an
 absurdity as to attempt to identify and localise the island of
 Shakespeare's 'Tempest'.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LOCKSLEY HALL
 
 First published in 1842, and no alterations were made in it subsequently
 to the edition of 1850; except that in the Selections published in 1865
 in the third stanza the reading was "half in ruin" for "in the
 distance". This poem, as Tennyson explained, was not autobiographic but
 purely imaginary, "representing young life, its good side, its
 deficiences and its yearnings". The poem, he added, was written in
 Trochaics because the elder Hallam told him that the English people
 liked that metre. The hero is a sort of preliminary sketch of the hero
 in 'Maud', the position and character of each being very similar: both
 are cynical and querulous, and break out into tirades against their kind
 and society; both have been disappointed in love, and both find the same
 remedy for their afflictions by mixing themselves with action and
 becoming "one with their kind".
 
 'Locksley Hall' was suggested, as Tennyson acknowledged, by Sir William
 Jones' translation of the old Arabian Moallakat, a collection from the
 works of pre-Mahommedan poets. See Sir William Jones' works, quarto
 edition, vol. iv., pp. 247-57. But only one of these poems, namely the
 poem of Amriolkais, could have immediately influenced him. In this the
 poet supposes himself attended on a journey by a company of friends, and
 they pass near a place where his mistress had lately lived, but from
 which her tribe had then removed. He desires them to stop awhile, that
 he may weep over the deserted remains of her tent. They comply with his
 request, but exhort him to show more strength of mind, and urge two
 topics of consolation, namely, that he had before been equally unhappy
 and that he had enjoyed his full share of pleasures. Thus by the
 recollection of his past delights his imagination is kindled and his
 grief suspended. But Tennyson's chief indebtedness is rather in the
 oriental colouring given to his poem, chiefly in the sentiment and
 imagery. Thus in the couplet--
 
     Many a night I saw the Pleiads rising through the mellow shade
     Glitter like a swarm of fireflies tangl'd in a silver braid,
 
 we are reminded of "It was the hour when the Pleiads appeared in the
 firmament like the folds of a silken sash variously decked with gems".
 
 
   Comrades, leave me here a little, while as yet 'tis early morn:
   Leave me here, and when you want me, sound upon the bugle horn.
 
   'Tis the place, and all around it, [1] as of old, the curlews call,
   Dreary gleams [2] about the moorland flying over Locksley Hall;
 
   Locksley Hall, that in the distance overlooks the sandy tracts,
   And the hollow ocean-ridges roaring into cataracts.
 
   Many a night from yonder ivied casement, ere I went to rest,
   Did I look on great Orion sloping slowly to the West.
 
   Many a night I saw the Pleiads, rising thro' the mellow shade,
   Glitter like a swarm of fire-flies tangled in a silver braid.
 
   Here about the beach I wander'd, nourishing a youth sublime
   With the fairy tales of science, and the long result of Time;
 
   When the centuries behind me like a fruitful land reposed;
   When I clung to all the present for the promise that it closed:
 
   When I dipt into the future far as human eye could see;
   Saw the Vision of the world, and all the wonder that would be.--
 
   In the Spring a fuller crimson comes upon the robin's [3] breast;
   In the Spring the wanton lapwing gets himself another crest;
 
   In the Spring a livelier iris changes on the burnish'd dove;
   In the Spring a young man's fancy lightly turns to thoughts of love.
 
   Then her cheek was pale and thinner than should be for one so young,
   And her eyes on all my motions with a mute observance hung.
 
   And I said, "My cousin Amy, speak, and speak the truth to me,
   Trust me, cousin, all the current of my being sets to thee."
 
   On her pallid cheek and forehead came a colour and a light,
   As I have seen the rosy red flushing in the northern night.
 
   And she turn'd--her bosom shaken with a sudden storm of sighs--
   All the spirit deeply dawning in the dark of hazel eyes--
 
   Saying, "I have hid my feelings, fearing they should do me wrong";
   Saying, "Dost thou love me, cousin?" weeping, "I have loved thee
     long".
 
   Love took up the glass of Time, and turn'd it in his glowing hands;
   Every moment, lightly shaken, ran itself in golden sands. [4]
 
   Love took up the harp of Life, and smote on all the chords with might;
   Smote the chord of Self, that, trembling, pass'd in music out of
     sight.
 
   Many a morning on the moorland did we hear the copses ring,
   And her whisper throng'd my pulses with the fulness of the Spring.
 
   Many an evening by the waters did we watch the stately ships,
   And our spirits rush'd together at the touching of the lips. [5]
 
   O my cousin, shallow-hearted! O my Amy, mine no more!
   O the dreary, dreary moorland! O the barren, barren shore!
 
   Falser than all fancy fathoms, falser than all songs have sung,
   Puppet to a father's threat, and servile to a shrewish tongue!
 
   Is it well to wish thee happy?--having known me--to decline
   On a range of lower feelings and a narrower heart than mine!
 
   Yet it shall be: thou shalt lower to his level day by day,
   What is fine within thee growing coarse to sympathise with clay.
 
   As the husband is, the wife is: thou art mated with a clown,
   And the grossness of his nature will have weight to drag thee down.
 
   He will hold thee, when his passion shall have spent its novel force,
   Something better than his dog, a little dearer than his horse.
 
   What is this? his eyes are heavy: think not they are glazed with wine.
   Go to him: it is thy duty: kiss him: take his hand in thine.
 
   It may be my lord is weary, that his brain is overwrought:
   Soothe him with thy finer fancies, touch him with thy lighter thought.
 
   He will answer to the purpose, easy things to understand--
   Better thou wert dead before me, tho' I slew thee with my hand!
 
   Better thou and I were lying, hidden from the heart's disgrace,
   Roll'd in one another's arms, and silent in a last embrace.
 
   Cursed be the social wants that sin against the strength of youth!
   Cursed be the social lies that warp us from the living truth!
 
   Cursed be the sickly forms that err from honest Nature's rule!
   Cursed be the gold that gilds the straiten'd forehead of the fool!
 
   Well--'tis well that I should bluster!--Hadst thou less unworthy
     proved--
   Would to God--for I had loved thee more than ever wife was loved.
 
   Am I mad, that I should cherish that which bears but bitter fruit?
   I will pluck it from my bosom, tho' my heart be at the root.
 
   Never, tho' my mortal summers to such length of years should come
   As the many-winter'd crow that leads the clanging rookery home. [6]
 
   Where is comfort? in division of the records of the mind?
   Can I part her from herself, and love her, as I knew her, kind?
 
   I remember one that perish'd: sweetly did she speak and move:
   Such a one do I remember, whom to look it was to love.
 
   Can I think of her as dead, and love her for the love she bore?
   No--she never loved me truly: love is love for evermore.
 
   Comfort? comfort scorn'd of devils! this is truth the poet sings,
   That a sorrow's crown of sorrow [7] is remembering happier things.
 
   Drug thy memories, lest thou learn it, lest thy heart be put to proof,
   In the dead unhappy night, and when the rain is on the roof.
 
   Like a dog, he hunts in dreams, and thou art staring at the wall,
   Where the dying night-lamp flickers, and the shadows rise and fall.
 
   Then a hand shall pass before thee, pointing to his drunken sleep,
   To thy widow'd marriage-pillows, to the tears that thou wilt weep.
 
   Thou shalt hear the "Never, never," whisper'd by the phantom years,
   And a song from out the distance in the ringing of thine ears;
 
   And an eye shall vex thee, looking ancient kindness on thy pain.
   Turn thee, turn thee on thy pillow: get thee to thy rest again.
 
   Nay, but Nature brings thee solace; for a tender voice will cry,
   'Tis a purer life than thine; a lip to drain thy trouble dry.
 
   Baby lips will laugh me down: my latest rival brings thee rest.
   Baby fingers, waxen touches, press me from the mother's breast.
 
   O, the child too clothes the father with a dearness not his due.
   Half is thine and half is his: it will be worthy of the two.
 
   O, I see thee old and formal, fitted to thy petty part,
   With a little hoard of maxims preaching down a daughter's heart.
 
   "They were dangerous guides the feelings--she herself was not exempt--
   Truly, she herself had suffer'd"--Perish in thy self-contempt!
 
   Overlive it--lower yet--be happy! wherefore should I care,
   I myself must mix with action, lest I wither by despair.
 
   What is that which I should turn to, lighting upon days like these?
   Every door is barr'd with gold, and opens but to golden keys.
 
   Every gate is throng'd with suitors, all the markets overflow.
   I have but an angry fancy: what is that which I should do?
 
   I had been content to perish, falling on the foeman's ground,
   When the ranks are roll'd in vapour, and the winds are laid with
     sound.
 
   But the jingling of the guinea helps the hurt that Honour feels,
   And the nations do but murmur, snarling at each other's heels.
 
   Can I but relive in sadness? I will turn that earlier page.
   Hide me from my deep emotion, O thou wondrous Mother-Age!
 
   Make me feel the wild pulsation that I felt before the strife,
   When I heard my days before me, and the tumult of my life;
 
   Yearning for the large excitement that the coming years would yield,
   Eager-hearted as a boy when first he leaves his father's field,
 
   And at night along the dusky highway near and nearer drawn,
   Sees in heaven the light of London flaring like a dreary dawn; [8]
 
   And his spirit leaps within him to be gone before him then,
   Underneath the light he looks at, in among the throngs of men;
 
   Men, my brothers, men the workers, ever reaping something new:
   That which they have done but earnest of the things that they shall
     do:
 
   For I dipt into the future, far as human eye could see,
   Saw the vision of the world, and all the wonder that would be; [9]
 
   Saw the heavens fill with commerce, argosies of magic sails,
   Pilots of the purple twilight, dropping down with costly bales; [10]
 
   Heard the heavens fill with shouting, and there rain'd a ghastly dew
   From the nations' airy navies grappling in the central blue; [10]
 
   Far along the world-wide whisper of the south-wind rushing warm,
   With the standards of the peoples plunging thro' the thunderstorm;
     [10]
 
   Till the war-drum throbbed no longer, and the battle-flags were furl'd
   In the Parliament of man, the Federation of the world. [10]
 
   There the common sense of most shall hold a fretful realm in awe,
   And the kindly earth shall slumber, lapt in universal law.
 
   So I triumph'd, ere my passion sweeping thro' me left me dry,
   Left me with the palsied heart, and left me with the jaundiced eye;
 
   Eye, to which all order festers, all things here are out of joint,
   Science moves, but slowly slowly, creeping on from point to point:
 
   Slowly comes a hungry people, as a lion, creeping nigher, [11]
   Glares at one that nods and winks behind a slowly-dying fire.
 
   Yet I doubt not thro' the ages one increasing purpose runs,
   And the thoughts of men are widen'd with the process of the suns.
 
   What is that to him that reaps not harvest of his youthful joys,
   Tho' the deep heart of existence beat for ever like a boy's?
 
   Knowledge comes, but wisdom lingers, and I linger on the shore,
   And the individual withers, and the world is more and more.
 
   Knowledge comes, but wisdom lingers, and he bears a laden breast,
   Full of sad experience, moving toward the stillness of his rest.
 
   Hark, my merry comrades call me, sounding on the bugle-horn,
   They to whom my foolish passion were a target for their scorn:
 
   Shall it not be scorn to me to harp on such a moulder'd string?
   I am shamed thro' all my nature to have loved so slight a thing.
 
   Weakness to be wroth with weakness! woman's pleasure, woman's pain--
     [12]
   Nature made them blinder motions bounded in a shallower brain:
 
   Woman is the lesser man, and all thy passions, match'd with mine,
   Are as moonlight unto sunlight, and as water unto wine--
 
   Here at least, where nature sickens, nothing. Ah, for some retreat
   Deep in yonder shining Orient, where my life began to beat;
 
   Where in wild Mahratta-battle fell my father evil-starr'd;--
   I was left a trampled orphan, and a selfish uncle's ward.
 
   Or to burst all links of habit--there to wander far away,
   On from island unto island at the gateways of the day.
 
   Larger constellations burning, mellow moons and happy skies,
   Breadths of tropic shade and palms in cluster, knots of Paradise. [13]
 
   Never comes the trader, never floats an European flag,
   Slides the bird o'er lustrous woodland, swings the trailer [14] from
     the crag;
 
   Droops the heavy-blossom'd bower, hangs the heavy-fruited tree--
   Summer isles of Eden lying in dark-purple spheres of sea.
 
   There methinks would be enjoyment more than in this march of mind,
   In the steamship, in the railway, in the thoughts that shake mankind.
 
   There the passions cramp'd no longer shall have scope and
     breathing-space;
   I will take some savage woman, she shall rear my dusky race.
 
   Iron-jointed, supple-sinew'd, they shall dive, and they shall run,
   Catch the wild goat by the hair, and hurl their lances in the sun;
 
   Whistle back the parrot's call, and leap the rainbows of the brooks.
   Not with blinded eyesight poring over miserable books--
 
   Fool, again the dream, the fancy! but I _know_ my words are wild,
   But I count the gray barbarian lower than the Christian child.
 
   _I_, to herd with narrow foreheads, vacant of our glorious gains, [15]
   Like a beast with lower pleasures, like a beast with lower pains!
 
   Mated with a squalid savage--what to me were sun or clime?
   I the heir of all the ages, in the foremost files of time--
 
   I that rather held it better men should perish one by one,
   Than that earth should stand at gaze like Joshua's moon in Ajalon!
 
   Not in vain the distance beacons. Forward, forward let us range.
   Let the great world spin [16] for ever down the ringing grooves [17]
     of change.
 
   Thro' the shadow of the globe [18] we sweep into the younger day:
   Better fifty years of Europe than a cycle of Cathay. [19]
 
   Mother-Age (for mine I knew not) help me as when life begun:
   Rift the hills, and roll the waters, flash the lightnings, weigh the
     Sun--[20]
 
   O, I see the crescent promise of my spirit hath not set.
   Ancient founts of inspiration well thro' all my fancy yet.
 
   Howsoever these things be, a long farewell to Locksley Hall!
   Now for me the woods may wither, now for me the roof-tree fall.
 
   Comes a vapour from the margin, blackening over heath and holt,
   Cramming all the blast before it, in its breast a thunderbolt.
 
   Let it fall on Locksley Hall, with rain or hail, or fire or snow;
   For the mighty wind arises, roaring seaward, and I go.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842. And round the gables.]
 
 [Footnote 2: "Gleams," it appears, is a Lincolnshire word for the cry of
 the curlew, and so by removing the comma after call we get an
 interpretation which perhaps improves the sense and certainly gets rid
 of a very un-Tennysonian cumbrousness in the second line. But Tennyson
 had never, he said, heard of that meaning of "gleams," adding he wished
 he had. He meant nothing more in the passage than "to express the flying
 gleams of light across a dreary moorland when looking at it under
 peculiarly dreary circumstances". See for this, 'Life', iii., 82.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842 and all up to and including 1850 have a capital 'R' to
 robin.]
 
 [Footnote 4: Cf. W. R. Spencer ('Poems', p. 166):--
 
   What eye with clear account remarks
   The ebbing of his glass,
   When all its sands are diamond sparks
   That dazzle as they pass.
 
 But this is of course in no way parallel to Tennyson's subtly beautiful
 image, which he himself pronounced to be the best simile he had ever
 made.]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: Cf. Guarini, 'Pastor Fido':--
 
   Ma i colpi di due labbre innamorate
   Quando a ferir si va bocca con bocca,
   ... ove l' un alma e l'altra Corre.]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: Cf. Horace's 'Annosa Cornix', Odes III., xvii., 13.]
 
 [Footnote 7: The reference is to Dante, 'Inferno', v. 121-3:--
 
   Nessun maggior dolore
   Che ricordarsi del tempo felice
   Nella miseria.
 
 For the pedigree and history of this see the present editor's
 'Illustrations of Tennyson', p. 63.]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: The epithet "dreary" shows that Tennyson preferred
 realistic picturesqueness to dramatic propriety.]
 
 [Footnote 9: See the introductory note to 'The Golden Year'.]
 
 [Footnote 10: See the introductory note to 'The Golden Year'.]
 
 [Footnote 11: Tennyson said that this simile was suggested by a passage
 in 'Pringle's Travels;' the incident only is described, and with
 thrilling vividness, by Pringle; but its application in simile is
 Tennyson's. See 'A Narrative of a Residence in South Africa', by Thomas
 Pringle, p. 39:
 
   "The night was extremely dark and the rain fell so heavily that in
   spite of the abundant supply of dry firewood, which we had luckily
   provided, it was not without difficulty that we could keep one
   watchfire burning.... About midnight we were suddenly roused by the
   roar of a lion close to our tents. It was so loud and tremendous that
   for the moment I actually thought that a thunderstorm had burst upon
   us.... We roused up the half-extinguished fire to a roaring blaze ...
   this unwonted display probably daunted our grim visitor, for he gave
   us no further trouble that night."]
 
 
 [Footnote 12: With this 'cf'. Leopardi, 'Aspasia', 53-60:--
 
   Non cape in quelle
   Anguste fronti ugual concetto. E male
   Al vivo sfolgora di quegli sguardi
   Spera l'uomo ingannato, e mal chiede
   Sensi profondi, sconosciuti, e molto
   Piu che virili, in chi dell' uomo al tutto
   Da natura e minor. Che se piu molli
   E piu tenui le membra, essa la mente
   Men capace e men forte anco riceve.]
 
 
 [Footnote 13: One wonders Tennyson could have had the heart to excise the
 beautiful couplet which in his MS. followed this stanza.
 
   All about a summer ocean, leagues on leagues of golden calm,
   And within melodious waters rolling round the knolls of palm.]
 
 
 [Footnote 14: 1842 and all up to and inclusive of 1850. Droops the
 trailer. This is one of Tennyson's many felicitous corrections. In the
 monotonous, motionless splendour of a tropical landscape the smallest
 movement catches the eye, the flight of a bird, the gentle waving of the
 trailer stirred by the breeze from the sea.]
 
 [Footnote 15: 'Cf'. Shakespeare, "foreheads villainously low".]
 
 [Footnote 16: 1842. Peoples spin.]
 
 [Footnote 17: Tennyson tells us that when he travelled by the first train
 from Liverpool to Manchester in 1830 it was night and he thought that
 the wheels ran in a groove, hence this line.]
 
 [Footnote 18: 1842. The world.]
 
 [Footnote 19: Cathay, the old name for China.]
 
 [Footnote 20: 'Cf'. Tasso, 'Gems', ix., st. 91:--
 
   Nuova nube di polve ecco vicina
   Che fulgori in grembo tiene.
 
   (Lo! a fresh cloud of dust is near which
   Carries in its breast thunderbolts.)]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 GODIVA
 
 
 First published in 1842. No alteration was made in any subsequent
 edition.
 
 The poem was written in 1840 when Tennyson was returning from Coventry
 to London, after his visit to Warwickshire in that year. The Godiva
 pageant takes place in that town at the great fair on Friday in Trinity
 week. Earl Leofric was the Lord of Coventry in the reign of Edward the
 Confessor, and he and his wife Godiva founded a magnificent Benedictine
 monastery at Coventry. The first writer who mentions this legend is
 Matthew of Westminster, who wrote in 1307, that is some 250 years after
 Leofric's time, and what authority he had for it is not known. It is
 certainly not mentioned by the many preceding writers who have left
 accounts of Leofric and Godiva (see Gough's edition of Camden's
 'Britannia', vol. ii., p. 346, and for a full account of the legend see
 W. Reader, 'The History and Description of Coventry Show Fair, with the
 History of Leofric and Godiva'). With Tennyson's should be compared
 Moultrie's beautiful poem on the same subject, and Landor's Imaginary
 Conversation between Leofric and Godiva.
 
   [1] _I waited for the train at Coventry;
   I hung with grooms and porters on the bridge,
   To match the three tall spires; [2] and there I shaped
   The city's ancient legend into this:_
   Not only we, the latest seed of Time,
   New men, that in the flying of a wheel
   Cry down the past, not only we, that prate
   Of rights and wrongs, have loved the people well,
   And loathed to see them overtax'd; but she
   Did more, and underwent, and overcame,
   The woman of a thousand summers back,
   Godiva, wife to that grim Earl, who ruled
   In Coventry: for when he laid a tax
   Upon his town, and all the mothers brought
   Their children, clamouring, "If we pay, we starve!"
   She sought her lord, and found him, where he strode
   About the hall, among his dogs, alone,
   His beard a foot before him, and his hair
   A yard behind. She told him of their tears,
   And pray'd him, "If they pay this tax, they starve".
   Whereat he stared, replying, half-amazed,
   "You would not let your little finger ache
   For such as _these?_"--"But I would die," said she.
   He laugh'd, and swore by Peter and by Paul;
   Then fillip'd at the diamond in her ear;
   "O ay, ay, ay, you talk!"--"Alas!" she said,
   "But prove me what it is I would not do."
   And from a heart as rough as Esau's hand,
   He answer'd, "Ride you naked thro' the town,
   And I repeal it"; and nodding as in scorn,
   He parted, with great strides among his dogs.
   So left alone, the passions of her mind,
   As winds from all the compass shift and blow,
   Made war upon each other for an hour,
   Till pity won. She sent a herald forth,
   And bad him cry, with sound of trumpet, all
   The hard condition; but that she would loose
   The people: therefore, as they loved her well,
   From then till noon no foot should pace the street,
   No eye look down, she passing; but that all
   Should keep within, door shut, and window barr'd.
   Then fled she to her inmost bower, and there
   Unclasp'd the wedded eagles of her belt,
   The grim Earl's gift; but ever at a breath
   She linger'd, looking like a summer moon
   Half-dipt in cloud: anon she shook her head,
   And shower'd the rippled ringlets to her knee;
   Unclad herself in haste; adown the stair
   Stole on; and, like a creeping sunbeam, slid
   From pillar unto pillar, until she reach'd
   The gateway; there she found her palfrey trapt
   In purple blazon'd with armorial gold.
   Then she rode forth, clothed on with chastity:
   The deep air listen'd round her as she rode,
   And all the low wind hardly breathed for fear.
   The little wide-mouth'd heads upon the spout
   Had cunning eyes to see: the barking cur
   Made her cheek flame: her palfrey's footfall shot
   Light horrors thro' her pulses: the blind walls
   Were full of chinks and holes; and overhead
   Fantastic gables, crowding, stared: but she
   Not less thro' all bore up, till, last, she saw
   The white-flower'd elder-thicket from the field
   Gleam thro' the Gothic archways [3]in the wall.
   Then she rode back cloth'd on with chastity:
   And one low churl, [4] compact of thankless earth,
   The fatal byword of all years to come,
   Boring a little auger-hole in fear,
   Peep'd--but his eyes, before they had their will,
   Were shrivell'd into darkness in his head,
   And dropt before him. So the Powers, who wait
   On noble deeds, cancell'd a sense misused;
   And she, that knew not, pass'd: and all at once,
   With twelve great shocks of sound, the shameless noon
   Was clash'd and hammer'd from a hundred towers, [5]
   One after one: but even then she gain'd
   Her bower; whence reissuing, robed and crown'd,
   To meet her lord, she took the tax away,
   And built herself an everlasting name.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: These four lines are not in the privately printed volume of
 1842, but were added afterwards.]
 
 [Footnote 2: St. Michael's, Trinity, and St. John.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1844. Archway.]
 
 [Footnote 4: His effigy is still to be seen, protruded from an upper
 window in High Street, Coventry.]
 
 [Footnote 5: A most poetical licence. Thirty-two towers are the very
 utmost allowed by writers on ancient Coventry.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE TWO VOICES
 
 
 First published in 1842, though begun as early as 1833 and in course of
 composition in 1834. See Spedding's letter dated 19th September, 1834.
 Its original title was 'The Thoughts of a Suicide'. No alterations were
 made in the poem after 1842.
 
 It adds interest to this poem to know that it is autobiographical. It
 was written soon after the death of Arthur Hallam when Tennyson's
 depression was deepest. "When I wrote 'The Two Voices' I was so utterly
 miserable, a burden to myself and to my family, that I said, 'Is life
 worth anything?'" It is the history--as Spedding put it--of the
 agitations, the suggestions and counter-suggestions of a mind sunk in
 hopeless despondency, and meditating self-destruction, together with the
 manner of its recovery to a more healthy condition. We have two
 singularly interesting parallels to it in preceding poetry. The one is
 in the third book of Lucretius (830-1095), where the arguments for
 suicide are urged, not merely by the poet himself, but by arguments
 placed by him in the mouth of Nature herself, and urged with such
 cogency that they are said to have induced one of his editors and
 translators, Creech, to put an end to his life. The other is in Spenser,
 in the dialogue between Despair and the Red Cross Knight, where Despair
 puts the case for self-destruction, and the Red Cross Knight rebuts the
 arguments ('Faerie Queene', I. ix., st. xxxviii.-liv.).
 
 
   A still small voice spake unto me,
   "Thou art so full of misery,
   Were it not better not to be?"
 
   Then to the still small voice I said;
   "Let me not cast in endless shade
   What is so wonderfully made".
 
   To which the voice did urge reply;
   "To-day I saw the dragon-fly
   Come from the wells where he did lie.
 
   "An inner impulse rent the veil
   Of his old husk: from head to tail
   Came out clear plates of sapphire mail.
 
   "He dried his wings: like gauze they grew:
   Thro' crofts and pastures wet with dew
   A living flash of light he flew."
 
   I said, "When first the world began
   Young Nature thro' five cycles ran,
   And in the sixth she moulded man.
 
   "She gave him mind, the lordliest
   Proportion, and, above the rest,
   Dominion in the head and breast."
 
   Thereto the silent voice replied;
   "Self-blinded are you by your pride:
   Look up thro' night: the world is wide.
 
   "This truth within thy mind rehearse,
   That in a boundless universe
   Is boundless better, boundless worse.
 
   "Think you this mould of hopes and fears
   Could find no statelier than his peers
   In yonder hundred million spheres?"
 
   It spake, moreover, in my mind:
   "Tho' thou wert scatter'd to the wind,
   Yet is there plenty of the kind".
 
   Then did my response clearer fall:
   "No compound of this earthly ball
   Is like another, all in all".
 
   To which he answer'd scoffingly;
   "Good soul! suppose I grant it thee,
   Who'll weep for thy deficiency?
 
   "Or will one beam [1] be less intense,
   When thy peculiar difference
   Is cancell'd in the world of sense?"
 
   I would have said, "Thou canst not know,"
   But my full heart, that work'd below,
   Rain'd thro' my sight its overflow.
 
   Again the voice spake unto me:
   "Thou art so steep'd in misery,
   Surely 'twere better not to be.
 
   "Thine anguish will not let thee sleep,
   Nor any train of reason keep:
   Thou canst not think, but thou wilt weep."
 
   I said, "The years with change advance:
   If I make dark my countenance,
   I shut my life from happier chance.
 
   "Some turn this sickness yet might take,
   Ev'n yet." But he: "What drug can make
   A wither'd palsy cease to shake?"
 
   I wept, "Tho' I should die, I know
   That all about the thorn will blow
   In tufts of rosy-tinted snow;
 
   "And men, thro' novel spheres of thought
   Still moving after truth long sought,
   Will learn new things when I am not."
 
   "Yet," said the secret voice, "some time,
   Sooner or later, will gray prime
   Make thy grass hoar with early rime.
 
   "Not less swift souls that yearn for light,
   Rapt after heaven's starry flight,
   Would sweep the tracts of day and night.
 
   "Not less the bee would range her cells,
   The furzy prickle fire the dells,
   The foxglove cluster dappled bells."
 
   I said that "all the years invent;
   Each month is various to present
   The world with some development.
 
   "Were this not well, to bide mine hour,
   Tho' watching from a ruin'd tower
   How grows the day of human power?"
 
   "The highest-mounted mind," he said,
   "Still sees the sacred morning spread
   The silent summit overhead.
 
   "Will thirty seasons render plain
   Those lonely lights that still remain,
   Just breaking over land and main?
 
   "Or make that morn, from his cold crown
   And crystal silence creeping down,
   Flood with full daylight glebe and town?
 
   "Forerun thy peers, thy time, and let
   Thy feet, millenniums hence, be set
   In midst of knowledge, dream'd not yet.
 
   "Thou hast not gain'd a real height,
   Nor art thou nearer to the light,
   Because the scale is infinite.
 
   "'Twere better not to breathe or speak,
   Than cry for strength, remaining weak,
   And seem to find, but still to seek.
 
   "Moreover, but to seem to find
   Asks what thou lackest, thought resign'd,
   A healthy frame, a quiet mind."
 
   I said, "When I am gone away,
   'He dared not tarry,' men will say,
   Doing dishonour to my clay."
 
   "This is more vile," he made reply,
   "To breathe and loathe, to live and sigh,
   Than once from dread of pain to die.
 
   "Sick art thou--a divided will
   Still heaping on the fear of ill
   The fear of men, a coward still.
 
   "Do men love thee? Art thou so bound
   To men, that how thy name may sound
   Will vex thee lying underground?
 
   "The memory of the wither'd leaf
   In endless time is scarce more brief
   Than of the garner'd Autumn-sheaf.
 
   "Go, vexed Spirit, sleep in trust;
   The right ear, that is fill'd with dust,
   Hears little of the false or just."
 
   "Hard task, to pluck resolve," I cried,
   "From emptiness and the waste wide
   Of that abyss, or scornful pride!
 
   "Nay--rather yet that I could raise
   One hope that warm'd me in the days
   While still I yearn'd for human praise.
 
   "When, wide in soul, and bold of tongue,
   Among the tents I paused and sung,
   The distant battle flash'd and rung.
 
   "I sung the joyful Paean clear,
   And, sitting, burnish'd without fear
   The brand, the buckler, and the spear--
 
   "Waiting to strive a happy strife,
   To war with falsehood to the knife,
   And not to lose the good of life--
 
   "Some hidden principle to move,
   To put together, part and prove,
   And mete the bounds of hate and love--
 
   "As far as might be, to carve out
   Free space for every human doubt,
   That the whole mind might orb about--
 
   "To search thro' all I felt or saw,
   The springs of life, the depths of awe,
   And reach the law within the law:
 
   "At least, not rotting like a weed,
   But, having sown some generous seed,
   Fruitful of further thought and deed,
 
   "To pass, when Life her light withdraws,
   Not void of righteous self-applause,
   Nor in a merely selfish cause--
 
   "In some good cause, not in mine own,
   To perish, wept for, honour'd, known,
   And like a warrior overthrown;
 
   "Whose eyes are dim with glorious tears,
   When, soil'd with noble dust, he hears
   His country's war-song thrill his ears:
 
   "Then dying of a mortal stroke,
   What time the foeman's line is broke.
   And all the war is roll'd in smoke." [2]
 
   "Yea!" said the voice, "thy dream was good,
   While thou abodest in the bud.
   It was the stirring of the blood.
 
   "If Nature put not forth her power [2]
   About the opening of the flower,
   Who is it that could live an hour?
 
   "Then comes the check, the change, the fall.
   Pain rises up, old pleasures pall.
   There is one remedy for all.
 
   "Yet hadst thou, thro' enduring pain,
   Link'd month to month with such a chain
   Of knitted purport, all were vain.
 
   "Thou hadst not between death and birth
   Dissolved the riddle of the earth.
   So were thy labour little worth.
 
   "That men with knowledge merely play'd,
   I told thee--hardly nigher made,
   Tho' scaling slow from grade to grade;
 
   "Much less this dreamer, deaf and blind,
   Named man, may hope some truth to find,
   That bears relation to the mind.
 
   "For every worm beneath the moon
   Draws different threads, and late and soon
   Spins, toiling out his own cocoon.
 
   "Cry, faint not: either Truth is born
   Beyond the polar gleam forlorn,
   Or in the gateways of the morn.
 
   "Cry, faint not, climb: the summits slope
   Beyond the furthest nights of hope,
   Wrapt in dense cloud from base to cope.
 
   "Sometimes a little corner shines,
   As over rainy mist inclines
   A gleaming crag with belts of pines.
 
   "I will go forward, sayest thou,
   I shall not fail to find her now.
   Look up, the fold is on her brow.
 
   "If straight thy track, or if oblique,
   Thou know'st not. Shadows thou dost strike,
   Embracing cloud, Ixion-like;
 
   "And owning but a little more
   Than beasts, abidest lame and poor,
   Calling thyself a little lower
 
   "Than angels. Cease to wail and brawl!
   Why inch by inch to darkness crawl?
   There is one remedy for all."
 
   "O dull, one-sided voice," said I,
   "Wilt thou make everything a lie,
   To flatter me that I may die?
 
   "I know that age to age succeeds,
   Blowing a noise of tongues and deeds,
   A dust of systems and of creeds.
 
   "I cannot hide that some have striven,
   Achieving calm, to whom was given
   The joy that mixes man with Heaven:
 
   "Who, rowing hard against the stream,
   Saw distant gates of Eden gleam,
   And did not dream it was a dream";
 
   "But heard, by secret transport led, [3]
   Ev'n in the charnels of the dead,
   The murmur of the fountain-head--
 
   "Which did accomplish their desire,--
   Bore and forbore, and did not tire,
   Like Stephen, an unquenched fire.
 
   "He heeded not reviling tones,
   Nor sold his heart to idle moans,
   Tho' cursed and scorn'd, and bruised with stones:
 
   "But looking upward, full of grace,
   He pray'd, and from a happy place
   God's glory smote him on the face."
 
   The sullen answer slid betwixt:
   "Not that the grounds of hope were fix'd,
   The elements were kindlier mix'd." [4]
 
   I said, "I toil beneath the curse,
   But, knowing not the universe,
   I fear to slide from bad to worse. [5]
 
   "And that, in seeking to undo
   One riddle, and to find the true,
   I knit a hundred others new:
 
   "Or that this anguish fleeting hence,
   Unmanacled from bonds of sense,
   Be fix'd and froz'n to permanence:
 
   "For I go, weak from suffering here;
   Naked I go, and void of cheer:
   What is it that I may not fear?"
 
   "Consider well," the voice replied,
   "His face, that two hours since hath died;
   Wilt thou find passion, pain or pride?
 
   "Will he obey when one commands?
   Or answer should one press his hands?
   He answers not, nor understands.
 
   "His palms are folded on his breast:
   There is no other thing express'd
   But long disquiet merged in rest.
 
   "His lips are very mild and meek:
   Tho' one should smite him on the cheek,
   And on the mouth, he will not speak.
 
   "His little daughter, whose sweet face
   He kiss'd, taking his last embrace,
   Becomes dishonour to her race--
 
   "His sons grow up that bear his name,
   Some grow to honour, some to shame,--
   But he is chill to praise or blame. [6]
 
   "He will not hear the north wind rave,
   Nor, moaning, household shelter crave
   From winter rains that beat his grave.
 
   "High up the vapours fold and swim:
   About him broods the twilight dim:
   The place he knew forgetteth him."
 
   "If all be dark, vague voice," I said,
   "These things are wrapt in doubt and dread,
   Nor canst thou show the dead are dead.
 
   "The sap dries up: the plant declines. [7]
   A deeper tale my heart divines.
   Know I not Death? the outward signs?
 
   "I found him when my years were few;
   A shadow on the graves I knew,
   And darkness in the village yew.
 
   "From grave to grave the shadow crept:
   In her still place the morning wept:
   Touch'd by his feet the daisy slept.
 
   "The simple senses crown'd his head: [8]
   'Omega! thou art Lord,' they
   said; 'We find no motion in the dead.'
 
   "Why, if man rot in dreamless ease,
   Should that plain fact, as taught by these,
   Not make him sure that he shall cease?
 
   "Who forged that other influence,
   That heat of inward evidence,
   By which he doubts against the sense?
 
   "He owns the fatal gift of eyes, [9]
   That read his spirit blindly wise,
   Not simple as a thing that dies.
 
   "Here sits he shaping wings to fly:
   His heart forebodes a mystery:
   He names the name Eternity.
 
   "That type of Perfect in his mind
   In Nature can he nowhere find.
   He sows himself in every wind.
 
   "He seems to hear a Heavenly Friend,
   And thro' thick veils to apprehend
   A labour working to an end.
 
   "The end and the beginning vex
   His reason: many things perplex,
   With motions, checks, and counterchecks.
 
   "He knows a baseness in his blood
   At such strange war with something good,
   He may not do the thing he would.
 
   "Heaven opens inward, chasms yawn.
   Vast images in glimmering dawn,
   Half shown, are broken and withdrawn.
 
   "Ah! sure within him and without,
   Could his dark wisdom find it out,
   There must be answer to his doubt.
 
   "But thou canst answer not again.
   With thine own weapon art thou slain,
   Or thou wilt answer but in vain.
 
   "The doubt would rest, I dare not solve.
   In the same circle we revolve.
   Assurance only breeds resolve."
 
   As when a billow, blown against,
   Falls back, the voice with which I fenced
   A little ceased, but recommenced.
 
   "Where wert thou when thy father play'd
   In his free field, and pastime made,
   A merry boy in sun and shade?
 
   "A merry boy they called him then.
   He sat upon the knees of men
   In days that never come again,
 
   "Before the little ducts began
   To feed thy bones with lime, and ran
   Their course, till thou wert also man:
 
   "Who took a wife, who rear'd his race,
   Whose wrinkles gather'd on his face,
   Whose troubles number with his days:
 
   "A life of nothings, nothing-worth,
   From that first nothing ere his birth
   To that last nothing under earth!"
 
   "These words," I said, "are like the rest,
   No certain clearness, but at best
   A vague suspicion of the breast:
 
   "But if I grant, thou might'st defend
   The thesis which thy words intend--
   That to begin implies to end;
 
   "Yet how should I for certain hold, [10]
   Because my memory is so cold,
   That I first was in human mould?
 
   "I cannot make this matter plain,
   But I would shoot, howe'er in vain,
   A random arrow from the brain.
 
   "It may be that no life is found,
   Which only to one engine bound
   Falls off, but cycles always round.
 
   "As old mythologies relate,
   Some draught of Lethe might await
   The slipping thro' from state to state.
 
   "As here we find in trances, men
   Forget the dream that happens then,
   Until they fall in trance again.
 
   "So might we, if our state were such
   As one before, remember much,
   For those two likes might meet and touch. [11]
 
   "But, if I lapsed from nobler place,
   Some legend of a fallen race
   Alone might hint of my disgrace;
 
   "Some vague emotion of delight
   In gazing up an Alpine height,
   Some yearning toward the lamps of night.
 
   "Or if thro' lower lives I came--
   Tho' all experience past became
   Consolidate in mind and frame--
 
   "I might forget my weaker lot;
   For is not our first year forgot?
   The haunts of memory echo not.
 
   "And men, whose reason long was blind,
   From cells of madness unconfined, [12]
   Oft lose whole years of darker mind.
 
   "Much more, if first I floated free,
   As naked essence, must I be
   Incompetent of memory:
 
   "For memory dealing but with time,
   And he with matter, could she climb
   Beyond her own material prime?
 
   "Moreover, something is or seems,
   That touches me with mystic gleams,
   Like glimpses of forgotten dreams--
 
   "Of something felt, like something here;
   Of something done, I know not where;
   Such as no language may declare."
 
   The still voice laugh'd. "I talk," said he,
   "Not with thy dreams.
   Suffice it thee Thy pain is a reality."
 
   "But thou," said I, "hast miss'd thy mark,
   Who sought'st to wreck my mortal ark,
   By making all the horizon dark.
 
   "Why not set forth, if I should do
   This rashness, that which might ensue
   With this old soul in organs new?
 
   "Whatever crazy sorrow saith,
   No life that breathes with human breath
   Has ever truly long'd for death.
 
   "'Tis life, whereof our nerves are scant,
   Oh life, not death, for which we pant;
   More life, and fuller, that I want."
 
   I ceased, and sat as one forlorn.
   Then said the voice, in quiet scorn,
   "Behold it is the Sabbath morn".
 
   And I arose, and I released
   The casement, and the light increased
   With freshness in the dawning east.
 
   Like soften'd airs that blowing steal,
   When meres begin to uncongeal,
   The sweet church bells began to peal.
 
   On to God's house the people prest:
   Passing the place where each must rest,
   Each enter'd like a welcome guest.
 
   One walk'd between his wife and child,
   With measur'd footfall firm and mild,
   And now and then he gravely smiled.
 
   The prudent partner of his blood
   Lean'd on him, faithful, gentle, good, [13]
   Wearing the rose of womanhood.
 
   And in their double love secure,
   The little maiden walk'd demure,
   Pacing with downward eyelids pure.
 
   These three made unity so sweet,
   My frozen heart began to beat,
   Remembering its ancient heat.
 
   I blest them, and they wander'd on:
   I spoke, but answer came there none:
   The dull and bitter voice was gone.
 
   A second voice was at mine ear,
   A little whisper silver-clear,
   A murmur, "Be of better cheer".
 
   As from some blissful neighbourhood,
   A notice faintly understood,
   "I see the end, and know the good".
 
   A little hint to solace woe,
   A hint, a whisper breathing low,
   "I may not speak of what I know".
 
   Like an Aeolian harp that wakes
   No certain air, but overtakes
   Far thought with music that it makes:
 
   Such seem'd the whisper at my side:
   "What is it thou knowest, sweet voice?" I cried.
   "A hidden hope," the voice replied:
 
   So heavenly-toned, that in that hour
   From out my sullen heart a power
   Broke, like the rainbow from the shower,
 
   To feel, altho' no tongue can prove
   That every cloud, that spreads above
   And veileth love, itself is love.
 
   And forth into the fields I went,
   And Nature's living motion lent
   The pulse of hope to discontent.
 
   I wonder'd at the bounteous hours,
   The slow result of winter showers:
   You scarce could see the grass for flowers.
 
   I wonder'd, while I paced along:
   The woods were fill'd so full with song,
   There seem'd no room for sense of wrong.
 
   So variously seem'd all things wrought, [14]
   I marvell'd how the mind was brought
   To anchor by one gloomy thought;
 
   And wherefore rather I made choice
   To commune with that barren voice,
   Than him that said, "Rejoice! rejoice!"
 
 
 [Footnote 1: The insensibility of Nature to man's death has been the
 eloquent theme of many poets. 'Cf'. Byron, 'Lara', canto ii. 'ad init'.,
 and Matthew Arnold, 'The Youth of Nature'.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 'Cf. Palace of Art', "the riddle of the painful earth".]
 
 [Footnote 3: 'Seq'. The reference is to Acts of the Apostles vii.
 54-60.]
 
 [Footnote 4: Suggested by Shakespeare, 'Julius Caesar', Act v., Sc.
 5:--
 
   and _the elements_
   So mix'd in' him that Nature, etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: An excellent commentary on this is Clough's
 
   _Perche pensa, pensando vecchia_.]
 
 
 [Footnote 6: 'Cf'. Job xiv. 21:
 
   "His sons come to honour, and he knowcth it not; and they are brought
   low, but he perceiveth it not of them."]
 
 
 [Footnote 7: So Bishop Butler, 'Analogy', ch. i.:
 
   "We cannot argue _from the reason of the thing_ that death is the
   destruction of living agents because we know not at all what death is
   in itself, but only some of its effects".]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: So Milton, enfolding this idea of death, 'Paradise
 Lost', ii., 672-3:--
 
   What seemed his head
   The _likeness_ of a kingly crown had on.]
 
 
 [Footnote 9: 'Cf'. Plato, 'Phaedo', x.:--
 
   [Greek: ara echei alaetheian tina opsis te kai akoae tois anthr_opois.
   Ae ta ge toiauta kai oi poiaetai haemin aei thrulousin oti out
   akouomen akribes ouden oute or_omen]
 
   "Have sight and hearing any truth in them? Are they not, as poets are
   always telling us, inaccurate witnesses?"
 
 The proper commentary on the whole of this passage is Plato
 'passim', but the 'Phaedo' particularly, 'cf. Republic',
 vii., viii. and xiv.-xv.]
 
 
 [Footnote 10: An allusion to the myth that when souls are sent to occupy
 a body again they drink of Lethe that they may forget their previous
 existence. See the famous passage towards the end of the tenth book of
 Plato's 'Republic':
 
   "All persons are compelled to drink a certain quantity of the water,
   but those who are not preserved by prudence drink more than the
   quantity, and each as he drinks forgets everything".
 
 So Milton, 'Paradise Lost', ii., 582-4.]
 
 
 [Footnote 11: The best commentary on this will be found in Herbert
 Spencer's 'Psychology'.]
 
 [Footnote 12: Compare with this Tennyson's first sonnet ('Works', Globe
 Edition, 25), and the lines in the 'Ancient Sage' in the 'Passion of the
 Past' ('Id'., 551). 'Cf'. too the lines in Wordsworth's ode on
 'Intimations of Immortality':--
 
   But there's a tree, of many one,
   A single field which I have looked upon,
   Both of them speak of something that is gone;
   The pansy at my feet
   Doth the same tale repeat.
 
 For other remarkable illustrations of this see the present writer's
 'Illustrations of Tennyson', p. 38.]
 
 
 [Footnote 13: 'Cf'. Coleridge, 'Ancient Mariner, iv'.:--
 
   "O happy living things ... I blessed them
   The self-same moment I could pray."
 
 There is a close parallel between the former and the latter state
 described here and in Coleridge's mystic allegory; in both cases the
 sufferers "wake to love," the curse falling off them when they can
 "bless".]
 
 
 [Footnote 14: 1884. And all so variously wrought (with semi-colon instead
 of full stop at the end of the preceding line).]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE DAY-DREAM
 
 First published in 1842, but written in 1835. In it is incorporated,
 though with several alterations, 'The Sleeping Beauty', published among
 the poems of 1830, but excised in subsequent editions. Half extravaganza
 and half apologue, like the 'Midsummer Night's Dream', this delightful
 poem may be safely left to deliver its own message and convey its own
 meaning. It is an excellent illustration of the truth of Tennyson's own
 remark: "Poetry is like shot silk with many glancing colours. Every
 reader must find his own interpretation according to his ability, and
 according to his sympathy with the poet."
 
   PROLOGUE
 
   (No alteration has been made in the Prologue since 1842.)
 
 
     O, Lady Flora, let me speak:
     A pleasant hour has past away
     While, dreaming on your damask cheek,
     The dewy sister-eyelids lay.
 
     As by the lattice you reclined,
     I went thro' many wayward moods
     To see you dreaming--and, behind,
     A summer crisp with shining woods.
     And I too dream'd, until at last
     Across my fancy, brooding warm,
     The reflex of a legend past,
     And loosely settled into form.
     And would you have the thought I had,
     And see the vision that I saw,
     Then take the broidery-frame, and add
     A crimson to the quaint Macaw,
     And I will tell it. Turn your face,
     Nor look with that too-earnest eye--
     The rhymes are dazzled from their place,
     And order'd words asunder fly.
 
 
 
   THE SLEEPING PALACE
 
 
   (No alteration since 1851.)
 
 
     1
 
     The varying year with blade and sheaf
     Clothes and reclothes the happy plains;
     Here rests the sap within the leaf,
     Here stays the blood along the veins.
     Faint shadows, vapours lightly curl'd,
     Faint murmurs from the meadows come,
     Like hints and echoes of the world
     To spirits folded in the womb.
 
 
     2
 
     Soft lustre bathes the range of urns
     On every slanting terrace-lawn.
     The fountain to his place returns
     Deep in the garden lake withdrawn.
     Here droops the banner on the tower,
     On the hall-hearths the festal fires,
     The peacock in his laurel bower,
     The parrot in his gilded wires.
 
 
     3
 
     Roof-haunting martins warm their eggs:
     In these, in those the life is stay'd.
     The mantles from the golden pegs
     Droop sleepily: no sound is made,
     Not even of a gnat that sings.
     More like a picture seemeth all
     Than those old portraits of old kings,
     That watch the sleepers from the wall.
 
 
     4
 
     Here sits the Butler with a flask
     Between his knees, half-drain'd; and there
     The wrinkled steward at his task,
     The maid-of-honour blooming fair:
     The page has caught her hand in his:
     Her lips are sever'd as to speak:
     His own are pouted to a kiss:
     The blush is fix'd upon her cheek.
 
 
     5
 
     Till all the hundred summers pass,
     The beams, that thro' the Oriel shine,
     Make prisms in every carven glass,
     And beaker brimm'd with noble wine.
     Each baron at the banquet sleeps,
     Grave faces gather'd in a ring.
     His state the king reposing keeps.
     He must have been a jovial king. [1]
 
 
     6
 
     All round a hedge upshoots, and shows
     At distance like a little wood;
     Thorns, ivies, woodbine, misletoes,
     And grapes with bunches red as blood;
     All creeping plants, a wall of green
     Close-matted, bur and brake and briar,
     And glimpsing over these, just seen,
     High up, the topmost palace-spire.
 
 
     7
 
     When will the hundred summers die,
     And thought and time be born again,
     And newer knowledge, drawing nigh,
     Bring truth that sways the soul of men?
     Here all things in there place remain,
     As all were order'd, ages since.
     Come, Care and Pleasure, Hope and Pain,
     And bring the fated fairy Prince.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: All editions up to and including 1851:--He must have been
 a jolly king.]
 
 
 
   THE SLEEPING BEAUTY
 
 
   (First printed in 1830, but does not reappear again till 1842. No
   alteration since 1842.)
 
 
     1
 
     Year after year unto her feet,
     She lying on her couch alone,
     Across the purpled coverlet,
     The maiden's jet-black hair has grown, [1]
     On either side her tranced form
     Forth streaming from a braid of pearl:
     The slumbrous light is rich and warm,
     And moves not on the rounded curl.
 
 
     2
 
     The silk star-broider'd [2] coverlid
     Unto her limbs itself doth mould
     Languidly ever; and, amid
     Her full black ringlets downward roll'd,
     Glows forth each softly-shadow'd arm,
     With bracelets of the diamond bright:
     Her constant beauty doth inform
     Stillness with love, and day with light.
 
 
     3
 
     She sleeps: her breathings are not heard
     In palace chambers far apart. [3]
     The fragrant tresses are not stirr'd
     That lie upon her charmed heart.
     She sleeps: on either hand [4] upswells
     The gold-fringed pillow lightly prest:
     She sleeps, nor dreams, but ever dwells
     A perfect form in perfect rest.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1830.
 
   The while she slumbereth alone,
   _Over_ the purple coverlet,
   The maiden's jet-black hair hath grown.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: 1830. Star-braided.]
 
 [Footnote 3: A writer in 'Notes and Queries', February, 1880, asks
 whether these lines mean that the lovely princess did _not_ snore
 so loud that she could be heard from one end of the palace to the other
 and whether it would not have detracted from her charms had that state
 of things been habitual. This brings into the field Dr. Gatty and other
 admirers of Tennyson, who, it must be owned, are not very successful in
 giving a satisfactory reply.]
 
 [Footnote 4: 1830. Side.]
 
 
 
 
   THE ARRIVAL
 
 
   (No alteration after 1853.)
 
 
     1
 
     All precious things, discover'd late,
     To those that seek them issue forth;
     For love in sequel works with fate,
     And draws the veil from hidden worth.
     He travels far from other skies
     His mantle glitters on the rocks--
     A fairy Prince, with joyful eyes,
     And lighter footed than the fox.
 
 
     2
 
     The bodies and the bones of those
     That strove in other days to pass,
     Are wither'd in the thorny close,
     Or scatter'd blanching on [1] the grass.
     He gazes on the silent dead:
     "They perish'd in their daring deeds."
     This proverb flashes thro' his head,
     "The many fail: the one succeeds".
 
 
     3
 
     He comes, scarce knowing what he seeks:
     He breaks the hedge: he enters there:
     The colour flies into his cheeks:
     He trusts to light on something fair;
     For all his life the charm did talk
     About his path, and hover near
     With words of promise in his walk,
     And whisper'd voices at his ear. [2]
 
 
     4
 
     More close and close his footsteps wind;
     The Magic Music [3] in his heart
     Beats quick and quicker, till he find
     The quiet chamber far apart.
     His spirit flutters like a lark,
     He stoops--to kiss her--on his knee.
     "Love, if thy tresses be so dark,
     How dark those hidden eyes must be!
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 to 1851. In.]
 
 [Footnote 2: All editions up to and including 1850. In his ear.]
 
 [Footnote 3: All editions up to and including 1851. Not capitals in
 magic music.]
 
 
 
 
 
   THE REVIVAL
 
 
   No alteration after 1853.
 
 
     1
 
     A touch, a kiss! the charm was snapt.
     There rose a noise of striking clocks,
     And feet that ran, and doors that clapt,
     And barking dogs, and crowing cocks;
     A fuller light illumined all,
     A breeze thro' all the garden swept,
     A sudden hubbub shook the hall,
     And sixty feet the fountain leapt.
 
 
     2
 
     The hedge broke in, the banner blew,
     The butler drank, the steward scrawl'd,
     The fire shot up, the martin flew,
     The parrot scream'd, the peacock squall'd,
     The maid and page renew'd their strife,
     The palace bang'd, and buzz'd and clackt,
     And all the long-pent stream of life
     Dash'd downward in a cataract.
 
 
     3
 
     And last with these [1] the king awoke,
     And in his chair himself uprear'd,
     And yawn'd, and rubb'd his face, and spoke,
     "By holy rood, a royal beard!
     How say you? we have slept, my lords,
     My beard has grown into my lap."
     The barons swore, with many words,
     'Twas but an after-dinner's nap.
 
 
     4
 
     "Pardy," return'd the king, "but still
     My joints are something [2] stiff or so.
     My lord, and shall we pass the bill
     I mention'd half an hour ago?"
     The chancellor, sedate and vain,
     In courteous words return'd reply:
     But dallied with his golden chain,
     And, smiling, put the question by.
 
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 to 1851. And last of all.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 1863. Somewhat.]
 
 
 
 
   THE DEPARTURE
 
 
   (No alteration since 1842.)
 
 
     1
 
     And on her lover's arm she leant,
     And round her waist she felt it fold,
     And far across the hills they went
     In that new world which is the old:
     Across the hills and far away
     Beyond their utmost purple rim,
     And deep into the dying day
     The happy princess follow'd him.
 
 
     2
 
     "I'd sleep another hundred years,
     O love, for such another kiss;"
     "O wake for ever, love," she hears,
     "O love, 'twas such as this and this."
     And o'er them many a sliding star,
     And many a merry wind was borne,
     And, stream'd thro' many a golden bar,
     The twilight melted into morn.
 
 
     3
 
     "O eyes long laid in happy sleep!"
     "O happy sleep, that lightly fled!"
     "O happy kiss, that woke thy sleep!"
     "O love, thy kiss would wake the dead!"
     And o'er them many a flowing range
     Of vapour buoy'd the crescent-bark,
     And, rapt thro' many a rosy change,
     The twilight died into the dark.
 
 
     4
 
     "A hundred summers! can it be?
     And whither goest thou, tell me where?"
     "O seek my father's court with me!
     For there are greater wonders there."
     And o'er the hills, and far away
     Beyond their utmost purple rim,
     Beyond the night across the day,
     Thro' all the world she follow'd him.
 
 
 
 
   MORAL
 
   (No alteration since 1842.)
 
 
     1
 
     So, Lady Flora, take my lay,
     And if you find no moral there,
     Go, look in any glass and say,
     What moral is in being fair.
     Oh, to what uses shall we put
     The wildweed-flower that simply blows?
     And is there any moral shut
     Within the bosom of the rose?
 
 
     2
 
     But any man that walks the mead,
     In bud or blade, or bloom, may find,
     According as his humours lead,
     A meaning suited to his mind.
     And liberal applications lie
     In Art like Nature, dearest friend; [1]
     So 'twere to cramp its use, if I
     Should hook it to some useful end.
 
 
 [Foonote 1: So Wordsworth:--
 
   O Reader! had you in your mind
   Such stores as silent thought can bring,
   O gentle Reader! you would find
   A tale in everything.
 
 --'Simon Lee'.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
   L'ENVOI
 
 
   (No alteration since 1843 except in numbering the stanzas.)
 
     1
 
     You shake your head. A random string
     Your finer female sense offends.
     Well--were it not a pleasant thing
     To fall asleep with all one's friends;
     To pass with all our social ties
     To silence from the paths of men;
     And every hundred years to rise
     And learn the world, and sleep again;
     To sleep thro' terms of mighty wars,
     And wake on science grown to more,
     On secrets of the brain, the stars,
     As wild as aught of fairy lore;
     And all that else the years will show,
     The Poet-forms of stronger hours,
     The vast Republics that may grow,
     The Federations and the Powers;
     Titanic forces taking birth
     In divers seasons, divers climes;
     For we are Ancients of the earth,
     And in the morning of the times.
 
 
     2
 
     So sleeping, so aroused from sleep
     Thro' sunny decads new and strange,
     Or gay quinquenniads would we reap
     The flower and quintessence of change.
 
 
     3
 
     Ah, yet would I--and would I might!
     So much your eyes my fancy take--
     Be still the first to leap to light
     That I might kiss those eyes awake!
     For, am I right or am I wrong,
     To choose your own you did not care;
     You'd have 'my' moral from the song,
     And I will take my pleasure there:
     And, am I right or am I wrong,
     My fancy, ranging thro' and thro',
     To search a meaning for the song,
     Perforce will still revert to you;
     Nor finds a closer truth than this
     All-graceful head, so richly curl'd,
     And evermore a costly kiss
     The prelude to some brighter world.
 
 
 
     4
 
     For since the time when Adam first
     Embraced his Eve in happy hour,
     And every bird of Eden burst
     In carol, every bud to flower,
     What eyes, like thine, have waken'd hopes?
     What lips, like thine, so sweetly join'd?
     Where on the double rosebud droops
     The fullness of the pensive mind;
     Which all too dearly self-involved, [1]
     Yet sleeps a dreamless sleep to me;
     A sleep by kisses undissolved,
     That lets thee [2] neither hear nor see:
     But break it. In the name of wife,
     And in the rights that name may give,
     Are clasp'd the moral of thy life,
     And that for which I care to live.
 
 
 [Foonote 1: 1842. The pensive mind that, self-involved.]
 
 [Foonote 2: 1842. Which lets thee.]
 
 
 
   EPILOGUE
 
 
   (No alteration since 1842.)
 
     So, Lady Flora, take my lay,
     And, if you find a meaning there,
     O whisper to your glass, and say,
     "What wonder, if he thinks me fair?"
     What wonder I was all unwise,
     To shape the song for your delight
     Like long-tail'd birds of Paradise,
     That float thro' Heaven, and cannot light?
     Or old-world trains, upheld at court
     By Cupid-boys of blooming hue--
     But take it--earnest wed with sport,
     And either sacred unto you.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 AMPHION
 
 
 First published in 1842. No alteration since 1850.
 
 In this humorous allegory the poet bewails his unhappy lot on having
 fallen on an age so unpropitious to poetry, contrasting it with the
 happy times so responsive to his predecessors who piped to a world
 prepared to dance to their music. However, he must toil and be satisfied
 if he can make a little garden blossom.
 
 
   My father left a park to me,
   But it is wild and barren,
   A garden too with scarce a tree
   And waster than a warren:
   Yet say the neighbours when they call,
   It is not bad but good land,
   And in it is the germ of all
   That grows within the woodland.
 
   O had I lived when song was great
   In days of old Amphion, [1]
   And ta'en my fiddle to the gate,
   Nor cared for seed or scion!
   And had I lived when song was great,
   And legs of trees were limber,
   And ta'en my fiddle to the gate,
   And fiddled in the timber!
 
   'Tis said he had a tuneful tongue,
   Such happy intonation,
   Wherever he sat down and sung
   He left a small plantation;
   Wherever in a lonely grove
   He set up his forlorn pipes,
   The gouty oak began to move,
   And flounder into hornpipes.
 
   The mountain stirr'd its bushy crown,
   And, as tradition teaches,
   Young ashes pirouetted down
   Coquetting with young beeches;
   And briony-vine and ivy-wreath
   Ran forward to his rhyming,
   And from the valleys underneath
   Came little copses climbing.
 
   The linden broke her ranks and rent
   The woodbine wreathes that bind her,
   And down the middle, buzz! she went,
   With all her bees behind her. [2]
   The poplars, in long order due,
   With cypress promenaded,
   The shock-head willows two and two
   By rivers gallopaded.
 
   The birch-tree swang her fragrant hair,
   The bramble cast her berry,
   The gin within the juniper
   Began to make him merry.
 
   Came wet-shot alder from the wave,
   Came yews, a dismal coterie;
   Each pluck'd his one foot from the grave,
   Poussetting with a sloe-tree:
   Old elms came breaking from the vine,
   The vine stream'd out to follow,
   And, sweating rosin, plump'd the pine
   From many a cloudy hollow.
 
   And wasn't it a sight to see
   When, ere his song was ended,
   Like some great landslip, tree by tree,
   The country-side descended;
   And shepherds from the mountain-caves
   Look'd down, half-pleased, half-frighten'd,
   As dash'd about the drunken leaves
   The random sunshine lighten'd!
 
   Oh, nature first was fresh to men,
   And wanton without measure;
   So youthful and so flexile then,
   You moved her at your pleasure.
   Twang out, my fiddle! shake the twigs!
   And make her dance attendance;
   Blow, flute, and stir the stiff-set sprigs,
   And scirrhous roots and tendons.
 
   'Tis vain! in such a brassy age
   I could not move a thistle;
   The very sparrows in the hedge
   Scarce answer to my whistle;
   Or at the most, when three-parts-sick
   With strumming and with scraping,
   A jackass heehaws from the rick,
   The passive oxen gaping.
 
   But what is that I hear? a sound
   Like sleepy counsel pleading:
   O Lord!--'tis in my neighbour's ground,
   The modern Muses reading.
   They read Botanic Treatises.
   And works on Gardening thro' there,
   And Methods of transplanting trees
   To look as if they grew there.
 
   The wither'd Misses! how they prose
   O'er books of travell'd seamen,
   And show you slips of all that grows
   From England to Van Diemen.
   They read in arbours clipt and cut,
   And alleys, faded places,
   By squares of tropic summer shut
   And warm'd in crystal cases.
 
   But these, tho' fed with careful dirt,
   Are neither green nor sappy;
   Half-conscious of the garden-squirt,
   The spindlings look unhappy, [3]
   Better to me the meanest weed
   That blows upon its mountain,
   The vilest herb that runs to seed
   Beside its native fountain.
 
   And I must work thro' months of toil,
   And years of cultivation,
   Upon my proper patch of soil
   To grow my own plantation.
   I'll take the showers as they fall,
   I will not vex my bosom:
   Enough if at the end of all
   A little garden blossom.
 
 
 [Foonote 1: Amphion was no doubt capable of performing all the feats
 here attributed to him, but there is no record of them; he appears to
 have confined himself to charming the stones into their places when
 Thebes was being built. Tennyson seems to have confounded him with
 Orpheus.]
 
 [Footnote 2: Till 1857 these four lines ran thus:--
 
   The birch-tree swang her fragrant hair,
   The bramble cast her berry.
   The gin within the juniper
   Began to make him merry.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: All editions up to and including 1850. The poor things look
 unhappy.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ST. AGNES
 
 
 This exquisite little poem was first published in 1837 in the
 'Keepsake', an annual edited by Lady Emmeline Stuart Wortley, and was
 included in the edition of 1842. No alteration has been made in it since
 1842.
 
 In 1857 the title was altered from "St. Agnes" to "St. Agnes' Eve," thus
 bringing it near to Keats' poem, which certainly influenced Tennyson in
 writing it, as a comparison of the opening of the two poems will show.
 The saint from whom the poem takes its name was a young girl of thirteen
 who suffered martyrdom in the reign of Diocletian: she is a companion to
 Sir Galahad.
 
 
   Deep on the convent-roof the snows
   Are sparkling to the moon:
   My breath to heaven like vapour goes:
   May my soul follow soon!
   The shadows of the convent-towers
   Slant down the snowy sward,
   Still creeping with the creeping hours
   That lead me to my Lord:
   Make Thou [1] my spirit pure and clear
   As are the frosty skies,
   Or this first snowdrop of the year
   That in [2] my bosom lies.
 
   As these white robes are soiled and dark,
   To yonder shining ground;
   As this pale taper's earthly spark,
   To yonder argent round;
   So shows my soul before the Lamb,
   My spirit before Thee;
   So in mine earthly house I am,
   To that I hope to be.
   Break up the heavens, O Lord! and far,
   Thro' all yon starlight keen,
   Draw me, thy bride, a glittering star,
   In raiment white and clean.
 
   He lifts me to the golden doors;
   The flashes come and go;
   All heaven bursts her starry floors,
   And strows [3] her lights below,
   And deepens on and up! the gates
   Roll back, and far within
   For me the Heavenly Bridegroom waits, [4]
   To make me pure of sin. [5]
   The sabbaths of Eternity,
   One sabbath deep and wide--
   A light upon the shining sea--
   The Bridegroom [6] with his bride!
 
 
 [Footnote 1: In 'Keepsake': not capital in Thou.]
 
 [Footnote 2: In 'Keepsake': On.]
 
 [Footnote 3: In 'Keepsake': Strews.]
 
 [Footnote 4: In 'Keepsake': not capitals in Heavenly and Bridegroom.]
 
 [Footnote 5: In 'Keepsake': To wash me pure from sin.]
 
 [Footnote 6: In 'Keepsake': capital in Bridegroom.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SIR GALAHAD
 
 Published in 1842. No alteration has been made in it since. This poem
 may be regarded as a prelude to 'The Holy Grail'. The character of
 Galahad is deduced principally from the seventeenth book of the 'Morte
 d'Arthur'. In the twenty-second chapter of that book St. Joseph of
 Arimathea says to him: "Thou hast resembled me in two things in that
 thou hast seen the marvels of the sangreal, and in that thou has been a
 clean maiden".
 
 
   My good blade carves the casques of men,
   My tough lance thrusteth sure,
   My strength is as the strength of ten,
   Because my heart is pure.
 
   The shattering trumpet shrilleth high,
   The hard brands shiver on the steel,
   The splinter'd spear-shafts crack and fly,
   The horse and rider reel:
 
   They reel, they roll in clanging lists,
   And when the tide of combat stands,
   Perfume and flowers fall in showers,
   That lightly rain from ladies' hands.
 
   How sweet are looks that ladies bend
   On whom their favours fall!
   For them I battle till the end,
   To save from shame and thrall:
   But all my heart is drawn above,
   My knees are bow'd in crypt and shrine:
   I never felt the kiss of love,
   Nor maiden's hand in mine.
   More bounteous aspects on me beam,
   Me mightier transports move and thrill;
   So keep I fair thro' faith and prayer
   A virgin heart in work and will.
 
   When down the stormy crescent goes,
   A light before me swims,
   Between dark stems the forest glows,
   I hear a noise of hymns:
   Then by some secret shrine I ride;
   I hear a voice, but none are there;
   The stalls are void, the doors are wide,
   The tapers burning fair.
   Fair gleams the snowy altar-cloth,
   The silver vessels sparkle clean,
   The shrill bell rings, the censer swings,
   And solemn chaunts resound between.
 
   Sometimes on lonely mountain-meres
   I find a magic bark;
   I leap on board: no helmsman steers:
   I float till all is dark.
   A gentle sound, an awful light!
   Three angels bear the holy Grail:
   With folded feet, in stoles of white,
   On sleeping wings they sail.
   Ah, blessed vision! blood of God!
   My spirit beats her mortal bars,
   As down dark tides the glory slides,
   And star-like mingles with the stars.
 
   When on my goodly charger borne
   Thro' dreaming towns I go,
   The cock crows ere the Christmas morn,
   The streets are dumb with snow.
   The tempest crackles on the leads,
   And, ringing, spins from brand and mail;
   But o'er the dark a glory spreads,
   And gilds the driving hail.
   I leave the plain, I climb the height;
   No branchy thicket shelter yields;
   But blessed forms in whistling storms
   Fly o'er waste fens and windy fields.
 
   A maiden knight--to me is given
   Such hope, I know not fear;
   I yearn to breathe the airs of heaven
   That often meet me here.
   I muse on joy that will not cease,
   Pure spaces clothed in living beams,
   Pure lilies of eternal peace,
   Whose odours haunt my dreams;
   And, stricken by an angel's hand,
   This mortal armour that I wear,
   This weight and size, this heart and eyes,
   Are touch'd, are turn'd to finest air.
 
   The clouds are broken in the sky,
   And thro' the mountain-walls
   A rolling organ-harmony
   Swells up, and shakes and falls.
   Then move the trees, the copses nod,
   Wings flutter, voices hover clear:
   "O just and faithful knight of God!
   Ride on! the prize is near".
   So pass I hostel, hall, and grange;
   By bridge and ford, by park and pale,
   All-arm'd I ride, whate'er betide,
   Until I find the holy Grail.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 EDWARD GRAY
 
 First published in 1842 but written in or before 1840. See 'Life', i.,
 209. Not altered since.
 
 
   Sweet Emma Moreland of yonder town
   Met me walking on yonder way,
   "And have you lost your heart?" she said;
   "And are you married yet, Edward Gray?"
 
   Sweet Emma Moreland spoke to me:
   Bitterly weeping I turn'd away:
   "Sweet Emma Moreland, love no more
   Can touch the heart of Edward Gray.
 
   "Ellen Adair she loved me well,
   Against her father's and mother's will:
   To-day I sat for an hour and wept,
   By Ellen's grave, on the windy hill.
 
   "Shy she was, and I thought her cold;
   Thought her proud, and fled over the sea;
   Fill'd I was with folly and spite,
   When Ellen Adair was dying for me.
 
   "Cruel, cruel the words I said!
   Cruelly came they back to-day:
   'You're too slight and fickle,' I said,
   'To trouble the heart of Edward Gray'.
 
   "There I put my face in the grass--
   Whisper'd, 'Listen to my despair:
   I repent me of all I did:
   Speak a little, Ellen Adair!'
 
   "Then I took a pencil, and wrote
   On the mossy stone, as I lay,
   'Here lies the body of Ellen Adair;
   And here the heart of Edward Gray!'
 
   "Love may come, and love may go,
   And fly, like a bird, from tree to tree:
   But I will love no more, no more,
   Till Ellen Adair come back to me.
 
   "Bitterly wept I over the stone:
   Bitterly weeping I turn'd away;
   There lies the body of Ellen Adair!
   And there the heart of Edward Gray!"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 WILL WATERPROOF'S LYRICAL MONOLOGUE
 
 MADE AT THE COCK
 
 First published 1842. The final text was that of 1853, which has not
 been altered since, except that in stanza 29 the two "we's" in the first
 line and the "thy" in the third line are not in later editions
 italicised. The Cock Tavern, No. 201 Fleet Street, on the north side of
 Fleet Street, stood opposite the Temple and was of great antiquity,
 going back nearly 300 years. Strype, bk. iv., h. 117, describes it as "a
 noted public-house," and Pepys' 'Diary', 23rd April, 1668, speaks of
 himself as having been "mighty merry there". The old carved
 chimney-piece was of the age of James I., and the gilt bird over the
 portal was the work of Grinling Gibbons. When Tennyson wrote this poem
 it was the favourite resort of templars, journalists and literary people
 generally, as it had long been. But the old place is now a thing of the
 past. On the evening of 10th April, 1886, it closed its doors for ever
 after an existence of nearly 300 years. There is an admirable
 description of it, signed A. J. M., in 'Notes and Queries', seventh
 series, vol. i., 442-6. I give a short extract:
 
   "At the end of a long room beyond the skylight which, except a feeble
   side window, was its only light in the daytime, was a door that led
   past a small lavatory and up half a dozen narrow steps to the kitchen,
   one of the strangest and grimmest old kitchens you ever saw. Across a
   mighty hatch, thronged with dishes, you looked into it and beheld
   there the white-jacketed man-cook, served by his two robust and
   red-armed kitchen maids. For you they were preparing chops, pork chops
   in winter, lamb chops in spring, mutton chops always, and steaks and
   sausages, and kidneys and potatoes, and poached eggs and Welsh
   rabbits, and stewed cheese, the special glory of the house. That was
   the 'menu' and men were the only guests. But of late years, as
   innovations often precede a catastrophe, two new things were
   introduced, vegetables and women. Both were respectable and both were
   good, but it was felt, especially by the virtuous Smurthwaite, that
   they were 'de trop' in a place so masculine and so carnivorous."
 
 
 
 
 
   O plump head-waiter at The Cock,
   To which I most resort,
   How goes the time? 'Tis five o'clock.
   Go fetch a pint of port:
   But let it not be such as that
   You set before chance-comers,
   But such whose father-grape grew fat
   On Lusitanian summers.
 
   No vain libation to the Muse,
   But may she still be kind,
   And whisper lovely words, and use
   Her influence on the mind,
   To make me write my random rhymes,
   Ere they be half-forgotten;
   Nor add and alter, many times,
   Till all be ripe and rotten.
 
   I pledge her, and she comes and dips
   Her laurel in the wine,
   And lays it thrice upon my lips,
   These favour'd lips of mine;
   Until the charm have power to make
   New life-blood warm the bosom,
   And barren commonplaces break
   In full and kindly [1] blossom.
 
   I pledge her silent at the board;
   Her gradual fingers steal
   And touch upon the master-chord
   Of all I felt and feel.
   Old wishes, ghosts of broken plans,
   And phantom hopes assemble;
   And that child's heart within the man's
   Begins to move and tremble.
 
   Thro' many an hour of summer suns
   By many pleasant ways,
   Against its fountain upward runs
   The current of my days: [2]
   I kiss the lips I once have kiss'd;
   The gas-light wavers dimmer;
   And softly, thro' a vinous mist,
   My college friendships glimmer.
 
   I grow in worth, and wit, and sense,
   Unboding critic-pen,
   Or that eternal want of pence,
   Which vexes public men,
   Who hold their hands to all, and cry
   For that which all deny them--
   Who sweep the crossings, wet or dry,
   And all the world go by them.
 
   Ah yet, tho' [3] all the world forsake,
   Tho' [3] fortune clip my wings,
   I will not cramp my heart, nor take
   Half-views of men and things.
   Let Whig and Tory stir their blood;
   There must be stormy weather;
   But for some true result of good
   All parties work together.
 
   Let there be thistles, there are grapes;
   If old things, there are new;
   Ten thousand broken lights and shapes,
   Yet glimpses of the true.
   Let raffs be rife in prose and rhyme,
   We lack not rhymes and reasons,
   As on this whirligig of Time [4]
   We circle with the seasons.
 
   This earth is rich in man and maid;
   With fair horizons bound:
   This whole wide earth of light and shade
   Comes out, a perfect round.
   High over roaring Temple-bar,
   And, set in Heaven's third story,
   I look at all things as they are,
   But thro' a kind of glory.
 
   Head-waiter, honour'd by the guest
   Half-mused, or reeling-ripe,
   The pint, you brought me, was the best
   That ever came from pipe.
   But tho' [3] the port surpasses praise,
   My nerves have dealt with stiffer.
   Is there some magic in the place?
   Or do my peptics differ?
 
   For since I came to live and learn,
   No pint of white or red
   Had ever half the power to turn
   This wheel within my head,
 
   Which bears a season'd brain about,
   Unsubject to confusion,
   Tho' [3] soak'd and saturate, out and out,
   Thro' every convolution.
 
   For I am of a numerous house,
   With many kinsmen gay,
   Where long and largely we carouse
   As who shall say me nay:
   Each month, a birthday coming on,
   We drink defying trouble,
   Or sometimes two would meet in one,
   And then we drank it double;
 
   Whether the vintage, yet unkept,
   Had relish, fiery-new,
   Or, elbow-deep in sawdust, slept,
   As old as Waterloo;
   Or stow'd (when classic Canning died)
   In musty bins and chambers,
   Had cast upon its crusty side
   The gloom of ten Decembers.
 
   The Muse, the jolly Muse, it is!
   She answer'd to my call,
   She changes with that mood or this,
   Is all-in-all to all:
   She lit the spark within my throat,
   To make my blood run quicker,
   Used all her fiery will, and smote
   Her life into the liquor.
 
   And hence this halo lives about
   The waiter's hands, that reach
   To each his perfect pint of stout,
   His proper chop to each.
   He looks not like the common breed
   That with the napkin dally;
   I think he came like Ganymede,
   From some delightful valley.
 
   The Cock was of a larger egg
   Than modern poultry drop,
   Stept forward on a firmer leg,
   And cramm'd a plumper crop;
   Upon an ampler dunghill trod,
   Crow'd lustier late and early,
   Sipt wine from silver, praising God,
   And raked in golden barley.
 
   A private life was all his joy,
   Till in a court he saw
   A something-pottle-bodied boy,
   That knuckled at the taw:
   He stoop'd and clutch'd him, fair and good,
   Flew over roof and casement:
   His brothers of the weather stood
   Stock-still for sheer amazement.
 
   But he, by farmstead, thorpe and spire,
   And follow'd with acclaims,
   A sign to many a staring shire,
   Came crowing over Thames.
   Right down by smoky Paul's they bore,
   Till, where the street grows straiter, [5]
   One fix'd for ever at the door,
   And one became head-waiter.
 
   But whither would my fancy go?
   How out of place she makes
   The violet of a legend blow
   Among the chops and steaks!
   'Tis but a steward of the can,
   One shade more plump than common;
   As just and mere a serving-man
   As any born of woman.
 
   I ranged too high: what draws me down
   Into the common day?
   Is it the weight of that half-crown,
   Which I shall have to pay?
 
   For, something duller than at first,
   Nor wholly comfortable,
   I sit (my empty glass reversed),
   And thrumming on the table:
 
   Half-fearful that, with self at strife
   I take myself to task;
   Lest of the fullness of my life
   I leave an empty flask:
   For I had hope, by something rare,
   To prove myself a poet;
   But, while I plan and plan, my hair
   Is gray before I know it.
 
   So fares it since the years began,
   Till they be gather'd up;
   The truth, that flies the flowing can,
   Will haunt the vacant cup:
   And others' follies teach us not,
   Nor much their wisdom teaches;
   And most, of sterling worth, is what
   Our own experience preaches.
 
   Ah, let the rusty theme alone!
   We know not what we know.
   But for my pleasant hour, 'tis gone,
   'Tis gone, and let it go.
   'Tis gone: a thousand such have slipt
   Away from my embraces,
   And fall'n into the dusty crypt
   Of darken'd forms and faces.
 
   Go, therefore, thou! thy betters went
   Long since, and came no more;
   With peals of genial clamour sent
   From many a tavern-door,
   With twisted quirks and happy hits,
   From misty men of letters;
   The tavern-hours of mighty wits--
   Thine elders and thy betters.
 
   Hours, when the Poet's words and looks
   Had yet their native glow:
   Not yet the fear of little books
   Had made him talk for show:
   But, all his vast heart sherris-warm'd,
   He flash'd his random speeches;
   Ere days, that deal in ana, swarm'd
   His literary leeches.
 
   So mix for ever with the past,
   Like all good things on earth!
   For should I prize thee, couldst thou last,
   At half thy real worth?
   I hold it good, good things should pass:
   With time I will not quarrel:
   It is but yonder empty glass
   That makes me maudlin-moral.
 
   Head-waiter of the chop-house here,
   To which I most resort,
   I too must part: I hold thee dear
   For this good pint of port.
   For this, thou shalt from all things suck
   Marrow of mirth and laughter;
   And, wheresoe'er thou move, good luck
   Shall fling her old shoe after.
 
   But thou wilt never move from hence,
   The sphere thy fate allots:
   Thy latter days increased with pence
   Go down among the pots:
   Thou battenest by the greasy gleam
   In haunts of hungry sinners,
   Old boxes, larded with the steam
   Of thirty thousand dinners.
 
   _We_ fret, _we_ fume, would shift our skins,
   Would quarrel with our lot;
   _Thy_ care is, under polish'd tins,
   To serve the hot-and-hot;
   To come and go, and come again,
   Returning like the pewit,
   And watch'd by silent gentlemen,
   That trifle with the cruet.
 
   Live long, ere from thy topmost head
   The thick-set hazel dies;
   Long, ere the hateful crow shall tread
   The corners of thine eyes:
   Live long, nor feel in head or chest
   Our changeful equinoxes,
   Till mellow Death, like some late guest,
   Shall call thee from the boxes.
 
   But when he calls, and thou shalt cease
   To pace the gritted floor,
   And, laying down an unctuous lease
   Of life, shalt earn no more;
   No carved cross-bones, the types of Death,
   Shall show thee past to Heaven:
   But carved cross-pipes, and, underneath,
   A pint-pot neatly graven.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 and all previous to 1853. To full and kindly.]
 
 [Footnote 2: All previous to 1853:--
 
   Like Hezekiah's, backward runs
   The shadow of my days.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: All previous to 1853. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 4: The expression is Shakespeare's, 'Twelfth Night', v., i.,
 
   "and thus the whirligig of time brings in his revenges".]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: 1842 to 1843. With motion less or greater.]
 
 
 
 
 TO----
 
 AFTER READING A LIFE AND LETTERS
 
 Originally published in the 'Examiner' for 24th March, 1849; then in the
 sixth edition of the poems, 1850, with the second part of the title and
 the alterations noted. When reprinted in 1851 one more slight alteration
 was made. It has not been altered since. The work referred to was
 Moncton Milne's (afterwards Lord Houghton) 'Letters and Literary Remains
 of Keats' published in 1848, and the person to whom the poem may have
 been addressed was Tennyson's brother Charles, afterwards Charles
 Tennyson Turner, to the facts of whose life and to whose character it
 would exactly apply. See Napier,'Homes and Haunts of Tennyson', 48-50.
 But Sir Franklin Lushington tells me that it was most probably addressed
 to some imaginary person, as neither he nor such of Tennyson's surviving
 friends as he kindly consulted for me are able to identify the person.
 
 
   You might have won the Poet's name
   If such be worth the winning now,
   And gain'd a laurel for your brow
   Of sounder leaf than I can claim;
   But you have made the wiser choice,
   A life that moves to gracious ends
   Thro' troops of unrecording friends,
   A deedful life, a silent voice:
 
   And you have miss'd the irreverent doom
   Of those that wear the Poet's crown:
   Hereafter, neither knave nor clown
   Shall hold their orgies at your tomb.
 
   For now the Poet cannot die
   Nor leave his music as of old,
   But round him ere he scarce be cold
   Begins the scandal and the cry:
 
   "Proclaim the faults he would not show:
   Break lock and seal: betray the trust:
   Keep nothing sacred: 'tis but just
   The many-headed beast should know".
 
   Ah, shameless! for he did but sing.
   A song that pleased us from its worth;
   No public life was his on earth,
   No blazon'd statesman he, nor king.
 
   He gave the people of his best:
   His worst he kept, his best he gave.
   My Shakespeare's curse on [1] clown and knave
   Who will not let his ashes rest!
 
   Who make it seem more sweet [2] to be
   The little life of bank and brier,
   The bird that pipes his lone desire
   And dies unheard within his tree,
 
   Than he that warbles long and loud
   And drops at Glory's temple-gates,
   For whom the carrion vulture waits
   To tear his heart before the crowd!
 
 
 [Footnote 1: In Examiner and in 1850. My curse upon the.]
 
 [Footnote 2: In Examiner. Sweeter seem. For the sentiment 'cf'. Goethe:--
 
   Ich singe, wie der Vogel singt
   Der in den Zweigen wohnet;
   Das Lied das aus dem Seele dringt
   Ist Lohn, der reichlich lohnet.
 
 --'Der Saenger'.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TO E. L.,
 
 ON HIS TRAVELS IN GREECE
 
 This was first printed in 1853. It has not been altered since. The poem
 was addressed to Edward Lear, the landscape painter, and refers to his
 travels.
 
 
   Illyrian woodlands, echoing falls
   Of water, sheets of summer glass,
   The long divine Peneian pass, [1]
   The vast Akrokeraunian walls, [2]
 
   Tomohrit, [3] Athos, all things fair,
   With such a pencil, such a pen,
   You shadow forth to distant men,
   I read and felt that I was there:
 
   And trust me, while I turn'd the page,
   And track'd you still on classic ground,
   I grew in gladness till I found
   My spirits in the golden age.
 
   For me the torrent ever pour'd
   And glisten'd--here and there alone
   The broad-limb'd Gods at random thrown
   By fountain-urns;-and Naiads oar'd
 
   A glimmering shoulder under gloom
   Of cavern pillars; on the swell
   The silver lily heaved and fell;
   And many a slope was rich in bloom
 
   From him that on the mountain lea
   By dancing rivulets fed his flocks,
   To him who sat upon the rocks,
   And fluted to the morning sea.
 
 
 [Footnote 1:  'Cf'. Lear's description of Tempe:
 
   "It is not a vale, it is a narrow pass, and although extremely
   beautiful on account of the precipitous rocks on each side, the Peneus
   flowing deep in the midst between the richest overhanging plane woods,
   still its character is distinctly that of a ravine."
 
 --'Journal', 409.]
 
 
 [Footnote 2: The Akrokeraunian walls: the promontory now called Glossa.]
 
 [Footnote 3: Tomohr, Tomorit, or Tomohritt is a lofty mountain in
 Albania not far from Elbassan. Lear's account of it is very graphic:
 
   "That calm blue plain with Tomohr in the midst like an azure island in
   a boundless sea haunts my mind's eye and varies the present with the
   past".]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LADY CLARE
 
 First published 1842. After 1851 no alterations were made.
 
 This poem was suggested by Miss Ferrier's powerful novel 'The
 Inheritance'. A comparison with the plot of Miss Ferrier's novel will
 show with what tact and skill Tennyson has adapted the tale to his
 ballad. Thomas St. Clair, youngest son of the Earl of Rossville, marries
 a Miss Sarah Black, a girl of humble and obscure birth. He dies, leaving
 a widow and as is supposed a daughter, Gertrude, who claim the
 protection of Lord Rossville, as the child is heiress presumptive to the
 earldom. On Lord Rossville's death she accordingly becomes Countess of
 Rossville. She has two lovers, both distant connections, Colonel Delmour
 and Edward Lyndsay. At last it is discovered that she was not the
 daughter of Thomas St. Clair and her supposed mother, but of one Marion
 La Motte and Jacob Leviston, and that Mrs. St. Clair had adopted her
 when a baby and passed her off as her own child, that she might succeed
 to the title. Meanwhile Delmour by the death of his elder brother
 succeeds to the title and estates forfeited by the detected foundling,
 but instead of acting as Tennyson's Lord Ronald does, he repudiates her
 and marries a duchess. But her other lover Lyndsay is true to her and
 marries her. Delmour not long afterwards dies without issue, and Lyndsay
 succeeds to the title, Gertrude then becoming after all Countess of
 Rossville. In details Tennyson follows the novel sometimes very closely.
 Thus the "single rose," the poor dress, the bitter exclamation about her
 being a beggar born, are from the novel.
 
 The 1842 and all editions up to and including 1850 begin with the
 following stanza and omit stanza 2:--
 
 
 
   Lord Ronald courted Lady Clare,
   I trow they did not part in scorn;
   Lord Ronald, her cousin, courted her
   And they will wed the morrow morn.
 
 
   It was the time when lilies blow,
   And clouds are highest up in air,
   Lord Ronald brought a lily-white doe
   To give his cousin Lady Clare.
 
   I trow they did not part in scorn:
   Lovers long-betroth'd were they:
   They two will wed the morrow morn!
   God's blessing on the day!
 
   "He does not love me for my birth,
   Nor for my lands so broad and fair;
   He loves me for my own true worth,
   And that is well," said Lady Clare.
 
   In there came old Alice the nurse,
   Said, "Who was this that went from thee?"
   "It was my cousin," said Lady Clare,
   "To-morrow he weds with me."
 
   "O God be thank'd!" said Alice the nurse,
   "That all comes round so just and fair:
   Lord Ronald is heir of all your lands,
   And you are not the Lady Clare."
 
   "Are ye out of your mind, my nurse, my nurse?"
   Said Lady Clare, "that ye speak so wild";
   "As God's above," said Alice the nurse,
   "I speak the truth: you are my child.
 
   "The old Earl's daughter died at my breast;
   I speak the truth, as I live by bread!
   I buried her like my own sweet child,
   And put my child in her stead."
 
   "Falsely, falsely have ye done,
   O mother," she said, "if this be true,
   To keep the best man under the sun
   So many years from his due."
 
   "Nay now, my child," said Alice the nurse,
   "But keep the secret for your life,
   And all you have will be Lord Ronald's,
   When you are man and wife."
 
   "If I'm a beggar born," she said,
   "I will speak out, for I dare not lie.
   Pull off, pull off, the broach [1] of gold,
   And fling the diamond necklace by."
 
   "Nay now, my child," said Alice the nurse,
   "But keep the secret all ye can."
   She said, "Not so: but I will know
   If there be any faith in man".
 
   "Nay now, what faith?" said Alice the nurse,
   "The man will cleave unto his right."
   "And he shall have it," the lady replied,
   "Tho' [2] I should die to-night."
 
   "Yet give one kiss to your mother dear!
   Alas, my child, I sinn'd for thee."
   "O mother, mother, mother," she said,
   "So strange it seems to me.
 
   "Yet here's a kiss for my mother dear,
   My mother dear, if this be so,
   And lay your hand upon my head,
   And bless me, mother, ere I go."
 
   She clad herself in a russet gown,
   She was no longer Lady Clare:
   She went by dale, and she went by down,
   With a single rose in her hair.
 
   The lily-white doe Lord Ronald had brought
   Leapt up from where she lay,
   Dropt her head in the maiden's hand,
   And follow'd her all the way. [3]
 
   Down stept Lord Ronald from his tower:
   "O Lady Clare, you shame your worth!
   Why come you drest like a village maid,
   That are the flower of the earth?"
 
   "If I come drest like a village maid,
   I am but as my fortunes are:
   I am a beggar born," she said, [4]
   "And not the Lady Clare."
 
   "Play me no tricks," said Lord Ronald,
   "For I am yours in word and in deed.
   Play me no tricks," said Lord Ronald,
   "Your riddle is hard to read."
 
   O and proudly stood she up!
   Her heart within her did not fail:
   She look'd into Lord Ronald's eyes,
   And told him all her nurse's tale.
 
   He laugh'd a laugh of merry scorn:
   He turn'd, and kiss'd her where she stood:
   "If you are not the heiress born,
   And I," said he, "the next in blood--
 
   "If you are not the heiress born,
   And I," said he, "the lawful heir,
   We two will wed to-morrow morn,
   And you shall still be Lady Clare."
 
 
 [Footnote 1: All up to and including 1850. Brooch.]
 
 [Footnote 2: All up to and including 1850. Though.]
 
 [Footnote 3: The stanza beginning "The lily-white doe" is omitted in
 1842 and 1843, and in the subsequent editions up to and including 1850
 begins "A lily-white doe".]
 
 [Footnote 4: In a letter addressed to Tennyson the late Mr. Peter Bayne
 ventured to object to the dramatic propriety of Lady Clare speaking of
 herself as "a beggar born". Tennyson defended it by saying: "You make no
 allowance for the shock of the fall from being Lady Clare to finding
 herself the child of a nurse". But the expression is Miss Ferrier's: "Oh
 that she had suffered me to remain the beggar I was born"; and again to
 her lover: "You have loved an impostor and a beggar".]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE LORD OF BURLEIGH
 
 Written, as we learn from 'Life', i., 182, by 1835. First published in
 1842. No alteration since with the exception of "tho'" for "though".
 
 This poem tells the well-known story of Sarah Hoggins who married under
 the circumstances related in the poem. She died in January, 1797,
 sinking, so it was said, but without any authority for such a statement,
 under the burden of an honour "unto which she was not born". The story
 is that Henry Cecil, heir presumptive to his uncle, the ninth Earl of
 Exeter, was staying at Bolas, a rural village in Shropshire, where he
 met Sarah Hoggins and married her. They lived together at Bolas, where
 the two eldest of his children were born, for two years before he came
 into the title. She bore him two other children after she was Countess
 of Exeter, dying at Burleigh House near Stamford at the early age of
 twenty-four. The obituary notice runs thus: "January, 1797. At Burleigh
 House near Stamford, aged twenty-four, to the inexpressible surprise and
 concern of all acquainted with her, the Right Honbl. Countess of
 Exeter." For full information about this romantic incident see Walford's
 'Tales of Great Families', first series, vol. i., 65-82, and two
 interesting papers signed W. O. Woodall in 'Notes and Queries', seventh
 series, vol. xii., 221-23; 'ibid.', 281-84, and Napier's 'Homes and
 Haunts of Tennyson', 104-111.
 
 
   In her ear he whispers gaily,
   "If my heart by signs can tell,
   Maiden, I have watch'd thee daily,
   And I think thou lov'st me well".
   She replies, in accents fainter,
   "There is none I love like thee".
   He is but a landscape-painter,
   And a village maiden she.
   He to lips, that fondly falter,
   Presses his without reproof:
   Leads her to the village altar,
   And they leave her father's roof.
   "I can make no marriage present;
   Little can I give my wife.
   Love will make our cottage pleasant,
   And I love thee more than life."
   They by parks and lodges going
   See the lordly castles stand:
   Summer woods, about them blowing,
   Made a murmur in the land.
   From deep thought himself he rouses,
   Says to her that loves him well,
   "Let us see these handsome houses
   Where the wealthy nobles dwell".
   So she goes by him attended,
   Hears him lovingly converse,
   Sees whatever fair and splendid
   Lay betwixt his home and hers;
   Parks with oak and chestnut shady,
   Parks and order'd gardens great,
   Ancient homes of lord and lady,
   Built for pleasure and for state.
   All he shows her makes him dearer:
   Evermore she seems to gaze
   On that cottage growing nearer,
   Where they twain will spend their days.
   O but she will love him truly!
   He shall have a cheerful home;
   She will order all things duly,
   When beneath his roof they come.
   Thus her heart rejoices greatly,
   Till a gateway she discerns
   With armorial bearings stately,
   And beneath the gate she turns;
   Sees a mansion more majestic
   Than all those she saw before:
   Many a gallant gay domestic
   Bows before him at the door.
   And they speak in gentle murmur,
   When they answer to his call,
   While he treads with footstep firmer,
   Leading on from hall to hall.
   And, while now she wonders blindly,
   Nor the meaning can divine,
   Proudly turns he round and kindly,
   "All of this is mine and thine".
   Here he lives in state and bounty,
   Lord of Burleigh, fair and free,
   Not a lord in all the county
   Is so great a lord as he.
   All at once the colour flushes
   Her sweet face from brow to chin:
   As it were with shame she blushes,
   And her spirit changed within.
   Then her countenance all over
   Pale again as death did prove:
   But he clasp'd her like a lover,
   And he cheer'd her soul with love.
   So she strove against her weakness,
   Tho' at times her spirits sank:
   Shaped her heart with woman's meekness
   To all duties of her rank:
   And a gentle consort made he,
   And her gentle mind was such
   That she grew a noble lady,
   And the people loved her much.
   But a trouble weigh'd upon her,
   And perplex'd her, night and morn,
   With the burthen of an honour
   Unto which she was not born.
   Faint she grew, and ever fainter,
   As she murmur'd "Oh, that he
   Were once more that landscape-painter
   Which did win my heart from me!"
   So she droop'd and droop'd before him,
   Fading slowly from his side:
   Three fair children first she bore him,
   Then before her time she died.
   Weeping, weeping late and early,
   Walking up and pacing down,
   Deeply mourn'd the Lord of Burleigh,
   Burleigh-house by Stamford-town.
   And he came to look upon her,
   And he look'd at her and said,
   "Bring the dress and put it on her,
   That she wore when she was wed".
   Then her people, softly treading,
   Bore to earth her body, drest
   In the dress that she was wed in,
   That her spirit might have rest.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SIR LAUNCELOT AND QUEEN GUINEVERE
 
 A FRAGMENT
 
 First published in 1842. Not altered since 1853.
 
 See for what may have given the hint for this fragment _Morte D'Arthur_,
 bk. xix., ch. i., and bk. xx., ch. i., and _cf. Coming of Arthur:_--
 
     And Launcelot pass'd away among the flowers,
     For then was latter April, and return'd
     Among the flowers in May with Guinevere.
 
 
 
   Like souls that balance joy and pain,
   With tears and smiles from heaven again
   The maiden Spring upon the plain
   Came in a sun-lit fall of rain.
   In crystal vapour everywhere
   Blue isles of heaven laugh'd between,
   And, far in forest-deeps unseen,
   The topmost elm-tree [1] gather'd green
   From draughts of balmy air.
 
   Sometimes the linnet piped his song:
   Sometimes the throstle whistled strong:
   Sometimes the sparhawk, wheel'd along,
   Hush'd all the groves from fear of wrong:
   By grassy capes with fuller sound
   In curves the yellowing river ran,
   And drooping chestnut-buds began
   To spread into the perfect fan,
   Above the teeming ground.
 
   Then, in the boyhood of the year,
   Sir Launcelot and Queen Guinevere
   Rode thro' the coverts of the deer,
   With blissful treble ringing clear.
   She seem'd a part of joyous Spring:
   A gown of grass-green silk she wore,
   Buckled with golden clasps before;
   A light-green tuft of plumes she bore
   Closed in a golden ring.
 
   Now on some twisted ivy-net,
   Now by some tinkling rivulet,
   In mosses mixt [2] with violet
   Her cream-white mule his pastern set:
   And fleeter now [3] she skimm'd the plains
   Than she whose elfin prancer springs
   By night to eery warblings,
   When all the glimmering moorland rings
   With jingling bridle-reins.
 
   As she fled fast thro' sun and shade,
   The happy winds upon her play'd,
   Blowing the ringlet from the braid:
   She look'd so lovely, as she sway'd
   The rein with dainty finger-tips,
   A man had given all other bliss,
   And all his worldly worth for this,
   To waste his whole heart in one kiss
   Upon her perfect lips.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Up to 1848. Linden.]
 
 [Footnote 2: All editions up to and including 1850. On mosses thick.]
 
 [Footnote 3: 1842 to 1851. And now more fleet,]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 A FAREWELL
 
 First published in 1842. Not altered since 1843.
 
 This poem was dedicated to the brook at Somersby described in the 'Ode
 to Memory' and referred to so often in 'In Memoriam'. Possibly it may
 have been written in 1837 when the Tennysons left Somersby. 'Cf. In
 Memoriam', sect. ci.
 
   Flow down, cold rivulet, to the sea,
   Thy tribute wave deliver:
   No more by thee my steps shall be,
   For ever and for ever.
 
   Flow, softly flow, by lawn and lea,
   A rivulet then a river:
   No where by thee my steps shall be,
   For ever and for ever.
 
   But here will sigh thine alder tree,
   And here thine aspen shiver;
   And here by thee will hum the bee,
   For ever and for ever.
 
   A thousand suns [1] will stream on thee,
   A thousand moons will quiver;
   But not by thee my steps shall be,
   For ever and for ever.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842. A hundred suns.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE BEGGAR MAID
 
 First published in 1842, not altered since.
 
 Suggested probably by the fine ballad in Percy's _Reliques_, first
 series, book ii., ballad vi.
 
 
   Her arms across her breast she laid;
   She was more fair than words can say:
   Bare-footed came the beggar maid
   Before the king Cophetua.
   In robe and crown the king stept down,
   To meet and greet her on her way;
   "It is no wonder," said the lords,
   "She is more beautiful than day".
 
   As shines the moon in clouded skies,
   She in her poor attire was seen:
   One praised her ancles, one her eyes,
   One her dark hair and lovesome mien:
   So sweet a face, such angel grace,
   In all that land had never been:
   Cophetua sware a royal oath:
   "This beggar maid shall be my queen!"
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE VISION OF SIN
 
 First published in 1842. No alteration made in it after 1851, except in
 the insertion of a couplet afterwards omitted.
 
 This remarkable poem may be regarded as a sort of companion poem to 'The
 Palace of Art'; the one traces the effect of callous indulgence in mere
 intellectual and aesthetic pleasures, the other of profligate indulgence
 in the grosser forms of sensual enjoyment. At first all is ecstasy and
 intoxication, then comes satiety, and all that satiety brings in its
 train, cynicism, pessimism, the drying up of the very springs of life.
 "The body chilled, jaded and ruined, the cup of pleasure drained to the
 dregs, the senses exhausted of their power to enjoy, the spirit of its
 wish to aspire, nothing left but loathing, craving and rottenness." See
 Spedding in 'Edinburgh Review' for April, 1843. The poem concludes by
 leaving as an answer to the awful question, "can there be final
 salvation for the poor wretch?" a reply undecipherable by man, and dawn
 breaking in angry splendour. The best commentary on the poem would be
 Byron's lyric: "There's not a joy the world can give like that it takes
 away," and 'Don Juan'; biography and daily life are indeed full of
 comments on the truth of this fine allegory.
 
 
   1
 
   I had a vision when the night was late:
   A youth came riding toward a palace-gate.
   He rode a horse with wings, that would have flown, [1]
   But that his heavy rider kept him down.
   And from the palace came a child of sin,
   And took him by the curls, and led him in,
   Where sat a company with heated eyes,
   Expecting when a fountain should arise:
   A sleepy light upon their brows and lips--
   As when the sun, a crescent of eclipse,
   Dreams over lake and lawn, and isles and capes--
   Suffused them, sitting, lying, languid shapes,
   By heaps of gourds, and skins of wine, and piles of grapes.
 
 
   2
 
   Then methought I heard a mellow sound,
   Gathering up from all the lower ground; [2]
   Narrowing in to where they sat assembled
   Low voluptuous music winding trembled,
   Wov'n in circles: they that heard it sigh'd,
   Panted hand in hand with faces pale,
   Swung themselves, and in low tones replied;
   Till the fountain spouted, showering wide
   Sleet of diamond-drift and pearly hail;
   Then the music touch'd the gates and died;
   Rose again from where it seem'd to fail,
   Storm'd in orbs of song, a growing gale;
   Till thronging in and in, to where they waited,
   As 'twere a hundred-throated nightingale,
   The strong tempestuous treble throbb'd and palpitated;
   Ran into its giddiest whirl of sound,
   Caught the sparkles, and in circles,
   Purple gauzes, golden hazes, liquid mazes,
   Flung the torrent rainbow round:
   Then they started from their places,
   Moved with violence, changed in hue,
   Caught each other with wild grimaces,
   Half-invisible to the view,
   Wheeling with precipitate paces
   To the melody, till they flew,
   Hair, and eyes, and limbs, and faces,
   Twisted hard in fierce embraces,
   Like to Furies, like to Graces,
   Dash'd together in blinding dew:
   Till, kill'd with some luxurious agony,
   The nerve-dissolving melody
   Flutter'd headlong from the sky.
 
 
   3
 
   And then I look'd up toward a mountain-tract,
   That girt the region with high cliff and lawn:
   I saw that every morning, far withdrawn
   Beyond the darkness and the cataract,
   God made himself an awful rose of dawn, [3]
   Unheeded: and detaching, fold by fold,
   From those still heights, and, slowly drawing near,
   A vapour heavy, hueless, formless, cold,
   Came floating on for many a month and year,
   Unheeded: and I thought I would have spoken,
   And warn'd that madman ere it grew too late:
   But, as in dreams, I could not. Mine was broken,
   When that cold vapour touch'd the palace-gate,
   And link'd again. I saw within my head
   A gray and gap-tooth'd man as lean as death,
   Who slowly rode across a wither'd heath,
   And lighted at a ruin'd inn, and said:
 
 
   4
 
   "Wrinkled ostler, grim and thin!
   Here is custom come your way;
   Take my brute, and lead him in,
   Stuff his ribs with mouldy hay.
 
   "Bitter barmaid, waning fast!
   See that sheets are on my bed;
   What! the flower of life is past:
   It is long before you wed.
 
   "Slip-shod waiter, lank and sour,
   At the Dragon on the heath!
   Let us have a quiet hour,
   Let us hob-and-nob with Death.
 
   "I am old, but let me drink;
   Bring me spices, bring me wine;
   I remember, when I think,
   That my youth was half divine.
 
   "Wine is good for shrivell'd lips,
   When a blanket wraps the day,
   When the rotten woodland drips,
   And the leaf is stamp'd in clay.
 
   "Sit thee down, and have no shame,
   Cheek by jowl, and knee by knee:
   What care I for any name?
   What for order or degree?
 
   "Let me screw thee up a peg:
   Let me loose thy tongue with wine:
   Callest thou that thing a leg?
   Which is thinnest? thine or mine?
 
   "Thou shalt not be saved by works:
   Thou hast been a sinner too:
   Ruin'd trunks on wither'd forks,
   Empty scarecrows, I and you!
 
   "Fill the cup, and fill the can:
   Have a rouse before the morn:
   Every moment dies a man,
   Every moment one is born. [4]
 
   "We are men of ruin'd blood;
   Therefore comes it we are wise.
   Fish are we that love the mud.
   Rising to no fancy-flies.
 
   "Name and fame! to fly sublime
   Thro' the courts, the camps, the schools,
   Is to be the ball of Time,
   Bandied by the hands of fools.
 
   "Friendship!--to be two in one--
   Let the canting liar pack!
   Well I know, when I am gone,
   How she mouths behind my back.
 
   "Virtue!--to be good and just--
   Every heart, when sifted well,
   Is a clot of warmer dust,
   Mix'd with cunning sparks of hell.
 
   "O! we two as well can look
   Whited thought and cleanly life
   As the priest, above his book
   Leering at his neighbour's wife.
 
   "Fill the cup, and fill the can:
   Have a rouse before the morn:
   Every moment dies a man,
   Every moment one is born. [4]
 
   "Drink, and let the parties rave:
   They are fill'd with idle spleen;
   Rising, falling, like a wave,
   For they know not what they mean.
 
   "He that roars for liberty
   Faster binds a tyrant's [5] power;
   And the tyrant's cruel glee
   Forces on the freer hour.
 
   "Fill the can, and fill the cup:
   All the windy ways of men
   Are but dust that rises up,
   And is lightly laid again.
 
   "Greet her with applausive breath,
   Freedom, gaily doth she tread;
   In her right a civic wreath,
   In her left a human head.
 
   "No, I love not what is new;
   She is of an ancient house:
   And I think we know the hue
   Of that cap upon her brows.
 
   "Let her go! her thirst she slakes
   Where the bloody conduit runs:
   Then her sweetest meal she makes
   On the first-born of her sons.
 
   "Drink to lofty hopes that cool--
   Visions of a perfect State:
   Drink we, last, the public fool,
   Frantic love and frantic hate.
 
   "Chant me now some wicked stave,
   Till thy drooping courage rise,
   And the glow-worm of the grave
   Glimmer in thy rheumy eyes.
 
   "Fear not thou to loose thy tongue;
   Set thy hoary fancies free;
   What is loathsome to the young
   Savours well to thee and me.
 
   "Change, reverting to the years,
   When thy nerves could understand
   What there is in loving tears,
   And the warmth of hand in hand.
 
   "Tell me tales of thy first love--
   April hopes, the fools of chance;
   Till the graves begin to move,
   And the dead begin to dance.
 
   "Fill the can, and fill the cup:
   All the windy ways of men
   Are but dust that rises up,
   And is lightly laid again.
 
   "Trooping from their mouldy dens
   The chap-fallen circle spreads:
   Welcome, fellow-citizens,
   Hollow hearts and empty heads!
 
   "You are bones, and what of that?
   Every face, however full,
   Padded round with flesh and fat,
   Is but modell'd on a skull.
 
   "Death is king, and Vivat Rex!
   Tread a measure on the stones,
   Madam--if I know your sex,
   From the fashion of your bones.
 
   "No, I cannot praise the fire
   In your eye--nor yet your lip:
   All the more do I admire
   Joints of cunning workmanship.
 
   "Lo! God's likeness--the ground-plan--
   Neither modell'd, glazed, or framed:
   Buss me thou rough sketch of man,
   Far too naked to be shamed!
 
   "Drink to Fortune, drink to Chance,
   While we keep a little breath!
   Drink to heavy Ignorance!
   Hob-and-nob with brother Death!
 
   "Thou art mazed, the night is long,
   And the longer night is near:
   What! I am not all as wrong
   As a bitter jest is dear.
 
   "Youthful hopes, by scores, to all,
   When the locks are crisp and curl'd;
   Unto me my maudlin gall
   And my mockeries of the world.
 
   "Fill the cup, and fill the can!
   Mingle madness, mingle scorn!
   Dregs of life, and lees of man:
   Yet we will not die forlorn."
 
 
   5
 
   The voice grew faint: there came a further change:
   Once more uprose the mystic mountain-range:
   Below were men and horses pierced with worms,
   And slowly quickening into lower forms;
   By shards and scurf of salt, and scum of dross,
   Old plash of rains, and refuse patch'd with moss,
   Then some one spake [6]: "Behold! it was a crime
   Of sense avenged by sense that wore with time".
   [7] Another said: "The crime of sense became
   The crime of malice, and is equal blame".
   And one: "He had not wholly quench'd his power;
   A little grain of conscience made him sour".
   At last I heard a voice upon the slope
   Cry to the summit, "Is there any hope?"
   To which an answer peal'd from that high land.
   But in a tongue no man could understand;
   And on the glimmering limit far withdrawn
   God made Himself an awful rose of dawn. [8]
 
 
 [Footnote 1: A reference to the famous passage in the 'Phoedrus' where
 Plato compares the soul to a chariot drawn by the two-winged steeds.]
 
 Footnote 2: Imitated apparently from the dance in Shelley's 'Triumph of
 Life':--
 
   The wild dance maddens in the van; and those
   ...
   Mix with each other in tempestuous measure
   To savage music, wilder as it grows.
 
   They, tortur'd by their agonising pleasure,
   Convuls'd, and on the rapid whirlwinds spun
   ...
   Maidens and youths fling their wild arms in air.
   As their feet twinkle, etc.]
 
 
 [Footnote 3: See footnote to last line.]
 
 [Footnote 4: All up to and including 1850 read:--
 
   Every _minute_ dies a man,
   Every _minute_ one is born.
 
 Mr. Babbage, the famous mathematician, is said to have addressed the
 following letter to Tennyson in reference to this couplet:--
 
   "I need hardly point out to you that this calculation would tend to
   keep the sum total of the world's population in a state of perpetual
   equipoise, whereas it is a]**[Footnote: well-known fact that the said
   sum total is constantly on the increase. I would therefore take the
   liberty of suggesting that, in the next edition of your excellent
   poem, the erroneous calculation to which I refer should be corrected
   as follows:--
 
     Every moment dies a man,
     And one and a sixteenth is born.
 
   I may add that the exact figures are 1.167, but something must, of
   course, be conceded to the laws of metre."]
 
 
 [Footnote 5: 1842 and 1843. The tyrant's.]
 
 [Footnote 6: 1842. Said.]
 
 [Footnote 7: In the Selection published in 1865 Tennyson here inserted a
 couplet which he afterwards omitted:--
 
   Another answer'd: "But a crime of sense!"
   "Give him new nerves with old experience."]
 
 
 [Footnote 8: In Professor Tyndall's reminiscences of Tennyson, inserted
 in Tennyson's 'Life', he says he once asked him for some
 explanation of this line, and the poet's reply was:
 
   "The power of explaining such concentrated expressions of the
   imagination was very different from that of writing them".
 
 And on another occasion he said very happily:
 
   "Poetry is like shot silk with many glancing colours. Every reader
   must find his own interpretation, according to his ability, and
   according to his sympathy with the poet".
 
 Poetry in its essential forms always suggests infinitely more than it
 expresses, and at once inspires and kindles the intelligence which is to
 comprehend it; if that intelligence, which is perhaps only another name
 for sympathy, does not exist, then, in Byron's happy sarcasm:--
 
   "The gentle readers wax unkind,
   And, not so studious for the poet's ease,
   Insist on knowing what he 'means', a hard
   And hapless situation for a bard".
 
 Possibly Tennyson may have had in his mind Keats's line:--
 
 "There was an awful rainbow once in heaven"]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 COME NOT, WHEN I AM DEAD...
 
 First published in 'The Keepsake' for 1851.
 
   Come not, when I am dead,
   To drop thy foolish tears upon my grave,
   To trample round my fallen head,
   And vex the unhappy dust thou wouldst not save.
   There let the wind sweep and the plover cry;
   But thou, go by. [1]
 
   Child, if it were thine error or thy crime
   I care no longer, being all unblest:
   Wed whom thou wilt, but I am sick of Time, [2]
   And I desire to rest.
   Pass on, weak heart, and leave me where I lie:
   Go by, go by.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 'The Keepsake':--But go thou by.]
 
 [Footnote 2: 'The Keepsake' has a small 't' for Time.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE EAGLE
 
 {FRAGMENT}
 
 First published in 1851. It has not been altered.
 
 
   He clasps the crag with hooked hands;
   Close to the sun in lonely lands,
   Ring'd with the azure world, he stands.
 
   The wrinkled sea beneath him crawls; [1]
   He watches from his mountain walls,
   And like a thunderbolt he falls.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: One of Tennyson's most magically descriptive lines; nothing
 could exceed the vividness of the words "wrinkled" and "crawls" here.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 MOVE EASTWARD, HAPPY EARTH...
 
 First published in 1842.
 
   Move eastward, happy earth, and leave
   Yon orange sunset waning slow:
   From fringes of the faded eve,
   O, happy planet, eastward go;
   Till over thy dark shoulder glow
   Thy silver sister-world, and rise
   To glass herself in dewy eyes
   That watch me from the glen below.
 
   Ah, bear me with thee, smoothly [1] borne,
   Dip forward under starry light,
   And move me to my marriage-morn,
   And round again to happy night.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1842 to 1853. Lightly.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 BREAK, BREAK, BREAK...
 
 First published in 1842. No alteration.
 
 This exquisite poem was composed in a very different scene from that to
 which it refers, namely in "a Lincolnshire lane at five o'clock in the
 morning between blossoming hedges". See 'Life of Tennyson', vol. i., p.
 223.
 
   Break, break, break,
   On thy cold gray stones, O Sea!
   And I would that my tongue could utter
   The thoughts that arise in me.
 
   O well for the fisherman's boy,
   That he shouts with his sister at play!
   O well for the sailor lad,
   That he sings in his boat on the bay!
 
   And the stately ships go on
   To their haven under the hill;
   But O for the touch of a vanish'd hand,
   And the sound of a voice that is still!
 
   Break, break, break,
   At the foot of thy crags, O Sea!
   But the tender grace of a day that is dead
   Will never come back to me.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE POET'S SONG
 
 First published in 1842.
 
   The rain had fallen, the Poet arose,
   He pass'd by the town and out of the street,
   A light wind blew from the gates of the sun,
   And waves of shadow went over the wheat,
   And he sat him down in a lonely place,
   And chanted a melody loud and sweet,
   That made the wild-swan pause in her cloud,
   And the lark drop down at his feet.
 
   The swallow stopt as he hunted the bee, [1]
   The snake slipt under a spray,
   The wild hawk stood with the down on his beak,
   And stared, with his foot on the prey,
   And the nightingale thought, "I have sung many songs,
   But never a one so gay,
   For he sings of what the world will be
   When the years have died away".
 
 
 [Footnote 1: 1889, Fly.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 APPENDIX
 
 The Poems published in MDCCCXXX and in MDCCCXXXIII which were
 temporarily or finally suppressed.
 
 
 
 
 POEMS PUBLISHED IN MDCCCXXX
 
 
 ELEGIACS
 
 Reprinted in Collected Works among 'Juvenilia', with title
 altered to 'Leonine Elegiacs'. The only alterations made in the
 text were "wood-dove" for "turtle," and the substitution of "or" for
 "and" in the last line but one.
 
   Lowflowing breezes are roaming the broad valley dimm'd in the
     gloaming:
   Thoro' the black-stemm'd pines only the far river shines.
   Creeping thro' blossomy rushes and bowers of rose-blowing bushes,
   Down by the poplar tall rivulets babble and fall.
   Barketh the shepherd-dog cheerily; the grasshopper carolleth clearly;
   Deeply the turtle coos; shrilly the owlet halloos;
   Winds creep; dews fell chilly: in her first sleep earth breathes
     stilly:
   Over the pools in the burn watergnats murmur and mourn.
   Sadly the far kine loweth: the glimmering water outfloweth:
   Twin peaks shadow'd with pine slope to the dark hyaline.
   Lowthroned Hesper is stayed between the two peaks; but the Naiad
   Throbbing in mild unrest holds him beneath in her breast.
 
   The ancient poetess singeth, that Hesperus all things bringeth,
   Smoothing the wearied mind: bring me my love, Rosalind.
   Thou comest morning and even; she cometh not morning or even.
   False-eyed Hesper, unkind, where is my sweet Rosalind?
 
 
 
 
 THE "HOW" AND THE "WHY"
 
 
   I am any man's suitor,
   If any will be my tutor:
   Some say this life is pleasant,
   Some think it speedeth fast:
   In time there is no present,
   In eternity no future,
   In eternity no past.
   We laugh, we cry, we are born, we die,
   Who will riddle me the _how_ and the _why_?
 
   The bulrush nods unto its brother,
   The wheatears whisper to each other:
   What is it they say? What do they there?
   Why two and two make four? Why round is not square?
   Why the rocks stand still, and the light clouds fly?
   Why the heavy oak groans, and the white willows sigh?
   Why deep is not high, and high is not deep?
   Whether we wake, or whether we sleep?
   Whether we sleep, or whether we die?
   How you are you? Why I am I?
   Who will riddle me the _how_ and the _why_?
 
   The world is somewhat; it goes on somehow;
   But what is the meaning of _then_ and _now_?
   I feel there is something; but how and what?
   I know there is somewhat; but what and why?
   I cannot tell if that somewhat be I.
 
   The little bird pipeth, "why? why?"
   In the summerwoods when the sun falls low
   And the great bird sits on the opposite bough,
   And stares in his face and shouts, "how? how?"
   And the black owl scuds down the mellow twilight,
   And chaunts, "how? how?" the whole of the night.
 
   Why the life goes when the blood is spilt?
   What the life is? where the soul may lie?
   Why a church is with a steeple built;
   And a house with a chimneypot?
   Who will riddle me the how and the what?
   Who will riddle me the what and the why?
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SUPPOSED CONFESSIONS
 
 OF A SECOND-RATE SENSITIVE MIND NOT IN UNITY WITH ITSELF
 
 There has been only one important alteration made in this poem, when it
 was reprinted among the 'Juvenilia' in 1871, and that was the
 suppression of the verses beginning "A grief not uninformed and dull" to
 "Indued with immortality" inclusive, and the substitution of "rosy" for
 "waxen". Capitals are in all cases inserted in the reprint where the
 Deity is referred to, "through" is altered into "thro'" all through the
 poem, and hyphens are inserted in the double epithets. No further
 alterations were made in the edition of 1830.
 
   Oh God! my God! have mercy now.
   I faint, I fall. Men say that thou
   Didst die for me, for such as _me_,
   Patient of ill, and death, and scorn,
   And that my sin was as a thorn
   Among the thorns that girt thy brow,
   Wounding thy soul.--That even now,
   In this extremest misery
   Of ignorance, I should require
   A sign! and if a bolt of fire
   Would rive the slumbrous summernoon
   While I do pray to thee alone,
   Think my belief would stronger grow!
   Is not my human pride brought low?
   The boastings of my spirit still?
   The joy I had in my freewill
   All cold, and dead, and corpse-like grown?
   And what is left to me, but thou,
   And faith in thee? Men pass me by;
   Christians with happy countenances--
   And children all seem full of thee!
   And women smile with saint-like glances
   Like thine own mother's when she bow'd
   Above thee, on that happy morn
   When angels spake to men aloud,
   And thou and peace to earth were born.
   Goodwill to me as well as all--
   I one of them: my brothers they:
   Brothers in Christ--a world of peace
   And confidence, day after day;
   And trust and hope till things should cease,
   And then one Heaven receive us all.
   How sweet to have a common faith!
   To hold a common scorn of death!
   And at a burial to hear
   The creaking cords which wound and eat
   Into my human heart, whene'er
   Earth goes to earth, with grief, not fear,
   With hopeful grief, were passing sweet!
 
   A grief not uninformed, and dull
   Hearted with hope, of hope as full
   As is the blood with life, or night
   And a dark cloud with rich moonlight.
   To stand beside a grave, and see
   The red small atoms wherewith we
   Are built, and smile in calm, and say--
   "These little moles and graves shall be
   Clothed on with immortality
   More glorious than the noon of day--
   All that is pass'd into the flowers
   And into beasts and other men,
   And all the Norland whirlwind showers
   From open vaults, and all the sea
   O'er washes with sharp salts, again
   Shall fleet together all, and be
   Indued with immortality."
 
   Thrice happy state again to be
   The trustful infant on the knee!
   Who lets his waxen fingers play
   About his mother's neck, and knows
   Nothing beyond his mother's eyes.
   They comfort him by night and day;
   They light his little life alway;
   He hath no thought of coming woes;
   He hath no care of life or death,
   Scarce outward signs of joy arise,
   Because the Spirit of happiness
   And perfect rest so inward is;
   And loveth so his innocent heart,
   Her temple and her place of birth,
   Where she would ever wish to dwell,
   Life of the fountain there, beneath
   Its salient springs, and far apart,
   Hating to wander out on earth,
   Or breathe into the hollow air,
   Whose dullness would make visible
   Her subtil, warm, and golden breath,
   Which mixing with the infant's blood,
   Fullfills him with beatitude.
   Oh! sure it is a special care
   Of God, to fortify from doubt,
   To arm in proof, and guard about
   With triple-mailed trust, and clear
   Delight, the infant's dawning year.
 
   Would that my gloomed fancy were
   As thine, my mother, when with brows
   Propped on thy knees, my hands upheld
   In thine, I listen'd to thy vows,
   For me outpour'd in holiest prayer--
   For me unworthy!--and beheld
   Thy mild deep eyes upraised, that knew
   The beauty and repose of faith,
   And the clear spirit shining through.
   Oh! wherefore do we grow awry
   From roots which strike so deep? why dare
   Paths in the desert? Could not I
   Bow myself down, where thou hast knelt,
   To th' earth--until the ice would melt
   Here, and I feel as thou hast felt?
   What Devil had the heart to scathe
   Flowers thou hadst rear'd--to brush the dew
   From thine own lily, when thy grave
   Was deep, my mother, in the clay?
   Myself? Is it thus? Myself? Had I
   So little love for thee? But why
   Prevail'd not thy pure prayers? Why pray
   To one who heeds not, who can save
   But will not? Great in faith, and strong
   Against the grief of circumstance
   Wert thou, and yet unheard. What if
   Thou pleadest still, and seest me drive
   Thro' utter dark a fullsailed skiff,
   Unpiloted i' the echoing dance
   Of reboant whirlwinds, stooping low
   Unto the death, not sunk! I know
   At matins and at evensong,
   That thou, if thou were yet alive,
   In deep and daily prayers wouldst strive
   To reconcile me with thy God.
   Albeit, my hope is gray, and cold
   At heart, thou wouldest murmur still--
   "Bring this lamb back into thy fold,
   My Lord, if so it be thy will".
   Wouldst tell me I must brook the rod,
   And chastisement of human pride;
   That pride, the sin of devils, stood
   Betwixt me and the light of God!
   That hitherto I had defied
   And had rejected God--that grace
   Would drop from his o'erbrimming love,
   As manna on my wilderness,
   If I would pray--that God would move
   And strike the hard hard rock, and thence,
   Sweet in their utmost bitterness,
   Would issue tears of penitence
   Which would keep green hope's life. Alas!
   I think that pride hath now no place
   Nor sojourn in me. I am void,
   Dark, formless, utterly destroyed.
 
   Why not believe then? Why not yet
   Anchor thy frailty there, where man
   Hath moor'd and rested? Ask the sea
   At midnight, when the crisp slope waves
   After a tempest, rib and fret
   The broadimbased beach, why he
   Slumbers not like a mountain tarn?
   Wherefore his ridges are not curls
   And ripples of an inland mere?
   Wherefore he moaneth thus, nor can
   Draw down into his vexed pools
   All that blue heaven which hues and paves
   The other? I am too forlorn,
   Too shaken: my own weakness fools
   My judgment, and my spirit whirls,
   Moved from beneath with doubt and fear.
 
   "Yet" said I, in my morn of youth,
   The unsunned freshness of my strength,
   When I went forth in quest of truth,
   "It is man's privilege to doubt,
   If so be that from doubt at length,
   Truth may stand forth unmoved of change,
   An image with profulgent brows,
   And perfect limbs, as from the storm
   Of running fires and fluid range
   Of lawless airs, at last stood out
   This excellence and solid form
   Of constant beauty. For the Ox
   Feeds in the herb, and sleeps, or fills
   The horned valleys all about,
   And hollows of the fringed hills
   In summerheats, with placid lows
   Unfearing, till his own blood flows
   About his hoof. And in the flocks
   The lamb rejoiceth in the year,
   And raceth freely with his fere,
   And answers to his mother's calls
   From the flower'd furrow. In a time,
   Of which he wots not, run short pains
   Through his warm heart; and then, from whence
   He knows not, on his light there falls
   A shadow; and his native slope,
   Where he was wont to leap and climb,
   Floats from his sick and filmed eyes,
   And something in the darkness draws
   His forehead earthward, and he dies.
   Shall man live thus, in joy and hope
   As a young lamb, who cannot dream,
   Living, but that he shall live on?
   Shall we not look into the laws
   Of life and death, and things that seem,
   And things that be, and analyse
   Our double nature, and compare
   All creeds till we have found the one,
   If one there be?" Ay me! I fear
   All may not doubt, but everywhere
   Some must clasp Idols. Yet, my God,
   Whom call I Idol? Let thy dove
   Shadow me over, and my sins
   Be unremembered, and thy love
   Enlighten me. Oh teach me yet
   Somewhat before the heavy clod
   Weighs on me, and the busy fret
   Of that sharpheaded worm begins
   In the gross blackness underneath.
 
   O weary life! O weary death!
   O spirit and heart made desolate!
   O damned vacillating state!
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE BURIAL OF LOVE
 
   His eyes in eclipse,
   Pale cold his lips,
   The light of his hopes unfed,
   Mute his tongue,
   His bow unstrung
   With the tears he hath shed,
   Backward drooping his graceful head,
 
   Love is dead;
   His last arrow is sped;
   He hath not another dart;
   Go--carry him to his dark deathbed;
   Bury him in the cold, cold heart--
   Love is dead.
 
   Oh, truest love! art thou forlorn,
   And unrevenged? thy pleasant wiles
   Forgotten, and thine innocent joy?
   Shall hollowhearted apathy,
   The cruellest form of perfect scorn,
   With languor of most hateful smiles,
   For ever write
   In the withered light
   Of the tearless eye,
   An epitaph that all may spy?
   No! sooner she herself shall die.
 
   For her the showers shall not fall,
   Nor the round sun that shineth to all;
   Her light shall into darkness change;
   For her the green grass shall not spring,
   Nor the rivers flow, nor the sweet birds sing,
   Till Love have his full revenge.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TO--
 
   Sainted Juliet! dearest name!
   If to love be life alone,
   Divinest Juliet,
   I love thee, and live; and yet
   Love unreturned is like the fragrant flame
   Folding the slaughter of the sacrifice
   Offered to gods upon an altarthrone;
   My heart is lighted at thine eyes,
   Changed into fire, and blown about with sighs.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONG
 
 
   I
 
   I' the glooming light
   Of middle night
   So cold and white,
   Worn Sorrow sits by the moaning wave;
   Beside her are laid
   Her mattock and spade,
   For she hath half delved her own deep grave.
   Alone she is there:
   The white clouds drizzle: her hair falls loose;
   Her shoulders are bare;
   Her tears are mixed with the bearded dews.
 
 
   II
 
   Death standeth by;
   She will not die;
   With glazed eye
   She looks at her grave: she cannot sleep;
   Ever alone
   She maketh her moan:
   She cannot speak; she can only weep;
   For she will not hope.
   The thick snow falls on her flake by flake,
   The dull wave mourns down the slope,
   The world will not change, and her heart will not break.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONG
 
   The lintwhite and the throstlecock
   Have voices sweet and clear;
   All in the bloomed May.
   They from the blosmy brere
   Call to the fleeting year,
   If that he would them hear
   And stay. Alas! that one so beautiful
   Should have so dull an ear.
 
 
   II
 
   Fair year, fair year, thy children call,
   But thou art deaf as death;
   All in the bloomed May.
   When thy light perisheth
   That from thee issueth,
   Our life evanisheth: Oh! stay.
   Alas! that lips so cruel-dumb
   Should have so sweet a breath!
 
 
   III
 
   Fair year, with brows of royal love
   Thou comest, as a king,
   All in the bloomed May.
   Thy golden largess fling,
   And longer hear us sing;
   Though thou art fleet of wing,
   Yet stay. Alas! that eyes so full of light
   Should be so wandering!
 
 
   IV
 
   Thy locks are all of sunny sheen
   In rings of gold yronne, [1]
   All in the bloomed May,
   We pri'thee pass not on;
   If thou dost leave the sun,
   Delight is with thee gone, Oh! stay.
   Thou art the fairest of thy feres,
   We pri'thee pass not on.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: His crispe hair in ringis was yronne.--Chaucer, _Knight's
 Tale._ (Tennyson's note.)]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONG
 
 
   I
 
   Every day hath its night:
   Every night its morn:
   Thorough dark and bright
   Winged hours are borne;
   Ah! welaway!
 
   Seasons flower and fade;
   Golden calm and storm
   Mingle day by day.
   There is no bright form
   Doth not cast a shade--
   Ah! welaway!
 
 
   II
 
   When we laugh, and our mirth
   Apes the happy vein,
   We're so kin to earth,
   Pleasaunce fathers pain--
   Ah! welaway!
   Madness laugheth loud:
   Laughter bringeth tears:
   Eyes are worn away
   Till the end of fears
   Cometh in the shroud,
   Ah! welaway!
 
 
   III
 
   All is change, woe or weal;
   Joy is Sorrow's brother;
   Grief and gladness steal
   Symbols of each other;
   Ah! welaway!
   Larks in heaven's cope
   Sing: the culvers mourn
   All the livelong day.
   Be not all forlorn;
   Let us weep, in hope--
   Ah! welaway!
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 NOTHING WILL DIE
 
 Reprinted without any important alteration among the 'Juvenilia' in
 1871 and onward. No change made except that "through" is spelt "thro',"
 and in the last line "and" is substituted for "all".
 
 
   When will the stream be aweary of flowing
   Under my eye?
   When will the wind be aweary of blowing
   Over the sky?
   When will the clouds be aweary of fleeting?
   When will the heart be aweary of beating?
   And nature die?
   Never, oh! never, nothing will die?
   The stream flows,
   The wind blows,
   The cloud fleets,
   The heart beats,
   Nothing will die.
 
   Nothing will die;
   All things will change
   Through eternity.
   'Tis the world's winter;
   Autumn and summer
   Are gone long ago;
   Earth is dry to the centre,
   But spring, a new comer,
   A spring rich and strange,
   Shall make the winds blow
   Round and round,
   Through and through,
   Here and there,
   Till the air
   And the ground
   Shall be filled with life anew.
 
   The world was never made;
   It will change, but it will not fade.
   So let the wind range;
   For even and morn
   Ever will be
   Through eternity.
   Nothing was born;
   Nothing will die;
   All things will change.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ALL THINGS WILL DIE
 
 Reprinted among 'Juvenilia' in 1872 and onward, without alteration.
 
 
   Clearly the blue river chimes in its flowing
   Under my eye;
   Warmly and broadly the south winds are blowing
   Over the sky.
   One after another the white clouds are fleeting;
   Every heart this May morning in joyance is beating
   Full merrily;
   Yet all things must die.
   The stream will cease to flow;
   The wind will cease to blow;
   The clouds will cease to fleet;
   The heart will cease to beat;
   For all things must die.
 
   All things must die.
   Spring will come never more.
   Oh! vanity!
   Death waits at the door.
   See! our friends are all forsaking
   The wine and the merrymaking.
   We are called--we must go.
   Laid low, very low,
   In the dark we must lie.
   The merry glees are still;
   The voice of the bird
   Shall no more be heard,
   Nor the wind on the hill.
   Oh! misery!
   Hark! death is calling
   While I speak to ye,
   The jaw is falling,
   The red cheek paling,
   The strong limbs failing;
   Ice with the warm blood mixing;
   The eyeballs fixing.
   Nine times goes the passing bell:
   Ye merry souls, farewell.
   The old earth
   Had a birth,
   As all men know,
   Long ago.
   And the old earth must die.
   So let the warm winds range,
   And the blue wave beat the shore;
   For even and morn
   Ye will never see
   Through eternity.
   All things were born.
   Ye will come never more,
   For all things must die.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 HERO TO LEANDER
 
   Oh go not yet, my love,
   The night is dark and vast;
   The white moon is hid in her heaven above,
   And the waves climb high and fast.
   Oh! kiss me, kiss me, once again,
   Lest thy kiss should be the last.
   Oh kiss me ere we part;
   Grow closer to my heart.
   My heart is warmer surely than the bosom of the main.
 
   Oh joy! 0 bliss of blisses!
   My heart of hearts art thou.
   Come bathe me with thy kisses,
   My eyelids and my brow.
   Hark how the wild rain hisses,
   And the loud sea roars below.
 
   Thy heart beats through thy rosy limbs
   So gladly doth it stir;
   Thine eye in drops of gladness swims.
   I have bathed thee with the pleasant myrrh;
   Thy locks are dripping balm;
   Thou shalt not wander hence to-night,
   I'll stay thee with my kisses.
   To-night the roaring brine
   Will rend thy golden tresses;
   The ocean with the morrow light
   Will be both blue and calm;
   And the billow will embrace thee with a kiss as soft as mine.
 
   No western odours wander
   On the black and moaning sea,
   And when thou art dead, Leander,
   My soul must follow thee!
   Oh go not yet, my love
   Thy voice is sweet and low;
   The deep salt wave breaks in above
   Those marble steps below.
   The turretstairs are wet
   That lead into the sea.
   Leander! go not yet.
   The pleasant stars have set:
   Oh! go not, go not yet,
   Or I will follow thee.
 
 
 
 
 
 THE MYSTIC
 
   Angels have talked with him, and showed him thrones:
   Ye knew him not: he was not one of ye,
   Ye scorned him with an undiscerning scorn;
   Ye could not read the marvel in his eye,
   The still serene abstraction; he hath felt
   The vanities of after and before;
   Albeit, his spirit and his secret heart
   The stern experiences of converse lives,
   The linked woes of many a fiery change
   Had purified, and chastened, and made free.
   Always there stood before him, night and day,
   Of wayward vary colored circumstance,
   The imperishable presences serene
   Colossal, without form, or sense, or sound,
   Dim shadows but unwaning presences
   Fourfaced to four corners of the sky;
   And yet again, three shadows, fronting one,
   One forward, one respectant, three but one;
   And yet again, again and evermore,
   For the two first were not, but only seemed,
   One shadow in the midst of a great light,
   One reflex from eternity on time,
   One mighty countenance of perfect calm,
   Awful with most invariable eyes.
   For him the silent congregated hours,
   Daughters of time, divinely tall, beneath
   Severe and youthful brows, with shining eyes
   Smiling a godlike smile (the innocent light
   Of earliest youth pierced through and through with all
   Keen knowledges of low-embowed eld)
   Upheld, and ever hold aloft the cloud
   Which droops low hung on either gate of life,
   Both birth and death; he in the centre fixt,
   Saw far on each side through the grated gates
   Most pale and clear and lovely distances.
   He often lying broad awake, and yet
   Remaining from the body, and apart
   In intellect and power and will, hath heard
   Time flowing in the middle of the night,
   And all things creeping to a day of doom.
   How could ye know him? Ye were yet within
   The narrower circle; he had wellnigh reached
   The last, with which a region of white flame,
   Pure without heat, into a larger air
   Upburning, and an ether of black blue,
   Investeth and ingirds all other lives.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE GRASSHOPPER
 
 
   I
 
   Voice of the summerwind,
   Joy of the summerplain,
   Life of the summerhours,
   Carol clearly, bound along.
   No Tithon thou as poets feign
   (Shame fall 'em they are deaf and blind)
   But an insect lithe and strong,
   Bowing the seeded summerflowers.
   Prove their falsehood and thy quarrel,
   Vaulting on thine airy feet.
   Clap thy shielded sides and carol,
   Carol clearly, chirrup sweet.
   Thou art a mailed warrior in youth and strength complete;
   Armed cap-a-pie,
   Full fair to see;
   Unknowing fear,
   Undreading loss,
   A gallant cavalier
   'Sans peur et sans reproche,'
   In sunlight and in shadow,
   The Bayard of the meadow.
 
 
   II
 
   I would dwell with thee,
   Merry grasshopper,
   Thou art so glad and free,
   And as light as air;
   Thou hast no sorrow or tears,
   Thou hast no compt of years,
   No withered immortality,
   But a short youth sunny and free.
   Carol clearly, bound along,
   Soon thy joy is over,
   A summer of loud song,
   And slumbers in the clover.
   What hast thou to do with evil
   In thine hour of love and revel,
   In thy heat of summerpride,
   Pushing the thick roots aside
   Of the singing flowered grasses,
   That brush thee with their silken tresses?
   What hast thou to do with evil,
   Shooting, singing, ever springing
   In and out the emerald glooms,
   Ever leaping, ever singing,
   Lighting on the golden blooms?
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LOVE, PRIDE AND FORGETFULNESS
 
   Ere yet my heart was sweet Love's tomb,
   Love laboured honey busily.
   I was the hive and Love the bee,
   My heart the honey-comb.
   One very dark and chilly night
   Pride came beneath and held a light.
 
   The cruel vapours went through all,
   Sweet Love was withered in his cell;
   Pride took Love's sweets, and by a spell,
   Did change them into gall;
   And Memory tho' fed by Pride
   Did wax so thin on gall,
   Awhile she scarcely lived at all,
   What marvel that she died?
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 CHORUS
 
 In an unpublished drama written very early.
 
   The varied earth, the moving heaven,
   The rapid waste of roving sea,
   The fountainpregnant mountains riven
   To shapes of wildest anarchy,
   By secret fire and midnight storms
   That wander round their windy cones,
   The subtle life, the countless forms
   Of living things, the wondrous tones
   Of man and beast are full of strange
   Astonishment and boundless change.
 
   The day, the diamonded light,
   The echo, feeble child of sound,
   The heavy thunder's griding might,
   The herald lightning's starry bound,
   The vocal spring of bursting bloom,
   The naked summer's glowing birth,
   The troublous autumn's sallow gloom,
   The hoarhead winter paving earth
   With sheeny white, are full of strange
   Astonishment and boundless change.
 
   Each sun which from the centre flings
   Grand music and redundant fire,
   The burning belts, the mighty rings,
   The murmurous planets' rolling choir,
   The globefilled arch that, cleaving air,
   Lost in its effulgence sleeps,
   The lawless comets as they glare,
   And thunder thro' the sapphire deeps
   In wayward strength, are full of strange
   Astonishment and boundless change.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LOST HOPE
 
   You cast to ground the hope which once was mine,
   But did the while your harsh decree deplore,
   Embalming with sweet tears the vacant shrine,
   My heart, where Hope had been and was no more.
 
   So on an oaken sprout
   A goodly acorn grew;
   But winds from heaven shook the acorn out,
   And filled the cup with dew.
 
 
 
 
 
 THE TEARS OF HEAVEN
 
   Heaven weeps above the earth all night till morn,
   In darkness weeps, as all ashamed to weep,
   Because the earth hath made her state forlorn
   With selfwrought evils of unnumbered years,
   And doth the fruit of her dishonour reap.
   And all the day heaven gathers back her tears
   Into her own blue eyes so clear and deep,
   And showering down the glory of lightsome day,
   Smiles on the earth's worn brow to win her if she may.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LOVE AND SORROW
 
   O Maiden, fresher than the first green leaf
   With which the fearful springtide flecks the lea,
   Weep not, Almeida, that I said to thee
   That thou hast half my heart, for bitter grief
   Doth hold the other half in sovranty.
   Thou art my heart's sun in love's crystalline:
   Yet on both sides at once thou canst not shine:
   Thine is the bright side of my heart, and thine
   My heart's day, but the shadow of my heart,
   Issue of its own substance, my heart's night
   Thou canst not lighten even with 'thy' light,
   All powerful in beauty as thou art.
   Almeida, it my heart were substanceless,
   Then might thy rays pass thro' to the other side,
   So swiftly, that they nowhere would abide,
   But lose themselves in utter emptiness.
   Half-light, half-shadow, let my spirit sleep;
   They never learnt to love who never knew to weep.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TO A LADY SLEEPING
 
   O Thou whose fringed lids I gaze upon,
   Through whose dim brain the winged dreams are borne,
   Unroof the shrines of clearest vision,
   In honour of the silverflecked morn:
   Long hath the white wave of the virgin light
   Driven back the billow of the dreamful dark.
   Thou all unwittingly prolongest night,
   Though long ago listening the poised lark,
   With eyes dropt downward through the blue serene,
   Over heaven's parapets the angels lean.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNET
 
   Could I outwear my present state of woe
   With one brief winter, and indue i' the spring
   Hues of fresh youth, and mightily outgrow
   The wan dark coil of faded suffering--
   Forth in the pride of beauty issuing
   A sheeny snake, the light of vernal bowers,
   Moving his crest to all sweet plots of flowers
   And watered vallies where the young birds sing;
   Could I thus hope my lost delights renewing,
   I straightly would commend the tears to creep
   From my charged lids; but inwardly I weep:
   Some vital heat as yet my heart is wooing:
   This to itself hath drawn the frozen rain
   From my cold eyes and melted it again.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNET
 
   Though Night hath climbed her peak of highest noon,
   And bitter blasts the screaming autumn whirl,
   All night through archways of the bridged pearl
   And portals of pure silver walks the moon.
   Wake on, my soul, nor crouch to agony,
   Turn cloud to light, and bitterness to joy,
   And dross to gold with glorious alchemy,
   Basing thy throne above the world's annoy.
   Reign thou above the storms of sorrow and ruth
   That roar beneath; unshaken peace hath won thee:
   So shalt thou pierce the woven glooms of truth;
   So shall the blessing of the meek be on thee;
   So in thine hour of dawn, the body's youth,
   An honourable old shall come upon thee.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNET
 
   Shall the hag Evil die with child of Good,
   Or propagate again her loathed kind,
   Thronging the cells of the diseased mind,
   Hateful with hanging cheeks, a withered brood,
   Though hourly pastured on the salient blood?
   Oh! that the wind which bloweth cold or heat
   Would shatter and o'erbear the brazen beat
   Of their broad vans, and in the solitude
   Of middle space confound them, and blow back
   Their wild cries down their cavernthroats, and slake
   With points of blastborne hail their heated eyne!
   So their wan limbs no more might come between
   The moon and the moon's reflex in the night;
   Nor blot with floating shades the solar light.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNET
 
   The pallid thunderstricken sigh for gain,
   Down an ideal stream they ever float,
   And sailing on Pactolus in a boat,
   Drown soul and sense, while wistfully they strain
   Weak eyes upon the glistering sands that robe
   The understream. The wise could he behold
   Cathedralled caverns of thick-ribbed gold
   And branching silvers of the central globe,
   Would marvel from so beautiful a sight
   How scorn and ruin, pain and hate could flow:
   But Hatred in a gold cave sits below,
   Pleached with her hair, in mail of argent light
   Shot into gold, a snake her forehead clips
   And skins the colour from her trembling lips.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LOVE
 
 
   I
 
   Thou, from the first, unborn, undying love,
   Albeit we gaze not on thy glories near,
   Before the face of God didst breathe and move,
   Though night and pain and ruin and death reign here.
   Thou foldest, like a golden atmosphere,
   The very throne of the eternal God:
   Passing through thee the edicts of his fear
   Are mellowed into music, borne abroad
   By the loud winds, though they uprend the sea,
   Even from his central deeps: thine empery
   Is over all: thou wilt not brook eclipse;
   Thou goest and returnest to His Lips
   Like lightning: thou dost ever brood above
   The silence of all hearts, unutterable Love.
 
 
   II
 
   To know thee is all wisdom, and old age
   Is but to know thee: dimly we behold thee
   Athwart the veils of evil which enfold thee.
   We beat upon our aching hearts with rage;
   We cry for thee: we deem the world thy tomb.
   As dwellers in lone planets look upon
   The mighty disk of their majestic sun,
   Hollowed in awful chasms of wheeling gloom,
   Making their day dim, so we gaze on thee.
   Come, thou of many crowns, white-robed love,
   Oh! rend the veil in twain: all men adore thee;
   Heaven crieth after thee; earth waileth for thee:
   Breathe on thy winged throne, and it shall move
   In music and in light o'er land and sea.
 
 
   III
 
   And now--methinks I gaze upon thee now,
   As on a serpent in his agonies
   Awestricken Indians; what time laid low
   And crushing the thick fragrant reeds he lies,
   When the new year warm breathed on the earth,
   Waiting to light him with his purple skies,
   Calls to him by the fountain to uprise.
   Already with the pangs of a new birth
   Strain the hot spheres of his convulsed eyes,
   And in his writhings awful hues begin
   To wander down his sable sheeny sides,
   Like light on troubled waters: from within
   Anon he rusheth forth with merry din,
   And in him light and joy and strength abides;
   And from his brows a crown of living light
   Looks through the thickstemmed woods by day and night.
 
 
 
 
 
 THE KRAKEN
 
 Reprinted without alteration, except in the spelling of "antient," among
 'Juvenilia' in 1871 and onward.
 
   Below the thunders of the upper deep;
   Far, far beneath in the abysmal sea,
   His antient, dreamless, uninvaded sleep
   The Kraken sleepeth: faintest sunlights flee
   About his shadowy sides: above him swell
   Huge sponges of millennial growth and height;
   And far away into the sickly light,
   From many a wondrous grot and secret cell
   Unnumber'd and enormous polypi
   Winnow with giant arms the slumbering green.
   There hath he lain for ages and will lie
   Battening upon huge seaworms in his sleep,
   Until the latter fire shall heat the deep;
   Then once by man and angels to be seen,
   In roaring he shall rise and on the surface die.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ENGLISH WAR SONG
 
   Who fears to die? Who fears to die?
   Is there any here who fears to die
   He shall find what he fears, and none shall grieve
   For the man who fears to die;
   But the withering scorn of the many shall cleave
   To the man who fears to die.
 
   Chorus.--
            Shout for England!
            Ho! for England!
            George for England!
            Merry England!
            England for aye!
 
   The hollow at heart shall crouch forlorn,
   He shall eat the bread of common scorn;
   It shall be steeped in the salt, salt tear,
   Shall be steeped in his own salt tear:
   Far better, far better he never were born
   Than to shame merry England here.
 
   Chorus.--Shout for England! etc.
 
   There standeth our ancient enemy;
   Hark! he shouteth--the ancient enemy!
   On the ridge of the hill his banners rise;
   They stream like fire in the skies;
   Hold up the Lion of England on high
   Till it dazzle and blind his eyes.
 
   Chorus.--Shout for England! etc.
 
   Come along! we alone of the earth are free;
   The child in our cradles is bolder than he;
   For where is the heart and strength of slaves?
   Oh! where is the strength of slaves?
   He is weak! we are strong; he a slave, we are free;
   Come along! we will dig their graves.
 
   Chorus.--Shout for England! etc.
 
   There standeth our ancient enemy;
   Will he dare to battle with the free?
   Spur along! spur amain! charge to the fight:
   Charge! charge to the fight!
   Hold up the Lion of England on high!
   Shout for God and our right!
 
   Chorus.-Shout for England! etc.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 NATIONAL SONG
 
   There is no land like England
   Where'er the light of day be;
   There are no hearts like English hearts,
   Such hearts of oak as they be.
   There is no land like England
   Where'er the light of day be;
   There are no men like Englishmen,
   So tall and bold as they be.
 
   Chorus. For the French the Pope may shrive 'em,
           For the devil a whit we heed 'em,
           As for the French, God speed 'em
           Unto their hearts' desire,
           And the merry devil drive 'em
           Through the water and the fire.
 
           Our glory is our freedom,
           We lord it o'er the sea;
           We are the sons of freedom,
           We are free.
 
   There is no land like England,
   Where'er the light of day be;
   There are no wives like English wives,
   So fair and chaste as they be.
   There is no land like England,
   Where'er the light of day be;
   There are no maids like English maids,
   So beautiful as they be.
 
   Chorus.--For the French, etc.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 DUALISMS
 
   Two bees within a chrystal flowerbell rocked
   Hum a lovelay to the westwind at noontide.
   Both alike, they buzz together,
   Both alike, they hum together
   Through and through the flowered heather.
 
   Where in a creeping cove the wave unshocked
   Lays itself calm and wide,
   Over a stream two birds of glancing feather
   Do woo each other, carolling together.
   Both alike, they glide together
   Side by side;
   Both alike, they sing together,
   Arching blue-glossed necks beneath the purple weather.
 
   Two children lovelier than Love, adown the lea are singing,
   As they gambol, lilygarlands ever stringing:
   Both in blosmwhite silk are frocked:
   Like, unlike, they roam together
   Under a summervault of golden weather;
   Like, unlike, they sing together
   Side by side,
   Mid May's darling goldenlocked,
   Summer's tanling diamondeyed.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 WE ARE FREE
 
 Reprinted among 'Juvenilia' in 1871 and onward without alteration,
 except that it is printed as two stanzas.
 
   The winds, as at their hour of birth,
   Leaning upon the ridged sea,
   Breathed low around the rolling earth
   With mellow preludes, "We are Free";
   The streams through many a lilied row,
   Down-carolling to the crisped sea,
   Low-tinkled with a bell-like flow
   Atween the blossoms, "We are free".
 
 
 
 [Greek: Oi Rheontes]
 
   I
 
   All thoughts, all creeds, all dreams are true,
   All visions wild and strange;
   Man is the measure of all truth
   Unto himself. All truth is change:
   All men do walk in sleep, and all
   Have faith in that they dream:
   For all things are as they seem to all,
   And all things flow like a stream.
 
 
   II
 
   There is no rest, no calm, no pause,
   Nor good nor ill, nor light nor shade,
   Nor essence nor eternal laws:
   For nothing is, but all is made.
   But if I dream that all these are,
   They are to me for that I dream;
   For all things are as they seem to all,
   And all things flow like a stream.
 
 
 Argal--This very opinion is only true relatively to the flowing
 philosophers. (Tennyson's note.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 POEMS OF MDCCCXXXIII
 
 
 
 "MINE BE THE STRENGTH OF SPIRIT..."
 
 Reprinted without any alteration, except that Power is spelt with a
 small p, among the _Juvenilia_ in 1871 and onward.
 
 
   Mine be the strength of spirit, full and free,
   Like some broad river rushing down alone,
   With the selfsame impulse wherewith he was thrown
   From his loud fount upon the echoing lea:--
   Which with increasing might doth forward flee
   By town, and tower, and hill, and cape, and isle,
   And in the middle of the green salt sea
   Keeps his blue waters fresh for many a mile.
   Mine be the Power which ever to its sway
   Will win the wise at once, and by degrees
   May into uncongenial spirits flow;
   Even as the great gulfstream of Florida
   Floats far away into the Northern Seas
   The lavish growths of Southern Mexico.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TO--
 
 When this poem was republished among the _Juvenilia_ in 1871 several
 alterations were made in it. For the first stanza was substituted the
 following:--
 
   My life is full of weary days,
   But good things have not kept aloof,
   Nor wander'd into other ways:
   I have not lack'd thy mild reproof,
   Nor golden largess of thy praise.
 
 The second began "And now shake hands". In the fourth stanza for "sudden
 laughters" of the jay was substituted the felicitous "sudden scritches,"
 and the sixth and seventh stanzas were suppressed.
 
 
   I
 
   All good things have not kept aloof
   Nor wandered into other ways:
   I have not lacked thy mild reproof,
   Nor golden largess of thy praise.
   But life is full of weary days.
 
 
   II
 
   Shake hands, my friend, across the brink
   Of that deep grave to which I go:
   Shake hands once more: I cannot sink
   So far--far down, but I shall know
   Thy voice, and answer from below.
 
 
   III
 
   When in the darkness over me
   The fourhanded mole shall scrape,
   Plant thou no dusky cypresstree,
   Nor wreathe thy cap with doleful crape,
   But pledge me in the flowing grape.
 
 
   IV
 
   And when the sappy field and wood
   Grow green beneath the showery gray,
   And rugged barks begin to bud,
   And through damp holts newflushed with May,
   Ring sudden laughters of the Jay,
 
 
   V
 
   Then let wise Nature work her will,
   And on my clay her darnels grow;
   Come only, when the days are still,
   And at my headstone whisper low,
   And tell me if the woodbines blow.
 
   VI
 
   If thou art blest, my mother's smile
   Undimmed, if bees are on the wing:
   Then cease, my friend, a little while,
   That I may hear the throstle sing
   His bridal song, the boast of spring.
 
 
   VII
 
   Sweet as the noise in parched plains
   Of bubbling wells that fret the stones,
   (If any sense in me remains)
   Thy words will be: thy cheerful tones
   As welcome to my crumbling bones.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 BUONAPARTE
 
 Reprinted without any alteration among 'Early Sonnets' in 1872, and
 unaltered since.
 
 
   He thought to quell the stubborn hearts of oak,
   Madman!--to chain with chains, and bind with bands
   That island queen who sways the floods and lands
   From Ind to Ind, but in fair daylight woke,
   When from her wooden walls, lit by sure hands,
   With thunders and with lightnings and with smoke,
   Peal after peal, the British battle broke,
   Lulling the brine against the Coptic sands.
   We taught him lowlier moods, when Elsinore
   Heard the war moan along the distant sea,
   Rocking with shatter'd spars, with sudden fires
   Flamed over: at Trafalgar yet once more
   We taught him: late he learned humility
   Perforce, like those whom Gideon school'd with briers.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNET
 
 I
 
   Oh, Beauty, passing beauty! sweetest Sweet!
   How canst thou let me waste my youth in sighs?
   I only ask to sit beside thy feet.
   Thou knowest I dare not look into thine eyes,
   Might I but kiss thy hand! I dare not fold
   My arms about thee--scarcely dare to speak.
   And nothing seems to me so wild and bold,
   As with one kiss to touch thy blessed cheek.
   Methinks if I should kiss thee, no control
   Within the thrilling brain could keep afloat
   The subtle spirit. Even while I spoke,
   The bare word KISS hath made my inner soul
   To tremble like a lutestring, ere the note
   Hath melted in the silence that it broke.
 
 
 II
 
 Reprinted in 1872 among 'Early Sonnets' with two alterations, "If I
 were loved" for "But were I loved," and "tho'" for "though".
 
   But were I loved, as I desire to be,
   What is there in the great sphere of the earth,
   And range of evil between death and birth,
   That I should fear--if I were loved by thee?
   All the inner, all the outer world of pain
   Clear Love would pierce and cleave, if thou wert mine,
   As I have heard that, somewhere in the main,
   Fresh water-springs come up through bitter brine.
   'Twere joy, not fear, clasped hand in hand with thee,
   To wait for death--mute--careless of all ills,
   Apart upon a mountain, though the surge
   Of some new deluge from a thousand hills
   Flung leagues of roaring foam into the gorge
   Below us, as far on as eye could see.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE HESPERIDES
 
     Hesperus and his daughters three
     That sing about the golden tree.
 
     (Comus).
 
 
   The Northwind fall'n, in the newstarred night
   Zidonian Hanno, voyaging beyond
   The hoary promontory of Soloe
   Past Thymiaterion, in calmed bays,
   Between the Southern and the Western Horn,
   Heard neither warbling of the nightingale,
   Nor melody o' the Lybian lotusflute
   Blown seaward from the shore; but from a slope
   That ran bloombright into the Atlantic blue,
   Beneath a highland leaning down a weight
   Of cliffs, and zoned below with cedarshade,
   Came voices, like the voices in a dream,
   Continuous, till he reached the other sea.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONG
 
 
   I
 
   The golden apple, the golden apple, the hallowed fruit,
   Guard it well, guard it warily,
   Singing airily,
   Standing about the charmed root.
   Round about all is mute,
   As the snowfield on the mountain-peaks,
   As the sandfield at the mountain-foot.
   Crocodiles in briny creeks
   Sleep and stir not: all is mute.
   If ye sing not, if ye make false measure,
   We shall lose eternal pleasure,
   Worth eternal want of rest.
   Laugh not loudly: watch the treasure
   Of the wisdom of the West.
   In a corner wisdom whispers.
   Five and three
   (Let it not be preached abroad) make an awful mystery.
   For the blossom unto three-fold music bloweth;
   Evermore it is born anew;
   And the sap to three-fold music floweth,
   From the root
   Drawn in the dark,
   Up to the fruit,
   Creeping under the fragrant bark,
   Liquid gold, honeysweet thro' and thro'.
   Keen-eyed Sisters, singing airily,
   Looking warily
   Every way,
   Guard the apple night and day,
   Lest one from the East come and take it away.
 
 
   II
 
   Father Hesper, Father Hesper, watch, watch, ever and aye,
   Looking under silver hair with a silver eye.
   Father, twinkle not thy stedfast sight;
   Kingdoms lapse, and climates change, and races die;
   Honour comes with mystery;
   Hoarded wisdom brings delight.
   Number, tell them over and number
   How many the mystic fruittree holds,
   Lest the redcombed dragon slumber
   Rolled together in purple folds.
   Look to him, father, lest he wink, and the golden apple be stol'n away,
   For his ancient heart is drunk with over-watchings night and day,
   Round about the hallowed fruit tree curled--
   Sing away, sing aloud evermore in the wind, without stop,
   Lest his scaled eyelid drop, For he is older than the world.
   If he waken, we waken,
   Rapidly levelling eager eyes.
   If he sleep, we sleep,
   Dropping the eyelid over the eyes.
   If the golden apple be taken
   The world will be overwise.
   Five links, a golden chain, are we,
   Hesper, the dragon, and sisters three,
   Bound about the golden tree.
 
 
   III
 
   Father Hesper, Father Hesper, watch, watch, night and day,
   Lest the old wound of the world be healed,
   The glory unsealed,
   The golden apple stol'n away,
   And the ancient secret revealed.
   Look from west to east along:
   Father, old Himala weakens,
   Caucasus is bold and strong.
   Wandering waters unto wandering waters call;
   Let them clash together, foam and fall.
   Out of watchings, out of wiles,
   Comes the bliss of secret smiles.
   All things are not told to all,
   Half-round the mantling night is drawn,
   Purplefringed with even and dawn.
   Hesper hateth Phosphor, evening hateth morn.
 
 
   IV
 
   Every flower and every fruit the redolent breath
   Of this warm seawind ripeneth,
   Arching the billow in his sleep;
   But the landwind wandereth,
   Broken by the highland-steep,
   Two streams upon the violet deep:
   For the western sun and the western star,
   And the low west wind, breathing afar,
   The end of day and beginning of night
   Make the apple holy and bright,
   Holy and bright, round and full, bright and blest,
   Mellowed in a land of rest;
   Watch it warily day and night;
   All good things are in the west,
   Till midnoon the cool east light
   Is shut out by the round of the tall hillbrow;
   But when the fullfaced sunset yellowly
   Stays on the flowering arch of the bough,
   The luscious fruitage clustereth mellowly,
   Goldenkernelled, goldencored,
   Sunset-ripened, above on the tree,
   The world is wasted with fire and sword,
   But the apple of gold hangs over the sea,
   Five links, a golden chain, are we,
   Hesper, the dragon, and sisters three,
   Daughters three,
   Bound about
   All round about
   The gnarled bole of the charmed tree,
   The golden apple, the golden apple, the hallowed fruit,
   Guard it well, guard it warily,
   Watch it warily,
   Singing airily,
   Standing about the charmed root.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 ROSALIND
 
 Not reprinted till 1884 when it was unaltered, as it has remained since:
 but the poem appended and printed by Tennyson (in the footnote) has not
 been reprinted.
 
   My Rosalind, my Rosalind,
   My frolic falcon, with bright eyes,
   Whose free delight, from any height of rapid flight,
   Stoops at all game that wing the skies,
   My Rosalind, my Rosalind,
   My bright-eyed, wild-eyed falcon, whither,
   Careless both of wind and weather,
   Whither fly ye, what game spy ye,
   Up or down the streaming wind?
 
 
   II
 
   The quick lark's closest-carolled strains,
   The shadow rushing up the sea,
   The lightningflash atween the rain,
   The sunlight driving down the lea,
   The leaping stream, the very wind,
   That will not stay, upon his way,
   To stoop the cowslip to the plains,
   Is not so clear and bold and free
   As you, my falcon Rosalind.
   You care not for another's pains,
   Because you are the soul of joy,
   Bright metal all without alloy.
   Life shoots and glances thro' your veins,
   And flashes off a thousand ways,
   Through lips and eyes in subtle rays.
   Your hawkeyes are keen and bright,
   Keen with triumph, watching still
   To pierce me through with pointed light;
   And oftentimes they flash and glitter
   Like sunshine on a dancing rill,
   And your words are seeming-bitter,
   Sharp and few, but seeming-bitter
   From excess of swift delight.
 
 
   III
 
   Come down, come home, my Rosalind,
   My gay young hawk, my Rosalind:
   Too long you keep the upper skies;
   Too long you roam, and wheel at will;
   But we must hood your random eyes,
   That care not whom they kill,
   And your cheek, whose brilliant hue
   Is so sparkling fresh to view,
   Some red heath-flower in the dew,
   Touched with sunrise. We must bind
   And keep you fast, my Rosalind,
   Fast, fast, my wild-eyed Rosalind,
   And clip your wings, and make you love:
   When we have lured you from above,
   And that delight of frolic flight, by day or night,
   From North to South;
   We'll bind you fast in silken cords,
   And kiss away the bitter words
   From off your rosy mouth. [1]
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Perhaps the following lines may be allowed to stand as a
 separate poem; originally they made part of the text, where they were
 manifestly superfluous:--
 
     My Rosalind, my Rosalind,
     Bold, subtle, careless Rosalind,
     Is one of those who know no strife
     Of inward woe or outward fear;
     To whom the slope and stream of life,
     The life before, the life behind,
     In the ear, from far and near,
     Chimeth musically clear.
     My falconhearted Rosalind,
     Fullsailed before a vigorous wind,
     Is one of those who cannot weep
     For others' woes, but overleap
     All the petty shocks and fears
     That trouble life in early years,
     With a flash of frolic scorn
     And keen delight, that never falls
     Away from freshness, self-upborne
     With such gladness, as, whenever
     The freshflushing springtime calls
     To the flooding waters cool,
     Young fishes, on an April morn,
     Up and down a rapid river,
     Leap the little waterfalls
     That sing into the pebbled pool.
     My happy falcon, Rosalind;
     Hath daring fancies of her own,
     Fresh as the dawn before the day,
     Fresh as the early seasmell blown
     Through vineyards from an inland bay.
     My Rosalind, my Rosalind,
     Because no shadow on you falls
     Think you hearts are tennis balls
     To play with, wanton Rosalind?]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONG
 
   Who can say
   Why To-day
   To-morrow will be yesterday?
   Who can tell
   Why to smell
   The violet, recalls the dewy prime
   Of youth and buried time?
   The cause is nowhere found in rhyme.
 
 
 
 KATE
 
 Reprinted without alteration among the 'Juvenilia' in 1895.
 
 
   I know her by her angry air,
   Her brightblack eyes, her brightblack hair,
   Her rapid laughters wild and shrill,
   As laughter of the woodpecker
   From the bosom of a hill.
   'Tis Kate--she sayeth what she will;
   For Kate hath an unbridled tongue,
   Clear as the twanging of a harp.
   Her heart is like a throbbing star.
   Kate hath a spirit ever strung
   Like a new bow, and bright and sharp
   As edges of the scymetar.
   Whence shall she take a fitting mate?
   For Kate no common love will feel;
   My woman-soldier, gallant Kate,
   As pure and true as blades of steel.
 
   Kate saith "the world is void of might".
   Kate saith "the men are gilded flies".
   Kate snaps her fingers at my vows;
   Kate will not hear of lover's sighs.
   I would I were an armed knight,
   Far famed for wellwon enterprise,
   And wearing on my swarthy brows
   The garland of new-wreathed emprise:
   For in a moment I would pierce
   The blackest files of clanging fight,
   And strongly strike to left and right,
   In dreaming of my lady's eyes.
   Oh! Kate loves well the bold and fierce;
   But none are bold enough for Kate,
   She cannot find a fitting mate.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 SONNET
 
 Written, on hearing of the outbreak of the Polish Insurrection.
 
 
   Blow ye the trumpet, gather from afar
   The hosts to battle: be not bought and sold.
   Arise, brave Poles, the boldest of the bold;
   Break through your iron shackles--fling them far.
   O for those days of Piast, ere the Czar
   Grew to this strength among his deserts cold;
   When even to Moscow's cupolas were rolled
   The growing murmurs of the Polish war!
   Now must your noble anger blaze out more
   Than when from Sobieski, clan by clan,
   The Moslem myriads fell, and fled before--
   Than when Zamoysky smote the Tartar Khan,
   Than earlier, when on the Baltic shore
   Boleslas drove the Pomeranian.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 POLAND
 
 Reprinted without alteration in 1872, except the removal of italics in
 "now" among the 'Early Sonnets'.
 
 
   How long, O God, shall men be ridden down,
   And trampled under by the last and least
   Of men? The heart of Poland hath not ceased
   To quiver, tho' her sacred blood doth drown
   The fields; and out of every smouldering town
   Cries to Thee, lest brute Power be increased,
   Till that o'ergrown Barbarian in the East
   Transgress his ample bound to some new crown:--
   Cries to thee, "Lord, how long shall these things be?
   How long this icyhearted Muscovite
   Oppress the region?" Us, O Just and Good,
   Forgive, who smiled when she was torn in three;
   Us, who stand now, when we should aid the right--
   A matter to be wept with tears of blood!
 
 
 
 TO--
 
 Reprinted without alteration as first of the 'Early Sonnets' in
 1872; subsequently in the twelfth line "That tho'" was substituted for
 "Altho'," and the last line was altered to--
 
   "And either lived in either's heart and speech,"
 
 and "hath" was not italicised.
 
 
   As when with downcast eyes we muse and brood,
   And ebb into a former life, or seem
   To lapse far back in some confused dream
   To states of mystical similitude;
   If one but speaks or hems or stirs his chair,
   Ever the wonder waxeth more and more,
   So that we say, "All this hath been before,
   All this _hath_ been, I know not when or where".
   So, friend, when first I look'd upon your face,
   Our thought gave answer each to each, so true--
   Opposed mirrors each reflecting each--
   Altho' I knew not in what time or place,
   Methought that I had often met with you,
   And each had lived in the other's mind and speech.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 O DARLING ROOM
 
 
   I
 
   O darling room, my heart's delight,
   Dear room, the apple of my sight,
   With thy two couches soft and white,
   There is no room so exquisite,
   No little room so warm and bright,
   Wherein to read, wherein to write.
 
 
   II
 
   For I the Nonnenwerth have seen,
   And Oberwinter's vineyards green,
   Musical Lurlei; and between
   The hills to Bingen have I been,
   Bingen in Darmstadt, where the Rhene
   Curves towards Mentz, a woody scene.
 
 
   III
 
   Yet never did there meet my sight,
   In any town, to left or right,
   A little room so exquisite,
   With two such couches soft and white;
   Not any room so warm and bright,
   Wherein to read, wherein to write.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TO CHRISTOPHER NORTH
 
   You did late review my lays,
   Crusty Christopher;
   You did mingle blame and praise,
   Rusty Christopher.
   When I learnt from whom it came,
   I forgave you all the blame,
   Musty Christopher;
   I could _not_ forgive the praise,
   Fusty Christopher.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE SKIPPING ROPE
 
 This silly poem was first published in the edition of 1842, and was
 retained unaltered till 1851, when it was finally suppressed.
 
 
   Sure never yet was Antelope
   Could skip so lightly by,
   Stand off, or else my skipping-rope
   Will hit you in the eye.
   How lightly whirls the skipping-rope!
   How fairy-like you fly!
   Go, get you gone, you muse and mope--
   I hate that silly sigh.
   Nay, dearest, teach me how to hope,
   Or tell me how to die.
   There, take it, take my skipping-rope,
   And hang yourself thereby.
 
 
 
 
 
 TIMBUCTOO
 
 A POEM WHICH OBTAINED THE CHANCELLOR'S MEDAL AT THE 'Cambridge
 Commencement' M.DCCCXXIX BY A. TENNYSON Of Trinity College.
 
 Printed in the Cambridge 'Chronicle and Journal' for Friday, 10th July,
 1839, and at the University Press by James Smith, among the 'Profusiones
 Academicae Praemiis annuis dignatae, et in Curia Cantabrigiensi
 Recitatae Comitiis Maximis' A.D. M.DCCCXXIX. Reprinted in an edition of
 the 'Cambridge Prize Poems' from 1813 to 1858 inclusive, by Messrs.
 Macmillan in 1859, but without any alteration, except in punctuation and
 the substitution of small letters for capitals where the change was
 appropriate; and again in 1893 in the appendix to the reprint of the
 'Poems by Two Brothers'.
 
     Deep in that lion-haunted island lies
     A mystic city, goal of enterprise.
 
     (Chapman.)
 
 
   I stood upon the Mountain which o'erlooks
   The narrow seas, whose rapid interval
   Parts Afric from green Europe, when the Sun
   Had fall'n below th' Atlantick, and above
   The silent Heavens were blench'd with faery light,
   Uncertain whether faery light or cloud,
   Flowing Southward, and the chasms of deep, deep blue
   Slumber'd unfathomable, and the stars
   Were flooded over with clear glory and pale.
   I gaz'd upon the sheeny coast beyond,
   There where the Giant of old Time infixed
   The limits of his prowess, pillars high
   Long time eras'd from Earth: even as the sea
   When weary of wild inroad buildeth up
   Huge mounds whereby to stay his yeasty waves.
   And much I mus'd on legends quaint and old
   Which whilome won the hearts of all on Earth
   Toward their brightness, ev'n as flame draws air;
   But had their being in the heart of Man
   As air is th' life of flame: and thou wert then
   A center'd glory--circled Memory,
   Divinest Atalantis, whom the waves
   Have buried deep, and thou of later name
   Imperial Eldorado roof'd with gold:
   Shadows to which, despite all shocks of Change,
   All on-set of capricious Accident,
   Men clung with yearning Hope which would not die.
   As when in some great City where the walls
   Shake, and the streets with ghastly faces throng'd
   Do utter forth a subterranean voice,
   Among the inner columns far retir'd
   At midnight, in the lone Acropolis.
   Before the awful Genius of the place
   Kneels the pale Priestess in deep faith, the while
   Above her head the weak lamp dips and winks
   Unto the fearful summoning without:
   Nathless she ever clasps the marble knees,
   Bathes the cold hand with tears, and gazeth on
   Those eyes which wear no light but that wherewith
   Her phantasy informs them. Where are ye
   Thrones of the Western wave, fair Islands green?
   Where are your moonlight halls, your cedarn glooms,
   The blossoming abysses of your hills?
   Your flowering Capes and your gold-sanded bays
   Blown round with happy airs of odorous winds?
   Where are the infinite ways which, Seraph-trod,
   Wound thro' your great Elysian solitudes,
   Whose lowest depths were, as with visible love,
   Fill'd with Divine effulgence, circumfus'd,
   Flowing between the clear and polish'd stems,
   And ever circling round their emerald cones
   In coronals and glories, such as gird
   The unfading foreheads of the Saints in Heaven?
   For nothing visible, they say, had birth
   In that blest ground but it was play'd about
   With its peculiar glory. Then I rais'd
   My voice and cried "Wide Afric, doth thy Sun
   Lighten, thy hills enfold a City as fair
   As those which starr'd the night o' the Elder World?
   Or is the rumour of thy Timbuctoo
   A dream as frail as those of ancient Time?"
   A curve of whitening, flashing, ebbing light!
   A rustling of white wings! The bright descent
   Of a young Seraph! and he stood beside me
   There on the ridge, and look'd into my face
   With his unutterable, shining orbs,
   So that with hasty motion I did veil
   My vision with both hands, and saw before me
   Such colour'd spots as dance athwart the eyes
   Of those that gaze upon the noonday Sun.
   Girt with a Zone of flashing gold beneath
   His breast, and compass'd round about his brow
   With triple arch of everchanging bows,
   And circled with the glory of living light
   And alternation of all hues, he stood.
 
   "O child of man, why muse you here alone
   Upon the Mountain, on the dreams of old
   Which fill'd the Earth with passing loveliness,
   Which flung strange music on the howling winds,
   And odours rapt from remote Paradise?
   Thy sense is clogg'd with dull mortality,
   Thy spirit fetter'd with the bond of clay:
   Open thine eye and see." I look'd, but not
   Upon his face, for it was wonderful
   With its exceeding brightness, and the light
   Of the great angel mind which look'd from out
   The starry glowing of his restless eyes.
   I felt my soul grow mighty, and my spirit
   With supernatural excitation bound
   Within me, and my mental eye grew large
   With such a vast circumference of thought,
   That in my vanity I seem'd to stand
   Upon the outward verge and bound alone
   Of full beautitude. Each failing sense
   As with a momentary flash of light
   Grew thrillingly distinct and keen. I saw
   The smallest grain that dappled the dark Earth,
   The indistinctest atom in deep air,
   The Moon's white cities, and the opal width
   Of her small glowing lakes, her silver heights
   Unvisited with dew of vagrant cloud,
   And the unsounded, undescended depth
   Of her black hollows. The clear Galaxy
   Shorn of its hoary lustre, wonderful,
   Distinct and vivid with sharp points of light
   Blaze within blaze, an unimagin'd depth
   And harmony of planet-girded Suns
   And moon-encircled planets, wheel in wheel,
   Arch'd the wan Sapphire. Nay, the hum of men,
   Or other things talking in unknown tongues,
   And notes of busy life in distant worlds
   Beat like a far wave on my anxious ear.
   A maze of piercing, trackless, thrilling thoughts
   Involving and embracing each with each
   Rapid as fire, inextricably link'd,
   Expanding momently with every sight
   And sound which struck the palpitating sense,
   The issue of strong impulse, hurried through
   The riv'n rapt brain: as when in some large lake
   From pressure of descendant crags, which lapse
   Disjointed, crumbling from their parent slope
   At slender interval, the level calm
   Is ridg'd with restless and increasing spheres
   Which break upon each other, each th' effect
   Of separate impulse, but more fleet and strong
   Than its precursor, till the eye in vain
   Amid the wild unrest of swimming shade
   Dappled with hollow and alternate rise
   Of interpenetrated arc, would scan
   Definite round.
 
                   I know not if I shape
   These things with accurate similitude
   From visible objects, for but dimly now,
   Less vivid than a half-forgotten dream,
   The memory of that mental excellence
   Comes o'er me, and it may be I entwine
   The indecision of my present mind
   With its past clearness, yet it seems to me
   As even then the torrent of quick thought
   Absorbed me from the nature of itself
   With its own fleetness. Where is he that borne
   Adown the sloping of an arrowy stream,
   Could link his shallop to the fleeting edge,
   And muse midway with philosophic calm
   Upon the wondrous laws which regulate
   The fierceness of the bounding element?
   My thoughts which long had grovell'd in the slime
   Of this dull world, like dusky worms which house
   Beneath unshaken waters, but at once
   Upon some earth-awakening day of spring
   Do pass from gloom to glory, and aloft
   Winnow the purple, bearing on both sides
   Double display of starlit wings which burn
   Fanlike and fibred, with intensest bloom:
   E'en so my thoughts, ere while so low, now felt
   Unutterable buoyancy and strength
   To bear them upward through the trackless fields
   Of undefin'd existence far and free.
 
   Then first within the South methought I saw
   A wilderness of spires, and chrystal pile
   Of rampart upon rampart, dome on dome,
   Illimitable range of battlement
   On battlement, and the Imperial height
   Of Canopy o'ercanopied.
 
                           Behind,
   In diamond light, upsprung the dazzling Cones
   Of Pyramids, as far surpassing Earth's
   As Heaven than Earth is fairer. Each aloft
   Upon his narrow'd Eminence bore globes
   Of wheeling suns, or stars, or semblances
   Of either, showering circular abyss
   Of radiance. But the glory of the place
   Stood out a pillar'd front of burnish'd gold
   Interminably high, if gold it were
   Or metal more ethereal, and beneath
   Two doors of blinding brilliance, where no gaze
   Might rest, stood open, and the eye could scan
   Through length of porch and lake and boundless hall,
   Part of a throne of fiery flame, where from
   The snowy skirting of a garment hung,
   And glimpse of multitudes of multitudes
   That minister'd around it--if I saw
   These things distinctly, for my human brain
   Stagger'd beneath the vision, and thick night
   Came down upon my eyelids, and I fell.
 
   With ministering hand he rais'd me up;
   Then with a mournful and ineffable smile,
   Which but to look on for a moment fill'd
   My eyes with irresistible sweet tears,
   In accents of majestic melody,
   Like a swol'n river's gushings in still night
   Mingled with floating music, thus he spake:
 
   "There is no mightier Spirit than I to sway
   The heart of man: and teach him to attain
   By shadowing forth the Unattainable;
   And step by step to scale that mighty stair
   Whose landing-place is wrapt about with clouds
   Of glory of Heaven. [1] With earliest Light of Spring,
   And in the glow of sallow Summertide,
   And in red Autumn when the winds are wild
   With gambols, and when full-voiced Winter roofs
   The headland with inviolate white snow,
   I play about his heart a thousand ways,
   Visit his eyes with visions, and his ears
   With harmonies of wind and wave and wood--
   Of winds which tell of waters, and of waters
   Betraying the close kisses of the wind--
   And win him unto me: and few there be
   So gross of heart who have not felt and known
   A higher than they see: They with dim eyes
   Behold me darkling. Lo! I have given thee
   To understand my presence, and to feel
   My fullness; I have fill'd thy lips with power.
   I have rais'd thee nigher to the Spheres of Heaven,
   Man's first, last home: and thou with ravish'd sense
   Listenest the lordly music flowing from
   Th'illimitable years. I am the Spirit,
   The permeating life which courseth through
   All th' intricate and labyrinthine veins
   Of the great vine of Fable, which, outspread
   With growth of shadowing leaf and clusters rare,
   Reacheth to every corner under Heaven,
   Deep-rooted in the living soil of truth:
   So that men's hopes and fears take refuge in
   The fragrance of its complicated glooms
   And cool impleached twilights. Child of Man,
   See'st thou yon river, whose translucent wave,
   Forth issuing from darkness, windeth through
   The argent streets o' the City, imaging
   The soft inversion of her tremulous Domes.
   Her gardens frequent with the stately Palm,
   Her Pagods hung with music of sweet bells.
   Her obelisks of ranged Chrysolite,
   Minarets and towers? Lo! how he passeth by,
   And gulphs himself in sands, as not enduring
   To carry through the world those waves, which bore
   The reflex of my City in their depths.
   Oh City! Oh latest Throne! where I was rais'd
   To be a mystery of loveliness
   Unto all eyes, the time is well nigh come
   When I must render up this glorious home
   To keen 'Discovery': soon yon brilliant towers
   Shall darken with the waving of her wand;
   Darken, and shrink and shiver into huts,
   Black specks amid a waste of dreary sand,
   Low-built, mud-wall'd, Barbarian settlement,
   How chang'd from this fair City!"
 
                                     Thus far the Spirit:
   Then parted Heavenward on the wing: and I
   Was left alone on Calpe, and the Moon
   Had fallen from the night, and all was dark!
 
 
 [Footnote 1: Be ye perfect even as your Father in Heaven is perfect.]
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 BIBLIOGRAPHY OF THE POEMS OF 1842.
 
 
 1830. Poems, chiefly Lyrical, by Alfred Tennyson. London: Effingham
       Wilson, 1830.
 
 1832. Poems by Alfred Tennyson. London: Edward Moxon, 1833 (published at
       the end of 1832).
 
 1837. In the 'Keepsake', an Annual, appears the poem "St. Agnes' Eve,"
       afterwards republished in the Poems of 1842, as "St. Agnes".
 
 1842. 'Morte d'Arthur, Dora, and other Idyls'. (Privately printed for
       the Author.)
 
 1842. Poems. In 2 vols. By Alfred Tennyson. London: Edward Moxon, Dover
       Street, 1842.
 
 1843. 'Id'. 2 vols. Second Edition, 1843.
 
 1845. 'Id'. Third Edition, 1845.
 
 1846. 'Id'. Fourth Edition, 1846.
 
 1848. 'Id.' Fifth Edition, 1848.
 
 1849. In the 'Examiner' for 24th March, 1849, appeared the poem "To----,
       after reading a Life and Letters," republished in the Sixth Edition of
 the Poems.
 
 1850. Poems. 2 vols. Sixth Edition, 1850.
 
 1851. In the 'Keepsake' appeared the verses: "Come not when I am Dead,"
       reprinted in the Seventh Edition of the Poems.
 
 1851. Poems. Seventh Edition. London: Edward Moxon, 1851. i vol.
 
 1853. 'Id'. Eighth Edition, 1853. i vol.
 
 1857. Poems by Alfred Tennyson, Poet Laureate. With engraving of bust by
       Woolner, and illustrations by Thomas Creswick, John Everett
       Millais, William Holman Hunt, William Macready, John Calcott
       Horsley, Dante Gabriel Rosetti, Clarkson Stanfield, and Daniel
       Maclise. Pp. xiii., 375. London: Edward Moxon, 1857. 8vo.
 
 1862. Poems MDCCCXXX, MDCCCXXXIII. Privately printed. This was
       suppressed by an injunction in Chancery. It was compiled and
       edited by Mr. Dykes Campbell for Camden Hotten.
 
 1863. Poems by Alfred Tennyson, D.C.L. I vol. Edward Moxon, 1863.
       (Recorded as being the Fifteenth Edition, but I have not seen any
       Edition between 1857 and this one.)
 
 1865. A selection from the works of Alfred Tennyson. Poet Laureate.
       (Moxon's Miniature Poets.) Edward Moxon & Co., 1865. Containing
       several minor alterations, and an additional couplet in the
       "Vision of Sin".
 
 1869. Pocket Edition of Complete Poems. Strahan, 1869. (I have not seen
       this, but it is entered in the London Catalogue.)
 
 1870. 'Id'. Post-Octavo, 1870 (entered in the London Catalogue).
 
 1871. Miniature or Cabinet Edition of the Complete Works of Alfred
       Tennyson, printed by Whittaker, Strahan & Co., 1871.
 
 1871. Complete Works. Edited by A. C. Loffalt. Rotterdam: 12mo, 1871.
 
 1872. Imperial Library Edition of the Works of Alfred Tennyson. In 6
       vols. Strahan & Co., 1872.
 
 1874-7. The Works of Alfred Tennyson. Cabinet edition in 10 vols.
         H.S.King. London: 1874-1877.
 
 1875. The Poetical Works of Alfred Tennyson. 6 vols. H. S. King.
       1875-77.
 
 1875. The Author's Edition in 4 vols. Henry S. King & Co. 1875.
 
 1877. The Works of Alfred Tennyson. H. S. King. 7 vols. 1877, and in the
       same year by the same publisher the completion of the Miniature
       Edition.
 
 1881. The Works of Alfred Tennyson. With portrait and illustrations,
       1881. C. Kegan Paul & Co.
 
 1884. The Works of Alfred Tennyson. Macmillan & Co., 1884. In the same
       year a school edition in four parts by the same publishers.
 
 1885. The Poetical Works of Alfred Tennyson. Complete Edition. New York:
       T. Y. Cowell & Co., 1885.
 
 1886. The Poetical Works of Alfred Tennyson. In 10 vols. Macmillan &
       Co., 1886.
 
 1886-91. The Poetical Works of Alfred Tennyson. 12 vols. (The dramatic
          works in 4 vols.) 16 vols. 1886-91.
 
 1889. The Works of Alfred Tennyson. London: Macmillan & Co., 1889.
 
 1890. The Poetical Works of Alfred Tennyson. Pocket Edition, without the
       plays. London: Macmillan & Co., 1890.
 
 1890. Selections. Edited by Rowe and Webb (frequently reprinted).
 
 1891. Complete Works, i vol. Reprinted ten times between this date and
       November, 1899.
 
 1891. Poetical Works. Miniature Edition. 12 vols.
 
 1891. Tennyson for the Young, i vol. With introduction and notes by
       Alfred Ainger, reprinted six times between this date and 1899.
 
 1893. Poems. Illustrated. I vol. (This contains the poems and
       illustrations of the Illustrated Edition published in 1857.)
 
 1894. The Works of Alfred, Lord Tennyson, Poet Laureate, with last
       alterations, etc. London: Macmillan & Co., 1894.
 
 1895. The Poetical Works of Alfred, Lord Tennyson (without the plays).
       (The People's Edition.) London: Macmillan & Co., 1895.
 
 1896. 'Id.' Pocket Edition.
 
 1898. The Life and Works of Alfred, Lord Tennyson. (Edition de Luxe.) 12
       vols. Macmillan & Co., 1898.
 
 1899. The Works of Alfred Tennyson. 8 vols.
 
 1899. Poetical Works of Alfred Lord Tennyson. Globe Edition. Macmillan.
       This Edition was supplied to Messrs. Warne and published by them
       as the Albion Edition.
 
 1899. Poems including 'In Memoriam'. Popular Edition, 1 vol.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Early Poems of Alfred Lord Tennyson, by

 
 
 
 Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Tapio Riikonen and Distributed Proofreaders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 BECKET AND OTHER PLAYS
 
 BY
 
 ALFRED LORD TENNYSON, POET LAUREATE
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 BECKET
 THE CUP
 THE FALCON
 THE PROMISE OF MAY
 
 
 
 BECKET
 
 
 TO THE LORD CHANCELLOR, THE RIGHT HONOURABLE EARL OF SELBORNE.
 
 MY DEAR SELBORNE,
 
 _To you, the honoured Chancellor of our own day, I dedicate this
 dramatic memorial of your great predecessor;--which, altho' not
 intended in its present form to meet the exigencies of our modern
 theatre, has nevertheless--for so you have assured me--won your
 approbation.
 
 Ever yours_,
 
 TENNYSON.
 
 
 
 
 _DRAMATIS PERSONAE_.
 
 HENRY II. (_son of the Earl of Anjou_).
 THOMAS BECKET, _Chancellor of England, afterwards Archbishop of
     Canterbury_.
 GILBERT FOLIOT, _Bishop of London_.
 ROGER, _Archbishop of York_.
        _Bishop of Hereford_.
 HILARY, _Bishop of Chichester_.
 JOCELYN, _Bishop of Salisbury_.
 JOHN OF SALISBURY |
 HERBERT OF BOSHAM | _friends of Becket_.
 WALTER MAP, _reputed author of 'Golias,' Latin poems against
     the priesthood_.
 KING LOUIS OF FRANCE.
 GEOFFREY, _son of Rosamund and Henry_.
 GRIM, _a monk of Cambridge_.
 SIR REGINALD FITZURSE |
 SIR RICHARD DE BRITO  | _the four knights of the King's_
 SIR WILLIAM DE TRACY  | _household, enemies of Becket_.
 SIR HUGH DE MORVILLE  |
 DE BROC OF SALTWOOD CASTLE.
 LORD LEICESTER.
 PHILIP DE ELEEMOSYNA.
 TWO KNIGHT TEMPLARS.
 JOHN OF OXFORD (_called the Swearer_).
 ELEANOR OF AQUITAINE, _Queen of England (divorced from Louis of France)_.
 ROSAMUND DE CLIFFORD.
 MARGERY.
 
 _Knights, Monks, Beggars, etc_.
 
 
 
 
 PROLOGUE.
 
 _A Castle in Normandy. Interior of the Hall. Roofs of a City seen
 thro' Windows_.
 
 HENRY _and_ BECKET _at chess_.
 
 
 HENRY.
 So then our good Archbishop Theobald
 Lies dying.
 
 BECKET.
 I am grieved to know as much.
 
 HENRY.
 But we must have a mightier man than he
 For his successor.
 
 BECKET.
                    Have you thought of one?
 
 HENRY.
 A cleric lately poison'd his own mother,
 And being brought before the courts of the Church,
 They but degraded him. I hope they whipt him.
 I would have hang'd him.
 
 BECKET.
                          It is your move.
 
 HENRY.
                                           Well--there.    [_Moves_.
 The Church in the pell-mell of Stephen's time
 Hath climb'd the throne and almost clutch'd the crown;
 But by the royal customs of our realm
 The Church should hold her baronies of me,
 Like other lords amenable to law.
 I'll have them written down and made the law.
 
 BECKET.
 My liege, I move my bishop.
 
 HENRY.
                             And if I live,
 No man without my leave shall excommunicate
 My tenants or my household.
 
 BECKET.
                             Look to your king.
 
 
 HENRY.
 No man without my leave shall cross the seas
 To set the Pope against me--I pray your pardon.
 
 BECKET.
 Well--will you move?
 
 HENRY.
                      There.    [_Moves_.
 
 BECKET.
                             Check--you move so wildly.
 
 HENRY.
 There then!    [_Moves_.
 
 BECKET.
     Why--there then, for you see my bishop
 Hath brought your king to a standstill. You are beaten.
 
 HENRY (_kicks over the board_).
 Why, there then--down go bishop and king together.
 I loathe being beaten; had I fixt my fancy
 Upon the game I should have beaten thee,
 But that was vagabond.
 
 BECKET.
                        Where, my liege? With Phryne,
 Or Lais, or thy Rosamund, or another?
 
 HENRY.
 My Rosamund is no Lais, Thomas Becket;
 And yet she plagues me too--no fault in her--
 But that I fear the Queen would have her life.
 
 BECKET.
 Put her away, put her away, my liege!
 Put her away into a nunnery!
 Safe enough there from her to whom thou art bound
 By Holy Church. And wherefore should she seek
 The life of Rosamund de Clifford more
 Than that of other paramours of thine?
 
 HENRY.
 How dost thou know I am not wedded to her?
 
 BECKET.
 How should I know?
 
 HENRY.
                    That is my secret, Thomas.
 
 BECKET.
 State secrets should be patent to the statesman
 Who serves and loves his king, and whom the king
 Loves not as statesman, but true lover and friend.
 
 HENRY.
 Come, come, thou art but deacon, not yet bishop,
 No, nor archbishop, nor my confessor yet.
 I would to God thou wert, for I should find
 An easy father confessor in thee.
 
 BECKET.
 St. Denis, that thou shouldst not. I should beat
 Thy kingship as my bishop hath beaten it.
 
 HENRY.
 Hell take thy bishop then, and my kingship too!
 Come, come, I love thee and I know thee, I know thee,
 A doter on white pheasant-flesh at feasts,
 A sauce-deviser for thy days of fish,
 A dish-designer, and most amorous
 Of good old red sound liberal Gascon wine:
 Will not thy body rebel, man, if thou flatter it?
 
 BECKET.
 That palate is insane which cannot tell
 A good dish from a bad, new wine from old.
 
 HENRY.
 Well, who loves wine loves woman.
 
 BECKET.
                                   So I do.
 Men are God's trees, and women are God's flowers;
 And when the Gascon wine mounts to my head,
 The trees are all the statelier, and the flowers
 Are all the fairer.
 
 HENRY.
                     And thy thoughts, thy fancies?
 
 BECKET.
 Good dogs, my liege, well train'd, and easily call'd
 Off from the game.
 
 HENRY.
                    Save for some once or twice,
 When they ran down the game and worried it.
 
 BECKET.
 No, my liege, no!--not once--in God's name, no!
 
 HENRY.
 Nay, then, I take thee at thy word--believe thee
 The veriest Galahad of old Arthur's hall.
 And so this Rosamund, my true heart-wife,
 Not Eleanor--she whom I love indeed
 As a woman should be loved--Why dost thou smile
 So dolorously?
 
 BECKET.
                My good liege, if a man
 Wastes himself among women, how should he love
 A woman, as a woman should be loved?
 
 HENRY.
 How shouldst thou know that never hast loved one?
 Come, I would give her to thy care in England
 When I am out in Normandy or Anjou.
 
 BECKET.
 My lord, I am your subject, not your--
 
 HENRY.
                                        Pander.
 God's eyes! I know all that--not my purveyor
 Of pleasures, but to save a life--her life;
 Ay, and the soul of Eleanor from hell-fire.
 I have built a secret bower in England, Thomas,
 A nest in a bush.
 
 BECKET.
                   And where, my liege?
 
 HENRY (_whispers_).
                                        Thine ear.
 
 BECKET.
 That's lone enough.
 
 HENRY (_laying paper on table_).
                     This chart here mark'd '_Her Bower_,'
 Take, keep it, friend. See, first, a circling wood,
 A hundred pathways running everyway,
 And then a brook, a bridge; and after that
 This labyrinthine brickwork maze in maze,
 And then another wood, and in the midst
 A garden and my Rosamund. Look, this line--
 The rest you see is colour'd green--but this
 Draws thro' the chart to her.
 
 BECKET.
                               This blood-red line?
 
 HENRY.
 Ay! blood, perchance, except thou see to her.
 
 BECKET.
 And where is she? There in her English nest?
 
 HENRY.
 Would God she were--no, here within the city.
 We take her from her secret bower in Anjou
 And pass her to her secret bower in England.
 She is ignorant of all but that I love her.
 
 BECKET.
 My liege, I pray thee let me hence: a widow
 And orphan child, whom one of thy wild barons--
 
 HENRY.
 Ay, ay, but swear to see to her in England.
 
 BECKET.
 Well, well, I swear, but not to please myself.
 
 HENRY.
 Whatever come between us?
 
 BECKET.
                           What should come
 Between us, Henry?
 
 HENRY.
                     Nay--I know not, Thomas.
 
 BECKET.
 What need then? Well--whatever come between us.    [_Going_.
 
 HENRY.
 A moment! thou didst help me to my throne
 In Theobald's time, and after by thy wisdom
 Hast kept it firm from shaking; but now I,
 For my realm's sake, myself must be the wizard
 To raise that tempest which will set it trembling
 Only to base it deeper. I, true son
 Of Holy Church--no croucher to the Gregories
 That tread the kings their children underheel--
 Must curb her; and the Holy Father, while
 This Barbarossa butts him from his chair,
 Will need my help--be facile to my hands.
 Now is my time. Yet--lest there should be flashes
 And fulminations from the side of Rome,
 An interdict on England--I will have
 My young son Henry crown'd the King of England,
 That so the Papal bolt may pass by England,
 As seeming his, not mine, and fall abroad.
 I'll have it done--and now.
 
 BECKET.
                             Surely too young
 Even for this shadow of a crown; and tho'
 I love him heartily, I can spy already
 A strain of hard and headstrong in him. Say,
 The Queen should play his kingship against thine!
 
 HENRY.
 I will not think so, Thomas. Who shall crown him?
 Canterbury is dying.
 
 BECKET.
                      The next Canterbury.
 
 HENRY.
 And who shall he be, my friend Thomas? Who?
 
 BECKET.
 Name him; the Holy Father will confirm him.
 
 HENRY (_lays his hand on_ BECKET'S _shoulder_).
 Here!
 
 BECKET.
       Mock me not. I am not even a monk.
 Thy jest--no more. Why--look--is this a sleeve
 For an archbishop?
 
 HENRY.
                    But the arm within
 Is Becket's, who hath beaten down my foes.
 
 BECKET.
 A soldier's, not a spiritual arm.
 
 HENRY.
 I lack a spiritual soldier, Thomas--
 A man of this world and the next to boot.
 
 BECKET.
 There's Gilbert Foliot.
 
 HENRY.
                         He! too thin, too thin.
 Thou art the man to fill out the Church robe;
 Your Foliot fasts and fawns too much for me.
 
 BECKET.
 Roger of York.
 
 HENRY.
                Roger is Roger of York.
 King, Church, and State to him but foils wherein
 To set that precious jewel, Roger of York.
 No.
 
 BECKET.
     Henry of Winchester?
 
 HENRY.
                          Him who crown'd Stephen--
 King Stephen's brother! No; too royal for me.
 And I'll have no more Anselms.
 
 BECKET.
                                Sire, the business
 Of thy whole kingdom waits me: let me go.
 
 HENRY.
 Answer me first.
 
 BECKET.
                  Then for thy barren jest
 Take thou mine answer in bare commonplace--
 _Nolo episcopari_.
 
 HENRY.
                    Ay, but _Nolo
 Archiepiscopari_, my good friend,
 Is quite another matter.
 
 BECKET.
                          A more awful one.
 Make _me_ archbishop! Why, my liege, I know
 Some three or four poor priests a thousand times
 Fitter for this grand function. _Me_ archbishop!
 God's favour and king's favour might so clash
 That thou and I----That were a jest indeed!
 
 HENRY.
 Thou angerest me, man: I do not jest.
 
     _Enter_ ELEANOR _and_ SIR REGINALD FITZURSE.
 
 ELEANOR (_singing_).
 
     Over! the sweet summer closes,
       The reign of the roses is done--
 
 HENRY (_to_ BECKET, _who is going_).
 Thou shalt not go. I have not ended with thee.
 
 ELEANOR (_seeing chart on table_).
 This chart with the red line! her bower! whose bower?
 
 HENRY.
 The chart is not mine, but Becket's: take it, Thomas.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Becket! O--ay--and these chessmen on the floor--the king's crown
 broken! Becket hath beaten thee again--and thou hast kicked down the
 board. I know thee of old.
 
 HENRY.
 True enough, my mind was set upon other matters.
 
 ELEANOR.
 What matters? State matters? love matters?
 
 HENRY.
 My love for thee, and thine for me.
 
 ELEANOR.
 
     Over! the sweet summer closes,
       The reign of the roses is done;
     Over and gone with the roses,
       And over and gone with the sun.
 
 Here; but our sun in Aquitaine lasts longer. I would I were in
 Aquitaine again--your north chills me.
 
     Over! the sweet summer closes,
       And never a flower at the close;
     Over and gone with the roses,
       And winter again and the snows.
 
 That was not the way I ended it first--but unsymmetrically,
 preposterously, illogically, out of passion, without art--like a song
 of the people. Will you have it? The last Parthian shaft of a forlorn
 Cupid at the King's left breast, and all left-handedness and
 under-handedness.
 
       And never a flower at the close,
     Over and gone with the roses,
       Not over and gone with the rose.
 
 True, one rose will outblossom the rest, one rose in a bower. I speak
 after my fancies, for I am a Troubadour, you know, and won the violet
 at Toulouse; but my voice is harsh here, not in tune, a nightingale
 out of season; for marriage, rose or no rose, has killed the golden
 violet.
 
 BECKET.
 Madam, you do ill to scorn wedded love.
 
 ELEANOR.
 So I do. Louis of France loved me, and I dreamed that I loved Louis
 of France: and I loved Henry of England, and Henry of England dreamed
 that he loved me; but the marriage-garland withers even with the
 putting on, the bright link rusts with the breath of the first
 after-marriage kiss, the harvest moon is the ripening of the harvest,
 and the honeymoon is the gall of love; he dies of his honeymoon. I
 could pity this poor world myself that it is no better ordered.
 
 HENRY.
 Dead is he, my Queen? What, altogether? Let me swear nay to that by
 this cross on thy neck. God's eyes! what a lovely cross! what jewels!
 
 ELEANOR.
 Doth it please you? Take it and wear it on that hard heart of yours--
 there.
                                          [_Gives it to him_.
 
 HENRY (_puts it on_).
 
     On this left breast before so hard a heart,
     To hide the scar left by thy Parthian dart.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Has my simple song set you jingling? Nay, if I took and translated
 that hard heart into our Provencal facilities, I could so play about
 it with the rhyme--
 
 HENRY.
 That the heart were lost in the rhyme and the matter in the metre. May
 we not pray you, Madam, to spare us the hardness of your facility?
 
 ELEANOR.
 The wells of Castaly are not wasted upon the desert. We did but jest.
 
 HENRY.
 There's no jest on the brows of Herbert there. What is it, Herbert?
 
     _Enter_ HERBERT OF BOSHAM.
 
 HERBERT.
 My liege, the good Archbishop is no more.
 
 HENRY.
 Peace to his soul!
 
 HERBERT.
 I left him with peace on his face--that sweet other-world smile, which
 will be reflected in the spiritual body among the angels. But he
 longed much to see your Grace and the Chancellor ere he past, and his
 last words were a commendation of Thomas Becket to your Grace as his
 successor in the archbishoprick.
 
 HENRY.
 Ha, Becket! thou rememberest our talk!
 
 BECKET.
 My heart is full of tears--I have no answer.
 
 HENRY.
 Well, well, old men must die, or the world would grow mouldy, would
 only breed the past again. Come to me to-morrow. Thou hast but to hold
 out thy hand. Meanwhile the revenues are mine. A-hawking, a-hawking!
 If I sit, I grow fat.
                                [_Leaps over the table, and exit_.
 
 BECKET.
 He did prefer me to the chancellorship,
 Believing I should ever aid the Church--
 But have I done it? He commends me now
 From out his grave to this archbishoprick.
 
 HERBERT.
 A dead man's dying wish should be of weight.
 
 BECKET.
 _His_ should. Come with me. Let me learn at full
 The manner of his death, and all he said.
                                     [_Exeunt_ HERBERT _and_ BECKET.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Fitzurse, that chart with the red line--thou sawest it--her bower.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Rosamund's?
 
 ELEANOR.
 Ay--there lies the secret of her whereabouts, and the King gave it to
 his Chancellor.
 
 FlTZURSE.
 To this son of a London merchant--how your Grace must hate him.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Hate him? as brave a Soldier as Henry and a goodlier man: but thou--
 dost thou love this Chancellor, that thou hast sworn a voluntary
 allegiance to him?
 
 FlTZURSE.
 Not for my love toward him, but because he had the love of the King.
 How should a baron love a beggar on horseback, with the retinue of
 three kings behind him, outroyalling royalty? Besides, he holp the
 King to break down our castles, for the which I hate him.
 
 ELEANOR.
 For the which I honour him. Statesman not Churchman he. A great and
 sound policy that: I could embrace him for it: you could not see the
 King for the kinglings.
 
 FlTZURSE.
 Ay, but he speaks to a noble as tho' he were a churl, and to a churl
 as if he were a noble.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Pride of the plebeian!
 
 FlTZURSE.
 And this plebeian like to be Archbishop!
 
 ELEANOR.
 True, and I have an inherited loathing of these black sheep of the
 Papacy. Archbishop? I can see further into a man than our hot-headed
 Henry, and if there ever come feud between Church and Crown, and I do
 not then charm this secret out of our loyal Thomas, I am not Eleanor.
 
 FlTZURSE.
 Last night I followed a woman in the city here. Her face was veiled,
 but the back methought was Rosamund--his paramour, thy rival. I can
 feel for thee.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Thou feel for me!--paramour--rival! King Louis had no paramours, and I
 loved him none the more. Henry had many, and I loved him none the
 less--now neither more nor less--not at all; the cup's empty. I would
 she were but his paramour, for men tire of their fancies; but I fear
 this one fancy hath taken root, and borne blossom too, and she, whom
 the King loves indeed, is a power in the State. Rival!--ay, and when
 the King passes, there may come a crash and embroilment as in
 Stephen's time; and her children--canst thou not--that secret matter
 which would heat the King against thee (_whispers him and he starts_).
 Nay, that is safe with me as with thyself: but canst thou not--thou
 art drowned in debt--thou shalt have our love, our silence, and our
 gold--canst thou not--if thou light upon her--free me from her?
 
 FITZURSE.
 Well, Madam, I have loved her in my time.
 
 ELEANOR.
 No, my bear, thou hast not. My Courts of Love would have held thee
 guiltless of love--the fine attractions and repulses, the delicacies,
 the subtleties.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Madam, I loved according to the main purpose and intent of nature.
 
 ELEANOR.
 I warrant thee! thou wouldst hug thy Cupid till his ribs cracked--
 enough of this. Follow me this Rosamund day and night, whithersoever
 she goes; track her, if thou canst, even into the King's lodging, that
 I may (_clenches her fist_)--may at least have my cry against him and
 her,--and thou in thy way shouldst be
 jealous of the King, for thou in thy way didst once,
 what shall I call it, affect her thine own self.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Ay, but the young colt winced and whinnied and
 flung up her heels; and then the King came honeying
 about her, and this Becket, her father's friend, like
 enough staved us from her.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Us!
 
 FITZURSE.
 Yea, by the Blessed Virgin! There were more than
 I buzzing round the blossom--De Tracy--even that
 flint De Brito.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Carry her off among you; run in upon her and
 devour her, one and all of you; make her as hateful
 to herself and to the King, as she is to me.
 
 FITZURSE.
 I and all would be glad to wreak our spite on the
 rose-faced minion of the King, and bring her to the
 level of the dust, so that the King--
 
 ELEANOR.
 Let her eat it like the serpent, and be driven out
 of her paradise.
 
 
 
 
 ACT ONE.
 
 
 SCENE I.--BECKET'S _House in London. Chamber barely furnished_. BECKET
 _unrobing_. HERBERT OF BOSHAM _and_ SERVANT.
 
 
 SERVANT.
 Shall I not help your lordship to your rest?
 
 BECKET.
 Friend, am I so much better than thyself
 That thou shouldst help me? Thou art wearied out
 With this day's work, get thee to thine own bed.
 Leave me with Herbert, friend.      [_Exit_ SERVANT.
 Help me off, Herbert, with this--and this.
 
 HERBERT.
 Was not the people's blessing as we past
 Heart-comfort and a balsam to thy blood?
 
 BECKET.
 The people know their Church a tower of strength,
 A bulwark against Throne and Baronage.
 Too heavy for me, this; off with it, Herbert!
 
 HERBERT.
 Is it so much heavier than thy Chancellor's robe?
 
 BECKET.
 No; but the Chancellor's and the Archbishop's
 Together more than mortal man can bear.
 
 HERBERT.
 Not heavier than thine armour at Thoulouse?
 
 BECKET.
 O Herbert, Herbert, in my chancellorship
 I more than once have gone against the Church.
 
 HERBERT.
 To please the King?
 
 BECKET.
                     Ay, and the King of kings,
 Or justice; for it seem'd to me but just
 The Church should pay her scutage like the lords.
 But hast thou heard this cry of Gilbert Foliot
 That I am not the man to be your Primate,
 For Henry could not work a miracle--
 Make an Archbishop of a soldier?
 
 HERBERT.
                                  Ay,
 For Gilbert Foliot held himself the man.
 
 BECKET.
 Am I the man? My mother, ere she bore me,
 Dream'd that twelve stars fell glittering out of heaven
 Into her bosom.
 
 HERBERT.
                 Ay, the fire, the light,
 The spirit of the twelve Apostles enter'd
 Into thy making.
 
 BECKET.
                  And when I was a child,
 The Virgin, in a vision of my sleep,
 Gave me the golden keys of Paradise. Dream,
 Or prophecy, that?
 
 HERBERT.
                    Well, dream and prophecy both.
 
 BECKET.
 And when I was of Theobald's household, once--
 The good old man would sometimes have his jest--
 He took his mitre off, and set it on me,
 And said, 'My young Archbishop--thou wouldst make
 A stately Archbishop!' Jest or prophecy there?
 
 HERBERT.
 Both, Thomas, both.
 
 BECKET.
                     Am I the man? That rang
 Within my head last night, and when I slept
 Methought I stood in Canterbury Minster,
 And spake to the Lord God, and said, 'O Lord,
 I have been a lover of wines, and delicate meats,
 And secular splendours, and a favourer
 Of players, and a courtier, and a feeder
 Of dogs and hawks, and apes, and lions, and lynxes.
 Am _I_ the man?' And the Lord answer'd me,
 'Thou art the man, and all the more the man.'
 And then I asked again, 'O Lord my God,
 Henry the King hath been my friend, my brother,
 And mine uplifter in this world, and chosen me
 For this thy great archbishoprick, believing
 That I should go against the Church with him.
 And I shall go against him with the Church,
 And I have said no word of this to him:
 'Am _I_ the man?' And the Lord answer'd me,
 'Thou art the man, and all the more the man.'
 And thereupon, methought, He drew toward me,
 And smote me down upon the Minster floor.
 I fell.
 
 HERBERT.
         God make not thee, but thy foes, fall.
 
 BECKET.
 I fell. Why fall? Why did He smite me? What?
 Shall I fall off--to please the King once more?
 Not fight--tho' somehow traitor to the King--
 My truest and mine utmost for the Church?
 
 HERBERT.
 Thou canst not fall that way. Let traitor be;
 For how have fought thine utmost for the Church,
 Save from the throne of thine archbishoprick?
 And how been made Archbishop hadst thou told him,
 'I mean to fight mine utmost for the Church,
 Against the King?'
 
 BECKET.
                    But dost thou think the King
 Forced mine election?
 
 HERBERT.
                      I do think the King
 Was potent in the election, and why not?
 Why should not Heaven have so inspired the King?
 Be comforted. Thou art the man--be thou
 A mightier Anselm.
 
 BECKET.
 I do believe thee, then. I am the man.
 And yet I seem appall'd--on such a sudden
 At such an eagle-height I stand and see
 The rift that runs between me and the King.
 I served our Theobald well when I was with him;
 I served King Henry well as Chancellor;
 I am his no more, and I must serve the Church.
 This Canterbury is only less than Rome,
 And all my doubts I fling from me like dust,
 Winnow and scatter all scruples to the wind,
 And all the puissance of the warrior,
 And all the wisdom of the Chancellor,
 And all the heap'd experiences of life,
 I cast upon the side of Canterbury--
 Our holy mother Canterbury, who sits
 With tatter'd robes. Laics and barons, thro'
 The random gifts of careless kings, have graspt
 Her livings, her advowsons, granges, farms,
 And goodly acres--we will make her whole;
 Not one rood lost. And for these Royal customs,
 These ancient Royal customs--they _are_ Royal,
 Not of the Church--and let them be anathema,
 And all that speak for them anathema.
 
 HERBERT.
 Thomas, thou art moved too much.
 
 BECKET.
                                  O Herbert, here
 I gash myself asunder from the King,
 Tho' leaving each, a wound; mine own, a grief
 To show the scar for ever--his, a hate
 Not ever to be heal'd.
 
     _Enter_ ROSAMUND DE CLIFFORD, _flying from_ SIR REGINALD
     FITZURSE. _Drops her veil_.
 
 BECKET.
                       Rosamund de Clifford!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Save me, father, hide me--they follow me--
 and I must not be known.
 
 BECKET.
                           Pass in with Herbert there.
 
            [_Exeunt_ ROSAMUND _and_ HERBERT _by side door_.
 
     _Enter_ FITZURSE.
 
 FITZURSE.
 The Archbishop!
 
 BECKET.
                 Ay! what wouldst thou, Reginald?
 
 FITZURSE.
 Why--why, my lord, I follow'd--follow'd one--
 
 BECKET.
 And then what follows? Let me follow thee.
 
 FITZURSE.
 It much imports me I should know her name.
 
 BECKET.
 What her?
 
 FITZURSE.
           The woman that I follow'd hither.
 
 BECKET.
 Perhaps it may import her all as much
 Not to be known.
 
 FITZURSE.
                  And what care I for that?
 Come, come, my lord Archbishop; I saw that door
 Close even now upon the woman.
 
 BECKET.
                                Well?
 
 FITZURSE (_making for the door_).
 Nay, let me pass, my lord, for I must know.
 
 BECKET.
 Back, man!
 
 FITZURSE.
            Then tell me who and what she is.
 
 BECKET.
 Art thou so sure thou followedst anything?
 Go home, and sleep thy wine off, for thine eyes
 Glare stupid--wild with wine.
 
 FITZURSE (_making to the door_).
                              I must and will.
 I care not for thy new archbishoprick.
 
 BECKET.
 Back, man, I tell thee! What!
 Shall I forget my new archbishoprick
 And smite thee with my crozier on the skull?
 'Fore God, I am a mightier man than thou.
 
 FlTZURSE.
 It well befits thy new archbishoprick
 To take the vagabond woman of the street
 Into thine arms!
 
 BECKET.
                  O drunken ribaldry!
 Out, beast! out, bear!
 
 FlTZURSE.
                        I shall remember this.
 
 BECKET.
 Do, and begone!    [_Exit_ FITZURSE.
                 [_Going to the door, sees_ DE TRACY.]
                 Tracy, what dost thou here?
 
 DE TRACY.
 My lord, I follow'd Reginald Fitzurse.
 
 BECKET.
 Follow him out!
 
 DE TRACY.
                 I shall remember this
 Discourtesy.
                                   [_Exit_.
 
 BECKET.
              Do. These be those baron-brutes
 That havock'd all the land in Stephen's day.
 Rosamund de Clifford.
 
     _Re-enter_ ROSAMUND _and_ HERBERT.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                       Here am I.
 
 BECKET.
                                  Why here?
 We gave thee to the charge of John of Salisbury.
 To pass thee to thy secret bower to-morrow.
 Wast thou not told to keep thyself from sight?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Poor bird of passage! so I was; but, father,
 They say that you are wise in winged things,
 And know the ways of Nature. Bar the bird
 From following the fled summer--a chink--he's out,
 Gone! And there stole into the city a breath
 Full of the meadows, and it minded me
 Of the sweet woods of Clifford, and the walks
 Where I could move at pleasure, and I thought
 Lo! I must out or die.
 
 BECKET.
                        Or out _and_ die.
 And what hast thou to do with this Fitzurse?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Nothing. He sued my hand. I shook at him.
 He found me once alone. Nay--nay--I cannot
 Tell you: my father drove him and his friends,
 De Tracy and De Brito, from our castle.
 I was but fourteen and an April then.
 I heard him swear revenge.
 
 BECKET.
                            Why will you court it
 By self-exposure? flutter out at night?
 Make it so hard to save a moth from the fire?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 I have saved many of 'em. You catch 'em, so,
 Softly, and fling them out to the free air.
 They burn themselves _within_-door.
 
 BECKET.
                                     Our good John
 Must speed you to your bower at once. The child
 Is there already.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                   Yes--the child--the child--
 O rare, a whole long day of open field.
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, but you go disguised.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                           O rare again!
 We'll baffle them, I warrant. What shall it be?
 I'll go as a nun.
 
 BECKET.
                   No.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                       What, not good enough
 Even to play at nun?
 
 BECKET.
                      Dan John with a nun,
 That Map, and these new railers at the Church
 May plaister his clean name with scurrilous rhymes!
 No!
     Go like a monk, cowling and clouding up
 That fatal star, thy Beauty, from the squint
 Of lust and glare of malice. Good night! good night!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Father, I am so tender to all hardness!
 Nay, father, first thy blessing.
 
 BECKET.
                                  Wedded?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                          Father!
 
 BECKET.
 Well, well! I ask no more. Heaven bless thee! hence!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 O, holy father, when thou seest him next,
 Commend me to thy friend.
 
 BECKET.
                           What friend?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                        The King.
 
 BECKET.
 Herbert, take out a score of armed men
 To guard this bird of passage to her cage;
 And watch Fitzurse, and if he follow thee,
 Make him thy prisoner. I am Chancellor yet.
                             [_Exeunt_ HERBERT _and_ ROSAMUND.
 Poor soul! poor soul!
 My friend, the King!... O thou Great Seal of England,
 Given me by my dear friend the King of England--
 We long have wrought together, thou and I--
 Now must I send thee as a common friend
 To tell the King, my friend, I am against him.
 We are friends no more: he will say that, not I.
 The worldly bond between us is dissolved,
 Not yet the love: can I be under him
 As Chancellor? as Archbishop over him?
 Go therefore like a friend slighted by one
 That hath climb'd up to nobler company.
 Not slighted--all but moan'd for: thou must go.
 I have not dishonour'd thee--I trust I have not;
 Not mangled justice. May the hand that next
 Inherits thee be but as true to thee
 As mine hath been! O, my dear friend, the King!
 O brother!--I may come to martyrdom.
 I am martyr in myself already.--Herbert!
 
 HERBERT (_re-entering_).
 My lord, the town is quiet, and the moon
 Divides the whole long street with light and shade.
 No footfall--no Fitzurse. We have seen her home.
 
 BECKET.
 The hog hath tumbled himself into some corner,
 Some ditch, to snore away his drunkenness
 Into the sober headache,--Nature's moral
 Against excess. Let the Great Seal be sent
 Back to the King to-morrow.
 
 HERBERT.
                             Must that be?
 The King may rend the bearer limb from limb
 Think on it again.
 
 BECKET.
                   Against the moral excess
 No physical ache, but failure it may be
 Of all we aim'd at. John of Salisbury
 Hath often laid a cold hand on my heats,
 And Herbert hath rebuked me even now.
 I will be wise and wary, not the soldier
 As Foliot swears it.--John, and out of breath!
 
     _Enter_ JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 Thomas, thou wast not happy taking charge
 Of this wild Rosamund to please the King,
 Nor am I happy having charge of her--
 The included Danae has escaped again
 Her tower, and her Acrisius--where to seek?
 I have been about the city.
 
 BECKET.
                             Thou wilt find her
 Back in her lodging. Go with her--at once--
 To-night--my men will guard you to the gates.
 Be sweet to her, she has many enemies.
 Send the Great Seal by daybreak. Both, good night!
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--_Street in Northampton leading to the Castle_.
 
 ELEANOR'S RETAINERS _and_ BECKET'S RETAINERS _fighting. Enter_ ELEANOR
 _and_ BECKET _from opposite streets_.
 
 
 ELEANOR.
 Peace, fools!
 
 BECKET.
               Peace, friends! what idle brawl is this?
 
 RETAINER OF BECKET.
 They said--her Grace's people--thou wast found--
 Liars! I shame to quote 'em--caught, my lord,
 With a wanton in thy lodging--Hell requite 'em!
 
 RETAINER OF ELEANOR.
 My liege, the Lord Fitzurse reported this
 In passing to the Castle even now.
 
 RETAINER OF BECKET.
 And then they mock'd us and we fell upon 'em,
 For we would live and die for thee, my lord,
 However kings and queens may frown on thee.
 
 BECKET TO HIS RETAINERS.
 Go, go--no more of this!
 
 ELEANOR TO HER RETAINERS.
                          Away!--(_Exeunt_ RETAINERS) Fitzurse--
 
 BECKET.
 Nay, let him be.
 
 ELEANOR.
                  No, no, my Lord Archbishop,
 'Tis known you are midwinter to all women,
 But often in your chancellorship you served
 The follies of the King.
 
 BECKET.
                          No, not these follies!
 
 ELEANOR.
 My lord, Fitzurse beheld her in your lodging.
 
 BECKET.
 Whom?
 
 ELEANOR.
       Well--you know--the minion, Rosamund.
 
 BECKET.
 He had good eyes!
 
 ELEANOR.
                   Then hidden in the street
 He watch'd her pass with John of Salisbury
 And heard her cry 'Where is this bower of mine?'
 
 BECKET.
 Good ears too!
 
 ELEANOR.
                You are going to the Castle,
 Will you subscribe the customs?
 
 BECKET.
                                 I leave that,
 Knowing how much you reverence Holy Church,
 My liege, to your conjecture.
 
 ELEANOR.
                               I and mine--
 And many a baron holds along with me--
 Are not so much at feud with Holy Church
 But we might take your side against the customs--
 So that you grant me one slight favour.
 
 BECKET.
                                         What?
 
 ELEANOR.
 A sight of that same chart which Henry gave you
 With the red line--'her bower.'
 
 BECKET.
                                 And to what end?
 
 ELEANOR.
 That Church must scorn herself whose fearful Priest
 Sits winking at the license of a king,
 Altho' we grant when kings are dangerous
 The Church must play into the hands of kings;
 Look! I would move this wanton from his sight
 And take the Church's danger on myself.
 
 BECKET.
 For which she should be duly grateful.
 
 ELEANOR.
                                        True!
 Tho' she that binds the bond, herself should see
 That kings are faithful to their marriage vow.
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, Madam, and queens also.
 
 ELEANOR.
                             And queens also!
 What is your drift?
 
 BECKET.
                     My drift is to the Castle,
 Where I shall meet the Barons and my King.    [_Exit_.
 
         DE BROC, DE TRACY, DE BRITO, DE MORVILLE (_passing_).
 
 ELEANOR.
 To the Castle?
 
 DE BROC.
                Ay!
 
 ELEANOR.
                     Stir up the King, the Lords!
 Set all on fire against him!
 
 DE BRITO.
                              Ay, good Madam!    [_Exeunt_.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Fool! I will make thee hateful to thy King.
 Churl! I will have thee frighted into France,
 And I shall live to trample on thy grave.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--_The Hall in Northampton Castle_.
 
 _On one side of the stage the doors of an inner Council-chamber,
 half-open. At the bottom, the great doors of the Hall_. ROGER
 ARCHBISHOP OF YORK, FOLIOT BISHOP OF LONDON, HILARY OF CHICHESTER,
 BISHOP OF HEREFORD, RICHARD DE HASTINGS (_Grand Prior of Templars_),
 PHILIP DE ELEEMOSYNA (_the Pope's Almoner_), _and others_. DE BROC,
 FITZURSE, DE BRITO, DE MORVILLE, DE TRACY, _and other_ BARONS
 _assembled--a table before them_. JOHN OF OXFORD, _President of the
 Council_.
 
 
     _Enter_ BECKET _and_ HERBERT OF BOSHAM.
 
 BECKET.
 Where is the King?
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
                    Gone hawking on the Nene,
 His heart so gall'd with thine ingratitude,
 He will not see thy face till thou hast sign'd
 These ancient laws and customs of the realm.
 Thy sending back the Great Seal madden'd him,
 He all but pluck'd the bearer's eyes away.
 Take heed, lest he destroy thee utterly.
 
 BECKET.
 Then shalt thou step into my place and sign.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
 Didst thou not promise Henry to obey
 These ancient laws and customs of the realm?
 
 BECKET.
 Saving the honour of my order--ay.
 Customs, traditions,--clouds that come and go;
 The customs of the Church are Peter's rock.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
 Saving thine order! But King Henry sware
 That, saving his King's kingship, he would grant thee
 The crown itself. Saving thine order, Thomas,
 Is black and white at once, and comes to nought.
 O bolster'd up with stubbornness and pride,
 Wilt thou destroy the Church in fighting for it,
 And bring us all to shame?
 
 BECKET.
                            Roger of York,
 When I and thou were youths in Theobald's house,
 Twice did thy malice and thy calumnies
 Exile me from the face of Theobald.
 Now I am Canterbury and thou art York.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
 And is not York the peer of Canterbury?
 Did not Great Gregory bid St. Austin here
 Found two archbishopricks, London and York?
 
 BECKET.
 What came of that? The first archbishop fled,
 And York lay barren for a hundred years.
 Why, by this rule, Foliot may claim the pall
 For London too.
 
 FOLIOT.
                 And with good reason too,
 For London had a temple and a priest
 When Canterbury hardly bore a name.
 
 BECKET.
 The pagan temple of a pagan Rome!
 The heathen priesthood of a heathen creed!
 Thou goest beyond thyself in petulancy!
 Who made thee London? Who, but Canterbury?
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 Peace, peace, my lords! these customs are no longer
 As Canterbury calls them, wandering clouds,
 But by the King's command are written down,
 And by the King's command I, John of Oxford,
 The President of this Council, read them.
 
 BECKET.
                                           Read!
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD (_reads_).
 'All causes of advowsons and presentations, whether between laymen or
 clerics, shall be tried in the King's court.'
 
 BECKET.
 But that I cannot sign: for that would drag
 The cleric before the civil judgment-seat,
 And on a matter wholly spiritual.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 'If any cleric be accused of felony, the Church shall not protect him:
 but he shall answer to the summons of the King's court to be tried
 therein.'
 
 BECKET.
 And that I cannot sign.
 Is not the Church the visible Lord on earth?
 Shall hands that do create the Lord be bound
 Behind the back like laymen-criminals?
 The Lord be judged again by Pilate? No!
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 'When a bishoprick falls vacant, the King, till another be appointed,
 shall receive the revenues thereof.'
 
 BECKET.
 And that I cannot sign. Is the King's treasury
 A fit place for the monies of the Church,
 That be the patrimony of the poor?
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 'And when the vacancy is to be filled up, the King shall summon the
 chapter of that church to court, and the election shall be made in the
 Chapel Royal, with the consent of our lord the King, and by the advice
 of his Government.'
 
 BECKET.
 And that I cannot sign: for that would make
 Our island-Church a schism from Christendom,
 And weight down all free choice beneath the throne.
 
 FOLIOT.
 And was thine own election so canonical,
 Good father?
 
 BECKET.
              If it were not, Gilbert Foliot,
 I mean to cross the sea to France, and lay
 My crozier in the Holy Father's hands,
 And bid him re-create me, Gilbert Foliot.
 
 FOLIOT.
 Nay; by another of these customs thou
 Wilt not be suffer'd so to cross the seas
 Without the license of our lord the King.
 
 BECKET.
 That, too, I cannot sign.
 
         DE BROC, DE BRITO, DE TRACY, FITZURSE, DE
         MORVILLE, _start up--a clash of swords_.
 
                           Sign and obey!
 
 BECKET.
 My lords, is this a combat or a council?
 Are ye my masters, or my lord the King?
 Ye make this clashing for no love o' the customs
 Or constitutions, or whate'er ye call them,
 But that there be among you those that hold
 Lands reft from Canterbury.
 
 DE BROC.
                             And mean to keep them,
 In spite of thee!
 
 LORDS (_shouting_).
                   Sign, and obey the crown!
 
 BECKET.
 The crown? Shall I do less for Canterbury
 Than Henry for the crown? King Stephen gave
 Many of the crown lands to those that helpt him;
 So did Matilda, the King's mother. Mark,
 When Henry came into his own again,
 Then he took back not only Stephen's gifts,
 But his own mother's, lest the crown should be
 Shorn of ancestral splendour. This did Henry.
 Shall I do less for mine own Canterbury?
 And thou, De Broc, that holdest Saltwood Castle--
 
 DE BROC.
 And mean to hold it, or--
 
 BECKET.
                          To have my life.
 
 DE BROC.
 The King is quick to anger; if thou anger him,
 We wait but the King's word to strike thee dead.
 
 BECKET.
 Strike, and I die the death of martyrdom;
 Strike, and ye set these customs by my death
 Ringing their own death-knell thro' all the realm.
 
 HERBERT.
 And I can tell you, lords, ye are all as like
 To lodge a fear in Thomas Becket's heart
 As find a hare's form in a lion's cave.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 Ay, sheathe your swords, ye will displease the King.
 
 DE BROC.
 Why down then thou! but an he come to Saltwood,
 By God's death, thou shalt stick him like a calf!
                                     [_Sheathing his sword_.
 
 HILARY.
 O my good lord, I do entreat thee--sign.
 Save the King's honour here before his barons.
 He hath sworn that thou shouldst sign, and now but shuns
 The semblance of defeat; I have heard him say
 He means no more; so if thou sign, my lord,
 That were but as the shadow of an assent.
 
 BECKET.
 'Twould seem too like the substance, if I sign'd.
 
 PHILIP DE ELEEMOSYNA.
 My lord, thine ear! I have the ear of the Pope.
 As thou hast honour for the Pope our master,
 Have pity on him, sorely prest upon
 By the fierce Emperor and his Antipope.
 Thou knowest he was forced to fly to France;
 He pray'd me to pray thee to pacify
 Thy King; for if thou go against thy King,
 Then must he likewise go against thy King,
 And then thy King might join the Antipope,
 And that would shake the Papacy as it stands.
 Besides, thy King swore to our cardinals
 He meant no harm nor damage to the Church.
 Smoothe thou his pride--thy signing is but form;
 Nay, and should harm come of it, it is the Pope
 Will be to blame--not thou. Over and over
 He told me thou shouldst pacify the King,
 Lest there be battle between Heaven and Earth,
 And Earth should get the better--for the time.
 Cannot the Pope absolve thee if thou sign?
 
 BECKET.
 Have I the orders of the Holy Father?
 
 PHILIP DE ELEEMOSYNA.
 Orders, my lord--why, no; for what am I?
 The secret whisper of the Holy Father.
 Thou, that hast been a statesman, couldst thou always
 Blurt thy free mind to the air?
 
 BECKET.
 If Rome be feeble, then should I be firm.
 
 PHILIP.
 Take it not that way--balk not the Pope's will.
 When he hath shaken off the Emperor,
 He heads the Church against the King with thee.
 
 RICHARD DE HASTINGS (_kneeling_).
 Becket, I am the oldest of the Templars;
 I knew thy father; he would be mine age
 Had he lived now; think of me as thy father!
 Behold thy father kneeling to thee, Becket.
 Submit; I promise thee on my salvation
 That thou wilt hear no more o' the customs.
 
 BECKET.
                                             What!
 Hath Henry told thee? hast thou talk'd with him?
 
 _Another_ TEMPLAR (_kneeling_).
 Father, I am the youngest of the Templars,
 Look on me as I were thy bodily son,
 For, like a son, I lift my hands to thee.
 
 PHILIP.
 Wilt thou hold out for ever, Thomas Becket?
 Dost thou not hear?
 
 BECKET (_signs_).
                     Why--there then--there--I sign,
 And swear to obey the customs.
 
 FOLIOT.
                                Is it thy will,
 My lord Archbishop, that we too should sign?
 
 BECKET.
 O ay, by that canonical obedience
 Thou still hast owed thy father, Gilbert Foliot.
 
 FOLIOT.
 Loyally and with good faith, my lord Archbishop?
 
 BECKET.
 O ay, with all that loyalty and good faith
 Thou still hast shown thy primate, Gilbert Foliot.
                           [BECKET _draws apart with_ HERBERT.
 Herbert, Herbert, have I betray'd the Church?
 I'll have the paper back--blot out my name.
 
 HERBERT.
 Too late, my lord: you see they are signing there.
 
 BECKET.
 False to myself--it is the will of God
 To break me, prove me nothing of myself!
 This Almoner hath tasted Henry's gold.
 The cardinals have finger'd Henry's gold.
 And Rome is venal ev'n to rottenness.
 I see it, I see it.
 I am no soldier, as he said--at least
 No leader. Herbert, till I hear from the Pope
 I will suspend myself from all my functions.
 If fast and prayer, the lacerating scourge--
 
 FOLIOT (_from the table_).
 My lord Archbishop, thou hast yet to seal.
 
 BECKET.
 First, Foliot, let me see what I have sign'd.
                              [_Goes to the table_.
 What, this! and this!--what! new and old together!
 Seal? If a seraph shouted from the sun,
 And bad me seal against the rights of the Church,
 I would anathematise him. I will not seal.
                                       [_Exit with_ HERBERT.
 
     _Enter_ KING HENRY.
 
 HENRY.
 Where's Thomas? hath he sign'd? show me the papers!
 Sign'd and not seal'd! How's that?
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
                                    He would not seal.
 And when he sign'd, his face was stormy-red--
 Shame, wrath, I know not what. He sat down there
 And dropt it in his hands, and then a paleness,
 Like the wan twilight after sunset, crept
 Up even to the tonsure, and he groan'd,
 'False to myself! It is the will of God!'
 
 HENRY.
 God's will be what it will, the man shall seal,
 Or I will seal his doom. My burgher's son--
 Nay, if I cannot break him as the prelate,
 I'll crush him as the subject. Send for him back.
                                  [_Sits on his throne_.
 Barons and bishops of our realm of England,
 After the nineteen winters of King Stephen--
 A reign which was no reign, when none could sit
 By his own hearth in peace; when murder common
 As nature's death, like Egypt's plague, had fill'd
 All things with blood; when every doorway blush'd,
 Dash'd red with that unhallow'd passover;
 When every baron ground his blade in blood;
 The household dough was kneaded up with blood;
 The millwheel turn'd in blood; the wholesome plow
 Lay rusting in the furrow's yellow weeds,
 Till famine dwarft the race--I came, your King!
 Nor dwelt alone, like a soft lord of the East,
 In mine own hall, and sucking thro' fools' ears
 The flatteries of corruption--went abroad
 Thro' all my counties, spied my people's ways;
 Yea, heard the churl against the baron--yea,
 And did him justice; sat in mine own courts
 Judging my judges, that had found a King
 Who ranged confusions, made the twilight day,
 And struck a shape from out the vague, and law
 From madness. And the event--our fallows till'd,
 Much corn, repeopled towns, a realm again.
 So far my course, albeit not glassy-smooth,
 Had prosper'd in the main, but suddenly
 Jarr'd on this rock. A cleric violated
 The daughter of his host, and murder'd him.
 Bishops--York, London, Chichester, Westminster--
 Ye haled this tonsured devil into your courts;
 But since your canon will not let you take
 Life for a life, ye but degraded him
 Where I had hang'd him. What doth hard murder care
 For degradation? and that made me muse,
 Being bounden by my coronation oath
 To do men justice. Look to it, your own selves!
 Say that a cleric murder'd an archbishop,
 What could ye do? Degrade, imprison him--
 Not death for death.
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
                      But I, my liege, could swear,
 To death for death.
 
 HENRY.
                      And, looking thro' my reign,
 I found a hundred ghastly murders done
 By men, the scum and offal of the Church;
 Then, glancing thro' the story of this realm,
 I came on certain wholesome usages,
 Lost in desuetude, of my grandsire's day,
 Good royal customs--had them written fair
 For John of Oxford here to read to you.
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 And I can easily swear to these as being
 The King's will and God's will and justice; yet
 I could but read a part to-day, because----
 
 FITZURSE.
 Because my lord of Canterbury----
 
 DE TRACY.
                                  Ay,
 This lord of Canterbury----
 
 DE BRITO.
                              As is his wont
 Too much of late whene'er your royal rights
 Are mooted in our councils----
 
 FITZURSE.
                               --made an uproar.
 
 HENRY.
 And Becket had my bosom on all this;
 If ever man by bonds of gratefulness--
 I raised him from the puddle of the gutter,
 I made him porcelain from the clay of the city--
 Thought that I knew him, err'd thro' love of him,
 Hoped, were he chosen archbishop, Church and Crown,
 Two sisters gliding in an equal dance,
 Two rivers gently flowing side by side--
 But no!
 The bird that moults sings the same song again,
 The snake that sloughs comes out a snake again.
 Snake--ay, but he that lookt a fangless one,
 Issues a venomous adder.
 For he, when having dofft the Chancellor's robe--
 Flung the Great Seal of England in my face--
 Claim'd some of our crown lands for Canterbury--
 My comrade, boon companion, my co-reveller,
 The master of his master, the King's king.--
 God's eyes! I had meant to make him all but king.
 Chancellor-Archbishop, he might well have sway'd
 All England under Henry, the young King,
 When I was hence. What did the traitor say?
 False to himself, but ten-fold false to me!
 The will of God--why, then it is my will--
 Is he coming?
                             MESSENGER (_entering_).
               With a crowd of worshippers,
 And holds his cross before him thro' the crowd,
 As one that puts himself in sanctuary.
 
 HENRY.
 His cross!
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
            His cross! I'll front him, cross to cross.
                                [_Exit_ ROGER OF YORK.
 HENRY.
 His cross! it is the traitor that imputes
 Treachery to his King!
 It is not safe for me to look upon him.
 Away--with me!
 
     [_Goes in with his_ BARONS _to the Council Chamber,
     the door of which is left open_.
 
     _Enter_ BECKET, _holding his cross of silver before him_.
     _The_ BISHOPS _come round him_.
 
 HEREFORD.
 The King will not abide thee with thy cross.
 Permit me, my good lord, to bear it for thee,
 Being thy chaplain.
 
 BECKET.
                     No: it must protect me.
 
 HERBERT.
 As once he bore the standard of the Angles,
 So now he bears the standard of the angels.
 
 FOLIOT.
 I am the Dean of the province: let me bear it.
 Make not thy King a traitorous murderer.
 
 BECKET.
 Did not your barons draw their swords against me?
 
     _Enter_ ROGER OF YORK, _with his cross,
     advancing to_ BECKET.
 
 BECKET.
 
 Wherefore dost thou presume to bear thy cross,
 Against the solemn ordinance from Rome,
 Out of thy province?
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
                      Why dost thou presume,
 Arm'd with thy cross, to come before the King?
 If Canterbury bring his cross to court,
 Let York bear his to mate with Canterbury.
 
 FOLIOT (_seizing hold of_ BECKET'S _cross_).
 Nay, nay, my lord, thou must not brave the King.
 Nay, let me have it. I will have it!
 
 BECKET.
                                      Away!
 
                     [_Flinging him off_.
 
 FOLIOT.
 _He_ fasts, they say, this mitred Hercules!
 _He_ fast! is that an arm of fast? My lord,
 Hadst thou not sign'd, I had gone along with thee;
 But thou the shepherd hast betray'd the sheep,
 And thou art perjured, and thou wilt not seal.
 As Chancellor thou wast against the Church,
 Now as Archbishop goest against the King;
 For, like a fool, thou knowst no middle way.
 Ay, ay! but art thou stronger than the King?
 
 BECKET.
 Strong--not in mine own self, but Heaven; true
 To either function, holding it; and thou
 Fast, scourge thyself, and mortify thy flesh,
 Not spirit--thou remainest Gilbert Foliot,
 A worldly follower of the worldly strong.
 I, bearing this great ensign, make it clear
 Under what Prince I fight.
 
 FOLIOT.
                            My lord of York,
 Let us go in to the Council, where our bishops
 And our great lords will sit in judgment on him.
 
 BECKET.
 Sons sit in judgment on their father!--then
 The spire of Holy Church may prick the graves--
 Her crypt among the stars. Sign? seal? I promised
 The King to obey these customs, not yet written,
 Saving mine order; true too, that when written
 I sign'd them--being a fool, as Foliot call'd me.
 I hold not by my signing. Get ye hence,
 Tell what I say to the King.
 
           [_Exeunt_ HEREFORD, FOLIOT, _and other_ BISHOPS.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
                              The Church will hate thee.
                                                     [_Exit_.
 
 BECKET.
 Serve my best friend and make him my worst foe;
 Fight for the Church, and set the Church against me!
 
 HERBERT.
 To be honest is to set all knaves against thee.
 Ah! Thomas, excommunicate them all!
 
 HEREFORD (_re-entering_).
 I cannot brook the turmoil thou hast raised.
 I would, my lord Thomas of Canterbury,
 Thou wert plain Thomas and not Canterbury,
 Or that thou wouldst deliver Canterbury
 To our King's hands again, and be at peace.
 
 HILARY (_re-entering_).
 For hath not thine ambition set the Church
 This day between the hammer and the anvil--
 Fealty to the King, obedience to thyself?
 
 HERBERT.
 What say the bishops?
 
 HILARY.
                       Some have pleaded for him,
 But the King rages--most are with the King;
 And some are reeds, that one time sway to the current,
 And to the wind another. But we hold
 Thou art forsworn; and no forsworn Archbishop
 Shall helm the Church. We therefore place ourselves
 Under the shield and safeguard of the Pope,
 And cite thee to appear before the Pope,
 And answer thine accusers.... Art thou deaf?
 
 BECKET.
 I hear you.                 [_Clash of arms_.
 
 HILARY.
             Dost thou hear those others?
 
 BECKET.
                                          Ay!
 
 ROGER OF YORK (_re-entering_).
 The King's 'God's eyes!' come now so thick and fast,
 We fear that he may reave thee of thine own.
 Come on, come on! it is not fit for us
 To see the proud Archbishop mutilated.
 Say that he blind thee and tear out thy tongue.
 
 BECKET.
 So be it. He begins at top with me:
 They crucified St. Peter downward.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
                                    Nay,
 But for their sake who stagger betwixt thine
 Appeal, and Henry's anger, yield.
 
 BECKET.
                                   Hence, Satan!
 
                                [_Exit_ ROGER OF YORK.
 
 FITZURSE (re-entering),
 My lord, the King demands three hundred marks,
 Due from his castles of Berkhamstead and Eye
 When thou thereof wast warden.
 
 BECKET.
                                Tell the King
 I spent thrice that in fortifying his castles.
 
 DE TRACY (_re-entering_.)
 My lord, the King demands seven hundred marks,
 Lent at the siege of Thoulouse by the King.
 
 BECKET.
 I led seven hundred knights and fought his wars.
 
 DE BRITO (_re-entering_).
 My lord, the King demands five hundred marks,
 Advanced thee at his instance by the Jews,
 For which the King was bound security.
 
 BECKET.
 I thought it was a gift; I thought it was a gift.
 
     _Enter Lord_ LEICESTER (_followed by_ BARONS _and_ BISHOPS).
 
 My lord, I come unwillingly. The King
 Demands a strict account of all those revenues
 From all the vacant sees and abbacies,
 Which came into thy hands when Chancellor.
 
 BECKET.
 How much might that amount to, my lord Leicester?
 
 LEICESTER.
 Some thirty--forty thousand silver marks.
 
 BECKET.
 Are these your customs? O my good lord Leicester,
 The King and I were brothers. All I had
 I lavish'd for the glory of the King;
 I shone from him, for him, his glory, his
 Reflection: now the glory of the Church
 Hath swallow'd up the glory of the King;
 I am his no more, but hers. Grant me one day
 To ponder these demands.
 
 LEICESTER.
                          Hear first thy sentence!
 The King and all his lords--
 
 BECKET.
                             Son, first hear _me_!
 
 LEICESTER.
 Nay, nay, canst thou, that holdest thine estates
 In fee and barony of the King, decline
 The judgment of the King?
 
 BECKET.
                           The King! I hold
 Nothing in fee and barony of the King.
 Whatever the Church owns--she holds it in
 Free and perpetual alms, unsubject to
 One earthly sceptre.
 
 LEICESTER.
                      Nay, but hear thy judgment.
 The King and all his barons--
 
 BECKET.
                              Judgment! Barons!
 Who but the bridegroom dares to judge the bride,
 Or he the bridegroom may appoint? Not he
 That is not of the house, but from the street
 Stain'd with the mire thereof.
                                I had been so true
 To Henry and mine office that the King
 Would throne me in the great Archbishoprick:
 And I, that knew mine own infirmity,
 For the King's pleasure rather than God's cause
 Took it upon me--err'd thro' love of him.
 Now therefore God from me withdraws Himself,
 And the King too.
                   What! forty thousand marks!
 Why thou, the King, the Pope, the Saints, the world,
 Know that when made Archbishop I was freed,
 Before the Prince and chief Justiciary,
 From every bond and debt and obligation
 Incurr'd as Chancellor.
                         Hear me, son.
                                       As gold
 Outvalues dross, light darkness, Abel Cain,
 The soul the body, and the Church the Throne,
 I charge thee, upon pain of mine anathema,
 That thou obey, not me, but God in me,
 Rather than Henry. I refuse to stand
 By the King's censure, make my cry to the Pope,
 By whom I will be judged; refer myself,
 The King, these customs, all the Church, to him,
 And under his authority--I depart.    [_Going_.
                        [LEICESTER _looks at him doubtingly_.
 Am I a prisoner?
 
 LEICESTER.
                  By St. Lazarus, no!
 I am confounded by thee. Go in peace.
 
 DE BROC.
 In peace now--but after. Take that for earnest.
                       [_Flings a bone at him from the rushes_.
 
 DE BRITO, FITZURSE, DE TRACY, _and others (flinging wisps of rushes)_.
 Ay, go in peace, caitiff, caitiff! And that too, perjured prelate--and
 that, turncoat shaveling! There, there, there! traitor, traitor,
 traitor!
 
 BECKET.
 Mannerless wolves!    [_Turning and facing them_.
 
 HERBERT.
                    Enough, my lord, enough!
 
 BECKET.
 Barons of England and of Normandy,
 When what ye shake at doth but seem to fly,
 True test of coward, ye follow with a yell.
 But I that threw the mightiest knight of France,
 Sir Engelram de Trie,--
 
 HERBERT.
                        Enough, my lord.
 
 BECKET.
 More than enough. I play the fool again.
 
     _Enter_ HERALD.
 
 HERALD.
 The King commands you, upon pain of death,
 That none should wrong or injure your Archbishop.
 
 FOLIOT.
 Deal gently with the young man Absalom.
 
     [_Great doors of the Hall at the back open, and
     discover a crowd. They shout_:
 
 Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord!
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.--_Refectory of the Monastery at Northampton.
 A Banquet on the Tables_.
 
 
     _Enter_ BECKET. BECKET'S RETAINERS.
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 Do thou speak first.
 
 2ND RETAINER.
 Nay, thou! Nay, thou! Hast not thou drawn the short straw?
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 My lord Archbishop, wilt thou permit us--
 
 BECKET.
 To speak without stammering and like a free man?
 Ay.
 
 1ST RETAINER.
     My lord, permit us then to leave thy service.
 
 BECKET.
 When?
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 Now.
 
 BECKET.
 To-night?
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 To-night, my lord.
 
 BECKET.
 And why?
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 My lord, we leave thee not without tears.
 
 BECKET.
 Tears? Why not stay with me then?
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 My lord, we cannot yield thee an answer altogether to thy
 satisfaction.
 
 BECKET.
 I warrant you, or your own either. Shall I find
 you one? The King hath frowned upon me.
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 That is not altogether our answer, my lord.
 
 BECKET.
 No; yet all but all. Go, go! Ye have eaten of my dish and drunken of
 my cup for a dozen years.
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 And so we have. We mean thee no wrong. Wilt thou not say, 'God bless
 you,' ere we go?
 
 BECKET.
 God bless you all! God redden your pale blood! But mine is human-red;
 and when ye shall hear it is poured out upon earth, and see it
 mounting to Heaven, my God bless you, that seems sweet to you now,
 will blast and blind you like a curse.
 
 1ST RETAINER.
 We hope not, my lord. Our humblest thanks for
 your blessing. Farewell!
                             [_Exeunt_ RETAINERS.
 
 BECKET.
 Farewell, friends! farewell, swallows! I wrong the bird; she leaves
 only the nest she built, they leave the builder. Why? Am I to be
 murdered to-night?
 
                           [_Knocking at the door_.
 
 ATTENDANT.
 Here is a missive left at the gate by one from the castle.
 
 BECKET.
 Cornwall's hand or Leicester's: they write marvellously alike.
                                                      [_Reading_.
 'Fly at once to France, to King Louis of France: there be those about
 our King who would have thy blood.' Was not my lord of Leicester
 bidden to our supper?
 
 ATTENDANT.
 Ay, my lord, and divers other earls and barons. But the hour is past,
 and our brother, Master Cook, he makes moan that all be a-getting
 cold.
 
 BECKET.
 And I make my moan along with him. Cold after warm, winter after
 summer, and the golden leaves, these earls and barons, that clung to
 me, frosted off me by the first cold frown of the King. Cold, but look
 how the table steams, like a heathen altar; nay, like the altar at
 Jerusalem. Shall God's good gifts be wasted? None of them here! Call
 in the poor from the streets, and let them feast.
 
 HERBERT.
 That is the parable of our blessed Lord.
 
 BECKET.
 And why should not the parable of our blessed Lord be acted again?
 Call in the poor! The Church is ever at variance with the kings, and
 ever at one with the poor. I marked a group of lazars in the
 marketplace--half-rag, half-sore--beggars, poor rogues (Heaven bless
 'em) who never saw nor dreamed of such a banquet. I will amaze them.
 Call them in, I say. They shall henceforward be my earls and barons--
 our lords and masters in Christ Jesus.
 
                                      [_Exit_ HERBERT.
 
 If the King hold his purpose, I am myself a beggar. Forty thousand
 marks! forty thousand devils--and these craven bishops!
 
 _A_ POOR MAN _(entering) with his dog_.
 My lord Archbishop, may I come in with my poor friend, my dog? The
 King's verdurer caught him a-hunting in the forest, and cut off his
 paws. The dog followed his calling, my lord. I ha' carried him ever so
 many miles in my arms, and he licks my face and moans and cries out
 against the King.
 
 BECKET.
 Better thy dog than thee. The King's courts would use thee worse than
 thy dog--they are too bloody. Were the Church king, it would be
 otherwise. Poor beast! poor beast! set him down. I will bind up his
 wounds with my napkin. Give him a bone, give him a bone! Who misuses a
 dog would misuse a child--they cannot speak for themselves. Past help!
 his paws are past help. God help him!
 
     _Enter the_ BEGGARS _(and seat themselves at the Tables)_.
     BECKET _and_ HERBERT _wait upon them_.
 
 1ST BEGGAR.
 Swine, sheep, ox--here's a French supper. When thieves fall out,
 honest men----
 
 2ND BEGGAR.
 Is the Archbishop a thief who gives thee thy supper?
 
 1ST BEGGAR.
 Well, then, how does it go? When honest men fall out, thieves--no, it
 can't be that.
 
 2ND BEGGAR.
 Who stole the widow's one sitting hen o' Sunday, when she was at mass?
 
 1ST BEGGAR.
 Come, come! thou hadst thy share on her. Sitting hen! Our Lord
 Becket's our great sitting-hen cock, and we shouldn't ha' been sitting
 here if the barons and bishops hadn't been a-sitting on the
 Archbishop.
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, the princes sat in judgment against me, and the Lord hath prepared
 your table--_Sederunt principes, ederunt pauperes_.
 
 _A Voice_.
 Becket, beware of the knife!
 
 BECKET.
 Who spoke?
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Nobody, my lord. What's that, my lord?
 
 BECKET.
 Venison.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Venison?
 
 BECKET.
 Buck; deer, as you call it.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 King's meat! By the Lord, won't we pray for your lordship!
 
 BECKET.
 And, my children, your prayers will do more for me in the day of peril
 that dawns darkly and drearily over the house of God--yea, and in the
 day of judgment also, than the swords of the craven sycophants would
 have done had they remained true to me whose bread they have partaken.
 I must leave you to your banquet. Feed, feast, and be merry. Herbert,
 for the sake of the Church itself, if not for my own, I must fly to
 France to-night. Come with me.
                                         [_Exit with_ HERBERT.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Here--all of you--my lord's health (_they drink_). Well--if that isn't
 goodly wine--
 
 1ST BEGGAR.
 Then there isn't a goodly wench to serve him with it: they were
 fighting for her to-day in the street.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Peace!
 
 1ST BEGGAR.
 
     The black sheep baaed to the miller's ewe-lamb,
       The miller's away for to-night.
     Black sheep, quoth she, too black a sin for me.
     And what said the black sheep, my masters?
       We can make a black sin white.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Peace!
 
 1ST BEGGAR.
 
     'Ewe lamb, ewe lamb, I am here by the dam.'
       But the miller came home that night,
     And so dusted his back with the meal in his sack,
       That he made the black sheep white.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Be we not of the family? be we not a-supping with the head of the
 family? be we not in my lord's own refractory? Out from among us; thou
 art our black sheep.
 
     _Enter the four_ KNIGHTS.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Sheep, said he? And sheep without the shepherd, too. Where is my lord
 Archbishop? Thou the lustiest and lousiest of this Cain's brotherhood,
 answer.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 With Cain's answer, my lord. Am I his keeper? Thou shouldst call him
 Cain, not me.
 
 FITZURSE.
 So I do, for he would murder his brother the State.
 
 3RD BEGGAR (_rising and advancing_).
 No my lord; but because the Lord hath set his mark upon him that no
 man should murder him.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Where is he? where is he?
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 With Cain belike, in the land of Nod, or in the land of France for
 aught I know.
 
 FITZURSE.
 France! Ha! De Morville, Tracy, Brito--fled is he? Cross swords all of
 you! swear to follow him! Remember the Queen!
 
                    [_The four_ KNIGHTS _cross their swords_.
 
 DE BRITO.
 They mock us; he is here.
 
             [_All the_ BEGGARS _rise and advance upon them_.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Come, you filthy knaves, let us pass.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Nay, my lord, let _us_ pass. We be a-going home
 after our supper in all humbleness, my lord; for the
 Archbishop loves humbleness, my lord; and though
 we be fifty to four, we daren't fight you with our
 crutches, my lord. There now, if thou hast not laid
 hands upon me! and my fellows know that I am all
 one scale like a fish. I pray God I haven't given thee
 my leprosy, my lord.
 
     [FITZURSE _shrinks from him and another presses upon_ DE BRITO.
 
 DE BRITO.
 Away, dog!
 
 4TH BEGGAR.
 And I was bit by a mad dog o' Friday, an' I be half dog already by
 this token, that tho' I can drink wine I cannot bide water, my lord;
 and I want to bite, I want to bite, and they do say the very breath
 catches.
 
 DE BRITO.
 Insolent clown. Shall I smite him with the edge of the sword?
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 No, nor with the flat of it either. Smite the shepherd and the sheep
 are scattered. Smite the sheep and the shepherd will excommunicate
 thee.
 
 DE BRITO.
 Yet my fingers itch to beat him into nothing.
 
 5TH BEGGAR.
 So do mine, my lord. I was born with it, and sulphur won't bring it
 out o' me. But for all that the Archbishop washed my feet o' Tuesday.
 He likes it, my lord.
 
 6TH BEGGAR.
 And see here, my lord, this rag fro' the gangrene i' my leg. It's
 humbling--it smells o' human natur'. Wilt thou smell it, my lord? for
 the Archbishop likes the smell on it, my lord; for I be his lord and
 master i' Christ, my lord.
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 Faugh! we shall all be poisoned. Let us go.
 
                     [_They draw back,_ BEGGARS _following_.
 
 7TH BEGGAR.
 My lord, I ha' three sisters a-dying at home o' the sweating sickness.
 They be dead while I be a-supping.
 
 8TH BEGGAR.
 And I ha' nine darters i' the spital that be dead ten times o'er i'
 one day wi' the putrid fever; and I bring the taint on it along wi'
 me, for the Archbishop likes it, my lord.
 
     [_Pressing upon the_ KNIGHTS _till they disappear thro' the door_.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 Crutches, and itches, and leprosies, and ulcers, and gangrenes, and
 running sores, praise ye the Lord, for to-night ye have saved our
 Archbishop!
 
 1ST BEGGAR.
 I'll go back again. I hain't half done yet.
 
 HERBERT OF BOSHAM (_entering_).
 My friends, the Archbishop bids you good-night. He hath retired to
 rest, and being in great jeopardy of his life, he hath made his bed
 between the altars, from whence he sends me to bid you this night pray
 for him who hath fed you in the wilderness.
 
 3RD BEGGAR.
 So we will--so we will, I warrant thee. Becket shall be king, and the
 Holy Father shall be king, and the world shall live by the King's
 venison and the bread o' the Lord, and there shall be no more poor for
 ever. Hurrah! Vive le Roy! That's the English of it.
 
 
 
 
 ACT II.
 
 
 SCENE I.--ROSAMUND'S _Bower. A Garden of Flowers. In the midst a bank
 of wild-flowers with a bench before it_.
 
 
 _Voices heard singing among the trees_.
 
 _Duet_.
 
 1. Is it the wind of the dawn that I hear in the pine overhead?
 
 2. No; but the voice of the deep as it hollows the cliffs of the land.
 
 1. Is there a voice coming up with the voice of the deep from the
 strand,
 One coming up with a song in the flush of the glimmering red?
 
 2. Love that is born of the deep coming up with the sun from the sea.
 
 1. Love that can shape or can shatter a life till the life shall have
 fled?
 
 2. Nay, let us welcome him, Love that can lift up a life from the
 dead.
 
 1. Keep him away from the lone little isle. Let us be, let us be.
 
 2. Nay, let him make it his own, let him reign in it--he, it is he,
 Love that is born of the deep coming up with the sun from the sea.
 
     _Enter_ HENRY _and_ ROSAMUND.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Be friends with him again--I do beseech thee.
 
 HENRY.
 With Becket? I have but one hour with thee--
 Sceptre and crozier clashing, and the mitre
 Grappling the crown--and when I flee from this
 For a gasp of freer air, a breathing-while
 To rest upon thy bosom and forget him--
 Why thou, my bird, thou pipest Becket, Becket--
 Yea, thou my golden dream of Love's own bower,
 Must be the nightmare breaking on my peace
 With 'Becket.'
 
 ROSAMUND.
                O my life's life, not to smile
 Is all but death to me. My sun, no cloud!
 Let there not be one frown in this one hour.
 Out of the many thine, let this be mine!
 Look rather thou all-royal as when first
 I met thee.
 
 HENRY.
             Where was that?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                             Forgetting that
 Forgets me too.
 
 HENRY.
                 Nay, I remember it well.
 There on the moors.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                     And in a narrow path.
 A plover flew before thee. Then I saw
 Thy high black steed among the flaming furze,
 Like sudden night in the main glare of day.
 And from that height something was said to me
 I knew not what.
 
 HENRY.
                  I ask'd the way.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                   I think so.
 So I lost mine.
 
 HENRY.
                 Thou wast too shamed to answer.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Too scared--so young!
 
 HENRY.
                       The rosebud of my rose!--
 Well, well, no more of _him_--I have sent his folk,
 His kin, all his belongings, overseas;
 Age, orphans, and babe-breasting mothers--all
 By hundreds to him--there to beg, starve, die--
 So that the fool King Louis feed them not.
 The man shall feel that I can strike him yet.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Babes, orphans, mothers! is that royal, Sire?
 
 HENRY.
 And I have been as royal with the Church.
 He shelter'd in the Abbey of Pontigny.
 There wore his time studying the canon law
 To work it against me. But since he cursed
 My friends at Veselay, I have let them know,
 That if they keep him longer as their guest,
 I scatter all their cowls to all the hells.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 And is that altogether royal?
 
 HENRY.
                               Traitress!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 A faithful traitress to thy royal fame.
 
 HENRY.
 Fame! what care I for fame? Spite, ignorance, envy,
 Yea, honesty too, paint her what way they will.
 Fame of to-day is infamy to-morrow;
 Infamy of to-day is fame to-morrow;
 And round and round again. What matters? Royal--I
 mean to leave the royalty of my crown
 Unlessen'd to mine heirs.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                           Still--thy fame too:
 I say that should be royal.
 
 HENRY.
                             And I say,
 I care not for thy saying.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                            And I say,
 I care not for _thy_ saying. A greater King
 Than thou art, Love, who cares not for the word,
 Makes 'care not'--care. There have I spoken true?
 
 HENRY.
 Care dwell with me for ever, when I cease
 To care for thee as ever!
 
 ROSAMUND.
                           No need! no need!...
 There is a bench. Come, wilt thou sit?... My bank
 Of wild-flowers [_he sits_]. At thy feet!
                               [She sits at his feet.
 
 HENRY.
                                           I had them clear
 A royal pleasaunce for thee, in the wood,
 Not leave these countryfolk at court.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                       I brought them
 In from the wood, and set them here. I love them
 More than the garden flowers, that seem at most
 Sweet guests, or foreign cousins, not half speaking
 The language of the land. I love _them_ too,
 Yes. But, my liege, I am sure, of all the roses--
 Shame fall on those who gave it a dog's name--
 This wild one (_picking a briar-rose_)--nay, I shall not prick myself--
 Is sweetest. Do but smell!
 
 HENRY.
                            Thou rose of the world!
 Thou rose of all the roses!
     [Muttering.
 I am not worthy of her--this beast-body
 That God has plunged my soul in--I, that taking
 The Fiend's advantage of a throne, so long
 Have wander'd among women,--a foul stream
 Thro' fever-breeding levels,--at her side,
 Among these happy dales, run clearer, drop
 The mud I carried, like yon brook, and glass
 The faithful face of heaven--
                        [Looking at her, and unconsciously aloud,
                              --thine! thine!
 
 ROSAMUND.
                              I know it.
 
 HENRY (_muttering_).
 Not hers. We have but one bond, her hate of Becket.
 
 ROSAMUND (half hearing).
 Nay! nay! what art thou muttering? _I_ hate Becket?
 
 HENRY (_muttering_).
 A sane and natural loathing for a soul
 Purer, and truer and nobler than herself;
 And mine a bitterer illegitimate hate,
 A bastard hate born of a former love.
 
 ROSAMUND,
 My fault to name him! O let the hand of one
 To whom thy voice is all her music, stay it
 But for a breath.
            [_Puts her hand before his lips_.
                   Speak only of thy love.
 Why there--like some loud beggar at thy gate--
 The happy boldness of this hand hath won it
 Love's alms, thy kiss (_looking at her hand_)--Sacred!
 I'll kiss it too.    [_Kissing it_.
 There! wherefore dost thou so peruse it? Nay,
 There may be crosses in my line of life.
 
 HENRY.
 Not half _her_ hand--no hand to mate with _her_,
 If it should come to that.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                        With her? with whom?
 
 HENRY.
 Life on the hand is naked gipsy-stuff;
 Life on the face, the brows-clear innocence!
 Vein'd marble--not a furrow yet--and hers
     [_Muttering_.
 Crost and recrost, a venomous spider's web--
 
 ROSAMUND (_springing up_).
 Out of the cloud, my Sun--out of the eclipse
 Narrowing my golden hour!
 
 HENRY.
                           O Rosamund,
 I would be true--would tell thee all--and something
 I had to say--I love thee none the less--
 Which will so vex thee.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                         Something against _me_?
 
 HENRY.
 No, no, against myself.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                         I will not hear it.
 Come, come, mine hour! I bargain for mine hour.
 I'll call thee little Geoffrey.
 
 HENRY.
                                 Call him!
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                           Geoffrey!
     [_Enter_ GEOFFREY.
 
 HENRY.
 How the boy grows!
 
 ROSAMUND.
                    Ay, and his brows are thine;
 The mouth is only Clifford, my dear father.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 My liege, what hast thou brought me?
 
 HENRY.
                                      Venal imp!
 What say'st thou to the Chancellorship of England?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 O yes, my liege.
 
 HENRY.
                  'O yes, my liege!' He speaks
 As if it were a cake of gingerbread.
 Dost thou know, my boy, what it is to be Chancellor of England?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 Something good, or thou wouldst not give it me.
 
 HENRY.
 It is, my boy, to side with the King when Chancellor, and then to be
 made Archbishop and go against the King who made him, and turn the
 world upside down.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 I won't have it then. Nay, but give it me, and I promise thee not to
 turn the world upside down.
 
 HENRY (_giving him a ball_).
 Here is a ball, my boy, thy world, to turn anyway and play with as
 thou wilt--which is more than I can do with mine. Go try it, play.
                                        [_Exit_ GEOFFREY.
 A pretty lusty boy.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                     So like to thee;
 Like to be liker.
 
 HENRY.
                   Not in my chin, I hope!
 That threatens double.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                        Thou art manlike perfect.
 
 HENRY.
 Ay, ay, no doubt; and were I humpt behind,
 Thou'dst say as much--the goodly way of women
 Who love, for which I love them. May God grant
 No ill befall or him or thee when I
 Am gone.
 
 ROSAMUND.
          Is _he_ thy enemy?
 
 HENRY.
                             He? who? ay!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Thine enemy knows the secret of my bower.
 
 HENRY.
 And I could tear him asunder with wild horses
 Before he would betray it. Nay--no fear!
 More like is he to excommunicate me.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 And I would creep, crawl over knife-edge flint
 Barefoot, a hundred leagues, to stay his hand
 Before he flash'd the bolt.
 
 HENRY.
                             And when he flash'd it
 Shrink from me, like a daughter of the Church.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Ay, but he will not.
 
 HENRY.
                      Ay! but if he did?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 O then! O then! I almost fear to say
 That my poor heretic heart would excommunicate
 His excommunication, clinging to thee
 Closer than ever.
 
 HENRY (_raising_ ROSAMUND _and kissing her_).
                   My brave-hearted Rose!
 Hath he ever been to see thee?
 
 ROSAMUND
                                Here? not he.
 And it is so lonely here--no confessor.
 
 HENRY.
 Thou shall confess all thy sweet sins to me.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Besides, we came away in such a heat,
 I brought not ev'n my crucifix.
 
 HENRY.
                                 Take this.
 
       [_Giving her the Crucifix which_ ELEANOR _gave him_.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 O beautiful! May I have it as mine, till mine
 Be mine again?
 
 HENRY (_throwing it round her neck_).
                Thine--as I am--till death!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Death? no! I'll have it with me in my shroud,
 And wake with it, and show it to all the Saints.
 
 HENRY.
 Nay--I must go; but when thou layest thy lip
 To this, remembering One who died for thee,
 Remember also one who lives for thee
 Out there in France; for I must hence to brave
 The Pope, King Louis, and this turbulent priest.
 
 ROSAMUND (_kneeling_).
 O by thy love for me, all mine for thee,
 Fling not thy soul into the flames of hell:
 I kneel to thee--be friends with him again.
 
 HENRY.
 Look, look! if little Geoffrey have not tost
 His ball into the brook! makes after it too
 To find it. Why, the child will drown himself.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Geoffrey! Geoffrey!
 
                        [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--_Montmirail. 'The Meeting of the Kings.'_
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD _and_ HENRY. _Crowd in the distance_.
 
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 You have not crown'd young Henry yet, my liege?
 
 HENRY.
 Crown'd! by God's eyes, we will not have him crown'd.
 I spoke of late to the boy, he answer'd me,
 As if he wore the crown already--No,
 We will not have him crown'd.
 'Tis true what Becket told me, that the mother
 Would make him play his kingship against mine.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 Not have him crown'd?
 
 HENRY.
 Not now--not yet! and Becket
 Becket should crown him were he crown'd at all:
 But, since we would be lord of our own manor,
 This Canterbury, like a wounded deer,
 Has fled our presence and our feeding-grounds.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 Cannot a smooth tongue lick him whole again
 To serve your will?
 
 HENRY.
                     He hates my will, not me.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 There's York, my liege.
 
 HENRY.
                         But England scarce would hold
 Young Henry king, if only crown'd by York,
 And that would stilt up York to twice himself.
 There is a movement yonder in the crowd--
 See if our pious--what shall I call him, John?--
 Husband-in-law, our smooth-shorn suzerain,
 Be yet within the field.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
                          I will.    [_Exit_.
 
 HENRY.
                                  Ay! Ay!
 Mince and go back! his politic Holiness
 Hath all but climb'd the Roman perch again,
 And we shall hear him presently with clapt wing
 Crow over Barbarossa--at last tongue-free
 To blast my realms with excommunication
 And interdict. I must patch up a peace--
 A piece in this long-tugged at, threadbare-worn
 Quarrel of Crown and Church--to rend again.
 His Holiness cannot steer straight thro' shoals,
 Nor I. The citizen's heir hath conquer'd me
 For the moment. So we make our peace with him.
     [Enter_ Louis.
 Brother of France, what shall be done with Becket?
 
 LOUIS.
 The holy Thomas! Brother, you have traffick'd
 Between the Emperor and the Pope, between
 The Pope and Antipope--a perilous game
 For men to play with God.
 
 HENRY.
                           Ay, ay, good brother,
 They call you the Monk-King.
 
 LOUIS.
                              Who calls me? she
 That was my wife, now yours? You have her Duchy,
 The point you aim'd at, and pray God she prove
 True wife to you. You have had the better of us
 In secular matters.
 
 HENRY.
                     Come, confess, good brother,
 You did your best or worst to keep her Duchy.
 Only the golden Leopard printed in it
 Such hold-fast claws that you perforce again
 Shrank into France. Tut, tut! did we convene
 This conference but to babble of our wives?
 They are plagues enough in-door.
 
 LOUIS.
                                  We fought in the East,
 And felt the sun of Antioch scald our mail,
 And push'd our lances into Saracen hearts.
 We never hounded on the State at home
 To spoil the Church.
 
 HENRY.
                      How should you see this rightly?
 
 LOUIS.
 Well, well, no more! I am proud of my 'Monk-King,'
 Whoever named me; and, brother, Holy Church
 May rock, but will not wreck, nor our Archbishop
 Stagger on the slope decks for any rough sea
 Blown by the breath of kings. We do forgive you
 For aught you wrought against us.
                              [HENRY _holds up his hand_.
                                   Nay, I pray you,
 Do not defend yourself. You will do much
 To rake out all old dying heats, if you,
 At my requesting, will but look into
 The wrongs you did him, and restore his kin,
 Reseat him on his throne of Canterbury,
 Be, both, the friends you were.
 
 HENRY.
                                 The friends we were!
 Co-mates we were, and had our sport together,
 Co-kings we were, and made the laws together.
 The world had never seen the like before.
 You are too cold to know the fashion of it.
 Well, well, we will be gentle with him, gracious--
 Most gracious.
 
     _Enter_ BECKET, _after him,_ JOHN OF OXFORD, ROGER
     OF YORK, GILBERT FOLIOT, DE BROC, FITZURSE, _etc_.
 
                Only that the rift he made
 May close between us, here I am wholly king,
 The word should come from him.
 
 BECKET (_kneeling_).
                                Then, my dear liege,
 I here deliver all this controversy
 Into your royal hands.
 
 HENRY.
                        Ah, Thomas, Thomas,
 Thou art thyself again, Thomas again.
 
 BECKET (_rising_).
 Saving God's honour!
 
 HENRY.
                      Out upon thee, man!
 Saving the Devil's honour, his yes and no.
 Knights, bishops, earls, this London spawn--by Mahound,
 I had sooner have been born a Mussulman--
 Less clashing with their priests--
 I am half-way down the slope--will no man stay me?
 I dash myself to pieces--I stay myself--
 Puff--it is gone. You, Master Becket, you
 That owe to me your power over me--
 Nay, nay--
 Brother of France, you have taken, cherish'd him
 Who thief-like fled from his own church by night,
 No man pursuing. I would have had him back.
 Take heed he do not turn and rend you too:
 For whatsoever may displease him--that
 Is clean against God's honour--a shift, a trick
 Whereby to challenge, face me out of all
 My regal rights. Yet, yet--that none may dream
 I go against God's honour--ay, or himself
 In any reason, choose
 A hundred of the wisest heads from England,
 A hundred, too, from Normandy and Anjou:
 Let these decide on what was customary
 In olden days, and all the Church of France
 Decide on their decision, I am content
 More, what the mightiest and the holiest
 Of all his predecessors may have done
 Ev'n to the least and meanest of my own,
 Let him do the same to me--I am content.
 
 LOUIS.
 Ay, ay! the King humbles himself enough.
 
 BECKET.
 (_Aside_) Words! he will wriggle out of them like an eel
 When the time serves. (_Aloud_.) My lieges and my lords,
 The thanks of Holy Church are due to those
 That went before us for their work, which we
 Inheriting reap an easier harvest. Yet--
 
 LOUIS.
 My lord, will you be greater than the Saints,
 More than St. Peter? whom--what is it you doubt?
 Behold your peace at hand.
 
 BECKET.
                            I say that those
 Who went before us did not wholly clear
 The deadly growths of earth, which Hell's own heat
 So dwelt on that they rose and darken'd Heaven.
 Yet they did much. Would God they had torn up all
 By the hard root, which shoots again; our trial
 Had so been less; but, seeing they were men
 Defective or excessive, must we follow
 All that they overdid or underdid?
 Nay, if they were defective as St. Peter
 Denying Christ, who yet defied the tyrant,
 We hold by his defiance, not his defect.
 O good son Louis, do not counsel me,
 No, to suppress God's honour for the sake
 Of any king that breathes. No, God forbid!
 
 HENRY.
 No! God forbid! and turn me Mussulman!
 No God but one, and Mahound is his prophet.
 But for your Christian, look you, you shall have
 None other God but me--me, Thomas, son
 Of Gilbert Becket, London merchant. Out!
       I hear no more.                     [_Exit_.
 
 LOUIS.
                       Our brother's anger puts him,
 Poor man, beside himself--not wise. My lord,
 We have claspt your cause, believing that our brother
 Had wrong'd you; but this day he proffer'd peace.
 You will have war; and tho' we grant the Church
 King over this world's kings, yet, my good lord,
 We that are kings are something in this world,
 And so we pray you, draw yourself from under
 The wings of France. We shelter you no more.
                                               [_Exit_.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
 I am glad that France hath scouted him at last:
 I told the Pope what manner of man he was.
                                        [_Exit_.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
 Yea, since he flouts the will of either realm,
 Let either cast him away like a dead dog!
                                        [_Exit_.
 
 FOLIOT.
 Yea, let a stranger spoil his heritage,
 And let another take his bishoprick!
                                        [_Exit_.
 
 DE BROC.
 Our castle, my lord, belongs to Canterbury.
 I pray you come and take it.           [_Exit_.
 
 FITZURSE.
                              When you will.
                                        [_Exit_.
 
 BECKET.
 Cursed be John of Oxford, Roger of York,
 And Gilbert Foliot! cursed those De Brocs
 That hold our Saltwood Castle from our see!
 Cursed Fitzurse, and all the rest of them
 That sow this hate between my lord and me!
 
 _Voices from the Crowd_.
 Blessed be the Lord Archbishop, who hath withstood two Kings to their
 faces for the honour of God.
 
 BECKET.
 Out of the mouths of babes and sucklings, praise!
 I thank you, sons; when kings but hold by crowns,
 The crowd that hungers for a crown in Heaven
 Is my true king.
 
 HERBERT.
                  Thy true King bad thee be
 A fisher of men; thou hast them in thy net.
 
 BECKET.
 I am too like the King here; both of us
 Too headlong for our office. Better have been
 A fisherman at Bosham, my good Herbert,
 Thy birthplace--the sea-creek--the petty rill
 That falls into it--the green field--the gray church--
 The simple lobster-basket, and the mesh--
 The more or less of daily labour done--
 The pretty gaping bills in the home-nest
 Piping for bread--the daily want supplied--
 The daily pleasure to supply it.
 
 HERBERT.
                                  Ah, Thomas,
 You had not borne it, no, not for a day.
 
 BECKET.
 Well, maybe, no.
 
 HERBERT.
                  But bear with Walter Map,
 For here he comes to comment on the time.
 
     _Enter_ WALTER MAP.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 Pity, my lord, that you have quenched the warmth of France toward you,
 tho' His Holiness, after much smouldering and smoking, be kindled
 again upon your quarter.
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, if he do not end in smoke again.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 My lord, the fire, when first kindled, said to the smoke, 'Go up, my
 son, straight to Heaven.' And the smoke said, 'I go;' but anon the
 North-east took and turned him South-west, then the South-west turned
 him North-east, and so of the other winds; but it was in him to go up
 straight if the time had been quieter. Your lordship affects the
 unwavering perpendicular; but His Holiness, pushed one way by the
 Empire and another by England, if he move at all, Heaven stay him, is
 fain to diagonalise.
 
 HERBERT.
 Diagonalise! thou art a word-monger!
 Our Thomas never will diagonalise.
 Thou art a jester and a verse-maker.
 Diagonalise!
 
 WALTER MAP.
 Is the world any the worse for my verses if the Latin rhymes be rolled
 out from a full mouth? or any harm done to the people if my jest be in
 defence of the Truth?
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, if the jest be so done that the people
 Delight to wallow in the grossness of it,
 Till Truth herself be shamed of her defender.
 _Non defensoribus istis_, Walter Map.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 Is that my case? so if the city be sick, and I cannot call the kennel
 sweet, your lordship would suspend me from verse-writing, as you
 suspended yourself after subwriting to the customs.
 
 BECKET.
 I pray God pardon mine infirmity.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 Nay, my lord, take heart; for tho' you suspended yourself, the Pope
 let you down again; and tho' you suspend Foliot or another, the Pope
 will not leave them in suspense, for the Pope himself is always in
 suspense, like Mahound's coffin hung between heaven and earth--always
 in suspense, like the scales, till the weight of Germany or the gold
 of England brings one of them down to the dust--always in suspense,
 like the tail of the horologe--to and fro--tick-tack--we make the
 time, we keep the time, ay, and we serve the time; for I have heard
 say that if you boxed the Pope's ears with a purse, you might stagger
 him, but he would pocket the purse. No saying of mine--Jocelyn of
 Salisbury. But the King hath bought half the College of Red-hats. He
 warmed to you to-day, and you have chilled him again. Yet you both
 love God. Agree with him quickly again, even for the sake of the
 Church. My one grain of good counsel which you will not swallow. I
 hate a split between old friendships as I hate the dirty gap in the
 face of a Cistercian monk, that will swallow anything. Farewell.
 
                                       [_Exit_.
 
 BECKET.
 Map scoffs at Rome. I all but hold with Map.
 Save for myself no Rome were left in England,
 All had been his. Why should this Rome, this Rome,
 Still choose Barabbas rather than the Christ,
 Absolve the left-hand thief and damn the right?
 Take fees of tyranny, wink at sacrilege,
 Which even Peter had not dared? condemn
 The blameless exile?--
 
 HERBERT.
                       Thee, thou holy Thomas!
 I would that thou hadst been the Holy Father.
 
 BECKET.
 I would have done my most to keep Rome holy,
 I would have made Rome know she still is Rome--
 Who stands aghast at her eternal self
 And shakes at mortal kings--her vacillation,
 Avarice, craft--O God, how many an innocent
 Has left his bones upon the way to Rome
 Unwept, uncared for. Yea--on mine own self
 The King had had no power except for Rome.
 'Tis not the King who is guilty of mine exile,
 But Rome, Rome, Rome!
 
 HERBERT.
                       My lord, I see this Louis
 Returning, ah! to drive thee from his realm.
 
 BECKET.
 He said as much before. Thou art no prophet,
 Nor yet a prophet's son.
 
 HERBERT.
                          Whatever he say,
 Deny not thou God's honour for a king.
 The King looks troubled.
 
     _Re-enter_ KING LOUIS.
 
 LOUIS.
                          My dear lord Archbishop,
 I learn but now that those poor Poitevins,
 That in thy cause were stirr'd against King Henry,
 Have been, despite his kingly promise given
 To our own self of pardon, evilly used
 And put to pain. I have lost all trust in him.
 The Church alone hath eyes--and now I see
 That I was blind--suffer the phrase--surrendering
 God's honour to the pleasure of a man.
 Forgive me and absolve me, holy father.    [_Kneels_.
 
 BECKET.
 Son, I absolve thee in the name of God.
 
 LOUIS (_rising_).
 Return to Sens, where we will care for you.
 The wine and wealth of all our France are yours;
 Rest in our realm, and be at peace with all.
                                          [_Exeunt_.
 
 _Voices from the Crowd_.
 Long live the good King Louis! God bless the great Archbishop!
 
     _Re-enter_ HENRY _and_ JOHN OF OXFORD.
 
 HENRY (_looking after_ KING LOUIS _and_ BECKET).
 Ay, there they go--both backs are turn'd to me--
 Why then I strike into my former path
 For England, crown young Henry there, and make
 Our waning Eleanor all but love me!
                                     John,
 Thou hast served me heretofore with Rome--and well.
 They call thee John the Swearer.
 
 JOHN OF OXFORD.
                                  For this reason,
 That, being ever duteous to the King,
 I evermore have sworn upon his side,
 And ever mean to do it.
 
 HENRY (_claps him on the shoulder_).
                         Honest John!
 To Rome again! the storm begins again.
 Spare not thy tongue! be lavish with our coins,
 Threaten our junction with the Emperor--flatter
 And fright the Pope--bribe all the Cardinals--leave
 Lateran and Vatican in one dust of gold--
 Swear and unswear, state and misstate thy best!
 I go to have young Henry crown'd by York.
 
 
 
 
 ACT III.
 
 
 SCENE I.--_The Bower_. HENRY _and_ ROSAMUND.
 
 
 HENRY.
 All that you say is just. I cannot answer it
 Till better times, when I shall put away--
 
 ROSAMUND.
 What will you put away?
 
 HENRY.
                         That which you ask me
 Till better times. Let it content you now
 There is no woman that I love so well.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 No woman but should be content with that--
 
 HENRY.
 And one fair child to fondle!
 
 ROSAMUND.
                               O yes, the child
 We waited for so long--heaven's gift at last--
 And how you doated on him then! To-day
 I almost fear'd your kiss was colder--yes--
 But then the child _is_ such a child. What chance
 That he should ever spread into the man
 Here in our silence? I have done my best.
 I am not learn'd.
 
 HENRY.
                   I am the King, his father,
 And I will look to it. Is our secret ours?
 Have you had any alarm? no stranger?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                      No.
 The warder of the bower hath given himself
 Of late to wine. I sometimes think he sleeps
 When he should watch; and yet what fear? the people
 Believe the wood enchanted. No one comes,
 Nor foe nor friend; his fond excess of wine
 Springs from the loneliness of my poor bower,
 Which weighs even on me.
 
 HENRY.
                          Yet these tree-towers,
 Their long bird-echoing minster-aisles,--the voice
 Of the perpetual brook, these golden slopes
 Of Solomon-shaming flowers--that was your saying,
 All pleased you so at first.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                              Not now so much.
 My Anjou bower was scarce as beautiful.
 But you were oftener there. I have none but you.
 The brook's voice is not yours, and no flower, not
 The sun himself, should he be changed to one,
 Could shine away the darkness of that gap
 Left by the lack of love.
 
 HENRY.
                           The lack of love!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Of one we love. Nay, I would not be bold,
 Yet hoped ere this you might--
                         [_Looks earnestly at him_.
 
 HENRY.
                               Anything further?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Only my best bower-maiden died of late,
 And that old priest whom John of Salisbury trusted
 Hath sent another.
 
 HENRY.
                    Secret?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                            I but ask'd her
 One question, and she primm'd her mouth and put
 Her hands together--thus--and said, God help her,
 That she was sworn to silence.
 
 HENRY.
                                What did you ask her?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Some daily something--nothing.
 
 HENRY.
                               Secret, then?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 I do not love her. Must you go, my liege,
 So suddenly?
 
 HENRY.
              I came to England suddenly,
 And on a great occasion sure to wake
 As great a wrath in Becket--
 
 ROSAMUND.
                             Always Becket!
 He always comes between us.
 
 HENRY.
                            --And to meet it
 I needs must leave as suddenly. It is raining,
 Put on your hood and see me to the bounds.
 
                                      [_Exeunt_
 
 MARGERY (_singing behind scene_).
 
     Babble in bower
       Under the rose!
     Bee mustn't buzz,
       Whoop--but he knows.
     Kiss me, little one,
       Nobody near!
     Grasshopper, grasshopper,
       Whoop--you can hear.
     Kiss in the bower,
       Tit on the tree!
     Bird mustn't tell,
       Whoop--he can see.
 
         _Enter_ MARGERY.
 
 I ha' been but a week here and I ha' seen what I ha' seen, for to be
 sure it's no more than a week since our old Father Philip that has
 confessed our mother for twenty years, and she was hard put to it, and
 to speak truth, nigh at the end of our last crust, and that mouldy,
 and she cried out on him to put me forth in the world and to make me a
 woman of the world, and to win my own bread, whereupon he asked our
 mother if I could keep a quiet tongue i' my head, and not speak till I
 was spoke to, and I answered for myself that I never spoke more than
 was needed, and he told me he would advance me to the service of a
 great lady, and took me ever so far away, and gave me a great pat o'
 the cheek for a pretty wench, and said it was a pity to blindfold such
 eyes as mine, and such to be sure they be, but he blinded 'em for all
 that, and so brought me no-hows as I may say, and the more shame to
 him after his promise, into a garden and not into the world, and bad
 me whatever I saw not to speak one word, an' it 'ud be well for me in
 the end, for there were great ones who would look after me, and to be
 sure I ha' seen great ones to-day--and then not to speak one word, for
 that's the rule o' the garden, tho' to be sure if I had been Eve i'
 the garden I shouldn't ha' minded the apple, for what's an apple, you
 know, save to a child, and I'm no child, but more a woman o the world
 than my lady here, and I ha' seen what I ha' seen--tho' to be sure if
 I hadn't minded it we should all on us ha' had to go, bless the
 Saints, wi' bare backs, but the backs 'ud ha' countenanced one
 another, and belike it 'ud ha' been always summer, and anyhow I am as
 well-shaped as my lady here, and I ha' seen what I ha' seen, and
 what's the good of my talking to myself, for here comes my lady
 (_enter_ ROSAMUND), and, my lady, tho' I shouldn't speak one word, I
 wish you joy o' the King's brother.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 What is it you mean?
 
 MARGERY.
 
 I mean your goodman, your husband, my lady, for I saw your ladyship
 a-parting wi' him even now i' the coppice, when I was a-getting o'
 bluebells for your ladyship's nose to smell on--and I ha' seen the
 King once at Oxford, and he's as like the King as fingernail to
 fingernail, and I thought at first it was the King, only you know the
 King's married, for King Louis--
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Married!
 
 MARGERY.
 Years and years, my lady, for her husband, King Louis--
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Hush!
 
 MARGERY.
 --And I thought if it were the King's brother he had a better bride
 than the King, for the people do say that his is bad beyond all
 reckoning, and--
 
 ROSAMUND.
 The people lie.
 
 MARGERY.
 Very like, my lady, but most on 'em know an honest woman and a lady
 when they see her, and besides they say, she makes songs, and that's
 against her, for I never knew an honest woman that could make songs,
 tho' to be sure our mother 'ill sing me old songs by the hour, but
 then, God help her, she had 'em from her mother, and her mother from
 her mother back and back for ever so long, but none on 'em ever made
 songs, and they were all honest.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Go, you shall tell me of her some other time.
 
 MARGERY.
 There's none so much to tell on her, my lady, only she kept the
 seventh commandment better than some I know on, or I couldn't look
 your ladyship i' the face, and she brew'd the best ale in all
 Glo'ster, that is to say in her time when she had the 'Crown.'
 
 ROSAMUND.
 The crown! who?
 
 MARGERY.
 Mother.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 I mean her whom you call--fancy--my husband's brother's wife.
 
 MARGERY.
 Oh, Queen Eleanor. Yes, my lady; and tho' I be sworn not to speak a
 word, I can tell you all about her, if----
 
 ROSAMUND.
 No word now. I am faint and sleepy. Leave me.
 Nay--go. What! will you anger me.
 
                                  [_Exit_ MARGERY.
 
 He charged me not to question any of those
 About me. Have I? no! she question'd _me_.
 Did she not slander _him_? Should she stay here?
 May she not tempt me, being at my side,
 To question _her_? Nay, can I send her hence
 Without his kingly leave! I am in the dark.
 I have lived, poor bird, from cage to cage, and known
 Nothing but him--happy to know no more,
 So that he loved me--and he loves me--yes,
 And bound me by his love to secrecy
 Till his own time.
                    Eleanor, Eleanor, have I
 Not heard ill things of her in France? Oh, she's
 The Queen of France. I see it--some confusion,
 Some strange mistake. I did not hear aright,
 Myself confused with parting from the King.
 
 MARGERY (_behind scene_).
 
     Bee mustn't buzz,
     Whoop--but he knows.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Yet her--what her? he hinted of some her--
 When he was here before--
 Something that would displease me. Hath he stray'd
 From love's clear path into the common bush,
 And, being scratch'd, returns to his true rose,
 Who hath not thorn enough to prick him for it,
 Ev'n with a word?
 
 MARGERY (_behind scene_).
 
     Bird mustn't tell,
     Whoop--he can see.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 I would not hear him. Nay--there's more--he frown'd
 'No mate for her, if it should come to that'--
 To that--to what?
 
 MARGERY (_behind scene_).
 
     Whoop--but he knows,
     Whoop--but he knows.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 O God! some dreadful truth is breaking on me--
 Some dreadful thing is coming on me.
                                       [_Enter_ GEOFFREY.
                                      Geoffrey!
 
 GEOFFREY.
 What are you crying for, when the sun shines?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Hath not thy father left us to ourselves?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 Ay, but he's taken the rain with him. I hear
 Margery: I'll go play with her.    [_Exit_ GEOFFREY.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 
     Rainbow, stay,
     Gleam upon gloom,
     Bright as my dream,
     Rainbow, stay!
     But it passes away,
     Gloom upon gleam,
     Dark as my doom--
     O rainbow stay.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--_Outside the Woods near_ ROSAMUND'S _Bower_.
 
 ELEANOR. FITZURSE.
 
 
 ELEANOR.
 Up from the salt lips of the land we two
 Have track'd the King to this dark inland wood;
 And somewhere hereabouts he vanish'd. Here
 His turtle builds: his exit is our adit:
 Watch! he will out again, and presently,
 Seeing he must to Westminster and crown
 Young Henry there to-morrow.
 
 FITZURSE.
                              We have watch'd
 So long in vain, he hath pass'd out again,
 And on the other side.    [_A great horn winded_.
                        Hark! Madam!
 
 ELEANOR.
                                     Ay,
 How ghostly sounds that horn in the black wood!
                            [_A countryman flying_.
 Whither away, man? what are you flying from?
 
 COUNTRYMAN.
 The witch! the witch! she sits naked by a great heap of gold in the
 middle of the wood, and when the horn sounds she comes out as a wolf.
 Get you hence! a man passed in there to-day: I holla'd to him, but he
 didn't hear me: he'll never out again, the witch has got him. I
 daren't stay--I daren't stay!
 
 ELEANOR.
 Kind of the witch to give thee warning tho'.
                                     [_Man flies_.
 Is not this wood-witch of the rustic's fear
 Our woodland Circe that hath witch'd the King?
                  [_Horn sounded. Another flying_.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Again! stay, fool, and tell me why thou fliest.
 
 COUNTRYMAN.
 Fly thou too. The King keeps his forest head of game here, and when
 that horn sounds, a score of wolf-dogs are let loose that will tear
 thee piecemeal. Linger not till the third horn. Fly!
                                    [_Exit_.
 
 ELEANOR.
 This is the likelier tale. We have hit the place.
 Now let the King's fine game look to itself.    [_Horn_.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Again!--
 And far on in the dark heart of the wood
 I hear the yelping of the hounds of hell.
 
 ELEANOR.
 I have my dagger here to still their throats.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Nay, Madam, not to-night--the night is falling.
 What can be done to-night?
 
 ELEANOR.
                             Well--well--away.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--_Traitor's Meadow at Freteval. Pavilions and Tents of the
 English and French Baronage_. BECKET _and_ HERBERT OF BOSHAM.
 
 
 BECKET.
 See here!
 
 HERBERT.
           What's here?
 
 BECKET.
                        A notice from the priest,
 To whom our John of Salisbury committed
 The secret of the bower, that our wolf-Queen
 Is prowling round the fold. I should be back
 In England ev'n for this.
 
 HERBERT.
                           These are by-things
 In the great cause.
 
 BECKET.
                     The by-things of the Lord
 Are the wrong'd innocences that will cry
 From all the hidden by-ways of the world
 In the great day against the wronger. I know
 Thy meaning. Perish she, I, all, before
 The Church should suffer wrong!
 
 HERBERT.
                                 Do you see, my lord,
 There is the King talking with Walter Map?
 
 BECKET.
 He hath the Pope's last letters, and they threaten
 The immediate thunder-blast of interdict:
 Yet he can scarce be touching upon those,
 Or scarce would smile that fashion.
 
 HERBERT.
                                     Winter sunshine!
 Beware of opening out thy bosom to it,
 Lest thou, myself, and all thy flock should catch
 An after ague-fit of trembling. Look!
 He bows, he bares his head, he is coming hither.
 Still with a smile.
 
     _Enter_ KING HENRY _and_ WALTER MAP.
 
 HENRY.
 We have had so many hours together, Thomas,
 So many happy hours alone together,
 That I would speak with you once more alone.
 
 BECKET.
 My liege, your will and happiness are mine.
 
                         [_Exeunt_ KING _and_ BECKET.
 
 HERBERT.
 The same smile still.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 Do you see that great black cloud that hath come over the sun and cast
 us all into shadow?
 
 HERBERT.
 And feel it too.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 And see you yon side-beam that is forced from under it, and sets the
 church-tower over there all a-hell-fire as it were?
 
 HERBERT.
 Ay.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 It is this black, bell-silencing, anti-marrying, burial-hindering
 interdict that hath squeezed out this side-smile upon Canterbury,
 whereof may come conflagration. Were I Thomas, I wouldn't trust it.
 Sudden change is a house on sand; and tho' I count Henry honest
 enough, yet when fear creeps in at the front, honesty steals out at
 the back, and the King at last is fairly scared by this cloud--this
 interdict. I have been more for the King than the Church in this
 matter--yea, even for the sake of the Church: for, truly, as the case
 stood, you had safelier have slain an archbishop than a she-goat: but
 our recoverer and upholder of customs hath in this crowning of young
 Henry by York and London so violated the immemorial usage of the
 Church, that, like the gravedigger's child I have heard of, trying to
 ring the bell, he hath half-hanged himself in the rope of the Church,
 or rather pulled all the Church with the Holy Father astride of it
 down upon his own head.
 
 HERBERT.
 Were you there?
 
 WALTER MAP.
 In the church rope?--no. I was at the crowning, for I have pleasure in
 the pleasure of crowds, and to read the faces of men at a great show.
 
 HERBERT.
 And how did Roger of York comport himself?
 
 WALTER MAP.
 As magnificently and archiepiscopally as our Thomas would have done:
 only there was a dare-devil in his eye--I should say a dare-Becket. He
 thought less of two kings than of one Roger the king of the occasion.
 Foliot is the holier man, perhaps the better. Once or twice there ran
 a twitch across his face as who should say what's to follow? but
 Salisbury was a calf cowed by Mother Church, and every now and then
 glancing about him like a thief at night when he hears a door open in
 the house and thinks 'the master.'
 
 HERBERT.
 And the father-king?
 
 WALTER MAP.
 The father's eye was so tender it would have called a goose off the
 green, and once he strove to hide his face, like the Greek king when
 his daughter was sacrificed, but he thought better of it: it was but
 the sacrifice of a kingdom to his son, a smaller matter; but as to the
 young crownling himself, he looked so malapert in the eyes, that had I
 fathered him I had given him more of the rod than the sceptre. Then
 followed the thunder of the captains and the shouting, and so we came
 on to the banquet, from whence there puffed out such an incense of
 unctuosity into the nostrils of our Gods of Church and State, that
 Lucullus or Apicius might have sniffed it in their Hades of
 heathenism, so that the smell of their own roast had not come across
 it--
 
 HERBERT.
 Map, tho' you make your butt too big, you overshoot it.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 --For as to the fish, they de-miracled the miraculous draught, and
 might have sunk a navy--
 
 HERBERT.
 There again, Goliasing and Goliathising!
 
 WALTER MAP.
 --And as for the flesh at table, a whole Peter's sheet, with all
 manner of game, and four-footed things, and fowls--
 
 HERBERT.
 And all manner of creeping things too?
 
 WALTER MAP.
 --Well, there were Abbots--but they did not bring their women; and so
 we were dull enough at first, but in the end we flourished out into a
 merriment; for the old King would act servitor and hand a dish to his
 son; whereupon my Lord of York--his fine-cut face bowing and beaming
 with all that courtesy which hath less loyalty in it than the backward
 scrape of the clown's heel--'great honour,' says he, 'from the King's
 self to the King's son.' Did you hear the young King's quip?
 
 HERBERT.
 No, what was it?
 
 WALTER MAP.
 Glancing at the days when his father was only Earl of Anjou, he
 answered:--'Should not an earl's son wait on a king's son?' And when
 the cold corners of the King's mouth began to thaw, there was a great
 motion of laughter among us, part real, part childlike, to be freed
 from the dulness--part royal, for King and kingling both laughed, and
 so we could not but laugh, as by a royal necessity--part childlike
 again--when we felt we had laughed too long and could not stay
 ourselves--many midriff-shaken even to tears, as springs gush out
 after earthquakes--but from those, as I said before, there may come a
 conflagration--tho', to keep the figure moist and make it hold water,
 I should say rather, the lacrymation of a lamentation; but look if
 Thomas have not flung himself at the King's feet. They have made it up
 again--for the moment.
 
 HERBERT.
 Thanks to the blessed Magdalen, whose day it is.
 
     _Re-enter_ HENRY _and_ BECKET. (_During their conference
     the_ BARONS _and_ BISHOPS _of_ FRANCE _and_ ENGLAND _come
     in at back of stage_.)
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, King! for in thy kingdom, as thou knowest,
 The spouse of the Great King, thy King, hath fallen--
 The daughter of Zion lies beside the way--
 The priests of Baal tread her underfoot--
 The golden ornaments are stolen from her--
 
 HENRY.
 Have I not promised to restore her, Thomas,
 And send thee back again to Canterbury?
 
 BECKET.
 Send back again those exiles of my kin
 Who wander famine-wasted thro' the world.
 
 HENRY.
 Have I not promised, man, to send them back?
 
 BECKET.
 Yet one thing more. Thou hast broken thro' the pales
 Of privilege, crowning thy young son by York,
 London and Salisbury--not Canterbury.
 
 HENRY.
 York crown'd the Conqueror--not Canterbury.
 
 BECKET.
 There was no Canterbury in William's time.
 
 HENRY.
 But Hereford, you know, crown'd the first Henry.
 
 BECKET.
 But Anselm crown'd this Henry o'er again.
 
 HENRY.
 And thou shalt crown my Henry o'er again.
 
 BECKET.
 And is it then with thy good-will that I
 Proceed against thine evil councillors,
 And hurl the dread ban of the Church on those
 Who made the second mitre play the first,
 And acted me?
 
 HENRY.
               Well, well, then--have thy way!
 It may be they were evil councillors.
 What more, my lord Archbishop? What more, Thomas?
 I make thee full amends. Say all thy say,
 But blaze not out before the Frenchmen here.
 
 BECKET.
 More? Nothing, so thy promise be thy deed.
 
 HENRY (_holding out his hand_).
 Give me thy hand. My Lords of France and England,
 My friend of Canterbury and myself
 Are now once more at perfect amity.
 Unkingly should I be, and most unknightly,
 Not striving still, however much in vain,
 To rival him in Christian charity.
 
 HERBERT.
 All praise to Heaven, and sweet St. Magdalen!
 
 HENRY.
 And so farewell until we meet in England.
 
 BECKET.
 I fear, my liege, we may not meet in England.
 
 HENRY.
 How, do you make me a traitor?
 
 BECKET.
                                No, indeed!
 That be far from thee.
 
 HENRY.
                        Come, stay with us, then,
 Before you part for England.
 
 BECKET.
                              I am bound
 For that one hour to stay with good King Louis,
 Who helpt me when none else.
 
 HERBERT.
                              He said thy life
 Was not one hour's worth in England save
 King Henry gave thee first the kiss of peace.
 
 HENRY.
 He said so? Louis, did he? look you, Herbert.
 When I was in mine anger with King Louis,
 I sware I would not give the kiss of peace,
 Not on French ground, nor any ground but English,
 Where his cathedral stands. Mine old friend, Thomas,
 I would there were that perfect trust between us,
 That health of heart, once ours, ere Pope or King
 Had come between us! Even now--who knows?--
 I might deliver all things to thy hand--
 If ... but I say no more ... farewell, my lord.
 
 BECKET.
 Farewell, my liege!
 
            [_Exit_ HENRY, _then the_ BARONS _and_ BISHOPS.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 There again! when the full fruit of the royal promise might have dropt
 into thy mouth hadst thou but opened it to thank him.
 
 BECKET.
 He fenced his royal promise with an _if_.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 And is the King's _if_ too high a stile for your lordship to overstep
 and come at all things in the next field?
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, if this _if_ be like the Devil's '_if_
 Thou wilt fall down and worship me.'
 
 HERBERT.
                                     Oh, Thomas;
 I could fall down and worship thee, my Thomas,
 For thou hast trodden this wine-press alone.
 
 BECKET.
 Nay, of the people there are many with me.
 
 WALTER MAP.
 I am not altogether with you, my lord, tho' I am none of those that
 would raise a storm between you, lest ye should draw together like two
 ships in a calm. You wrong the King: he meant what he said to-day. Who
 shall vouch for his to-morrows? One word further. Doth not the
 _fewness_ of anything make the fulness of it in estimation? Is not
 virtue prized mainly for its rarity and great baseness loathed as an
 exception: for were all, my lord, as noble as yourself, who would look
 up to you? and were all as base as--who shall I say--Fitzurse and his
 following--who would look down upon them? My lord, you have put so
 many of the King's household out of communion, that they begin to
 smile at it.
 
 BECKET.
 At their peril, at their peril--
 
 WALTER MAP.
 --For tho' the drop may hollow out the dead stone,
 doth not the living skin thicken against perpetual whippings?
 This is the second grain of good counsel I
 ever proffered thee, and so cannot suffer by the rule of
 frequency. Have I sown it in salt? I trust not, for
 before God I promise you the King hath many more
 wolves than he can tame in his woods of England, and
 if it suit their purpose to howl for the King, and you
 still move against him, you may have no less than to
 die for it; but God and his free wind grant your lordship
 a happy home-return and the King's kiss of peace
 in Kent. Farewell! I must follow the King.
                                       [_Exit_.
 
 HERBERT.
 Ay, and I warrant the customs. Did the King
 Speak of the customs?
 
 BECKET.
                       No!--To die for it--
 I live to die for it, I die to live for it.
 The State will die, the Church can never die.
 The King's not like to die for that which dies;
 But I must die for that which never dies.
 It will be so--my visions in the Lord:
 It must be so, my friend! the wolves of England
 Must murder her one shepherd, that the sheep
 May feed in peace. False figure, Map would say.
 Earth's falses are heaven's truths. And when my voice
 Is martyr'd mute, and this man disappears,
 That perfect trust may come again between us,
 And there, there, there, not here I shall rejoice
 To find my stray sheep back within the fold.
 The crowd are scattering, let us move away!
 And thence to England.
 
                           [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV.
 
 
 SCENE I.--_The Outskirts of the Bower_.
 
 
 GEOFFREY (_coming out of the wood_).
 Light again! light again! Margery? no, that's a finer thing there. How
 it glitters!
 
 ELEANOR (_entering_).
 Come to me, little one. How camest thou hither?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 On my legs.
 
 ELEANOR.
 And mighty pretty legs too. Thou art the prettiest child I ever saw.
 Wilt thou love me?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 No; I only love mother.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Ay; and who is thy mother?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 They call her--But she lives secret, you see.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Why?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 Don't know why.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Ay, but some one comes to see her now and then. Who is he?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 Can't tell.
 
 ELEANOR.
 What does she call him?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 My liege.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Pretty one, how camest thou?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 There was a bit of yellow silk here and there, and it looked pretty
 like a glowworm, and I thought if I followed it I should find the
 fairies.
 
 ELEANOR.
 I am the fairy, pretty one, a good fairy to thy mother. Take me to
 her.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 There are good fairies and bad fairies, and sometimes she cries, and
 can't sleep sound o' nights because of the bad fairies.
 
 ELEANOR.
 She shall cry no more; she shall sleep sound enough if thou wilt take
 me to her. I am her good fairy.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 But you don't look like a good fairy. Mother does. You are not pretty,
 like mother.
 
 ELEANOR.
 We can't all of us be as pretty as thou art--(_aside_) little bastard.
 Come, here is a golden chain I will give thee if thou wilt lead me to
 thy mother.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 No--no gold. Mother says gold spoils all. Love is the only gold.
 
 ELEANOR.
 I love thy mother, my pretty boy. Show me where thou camest out of the
 wood.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 By this tree; but I don't know if I can find the way back again.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Where's the warder?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 Very bad. Somebody struck him.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Ay? who was that?
 
 GEOFFREY.
 Can't tell. But I heard say he had had a stroke, or you'd have heard
 his horn before now. Come along, then; we shall see the silk here and
 there, and I want my supper.
 
                         [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--ROSAMUND'S _Bower_.
 
 
 ROSAMUND.
 The boy so late; pray God, he be not lost.
 I sent this Margery, and she comes not back;
 I sent another, and she comes not back.
 I go myself--so many alleys, crossings,
 Paths, avenues--nay, if I lost him, now
 The folds have fallen from the mystery,
 And left all naked, I were lost indeed.
     _Enter_ GEOFFREY _and_ ELEANOR.
 Geoffrey, the pain thou hast put me to!
                            [_Seeing_ ELEANOR.
                                         Ha, you!
 How came you hither?
 
 ELEANOR.
                      Your own child brought me hither!
 
 GEOFFREY.
 You said you couldn't trust Margery, and I watched her and followed
 her into the woods, and I lost her and went on and on till I found the
 light and the lady, and she says she can make you sleep o' nights.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 How dared you? Know you not this bower is secret,
 Of and belonging to the King of England,
 More sacred than his forests for the chase?
 Nay, nay, Heaven help you; get you hence in haste
 Lest worse befall you.
 
 ELEANOR.
                        Child, I am mine own self
 Of and belonging to the King. The King
 Hath divers ofs and ons, ofs and belongings,
 Almost as many as your true Mussulman--
 Belongings, paramours, whom it pleases him
 To call his wives; but so it chances, child,
 That I am his main paramour, his sultana.
 But since the fondest pair of doves will jar,
 Ev'n in a cage of gold, we had words of late,
 And thereupon he call'd my children bastards.
 Do you believe that you are married to him?
 
 ROSAMUND,
 I _should_ believe it.
 
 ELEANOR.
                        You must not believe it,
 Because I have a wholesome medicine here
 Puts that belief asleep. Your answer, beauty!
 Do you believe that you are married to him?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Geoffrey, my boy, I saw the ball you lost in the fork of the great
 willow over the brook. Go. See that you do not fall in. Go.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 And leave you alone with the good fairy. She calls you beauty, but I
 don't like her looks. Well, you bid me go, and I'll have my ball
 anyhow. Shall I find you asleep when I come back?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Go.                       [_Exit_ GEOFFREY.
 
 
 ELEANOR.
 
 He is easily found again. _Do_ you believe it?
 I pray you then to take my sleeping-draught;
 But if you should not care to take it--see!
                                 [_Draws a dagger_.
 What! have I scared the red rose from your face
 Into your heart. But this will find it there,
 And dig it from the root for ever.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                    Help! help!
 
 ELEANOR.
 They say that walls have ears; but these, it seems,
 Have none! and I have none--to pity thee.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 I do beseech you--my child is so young,
 So backward too; I cannot leave him yet.
 I am not so happy I could not die myself,
 But the child is so young. You have children--his;
 And mine is the King's child; so, if you love him--
 Nay, if you love him, there is great wrong done
 Somehow; but if you do not--there are those
 Who say you do not love him--let me go
 With my young boy, and I will hide my face,
 Blacken and gipsyfy it; none shall know me;
 The King shall never hear of me again,
 But I will beg my bread along the world
 With my young boy, and God will be our guide.
 I never meant you harm in any way.
 See, I can say no more.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Will you not say you are not married to him?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Ay, Madam, I can _say_ it, if you will.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Then is thy pretty boy a bastard?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                   No.
 
 ELEANOR.
 
 And thou thyself a proven wanton?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                   No.
 I am none such. I never loved but one.
 I have heard of such that range from love to love,
 Like the wild beast--if you can call it love.
 I have heard of such--yea, even among those
 Who sit on thrones--I never saw any such,
 Never knew any such, and howsoever
 You do misname me, match'd with any such,
 I am snow to mud.
 
 ELEANOR.
                   The more the pity then
 That thy true home--the heavens--cry out for thee
 Who art too pure for earth.
 
     _Enter_ FITZURSE.
 
 FITZURSE.
                             Give her to me.
 
 ELEANOR.
 The Judas-lover of our passion-play
 Hath track'd us hither.
 
 FITZURSE.
                         Well, why not? I follow'd
 You and the child: he babbled all the way.
 Give her to me to make my honeymoon.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Ay, as the bears love honey. Could you keep her
 Indungeon'd from one whisper of the wind,
 Dark even from a side glance of the moon,
 And oublietted in the centre--No!
 I follow out my hate and thy revenge.
 
 FITZURSE.
 You bad me take revenge another way--
 To bring her to the dust.... Come with me, love,
 And I will love thee.... Madam, let her live.
 I have a far-off burrow where the King
 Would miss her and for ever.
 
 ELEANOR.
                              How sayst thou, sweetheart?
 Wilt thou go with him? he will marry thee.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Give me the poison; set me free of him!
                                [ELEANOR _offers the vial_.
 No, no! I will not have it.
 
 ELEANOR.
                             Then this other,
 The wiser choice, because my sleeping-draught
 May bloat thy beauty out of shape, and make
 Thy body loathsome even to thy child;
 While this but leaves thee with a broken heart,
 A doll-face blanch'd and bloodless, over which
 If pretty Geoffrey do not break his own,
 It must be broken for him.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                            O I see now
 Your purpose is to fright me--a troubadour
 You play with words. You had never used so many,
 Not if you meant it, I am sure. The child....
 No.... mercy! No!    (_Kneels_.)
 
 ELEANOR.
                   Play!... that bosom never
 Heaved under the King's hand with such true passion
 As at this loveless knife that stirs the riot,
 Which it will quench in blood! Slave, if he love thee,
 Thy life is worth the wrestle for it: arise,
 And dash thyself against me that I may slay thee!
 The worm! shall I let her go? But ha! what's here?
 By very God, the cross I gave the King!
 His village darling in some lewd caress
 Has wheedled it off the King's neck to her own.
 By thy leave, beauty. Ay, the same! I warrant
 Thou hast sworn on this my cross a hundred times
 Never to leave him--and that merits death,
 False oath on holy cross--for thou must leave him
 To-day, but not quite yet. My good Fitzurse,
 The running down the chase is kindlier sport
 Ev'n than the death. Who knows but that thy lover
 May plead so pitifully, that I may spare thee?
 Come hither, man; stand there. (_To Rosamund_)
                                Take thy one chance;
 Catch at the last straw. Kneel to thy lord Fitzurse;
 Crouch even because thou hatest him; fawn upon him
 For thy life and thy son's.
 
 ROSAMUND (_rising_).
                             I am a Clifford,
 My son a Clifford and Plantagenet.
 I am to die then, tho' there stand beside thee
 One who might grapple with thy dagger, if he
 Had aught of man, or thou of woman; or I
 Would bow to such a baseness as would make me
 Most worthy of it: both of us will die,
 And I will fly with my sweet boy to heaven,
 And shriek to all the saints among the stars:
 'Eleanor of Aquitaine, Eleanor of England!
 Murder'd by that adulteress Eleanor,
 Whose doings are a horror to the east,
 A hissing in the west!' Have we not heard
 Raymond of Poitou, thine own uncle--nay,
 Geoffrey Plantagenet, thine own husband's father--
 Nay, ev'n the accursed heathen Saladdeen--
 Strike!
 I challenge thee to meet me before God.
 Answer me there.
 
 ELEANOR (_raising the dagger_).
                  This in thy bosom, fool,
 And after in thy bastard's!
 
     _Enter_ BECKET _from behind. Catches hold of her arm_.
 
 BECKET.
                             Murderess!
 
     [_The dagger falls; they stare at one another. After a pause_.
 
 ELEANOR.
 My lord, we know you proud of your fine hand,
 But having now admired it long enough,
 We find that it is mightier than it seems--
 At least mine own is frailer: you are laming it.
 
 BECKET.
 And lamed and maim'd to dislocation, better
 Than raised to take a life which Henry bad me
 Guard from the stroke that dooms thee after death
 To wail in deathless flame.
 
 ELEANOR.
                             Nor you, nor I
 Have now to learn, my lord, that our good Henry
 Says many a thing in sudden heats, which he
 Gainsays by next sunrising--often ready
 To tear himself for having said as much.
 My lord, Fitzurse--
 
 BECKET.
                     He too! what dost thou here?
 Dares the bear slouch into the lion's den?
 One downward plunge of his paw would rend away
 Eyesight and manhood, life itself, from thee.
 Go, lest I blast thee with anathema,
 And make thee a world's horror.
 
 FITZURSE.
                                 My lord, I shall
 Remember this.
 
 BECKET.
                I _do_ remember thee;
 Lest I remember thee to the lion, go.
                                  [_Exit_ FITZURSE.
 Take up your dagger; put it in the sheath.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Might not your courtesy stoop to hand it me?
 But crowns must bow when mitres sit so high.
 Well--well--too costly to be left or lost.
                                    [_Picks up the dagger_.
 I had it from an Arab soldan, who,
 When I was there in Antioch, marvell'd at
 Our unfamiliar beauties of the west;
 But wonder'd more at my much constancy
 To the monk-king, Louis, our former burthen,
 From whom, as being too kin, you know, my lord,
 God's grace and Holy Church deliver'd us.
 I think, time given, I could have talk'd him out of
 His ten wives into one. Look at the hilt.
 What excellent workmanship. In our poor west
 We cannot do it so well.
 
 BECKET.
                          We can do worse.
 Madam, I saw your dagger at her throat;
 I heard your savage cry.
 
 ELEANOR.
                          Well acted, was it?
 A comedy meant to seem a tragedy--
 A feint, a farce. My honest lord, you are known
 Thro' all the courts of Christendom as one
 That mars a cause with over-violence.
 You have wrong'd Fitzurse. I speak not of myself.
 We thought to scare this minion of the King
 Back from her churchless commerce with the King
 To the fond arms of her first love, Fitzurse,
 Who swore to marry her. You have spoilt the farce.
 My savage cry? Why, she--she--when I strove
 To work against her license for her good,
 Bark'd out at me such monstrous charges, that
 The King himself, for love of his own sons,
 If hearing, would have spurn'd her; whereupon
 I menaced her with this, as when we threaten
 A yelper with a stick. Nay, I deny not
 That I was somewhat anger'd. Do you hear me?
 Believe or no, I care not. You have lost
 The ear of the King. I have it.... My lord Paramount,
 Our great High-priest, will not your Holiness
 Vouchsafe a gracious answer to your Queen?
 
 BECKET.
 Rosamund hath not answer'd you one word;
 Madam, I will not answer you one word.
 Daughter, the world hath trick'd thee. Leave it, daughter;
 Come thou with me to Godstow nunnery,
 And live what may be left thee of a life
 Saved as by miracle alone with Him
 Who gave it.
 
     _Re-enter_ GEOFFREY.
 
 GEOFFREY.
 Mother, you told me a great fib: it wasn't in the willow.
 
 BECKET.
 Follow us, my son, and we will find it for thee--
 Or something manlier.
                [_Exeunt_ BECKET, ROSAMUND, _and_ GEOFFREY.
 
 ELEANOR.
 The world hath trick'd her--that's the King; if so,
 There was the farce, the feint--not mine. And yet
 I am all but sure my dagger was a feint
 Till the worm turn'd--not life shot up in blood,
 But death drawn in;--_(looking at the vial) this_ was no feint then?
 no.
 But can I swear to that, had she but given
 Plain answer to plain query? nay, methinks
 Had she but bow'd herself to meet the wave
 Of humiliation, worshipt whom she loathed,
 I should have let her be, scorn'd her too much
 To harm her. Henry--Becket tells him this--
 To take my life might lose him Aquitaine.
 Too politic for that. Imprison me?
 No, for it came to nothing--only a feint.
 Did she not tell me I was playing on her?
 I'll swear to mine own self it was a feint.
 Why should I swear, Eleanor, who am, or was,
 A sovereign power? The King plucks out their eyes
 Who anger him, and shall not I, the Queen,
 Tear out her heart--kill, kill with knife or venom
 One of his slanderous harlots? 'None of such?'
 I love her none the more. Tut, the chance gone,
 She lives--but not for him; one point is gain'd.
 O I, that thro' the Pope divorced King Louis,
 Scorning his monkery,--I that wedded Henry,
 Honouring his manhood--will he not mock at me
 The jealous fool balk'd of her will--with _him_?
 But he and he must never meet again.
 Reginald Fitzurse!
 
     _Re-enter_ FITZURSE.
 
 FITZURSE.
                    Here, Madam, at your pleasure.
 
 ELEANOR.
 My pleasure is to have a man about me.
 Why did you slink away so like a cur?
 
 FITZURSE.
 
 Madam, I am as much man as the King.
 Madam, I fear Church-censures like your King.
 
 ELEANOR.
 
 He grovels to the Church when he's black-blooded,
 But kinglike fought the proud archbishop,--kinglike
 Defied the Pope, and, like his kingly sires,
 The Normans, striving still to break or bind
 The spiritual giant with our island laws
 And customs, made me for the moment proud
 Ev'n of that stale Church-bond which link'd me with him
 To bear him kingly sons. I am not so sure
 But that I love him still. Thou as much man!
 No more of that; we will to France and be
 Beforehand with the King, and brew from out
 This Godstow-Becket intermeddling such
 A strong hate-philtre as may madden him--madden
 Against his priest beyond all hellebore.
 
 
 
 
 ACT V.
 
 
 SCENE I.--_Castle in Normandy. King's Chamber_.
 
 HENRY, ROGER OF YORK, FOLIOT, JOCELYN OF SALISBURY.
 
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
 Nay, nay, my liege,
 He rides abroad with armed followers,
 Hath broken all his promises to thyself,
 Cursed and anathematised us right and left,
 Stirr'd up a party there against your son--
 
 HENRY.
 Roger of York, you always hated him,
 Even when you both were boys at Theobald's.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
 I always hated boundless arrogance.
 In mine own cause I strove against him there,
 And in thy cause I strive against him now.
 
 HENRY.
 I cannot think he moves against my son,
 Knowing right well with what a tenderness
 He loved my son.
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
                  Before you made him king.
 But Becket ever moves against a king.
 The Church is all--the crime to be a king.
 We trust your Royal Grace, lord of more land
 Than any crown in Europe, will not yield
 To lay your neck beneath your citizens' heel.
 
 HENRY.
 Not to a Gregory of my throning! No.
 
 FOLIOT.
 My royal liege, in aiming at your love,
 It may be sometimes I have overshot
 My duties to our Holy Mother Church,
 Tho' all the world allows I fall no inch
 Behind this Becket, rather go beyond
 In scourgings, macerations, mortifyings,
 Fasts, disciplines that clear the spiritual eye,
 And break the soul from earth. Let all that be.
 I boast not: but you know thro' all this quarrel
 I still have cleaved to the crown, in hope the crown
 Would cleave to me that but obey'd the crown,
 Crowning your son; for which our loyal service,
 And since we likewise swore to obey the customs,
 York and myself, and our good Salisbury here,
 Are push'd from out communion of the Church.
 
 JOCELYN OF SALISBURY.
 Becket hath trodden on us like worms, my liege;
 Trodden one half dead; one half, but half-alive,
 Cries to the King.
 
 HENRY (_aside_).
                    Take care o' thyself, O King.
 
 JOCELYN OF SALISBURY.
 Being so crush'd and so humiliated
 We scarcely dare to bless the food we eat
 Because of Becket.
 
 HENRY.
                    What would ye have me do?
 
 ROGER OF YORK.
 Summon your barons; take their counsel: yet
 I know--could swear--as long as Becket breathes,
 Your Grace will never have one quiet hour.
 
 HENRY.
 What?... Ay ... but pray you do not work upon me.
 I see your drift ... it may be so ... and yet
 You know me easily anger'd. Will you hence?
 He shall absolve you ... you shall have redress.
 I have a dizzying headache. Let me rest.
 I'll call you by and by.
 
       [_Exeunt_ ROGER OF YORK, FOLIOT, _and_ JOCELYN OF SALISBURY.
 
 Would he were dead! I have lost all love for him.
 If God would take him in some sudden way--
 Would he were dead.            [_Lies down_.
 
 PAGE (_entering_).
                     My liege, the Queen of England.
 
 HENRY.
 God's eyes!          [_Starting up_.
 
     _Enter_ ELEANOR.
 
 ELEANOR.
             Of England? Say of Aquitaine.
 I am no Queen of England. I had dream'd
 I was the bride of England, and a queen.
 
 HENRY.
 And,--while you dream'd you were the bride of England,--
 Stirring her baby-king against me? ha!
 
 ELEANOR.
 The brideless Becket is thy king and mine:
 I will go live and die in Aquitaine.
 
 HENRY.
 Except I clap thee into prison here,
 Lest thou shouldst play the wanton there again.
 Ha, you of Aquitaine! O you of Aquitaine!
 You were but Aquitaine to Louis--no wife;
 You are only Aquitaine to me--no wife.
 
 ELEANOR.
 And why, my lord, should I be wife to one
 That only wedded me for Aquitaine?
 Yet this no wife--her six and thirty sail
 Of Provence blew you to your English throne;
 And this no wife has born you four brave sons,
 And one of them at least is like to prove
 Bigger in our small world than thou art.
 
 HENRY.
                                          Ay--
 Richard, if he _be_ mine--I hope him mine.
 But thou art like enough to make him thine.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Becket is like enough to make all his.
 
 HENRY.
 Methought I had recover'd of the Becket,
 That all was planed and bevell'd smooth again,
 Save from some hateful cantrip of thine own.
 
 ELEANOR.
 I will go live and die in Aquitaine.
 I dream'd I was the consort of a king,
 Not one whose back his priest has broken.
 
 HENRY.
                                           What!
 Is the end come? You, will you crown my foe
 My victor in mid-battle? I will be
 Sole master of my house. The end is mine.
 What game, what juggle, what devilry are you playing?
 Why do you thrust this Becket on me again?
 
 ELEANOR.
 Why? for I _am_ true wife, and have my fears
 Lest Becket thrust you even from your throne.
 Do you know this cross, my liege?
 
 HENRY (_turning his head_).
                                   Away! Not I.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Not ev'n the central diamond, worth, I think,
 Half of the Antioch whence I had it.
 
 HENRY.
                                      That?
 
 ELEANOR.
 I gave it you, and you your paramour;
 She sends it back, as being dead to earth,
 So dead henceforth to you.
 
 HENRY.
                            Dead! you have murder'd her,
 Found out her secret bower and murder'd her.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Your Becket knew the secret of your bower.
 
 HENRY (_calling out_).
 Ho there! thy rest of life is hopeless prison.
 
 ELEANOR.
 And what would my own Aquitaine say to that?
 First, free thy captive from _her_ hopeless prison.
 
 HENRY.
 O devil, can I free her from the grave?
 
 ELEANOR.
 You are too tragic: both of us are players
 In such a comedy as our court of Provence
 Had laugh'd at. That's a delicate Latin lay
 Of Walter Map: the lady holds the cleric
 Lovelier than any soldier, his poor tonsure
 A crown of Empire. Will you have it again?
            (_Offering the cross. He dashes it down_.)
 St. Cupid, that is too irreverent.
 Then mine once more. (_Puts it on_.)
                      Your cleric hath your lady.
 Nay, what uncomely faces, could he see you!
 Foam at the mouth because King Thomas, lord
 Not only of your vassals but amours,
 Thro' chastest honour of the Decalogue
 Hath used the full authority of his Church
 To put her into Godstow nunnery.
 
 HENRY.
 To put her into Godstow nunnery!
 He dared not--liar! yet, yet I remember--
 I do remember.
 He bad me put her into a nunnery--
 Into Godstow, into Hellstow, Devilstow!
 The Church! the Church!
 God's eyes! I would the Church were down in hell!
                                              [_Exit_.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Aha!
 
     _Enter the four_ KNIGHTS.
 
 FITZURSE.
 What made the King cry out so furiously?
 
 ELEANOR.
 Our Becket, who will not absolve the Bishops.
 I think ye four have cause to love this Becket.
 
 FITZURSE.
 I hate him for his insolence to all.
 
 DE TRACY.
 And I for all his insolence to thee.
 
 DE BRITO.
 I hate him for I hate him is my reason,
 And yet I hate him for a hypocrite.
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 I do not love him, for he did his best
 To break the barons, and now braves the King.
 
 ELEANOR.
 Strike, then, at once, the King would have him--See!
 
     _Re-enter_ HENRY.
 
 HENRY.
 No man to love me, honour me, obey me!
 Sluggards and fools!
 The slave that eat my bread has kick'd his King!
 The dog I cramm'd with dainties worried me!
 The fellow that on a lame jade came to court,
 A ragged cloak for saddle--he, he, he,
 To shake my throne, to push into my chamber--
 My bed, where ev'n the slave is private--he--
 I'll have her out again, he shall absolve
 The bishops--they but did my will--not you--
 Sluggards and fools, why do you stand and stare?
 You are no king's men--you--you--you are Becket's men.
 Down with King Henry! up with the Archbishop!
 Will no man free me from this pestilent priest?    [_Exit_.
            [_The_ KNIGHTS _draw their swords_.
 
 ELEANOR.
 _Are_ ye king's men? I am king's woman, I.
 
 THE KNIGHTS.
 King's men! King's men!
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--_A Room in Canterbury Monastery_.
 
 BECKET _and_ JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 
 
 BECKET.
 York said so?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
               Yes: a man may take good counsel
 Ev'n from his foe.
 
 BECKET.
                    York will say anything.
 What is he saying now? gone to the King
 And taken our anathema with him. York!
 Can the King de-anathematise this York?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 Thomas, I would thou hadst return'd to England,
 Like some wise prince of this world from his wars,
 With more of olive-branch and amnesty
 For foes at home--thou hast raised the world against thee.
 
 BECKET.
 Why, John, my kingdom is not of this world.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 If it were more of this world it might be
 More of the next. A policy of wise pardon
 Wins here as well as there. To bless thine enemies--
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, mine, not Heaven's.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                         And may there not be something
 Of this world's leaven in thee too, when crying
 On Holy Church to thunder out her rights
 And thine own wrong so pitilessly. Ah, Thomas,
 The lightnings that we think are only Heaven's
 Flash sometimes out of earth against the heavens.
 The soldier, when he lets his whole self go
 Lost in the common good, the common wrong,
 Strikes truest ev'n for his own self. I crave
 Thy pardon--I have still thy leave to speak.
 Thou hast waged God's war against the King; and yet
 We are self-uncertain creatures, and we may,
 Yea, even when we know not, mix our spites
 And private hates with our defence of Heaven.
 
     [_Enter_ EDWARD GRIM.
 
 BECKET.
 Thou art but yesterday from Cambridge, Grim;
 What say ye there of Becket?
 
 GRIM.
                              _I_ believe him
 The bravest in our roll of Primates down
 From Austin--there are some--for there are men
 Of canker'd judgment everywhere--
 
 BECKET.
                                   Who hold
 With York, with York against me.
 
 GRIM.
                                  Well, my lord,
 A stranger monk desires access to you.
 
 BECKET.
 York against Canterbury, York against God!
 I am open to him.
                      [_Exit_ GRIM.
 
     _Enter_ ROSAMUND _as a Monk_.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                   Can I speak with you
 Alone, my father?
 
 BECKET.
                   Come you to confess?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Not now.
 
 BECKET.
          Then speak; this is my other self,
 Who like my conscience never lets me be.
 
 ROSAMUND (_throwing back the cowl_).
 I know him; our good John of Salisbury.
 
 BECKET.
 Breaking already from thy noviciate
 To plunge into this bitter world again--
 These wells of Marah. I am grieved, my daughter.
 I thought that I had made a peace for thee.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Small peace was mine in my noviciate, father.
 Thro' all closed doors a dreadful whisper crept
 That thou wouldst excommunicate the King.
 I could not eat, sleep, pray: I had with me
 The monk's disguise thou gavest me for my bower:
 I think our Abbess knew it and allow'd it.
 I fled, and found thy name a charm to get me
 Food, roof, and rest. I met a robber once,
 I told him I was bound to see the Archbishop;
 'Pass on,' he said, and in thy name I pass'd
 From house to house. In one a son stone-blind
 Sat by his mother's hearth: he had gone too far
 Into the King's own woods; and the poor mother,
 Soon as she learnt I was a friend of thine,
 Cried out against the cruelty of the King.
 I said it was the King's courts, not the King;
 But she would not believe me, and she wish'd
 The Church were king: she had seen the Archbishop once,
 So mild, so kind. The people love thee, father.
 
 BECKET.
 Alas! when I was Chancellor to the King,
 I fear I was as cruel as the King.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Cruel? Oh, no--it is the law, not he;
 The customs of the realm.
 
 BECKET.
                           The customs! customs!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 My lord, you have not excommunicated him?
 Oh, if you have, absolve him!
 
 BECKET.
                               Daughter, daughter,
 Deal not with things you know not.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                    I know _him_.
 Then you have done it, and I call _you_ cruel.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 No, daughter, you mistake our good Archbishop;
 For once in France the King had been so harsh,
 He thought to excommunicate him--Thomas,
 You could not--old affection master'd you,
 You falter'd into tears.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                          God bless him for it.
 
 BECKET.
 Nay, make me not a woman, John of Salisbury,
 Nor make me traitor to my holy office.
 Did not a man's voice ring along the aisle,
 'The King is sick and almost unto death.'
 How could I excommunicate him then?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 And wilt thou excommunicate him now?
 
 BECKET.
 Daughter, my time is short, I shall not do it.
 And were it longer--well--I should not do it.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Thanks in this life, and in the life to come.
 
 BECKET.
 Get thee back to thy nunnery with all haste;
 Let this be thy last trespass. But one question--
 How fares thy pretty boy, the little Geoffrey?
 No fever, cough, croup, sickness?
 
 ROSAMUND.
                                   No, but saved
 From all that by our solitude. The plagues
 That smite the city spare the solitudes.
 
 BECKET.
 God save him from all sickness of the soul!
 Thee too, thy solitude among thy nuns,
 May that save thee! Doth he remember me?
 
 ROSAMUND.
 I warrant him.
 
 BECKET.
                He is marvellously like thee.
 
 ROSAMUND.
 Liker the King.
 
 BECKET.
                 No, daughter.
 
 ROSAMUND.
                               Ay, but wait
 Till his nose rises; he will be very king.
 
 BECKET.
 Ev'n so: but think not of the King: farewell!
 
 ROSAMUND.
 My lord, the city is full of armed men.
 
 BECKET,
 Ev'n so: farewell!
 
 ROSAMUND.
                    I will but pass to vespers,
 And breathe one prayer for my liege-lord the King,
 His child and mine own soul, and so return.
 
 BECKET.
 Pray for me too: much need of prayer have I.
                                  [ROSAMUND _kneels and goes_.
 Dan John, how much we lose, we celibates,
 Lacking the love of woman and of child.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 More gain than loss; for of your wives you shall
 Find one a slut whose fairest linen seems
 Foul as her dust-cloth, if she used it--one
 So charged with tongue, that every thread of thought
 Is broken ere it joins--a shrew to boot,
 Whose evil song far on into the night
 Thrills to the topmost tile--no hope but death;
 One slow, fat, white, a burthen of the hearth;
 And one that being thwarted ever swoons
 And weeps herself into the place of power;
 And one an _uxor pauperis Ibyci_.
 So rare the household honey-making bee,
 Man's help! but we, we have the Blessed Virgin
 For worship, and our Mother Church for bride;
 And all the souls we saved and father'd here
 Will greet us as our babes in Paradise.
 What noise was that? she told us of arm'd men
 Here in the city. Will you not withdraw?
 
 BECKET.
 I once was out with Henry in the days
 When Henry loved me, and we came upon
 A wild-fowl sitting on her nest, so still
 I reach'd my hand and touch'd; she did not stir;
 The snow had frozen round her, and she sat
 Stone-dead upon a heap of ice-cold eggs.
 Look! how this love, this mother, runs thro' all
 The world God made--even the beast--the bird!
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 Ay, still a lover of the beast and bird?
 But these arm'd men--will you not hide yourself?
 Perchance the fierce De Brocs from Saltwood Castle,
 To assail our Holy Mother lest she brood
 Too long o'er this hard egg, the world, and send
 Her whole heart's heat into it, till it break
 Into young angels. Pray you, hide yourself.
 
 BECKET.
 There was a little fair-hair'd Norman maid
 Lived in my mother's house: if Rosamund is
 The world's rose, as her name imports her--she
 Was the world's lily.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                       Ay, and what of her?
 
 BECKET.
 She died of leprosy.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                      I know not why
 You call these old things back again, my lord.
 
 BECKET.
 The drowning man, they say, remembers all
 The chances of his life, just ere he dies.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 Ay--but these arm'd men--will _you_ drown _yourself?_
 He loses half the meed of martyrdom
 Who will be martyr when he might escape.
 
 BECKET.
 What day of the week? Tuesday?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                                Tuesday, my lord,
 
 BECKET.
 On a Tuesday was I born, and on a Tuesday
 Baptized; and on a Tuesday did I fly
 Forth from Northampton; on a Tuesday pass'd
 From England into bitter banishment;
 On a Tuesday at Pontigny came to me
 The ghostly warning of my martyrdom;
 On a Tuesday from mine exile I return'd,
 And on a Tuesday--
 
       [TRACY _enters, then_ FITZURSE, DE BRITO, _and_
       DE MORVILLE. MONKS _following_.
 
                   --on a Tuesday----Tracy!
 
     _A long silence, broken by_ FITZURSE _saying, contemptuously,_
 
 God help thee!
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY (_aside_).
                How the good Archbishop reddens!
 He never yet could brook the note of scorn.
 
 FITZURSE.
 My lord, we bring a message from the King
 Beyond the water; will you have it alone,
 Or with these listeners near you?
 
 BECKET.
                                   As you will.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Nay, as _you_ will.
 
 BECKET.
                     Nay, as _you_ will.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                                                           Why then
 Better perhaps to speak with them apart.
 Let us withdraw.
 
         [_All go out except the four_ KNIGHTS _and_ BECKET.
 
 FITZURSE.
                  We are all alone with him.
 Shall I not smite him with his own cross-staff?
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 No, look! the door is open: let him be.
 
 FITZURSE.
 The King condemns your excommunicating----
 
 BECKET.
 This is no secret, but a public matter.
 In here again!
                 [JOHN OF SALISBURY _and_ MONKS _return_.
                Now, sirs, the King's commands!
 
 FITZURSE.
 The King beyond the water, thro' our voices,
 Commands you to be dutiful and leal
 To your young King on this side of the water,
 Not scorn him for the foibles of his youth.
 What! you would make his coronation void
 By cursing those who crown'd him. Out upon you!
 
 BECKET.
 Reginald, all men know I loved the Prince.
 His father gave him to my care, and I
 Became his second father: he had his faults,
 For which I would have laid mine own life down
 To help him from them, since indeed I loved him,
 And love him next after my lord his father.
 Rather than dim the splendour of his crown
 I fain would treble and quadruple it
 With revenues, realms, and golden provinces
 So that were done in equity.
 
 FITZURSE.
                              You have broken
 Your bond of peace, your treaty with the King--
 Wakening such brawls and loud disturbances
 In England, that he calls you oversea
 To answer for it in his Norman courts.
 
 BECKET.
 Prate not of bonds, for never, oh, never again
 Shall the waste voice of the bond-breaking sea
 Divide me from the mother church of England,
 My Canterbury. Loud disturbances!
 Oh, ay--the bells rang out even to deafening,
 Organ and pipe, and dulcimer, chants and hymns
 In all the churches, trumpets in the halls,
 Sobs, laughter, cries: they spread their raiment down
 Before me--would have made my pathway flowers,
 Save that it was mid-winter in the street,
 But full mid-summer in those honest hearts.
 
 FITZURSE.
 The King commands you to absolve the bishops
 Whom you have excommunicated.
 
 BECKET.
                               I?
 Not I, the Pope. Ask _him_ for absolution.
 
 FITZURSE.
 But you advised the Pope.
 
 BECKET.
                           And so I did.
 They have but to submit.
 
 THE FOUR KNIGHTS.
                          The King commands you.
 We are all King's men.
 
 BECKET.
                        King's men at least should know
 That their own King closed with me last July
 That I should pass the censures of the Church
 On those that crown'd young Henry in this realm,
 And trampled on the rights of Canterbury.
 
 FITZURSE.
 What! dare you charge the King with treachery?
 _He_ sanction thee to excommunicate
 The prelates whom he chose to crown his son!
 
 BECKET.
 I spake no word of treachery, Reginald.
 But for the truth of this I make appeal
 To all the archbishops, bishops, prelates, barons,
 Monks, knights, five hundred, that were there and heard.
 Nay, you yourself were there: you heard yourself.
 
 FITZURSE.
 I was not there.
 
 BECKET.
                  I saw you there.
 
 FITZURSE.
                                   I was not.
 
 BECKET.
 You were. I never forget anything.
 
 FITZURSE.
 He makes the King a traitor, me a liar.
 How long shall we forbear him?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY (_drawing_ BECKET _aside_).
                                O my good lord.
 Speak with them privately on this hereafter.
 You see they have been revelling, and I fear
 Are braced and brazen'd up with Christmas wines
 For any murderous brawl.
 
 BECKET.
                          And yet they prate
 Of mine, my brawls, when those, that name themselves
 Of the King's part, have broken down our barns,
 Wasted our diocese, outraged our tenants,
 Lifted our produce, driven our clerics out--
 Why they, your friends, those ruffians, the De Brocs,
 They stood on Dover beach to murder me,
 They slew my stags in mine own manor here,
 Mutilated, poor brute, my sumpter-mule,
 Plunder'd the vessel full of Gascon wine,
 The old King's present, carried off the casks,
 Kill'd half the crew, dungeon'd the other half
 In Pevensey Castle--
 
 DE MORVILLE.
                     Why not rather then,
 If this be so, complain to your young King,
 Not punish of your own authority?
 
 BECKET.
 Mine enemies barr'd all access to the boy.
 They knew he loved me.
 Hugh, Hugh, how proudly you exalt your head!
 Nay, when they seek to overturn our rights,
 I ask no leave of king, or mortal man,
 To set them straight again. Alone I do it.
 Give to the King the things that are the King's,
 And those of God to God.
 
 FITZURSE.
                          Threats! threats! ye hear him.
 What! will he excommunicate all the world?
 
                            [_The_ KNIGHTS _come round_ BECKET.
 
 DE TRACY.
 He shall not.
 
 DE BRITO.
               Well, as yet--I should be grateful--
 He hath not excommunicated _me_.
 
 BECKET.
 Because thou wast _born_ excommunicate.
 I never spied in thee one gleam of grace.
 
 DE BRITO.
 Your Christian's Christian charity!
 
 BECKET.
                                     By St. Denis----
 
 DE BRITO.
 Ay, by St. Denis, now will he flame out,
 And lose his head as old St. Denis did.
 
 BECKET.
 Ye think to scare me from my loyalty
 To God and to the Holy Father. No!
 Tho' all the swords in England flash'd above me
 Ready to fall at Henry's word or yours--
 Tho' all the loud-lung'd trumpets upon earth
 Blared from the heights of all the thrones of her kings,
 Blowing the world against me, I would stand
 Clothed with the full authority of Rome,
 Mail'd in the perfect panoply of faith,
 First of the foremost of their files, who die
 For God, to people heaven in the great day
 When God makes up his jewels. Once I fled--
 Never again, and you--I marvel at you--
 Ye know what is between us. Ye have sworn
 Yourselves my men when I was Chancellor--
 My vassals--and yet threaten your Archbishop
 In his own house.
 
 KNIGHTS.
                   Nothing can be between us
 That goes against our fealty to the King.
 
 FITZURSE.
 And in his name we charge you that ye keep
 This traitor from escaping.
 
 BECKET.
                             Rest you easy,
 For I am easy to keep. I shall not fly.
 Here, here, here will you find me.
 
 DE MORVILLE.
                                    Know you not
 You have spoken to the peril of your life?
 
 BECKET.
 As I shall speak again.
 
 FITZURSE, DE TRACY, _and_ DE BRITO.
                         To arms!
 
                        [_They rush out,_ DE MORVILLE _lingers_.
 
 BECKET.
                                  De Morville,
 I had thought so well of you; and even now
 You seem the least assassin of the four.
 Oh, do not damn yourself for company!
 Is it too late for me to save your soul?
 I pray you for one moment stay and speak.
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 Becket, it _is_ too late.    [_Exit_.
 
 BECKET.
                           Is it too late?
 Too late on earth may be too soon in hell.
 
 KNIGHTS (_in the distance_).
 Close the great gate--ho, there--upon the town.
 
 BECKET'S RETAINERS.
 Shut the hall-doors.    [_A pause_.
 
 BECKET.
                      You hear them, brother John;
 Why do you stand so silent, brother John?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 For I was musing on an ancient saw,
 _Suaviter in modo, fortiter in re,_
 Is strength less strong when hand-in-hand with grace?
 _Gratior in pulchro corpore virtus_. Thomas,
 Why should you heat yourself for such as these?
 
 BECKET.
 Methought I answer'd moderately enough.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 As one that blows the coal to cool the fire.
 My lord, I marvel why you never lean
 On any man's advising but your own.
 
 BECKET.
 Is it so, Dan John? well, what should I have done?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 You should have taken counsel with your friends
 Before these bandits brake into your presence.
 They seek--you make--occasion for your death.
 
 BECKET.
 My counsel is already taken, John.
 I am prepared to die.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY
                       We are sinners all,
 The best of all not all-prepared to die.
 
 BECKET.
 God's will be done!
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                     Ay, well. God's will be done!
 
 GRIM (_re-entering_).
 My lord, the knights are arming in the garden
 Beneath the sycamore.
 
 BECKET.
                       Good! let them arm.
 
 GRIM.
 And one of the De Brocs is with them, Robert,
 The apostate monk that was with Randulf here.
 He knows the twists and turnings of the place.
 
 BECKET.
 No fear!
 
 GRIM.
          No fear, my lord.
 
                   [_Crashes on the hall-doors. The_ MONKS _flee_.
 
 BECKET (_rising_).
                            Our dovecote flown!
 I cannot tell why monks should all be cowards.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 Take refuge in your own cathedral, Thomas.
 
 BECKET.
 Do they not fight the Great Fiend day by day?
 Valour and holy life should go together.
 Why should all monks be cowards?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                                  Are they so?
 I say, take refuge in your own cathedral.
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, but I told them I would wait them here.
 
 GRIM.
 May they not say you dared not show yourself
 In your old place? and vespers are beginning.
             [_Bell rings for vespers till end of scene_.
 You should attend the office, give them heart.
 They fear you slain: they dread they know not what.
 
 BECKET.
 Ay, monks, not men.
 
 GRIM.
                     I am a monk, my lord,
 Perhaps, my lord, you wrong us.
 Some would stand by you to the death.
 
 BECKET.
                                       Your pardon.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 He said, 'Attend the office.'
 
 BECKET.
                               Attend the office?
 Why then--The Cross!--who bears my Cross before me?
 Methought they would have brain'd me with it, John.
 
                                      [GRIM _takes it_.
 
 GRIM.
 I! Would that I could bear thy cross indeed!
 
 BECKET.
 The Mitre!
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
            Will you wear it?--there!
 
                             [BECKET _puts on the mitre_.
 
 BECKET.
                                      The Pall!
 I go to meet my King!    [_Puts on the pall_.
 
 GRIM.
                       To meet the King?
                         [_Crashes on the doors as they go out_.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 Why do you move with such a stateliness?
 Can you not hear them yonder like a storm,
 Battering the doors, and breaking thro' the walls?
 
 BECKET.
 Why do the heathen rage? My two good friends,
 What matters murder'd here, or murder'd there?
 And yet my dream foretold my martyrdom
 In mine own church. It is God's will. Go on.
 Nay, drag me not. We must not seem to fly.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--_North Transept of Canterbury Cathedral. On the right hand
 a flight of steps leading to the Choir, another flight on the left,
 leading to the North Aisle. Winter afternoon slowly darkening. Low
 thunder now and then of an approaching storm_. MONKS _heard chanting
 the service_. ROSAMUND _kneeling_.
 
 
 ROSAMUND.
 O blessed saint, O glorious Benedict,--
 These arm'd men in the city, these fierce faces--
 Thy holy follower founded Canterbury--
 Save that dear head which now is Canterbury,
 Save him, he saved my life, he saved my child,
 Save him, his blood would darken Henry's name;
 Save him till all as saintly as thyself
 He miss the searching flame of purgatory,
 And pass at once perfect to Paradise.
          [_Noise of steps and voices in the cloisters_.
 Hark! Is it they? Coming! He is not here--
 Not yet, thank heaven. O save him!
                          [_Goes up steps leading to choir_.
 
 BECKET (_entering, forced along by_ JOHN OF SALISBURY _and_ GRIM).
                                    No, I tell you!
 I cannot bear a hand upon my person,
 Why do you force me thus against my will?
 
 GRIM.
 My lord, we force you from your enemies.
 
 BECKET.
 As you would force a king from being crown'd.
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
 We must not force the crown of martyrdom.
 
     [_Service stops_. MONKS _come down from the
     stairs that lead to the choir_.
 
 MONKS.
 Here is the great Archbishop! He lives! he lives!
 Die with him, and be glorified together.
 
 BECKET.
 Together?... get you back! go on with the office.
 
 MONKS.
 Come, then, with us to vespers.
 
 BECKET.
                                 How can I come
 When you so block the entry? Back, I say!
 Go on with the office. Shall not Heaven be served
 Tho' earth's last earthquake clash'd the minster-bells,
 And the great deeps were broken up again,
 And hiss'd against the sun?    [_Noise in the cloisters_.
 
 MONKS.
                             The murderers, hark!
 Let us hide! let us hide!
 
 BECKET.
                           What do these people fear?
 
 MONKS.
 Those arm'd men in the cloister.
 
 BECKET.
                                  Be not such cravens!
 I will go out and meet them.
 
 GRIM _and others_.
                              Shut the doors!
 We will not have him slain before our face.
        [_They close the doors of the transept. Knocking_.
 Fly, fly, my lord, before they burst the doors!
                                         [_Knocking_.
 
 BECKET.
 Why, these are our own monks who follow'd us!
 And will you bolt them out, and have _them_ slain?
 Undo the doors: the church is not a castle:
 Knock, and it shall be open'd. Are you deaf?
 What, have I lost authority among you?
 Stand by, make way!
       [_Opens the doors. Enter_ MONKS _from cloister_.
                     Come in, my friends, come in!
 Nay, faster, faster!
 
 MONKS.
                      Oh, my lord Archbishop,
 A score of knights all arm'd with swords and axes--
 To the choir, to the choir!
 
     [_Monks divide, part flying by the stairs on the
     right, part by those on the left. The rush of
     these last bears_ BECKET _along with them some
     way up the steps, where he is left standing alone_.
 
 BECKET.
                             Shall I too pass to the choir,
 And die upon the Patriarchal throne
 Of all my predecessors?
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY.
                         No, to the crypt!
 Twenty steps down. Stumble not in the darkness,
 Lest they should seize thee.
 
 GRIM.
                              To the crypt? no--no,
 To the chapel of St. Blaise beneath the roof!
 
 JOHN OF SALISBURY (_pointing upward and downward_).
 That way, or this! Save thyself either way.
 
 BECKET.
 Oh, no, not either way, nor any way
 Save by that way which leads thro' night to light.
 Not twenty steps, but one.
 And fear not I should stumble in the darkness,
 Not tho' it be their hour, the power of darkness,
 But my hour too, the power of light in darkness!
 I am not in the darkness but the light,
 Seen by the Church in Heaven, the Church on earth--
 The power of life in death to make her free!
 
     [_Enter the four_ KNIGHTS. JOHN OF SALISBURY
     _flies to the altar of St. Benedict_.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Here, here, King's men!
     [Catches hold of the last flying MONK.
                         Where is the traitor Becket?
 
 MONK.
 I am not he! I am not he, my lord.
 I am not he indeed!
 
 FITZURSE.
                     Hence to the fiend!
                             [_Pushes him away_.
 Where is this treble traitor to the King?
 
 DE TRACY.
 Where is the Archbishop, Thomas Becket?
 
 BECKET.
                                         Here.
 No traitor to the King, but Priest of God,
 Primate of England.
                      [_Descending into the transept_.
                     I am he ye seek.
 What would ye have of me?
 
 FlTZURSE.
                           Your life.
 
 DE TRACY.
                                      Your life.
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 Save that you will absolve the bishops.
 
 BECKET.
                                         Never,--
 Except they make submission to the Church.
 You had my answer to that cry before.
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 Why, then you are a dead man; flee!
 
 BECKET.
                                     I will not.
 I am readier to be slain, than thou to slay.
 Hugh, I know well thou hast but half a heart
 To bathe this sacred pavement with my blood.
 God pardon thee and these, but God's full curse
 Shatter you all to pieces if ye harm
 One of my flock!
 
 FITZURSE.
                  Was not the great gate shut?
 They are thronging in to vespers--half the town.
 We shall be overwhelm'd. Seize him and carry him!
 Come with us--nay--thou art our prisoner--come!
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 Ay, make him prisoner, do not harm the man.
 
       [FITZURSE _lays hold of the_ ARCHBISHOP'S _pall_.
 
 BECKET.
 Touch me not!
 
 DE BRITO.
               How the good priest gods himself!
 He is not yet ascended to the Father.
 
 FITZURSE.
 I will not only touch, but drag thee hence.
 
 BECKET.
 Thou art my man, thou art my vassal. Away!
        [_Flings him off till he reels, almost to falling_.
 
 DE TRACY (_lays hold of the pall_).
 Come; as he said, thou art our prisoner.
 
 BECKET.
                                          Down!
                             [_Throws him headlong_.
 
 FITZURSE (_advances with drawn sword_).
 I told thee that I should remember thee!
 
 BECKET.
 Profligate pander!
 
 FITZURSE.
                    Do you hear that? strike, strike.
 
     [_Strikes off the_ ARCHBISHOP'S _mitre, and wounds
     him in the forehead_.
 
 BECKET (_covers his eyes with his hand_).
 I do commend my cause to God, the Virgin,
 St. Denis of France and St. Alphege of England,
 And all the tutelar Saints of Canterbury.
                [GRIM _wraps his arms about the_ ARCHBISHOP.
 Spare this defence, dear brother.
 
     [TRACY _has arisen, and approaches, hesitatingly,
     with his sword raised_.
 
 FITZURSE.
                                   Strike him, Tracy!
 
 ROSAMUND (_rushing down steps from the choir)_.
 No, No, No, No!
 
 FlTZURSE.
                 This wanton here. De Morville,
 Hold her away.
 
 DE MORVILLE.
                I hold her.
 
 ROSAMUND (_held back by_ DE MORVILLE, _and stretching out her arms)_.
                            Mercy, mercy,
 As you would hope for mercy.
 
 FlTZURSE.
                              Strike, I say.
 
 GRIM.
 O God, O noble knights, O sacrilege!
 Strike our Archbishop in his own cathedral!
 The Pope, the King, will curse you--the whole world
 Abhor you; ye will die the death of dogs!
 Nay, nay, good Tracy.    [_Lifts his arm_.
 
 FlTZURSE.
                       Answer not, but strike.
 
 DE TRACY.
 There is my answer then.
 
     [_Sword falls on_ GRIM'S _arm, and glances from it,
     wounding_ BECKET.
 
 GRIM.
                          Mine arm is sever'd.
 I can no more--fight out the good fight--die
 Conqueror.    [_Staggers into the chapel of St. Benedict_.
 
 BECKET (_falling on his knees_).
            At the right hand of Power--
 Power and great glory--for thy Church, O Lord--
 Into Thy hands, O Lord--into Thy hands!----
                                             [_Sinks prone_.
 
 DE BRITO.
 This last to rid thee of a world of brawls! (_Kills him_.)
 The traitor's dead, and will arise no more.
 
 FITZURSE.
 Nay, have we still'd him? What! the great Archbishop!
 Does he breathe? No?
 
 DE TRACY.
                      No, Reginald, he is dead.
 
 (_Storm bursts_.) [Footnote: _A tremendous thunderstorm actually
 broke over the Cathedral as the murderers were leaving it.]
 
 DE MORVILLE.
 Will the earth gape and swallow us?
 
 DE BRITO.
                                     The deed's done--
 Away!
 
     [DE BRITO, DE TRACY, FITZURSE. _rush out, crying
     'King's men!'_ DE MORVILLE _follows slowly.
     Flashes of lightning thro' the Cathedral_.
     ROSAMUND _seen kneeling by the body of_ BECKET.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE CUP
 
 A TRAGEDY
 
 
 
 _DRAMATIS PERSONAE_.
 
 
 GALATIANS.
 
 SYNORIX, _an ex-Tetrarch_.
 SINNATUS, _a Tetrarch_.
 _Attendant_.
 _Boy_.
 _Maid_.
 PHOEBE.
 CAMMA, _wife of Sinnatus, afterwards Priestess in the Temple of
     Artemis_.
 
 ROMANS.
 
 ANTONIUS, _a Roman General_.
 PUBLIUS.
 _Nobleman_.
 _Messenger_.
 
 
 
 THE CUP.
 
 
 
 
 ACT I.
 
 
 SCENE I.--_Distant View of a City of Galatia_.
 
 As the curtain rises, Priestesses are heard singing in the Temple. Boy
 discovered on a pathway among Rocks, picking grapes. A party of Roman
 Soldiers, guarding a prisoner in chains, come down the pathway and
 exeunt.
 
 
     _Enter_ SYNORIX (_looking round_). _Singing ceases_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Pine, beech and plane, oak, walnut, apricot,
 Vine, cypress, poplar, myrtle, bowering in
 The city where she dwells. She past me here
 Three years ago when I was flying from
 My Tetrarchy to Rome. I almost touch'd her--
 A maiden slowly moving on to music
 Among her maidens to this Temple--O Gods!
 She is my fate--else wherefore has my fate
 Brought me again to her own city?--married
 Since--married Sinnatus, the Tetrarch here--
 But if he be conspirator, Rome will chain,
 Or slay him. I may trust to gain her then
 When I shall have my tetrarchy restored
 By Rome, our mistress, grateful that I show'd her
 The weakness and the dissonance of our clans,
 And how to crush them easily. Wretched race!
 And once I wish'd to scourge them to the bones.
 But in this narrow breathing-time of life
 Is vengeance for its own sake worth the while,
 If once our ends are gain'd? and now this cup--
 I never felt such passion for a woman.
         [_Brings out a cup and scroll from under his cloak_.
 What have I written to her?
 
                                [_Reading the scroll_.
 
 'To the admired Gamma, wife of Sinnatus, the Tetrarch, one who years
 ago, himself an adorer of our great goddess, Artemis, beheld you afar
 off worshipping in her Temple, and loved you for it, sends you this
 cup rescued from the burning of one of her shrines in a city thro'
 which he past with the Roman army: it is the cup we use in our
 marriages. Receive it from one who cannot at present write himself
 other than    'A GALATIAN SERVING BY FORCE IN THE ROMAN LEGION.'
 
                          [_Turns and looks up to Boy_.
 
 Boy, dost thou know the house of Sinnatus?
 
 BOY.
 These grapes are for the house of Sinnatus--
 Close to the Temple.
 
 SYNORIX.
                      Yonder?
 
 BOY.
                              Yes.
 
 SYNORIX (_aside_).
                                   That I
 With all my range of women should yet shun
 To meet her face to face at once! My boy,
                    [_Boy comes down rocks to him_.
 Take thou this letter and this cup to Camma,
 The wife of Sinnatus.
 
 BOY.
                       Going or gone to-day
 To hunt with Sinnatus.
 
 SYNORIX.
                        That matters not.
 Take thou this cup and leave it at her doors.
              [_Gives the cup and scroll to the Boy_.
 
 BOY.
 I will, my lord.    [_Takes his basket of grapes and exit_.
 
     _Enter_ ANTONIUS.
 
 ANTONIUS (_meeting the Boy as he goes out_).
                  Why, whither runs the boy?
 Is that the cup you rescued from the fire?
 
 SYNORIX.
 I send it to the wife of Sinnatus,
 One half besotted in religious rites.
 You come here with your soldiers to enforce
 The long-withholden tribute: you suspect
 This Sinnatus of playing patriotism,
 Which in your sense is treason. You have yet
 No proof against him: now this pious cup
 Is passport to their house, and open arms
 To him who gave it; and once there I warrant
 I worm thro' all their windings.
 
 ANTONIUS.
                                  If you prosper,
 Our Senate, wearied of their tetrarchies,
 Their quarrels with themselves, their spites at Rome,
 Is like enough to cancel them, and throne
 One king above them all, who shall be true
 To the Roman: and from what I heard in Rome,
 This tributary crown may fall to you.
 
 SYNORIX.
 The king, the crown! their talk in Rome? is it so?
                                       [ANTONIUS _nods_.
 Well--I shall serve Galatia taking it,
 And save her from herself, and be to Rome
 More faithful than a Roman.
                   [_Turns and sees_ CAMMA _coming_.
                            Stand aside,
 Stand aside; here she comes!
              [_Watching_ CAMMA _as she enters with her Maid_.
 
 GAMMA (_to Maid_).
 Where is he, girl?
 
 MAID.
                    You know the waterfall
 That in the summer keeps the mountain side,
 But after rain o'erleaps a jutting rock
 And shoots three hundred feet.
 
 CAMMA.
                               The stag is there?
 
 MAID.
 Seen in the thicket at the bottom there
 But yester-even.
 
 GAMMA.
                 Good then, we will climb
 The mountain opposite and watch the chase.
                 [_They descend the rocks and exeunt_.
 
 SYNORIX (_watching her_).
 (_Aside_.) The bust of Juno and the brows and eyes
 Of Venus; face and form unmatchable!
 
 ANTONIUS.
 Why do you look at her so lingeringly?
 
 SYNORIX.
 To see if years have changed her.
 
 ANTONIUS (_sarcastically_).
                                  Love her, do you?
 
 SYNORIX.
 I envied Sinnatus when he married her.
 
 ANTONIUS.
 She knows it? Ha!
 
 SYNORIX.
                   She--no, nor ev'n my face.
 
 ANTONIUS.
 Nor Sinnatus either?
 
 SYNORIX.
                      No, nor Sinnatus.
 
 ANTONIUS.
 Hot-blooded! I have heard them say in Rome.
 That your own people cast you from their bounds,
 For some unprincely violence to a woman,
 As Rome did Tarquin.
 
 SYNORIX.
                      Well, if this were so,
 I here return like Tarquin--for a crown.
 
 ANTONIUS.
 And may be foil'd like Tarquin, if you follow
 Not the dry light of Rome's straight-going policy,
 But the fool-fire of love or lust, which well
 May make you lose yourself, may even drown you
 In the good regard of Rome.
 
 SYNORIX.
                             Tut--fear me not;
 I ever had my victories among women.
 I am most true to Rome.
 
 ANTONIUS (_aside_).
                         I hate the man!
 What filthy tools our Senate works with! Still
 I must obey them. (_Aloud_.) Fare you well.    [_Going_.
 
 SYNORIX.
                                             Farewell!
 
 ANTONIUS (_stopping_).
 A moment! If you track this Sinnatus
 In any treason, I give you here an order
                                     [_Produces a paper_.
 To seize upon him. Let me sign it. (_Signs it_.) There
 'Antonius leader of the Roman Legion.'
          [_Hands the paper to_ SYNORIX. _Goes up pathway and exit_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Woman again!--but I am wiser now.
 No rushing on the game--the net,--the net.
     [_Shouts of_ 'Sinnatus! Sinnatus!' _Then horn. Looking off
 stage_.]
 He comes, a rough, bluff, simple-looking fellow.
 If we may judge the kernel by the husk,
 Not one to keep a woman's fealty when
 Assailed by Craft and Love. I'll join with him:
 I may reap something from him--come upon _her_
 Again, perhaps, to-day--_her_. Who are with him?
 I see no face that knows me. Shall I risk it?
 I am a Roman now, they dare not touch me.
 I will.
 
     _Enter_ SINNATUS, HUNTSMEN _and hounds_.
 
         Fair Sir, a happy day to you!
 You reck but little of the Roman here,
 While you can take your pastime in the woods.
 
 SlNNATUS.
 Ay, ay, why not? What would you with me, man?
 
 SYNORIX.
 I am a life-long lover of the chase,
 And tho' a stranger fain would be allow'd
 To join the hunt.
 
 SlNNATUS.
                   Your name?
 
 SYNORIX.
                              Strato, my name.
 
 SlNNATUS.
 No Roman name?
 
 SYNORIX.
                A Greek, my lord; you know
 That we Galatians are both Greek and Gaul.
                             [_Shouts and horns in the distance
 
 SINNATUS.
 Hillo, the stag! (_To_ SYNORIX.) What, you are all unfurnish'd?
 Give him a bow and arrows--follow--follow.
                                      [_Exit, followed by Huntsmen_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Slowly but surely--till I see my way.
 It is the one step in the dark beyond
 Our expectation, that amazes us.
                       [_Distant shouts and horns_.
 Hillo! Hillo!
                  [_Exit_ SYNORIX. _Shouts and horns_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--_A Room in the Tetrarch's House_.
 
 Frescoed figures on the walls. Evening. Moonlight outside. A couch
 with cushions on it. A small table with flagon of wine, cups, plate of
 grapes, etc., also the cup of Scene I. A chair with drapery on it.
 
 
 CAMMA _enters, and opens' curtains of window_.
 
 CAMMA.
 No Sinnatus yet--and there the rising moon.
       [_Takes up a cithern and sits on couch. Plays and sings_.
 
     'Moon on the field and the foam,
       Moon on the waste and the wold,
     Moon bring him home, bring him home
       Safe from the dark and the cold,
     Home, sweet moon, bring him home,
       Home with the flock to the fold--
     Safe from the wolf'----
 
 (_Listening_.) Is he coming? I thought I heard
 A footstep. No not yet. They say that Rome
 Sprang from a wolf. I fear my dear lord mixt
 With some conspiracy against the wolf.
 This mountain shepherd never dream'd of Rome.
 (_Sings_.) 'Safe from the wolf to the fold'----
 And that great break of precipice that runs
 Thro' all the wood, where twenty years ago
 Huntsman, and hound, and deer were all neck-broken!
 Nay, here he comes.
 
     _Enter_ SINNATUS _followed by_ SYNORIX.
 
 SINNATUS (_angrily_).
                    I tell thee, my good fellow,
 My arrow struck the stag.
 
 SYNORIX.
                           But was it so?
 Nay, you were further off: besides the wind
 Went with _my_ arrow.
 
 SINNATUS.
                        I am sure _I_ struck him.
 
 SYNORIX.
 And I am just as sure, my lord, _I_ struck him.
 (_Aside_.) And I may strike your game when you are gone.
 
 CAMMA.
 Come, come, we will not quarrel about the stag.
 I have had a weary day in watching you.
 Yours must have been a wearier. Sit and eat,
 And take a hunter's vengeance on the meats.
 
 SINNATUS.
 No, no--we have eaten--we are heated. Wine!
 
 CAMMA.
 Who is our guest?
 
 SINNATUS.
                   Strato he calls himself.
 
       [CAMMA _offers wine to_ SYNORIX, _while_ SINNATUS _helps
 himself_.
 
 SINNATUS.
 I pledge you, Strato.    [_Drinks_.
 
 SYNORIX.
                       And I you, my lord.    [_Drinks_.
 
 SINNATUS (_seeing the cup sent to_ CAMMA).
 What's here?
 
 CAMMA.
              A strange gift sent to me to-day.
 A sacred cup saved from a blazing shrine
 Of our great Goddess, in some city where
 Antonius past. I had believed that Rome
 Made war upon the peoples not the Gods.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Most like the city rose against Antonius,
 Whereon he fired it, and the sacred shrine
 By chance was burnt along with it.
 
 SINNATUS.
                                    Had you then
 No message with the cup?
 
 CAMMA.
                          Why, yes, see here.
                                     [_Gives him the scroll_.
 
 SINNATUS (_reads_).
 'To the admired Camma,--beheld you afar off--loved you--sends you this
 cup--the cup we use in our marriages--cannot at present write himself
 other than
                     'A GALATIAN SERVING BY FORCE IN THE ROMAN LEGION.'
 
 Serving by force! Were there no boughs to hang on,
 Rivers to drown in? Serve by force? No force
 Could make me serve by force.
 
 SYNORIX.
                               How then, my lord?
 The Roman is encampt without your city--
 The force of Rome a thousand-fold our own.
 Must all Galatia hang or drown herself?
 And you a Prince and Tetrarch in this province--
 
 SINNATUS.
 Province!
 
 SYNORIX.
           Well, well, they call it so in Rome.
 
 SINNATUS (_angrily_).
 Province!
 
 SYNORIX.
           A noble anger! but Antonius
 To-morrow will demand your tribute--you,
 Can you make war? Have you alliances?
 Bithynia, Pontus, Paphlagonia?
 We have had our leagues of old with Eastern kings.
 There is my hand--if such a league there be.
 What will you do?
 
 SINNATUS.
                    Not set myself abroach
 And run my mind out to a random guest
 Who join'd me in the hunt. You saw my hounds
 True to the scent; and we have two-legg'd dogs
 Among us who can smell a true occasion,
 And when to bark and how.
 
 SYNORIX.
                           My good Lord Sinnatus,
 I once was at the hunting of a lion.
 Roused by the clamour of the chase he woke,
 Came to the front of the wood--his monarch mane
 Bristled about his quick ears--he stood there
 Staring upon the hunter. A score of dogs
 Gnaw'd at his ankles: at the last he felt
 The trouble of his feet, put forth one paw,
 Slew four, and knew it not, and so remain'd
 Staring upon the hunter: and this Rome
 Will crush you if you wrestle with her; then
 Save for some slight report in her own Senate
 Scarce know what she has done.
 (_Aside_.) Would I could move him,
 Provoke him any way! (_Aloud_.) The Lady Camma,
 Wise I am sure as she is beautiful,
 Will close with me that to submit at once
 Is better than a wholly-hopeless war,
 Our gallant citizens murder'd all in vain,
 Son, husband, brother gash'd to death in vain,
 And the small state more cruelly trampled on
 Than had she never moved.
 
 CAMMA.
 Sir, I had once
 A boy who died a babe; but were he living
 And grown to man and Sinnatus will'd it, I
 Would set him in the front rank of the fight
 With scarce a pang. (_Rises_.) Sir, if a state submit
 At once, she may be blotted out at once
 And swallow'd in the conqueror's chronicle.
 Whereas in wars of freedom and defence
 The glory and grief of battle won or lost
 Solders a race together--yea--tho' they fail,
 The names of those who fought and fell are like
 A bank'd-up fire that flashes out again
 From century to century, and at last
 May lead them on to victory--I hope so--
 Like phantoms of the Gods.
 
 SINNATUS.
                            Well spoken, wife.
 
 SYNORIX (_bowing_).
 Madam, so well I yield.
 
 SINNATUS.
                         I should not wonder
 If Synorix, who has dwelt three years in Rome
 And wrought his worst against his native land.
 Returns with this Antonius.
 
 SYNORIX.
                             What is Synorix?
 
 SINNATUS.
 Galatian, and not know? This Synorix
 Was Tetrarch here, and tyrant also--did
 Dishonour to our wives.
 
 SYNORIX.
                         Perhaps you judge him
 With feeble charity: being as you tell me
 Tetrarch, there might be willing wives enough
 To feel dishonour, honour.
 
 CAMMA.
                            Do not say so.
 I know of no such wives in all Galatia.
 There may be courtesans for aught I know
 Whose life is one dishonour.
 
     _Enter_ ATTENDANT.
 
 ATTENDANT (_aside_).
                              My lord, the men!
 
 SINNATUS (_aside_).
 Our anti-Roman faction?
 
 ATTENDANT (_aside_).
                         Ay, my lord.
 
 SYNORIX (_overhearing_).
 (_Aside_.) I have enough--their anti-Roman faction.
 
 SINNATUS (_aloud_).
 Some friends of mine would speak with me without.
 You, Strato, make good cheer till I return.
                                        [_Exit_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 I have much to say, no time to say it in.
 First, lady, know myself am that Galatian
 Who sent the cup.
 
 CAMMA.
                   I thank you from my heart.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Then that I serve with Rome to serve Galatia.
 That is my secret: keep it, or you sell me
 To torment and to death.    [_Coming closer_.
 For your ear only--
 I love you--for your love to the great Goddess.
 The Romans sent me here a spy upon you,
 To draw you and your husband to your doom.
 I'd sooner die than do it.
                [_Takes out paper given him by Antonius_.
 This paper sign'd
 Antonius--will you take it, read it? there!
 
 CAMMA.
 (_Reads_.) 'You are to seize on Sinnatus,--if----'
 
 SYNORIX. (_Snatches paper_.)
                                                    No more.
 What follows is for no wife's eyes. O Camma,
 Rome has a glimpse of this conspiracy;
 Rome never yet hath spar'd conspirator.
 Horrible! flaying, scourging, crucifying------
 
 CAMMA.
 I am tender enough. Why do you practise on me?
 
 SYNORIX.
 Why should I practise on you? How you wrong me!
 I am sure of being every way malign'd.
 And if you should betray me to your husband------
 
 CAMMA.
 Will _you_ betray him by this order?
 
 SYNORIX.
                                      See,
 I tear it all to pieces, never dream'd
 Of acting on it.    [_Tears the paper_.
 
 CAMMA.
 I owe you thanks for ever.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Hath Sinnatus never told you of this plot?
 
 CAMMA.
 What plot?
 
 SYNORIX.
            A child's sand-castle on the beach
 For the next wave--all seen,--all calculated,
 All known by Rome. No chance for Sinnatus.
 
 CAMMA.
 Why said you not as much to my brave Sinnatus?
 
 SYNORIX.
 Brave--ay--too brave, too over-confident,
 Too like to ruin himself, and you, and me!
 Who else, with this black thunderbolt of Rome
 Above him, would have chased the stag to-day
 In the full face of all the Roman camp?
 A miracle that they let him home again,
 Not caught, maim'd, blinded him.
 
       [CAMMA _shudders_.
 
 (_Aside_.) I have made her tremble.
 (_Aloud_.) I know they mean to torture him to death.
 I dare not tell him how I came to know it;
 I durst not trust him with--my serving Rome
 To serve Galatia: you heard him on the letter.
 Not say as much? I all but said as much.
 I am sure I told him that his plot was folly.
 I say it to you--you are wiser--Rome knows all,
 But you know not the savagery of Rome.
 
 CAMMA.
 O--have you power with Rome? use it for him!
 
 SYNORIX.
 Alas! I have no such power with Rome. All that
 Lies with Antonius.
 
       [_As if struck by a sudden thought. Comes over to her_.
 
 He will pass to-morrow
 In the gray dawn before the Temple doors.
 You have beauty,--O great beauty,--and Antonius,
 So gracious toward women, never yet
 Flung back a woman's prayer. Plead to him,
 I am sure you will prevail.
 
 CAMMA.
                              Still--I should tell
 My husband.
 
 SYNORIX.
             Will he let you plead for him
 To a Roman?
 
 CAMMA.
             I fear not.
 
 SYNORIX.
                         Then do not tell him.
 Or tell him, if you will, when you return,
 When you have charm'd our general into mercy,
 And all is safe again. O dearest lady,
 
         [_Murmurs of_ 'Synorix! Synorix!' _heard outside_.
 
 Think,--torture,--death,--and come.
 
 CAMMA.
                                     I will, I will.
 And I will not betray you.
 
 SYNORIX (_aside_).
 (_As_ SINNATUS _enters_.)  Stand apart.
 
     _Enter_ SINNATUS _and_ ATTENDANT.
 
 SINNATUS.
 Thou art that Synorix! One whom thou hast wrong'd
 Without there, knew thee with Antonius.
 They howl for thee, to rend thee head from limb.
 
 SYNORIX.
 I am much malign'd. I thought to serve Galatia.
 
 SINNATUS.
 Serve thyself first, villain! They shall not harm
 My guest within my house. There! (_points to door_) there! this door
 Opens upon the forest! Out, begone!
 Henceforth I am thy mortal enemy.
 
 SYNORIX.
 However I thank thee (_draws his sword_); thou hast
 saved my life.
                   [_Exit_.
 
 SINNATUS. (_To Attendant_.)
 Return and tell them Synorix is not here.    [_Exit Attendant_.
 What did that villain Synorix say to you?
 
 GAMMA.
 Is _he--that_--Synorix?
 
 SINNATUS.
                         Wherefore should you doubt it?
 One of the men there knew him.
 
 CAMMA.
                                Only one,
 And he perhaps mistaken in the face.
 
 SINNATUS.
 Come, come, could he deny it? What did he say?
 
 CAMMA.
 What _should_ he say?
 
 SINNATUS.
                       What _should_ he say, my wife!
 He should say this, that being Tetrarch once
 His own true people cast him from their doors
 Like a base coin.
 
 CAMMA.
                   Not kindly to them?
 
 SINNATUS.
                                       Kindly?
 O the most kindly Prince in all the world!
 Would clap his honest citizens on the back,
 Bandy their own rude jests with them, be curious
 About the welfare of their babes, their wives,
 O ay--their wives--their wives. What should he say?
 He should say nothing to my wife if I
 Were by to throttle him! He steep'd himself
 In all the lust of Rome. How should _you_ guess
 What manner of beast it is?
 
 CAMMA.
                             Yet he seem'd kindly,
 And said he loathed the cruelties that Rome
 Wrought on her vassals.
 
 SINNATUS.
                         Did he, _honest_ man?
 
 CAMMA.
 And you, that seldom brook the stranger here,
 Have let him hunt the stag with you to-day.
 
 SINNATUS.
 I warrant you now, he said _he_ struck the stag.
 
 CAMMA.
 Why no, he never touch'd upon the stag.
 
 SINNATUS.
 Why so I said, _my_ arrow. Well, to sleep.
                          [_Goes to close door_.
 
 CAMMA.
 Nay, close not yet the door upon a night
 That looks half day.
 
 SINNATUS.
                      True; and my friends may spy him
 And slay him as he runs.
 
 CAMMA.
                          He is gone already.
 Oh look,--yon grove upon the mountain,--white
 In the sweet moon as with a lovelier snow!
 But what a blotch of blackness underneath!
 Sinnatus, you remember--yea, you must,
 That there three years ago--the vast vine-bowers
 Ran to the summit of the trees, and dropt
 Their streamers earthward, which a breeze of May
 Took ever and anon, and open'd out
 The purple zone of hill and heaven; there
 You told your love; and like the swaying vines--
 Yea,--with our eyes,--our hearts, our prophet hopes
 Let in the happy distance, and that all
 But cloudless heaven which we have found together
 In our three married years! You kiss'd me there
 For the first time. Sinnatus, kiss me now.
 
 SINNATUS.
 First kiss. (_Kisses her_.) There then. You talk almost as if it
 Might be the last.
 
 CAMMA.
                    Will you not eat a little?
 
 SINNATUS.
 No, no, we found a goat-herd's hut and shared
 His fruits and milk. Liar! You will believe
 Now that he never struck the stag--a brave one
 Which you shall see to-morrow.
 
 CAMMA.
                                I rise to-morrow
 In the gray dawn, and take this holy cup
 To lodge it in the shrine of Artemis.
 
 SINNATUS.
 Good!
 
 CAMMA.
       If I be not back in half an hour,
 Come after me.
 
 SINNATUS.
                What! is there danger?
 
 CAMMA.
                                       Nay,
 None that I know: 'tis but a step from here
 To the Temple.
 
 SINNATUS.
                All my brain is full of sleep.
 Wake me before you go, I'll after you--
 After _me_ now!    [_Closes door and exit_.
 
 CAMMA (_drawing curtains_).
                 Your shadow. Synorix--
 His face was not malignant, and he said
 That men malign'd him. Shall I go? Shall I go?
 Death, torture--
 'He never yet flung back a woman's prayer'--
 I go, but I will have my dagger with me.
 
                                   [_Exit_.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--_Same as Scene I. Dawn_.
 
 Music and Singing in the Temple.
 
 
     _Enter_ SYNORIX _watchfully, after him_ PUBLIUS _and_ SOLDIERS.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Publius!
 
 PUBLIUS.
          Here!
 
 SYNORIX.
                Do you remember what
 I told you?
 
 PUBLIUS.
             When you cry 'Rome, Rome,' to seize
 On whomsoever may be talking with you,
 Or man, or woman, as traitors unto Rome.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Right. Back again. How many of you are there?
 
 PUBLIUS.
 Some half a score.
                       [_Exeunt Soldiers and Publius_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 I have my guard about me.
 I need not fear the crowd that hunted me
 Across the woods, last night. I hardly gain'd
 The camp at midnight. Will she come to me
 Now that she knows me Synorix? Not if Sinnatus
 Has told her all the truth about me. Well,
 I cannot help the mould that I was cast in.
 I fling all that upon my fate, my star.
 I know that I am genial, I would be
 Happy, and make all others happy so
 They did not thwart me. Nay, she will not come.
 Yet if she be a true and loving wife
 She may, perchance, to save this husband. Ay!
 See, see, my white bird stepping toward the snare.
 Why now I count it all but miracle,
 That this brave heart of mine should shake me so,
 As helplessly as some unbearded boy's
 When first he meets his maiden in a bower.
 
     _Enter_ CAMMA (_with cup_).
 
 SYNORIX.
 The lark first takes the sunlight on his wing,
 But you, twin sister of the morning star,
 Forelead the sun.
 
 CAMMA.
                   Where is Antonius?
 
 SYNORIX.
 Not here as yet. You are too early for him.
                    [_She crosses towards Temple_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Nay, whither go you now?
 
 CAMMA.
                          To lodge this cup
 Within the holy shrine of Artemis,
 And so return.
 
 SYNORIX.
                To find Antonius here.
 
       [_She goes into the Temple, he looks after her_.
 
 The loveliest life that ever drew the light
 From heaven to brood upon her, and enrich
 Earth with her shadow! I trust she _will_ return.
 These Romans dare not violate the Temple.
 No, I must lure my game into the camp.
 A woman I could live and die for. What!
 Die for a woman, what new faith is this?
 I am not mad, not sick, not old enough
 To doat on one alone. Yes, mad for her,
 Camma the stately, Camma the great-hearted,
 So mad, I fear some strange and evil chance
 Coming upon me, for by the Gods I seem
 Strange to myself.
 
     _Re-enter_ CAMMA.
 
 CAMMA.
                    Where is Antonius?
 
 SYNORIX.
 Where? As I said before, you are still too early.
 
 CAMMA.
 Too early to be here alone with thee;
 For whether men malign thy name, or no,
 It bears an evil savour among women.
 Where is Antonius?    (_Loud_.)
 
 SYNORIX.
                    Madam, as you know
 The camp is half a league without the city;
 If you will walk with me we needs must meet
 Antonius coming, or at least shall find him
 There in the camp.
 
 CAMMA.
                    No, not one step with thee.
 Where is Antonius?    (_Louder_.)
 
 SYNORIX (_advancing towards her_).
                    Then for your own sake,
 Lady, I say it with all gentleness,
 And for the sake of Sinnatus your husband,
 I must compel you.
 
 CAMMA (_drawing her dagger_).
                    Stay!--too near is death.
 
 SYNORIX (_disarming her_).
 Is it not easy to disarm a woman?
 
     _Enter_ SINNATUS (_seizes him from behind by the throat_).
 
 SYNORIX (_throttled and scarce audible_).
 Rome! Rome!
 
 SINNATUS.
             Adulterous dog!
 
 SYNORIX (_stabbing him with_ CAMMA'S _dagger_).
                             What! will you have it?
 
             [CAMMA _utters a cry and runs to_ SINNATUS.
 
 SINNATUS (_falls backward_).
 I have it in my heart--to the Temple--fly--
 For _my_ sake--or they seize on thee. Remember!
 Away--farewell!    [_Dies_.
 
 CAMMA (_runs up the steps into the Temple, looking back_).
 Farewell!
 
 SYNORIX (_seeing her escape_).
 The women of the Temple drag her in.
 Publius! Publius! No,
 Antonius would not suffer me to break
 Into the sanctuary. She hath escaped.
                        [_Looking down at_ SINNATUS.
 'Adulterous dog!' that red-faced rage at me!
 Then with one quick short stab--eternal peace.
 So end all passions. Then what use in passions?
 To warm the cold bounds of our dying life
 And, lest we freeze in mortal apathy,
 Employ us, heat us, quicken us, help us, keep us
 From seeing all too near that urn, those ashes
 Which all must be. Well used, they serve us well.
 I heard a saying in Egypt, that ambition
 Is like the sea wave, which the more you drink,
 The more you thirst--yea--drink too much, as men
 Have done on rafts of wreck--it drives you mad.
 I will be no such wreck, am no such gamester
 As, having won the stake, would dare the chance
 Of double, or losing all. The Roman Senate,
 For I have always play'd into their hands,
 Means me the crown. And Camma for my bride--
 The people love her--if I win her love,
 They too will cleave to me, as one with her.
 There then I rest, Rome's tributary king.
                         [_Looking down on_ SINNATUS.
 Why did I strike him?--having proof enough
 Against the man, I surely should have left
 That stroke to Rome. He saved my life too. Did he?
 It seem'd so. I have play'd the sudden fool.
 And that sets her against me--for the moment.
 Camma--well, well, I never found the woman
 I could not force or wheedle to my will.
 She will be glad at last to wear my crown.
 And I will make Galatia prosperous too,
 And we will chirp among our vines, and smile
 At bygone things till that (_pointing to_ SINNATUS) eternal peace.
 Rome! Rome!
 
     _Enter_ PUBLIUS _and_ SOLDIERS.
 
 Twice I cried Rome. Why came ye not before?
 
 PUBLIUS.
 Why come we now? Whom shall we seize upon?
 
 SYNORIX (_pointing to the body of_ SINNATUS).
 The body of that dead traitor Sinnatus.
 Bear him away.
 
 _Music and Singing in Temple_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT II
 
 
 SCENE.--_Interior of the Temple of Artemis_. Small gold gates on
 platform in front of the veil before the colossal statue of the
 Goddess, and in the centre of the Temple a tripod altar, on which is a
 lighted lamp. Lamps (lighted) suspended between each pillar. Tripods,
 vases, garlands of flowers, etc., about stage. Altar at back close to
 Goddess, with two cups. Solemn music. Priestesses decorating the
 Temple.
 
 
 (_The Chorus of_ PRIESTESSES _sing as they enter_.)
 
   Artemis, Artemis, hear us, O Mother, hear us, and bless us!
   Artemis, thou that art life to the wind, to the wave, to the glebe,
       to the fire!
   Hear thy people who praise thee! O help us from all that oppress us!
   Hear thy priestesses hymn thy glory! O yield them all their desire!
 
 PRIESTESS.
 Phoebe, that man from Synorix, who has been
 So oft to see the Priestess, waits once more
 Before the Temple.
 
 PHOEBE.
 We will let her know.
           [_Signs to one of the Priestesses, who goes out_.
 Since Camma fled from Synorix to our Temple,
 And for her beauty, stateliness, and power,
 Was chosen Priestess here, have you not mark'd
 Her eyes were ever on the marble floor?
 To-day they are fixt and bright--they look straight out.
 Hath she made up her mind to marry him?
 
 PRIESTESS.
 To marry him who stabb'd her Sinnatus.
 You will not easily make me credit that.
 
 PHOEBE.
 Ask her.
 
     _Enter_ CAMMA _as Priestess (in front of the curtains_).
 
 PRIESTESS.
          You will not marry Synorix?
 
 CAMMA.
 My girl, I am the bride of Death, and only
 Marry the dead.
 
 PRIESTESS.
                 Not Synorix then?
 
 CAMMA.
 
                                   My girl,
 At times this oracle of great Artemis
 Has no more power than other oracles
 To speak directly.
 
 PHOEBE.
                    Will you speak to him,
 The messenger from Synorix who waits
 Before the Temple?
 
 CAMMA.
                    Why not? Let him enter.
                       [_Comes forward on to step by tripod.
 
     Enter a_ MESSENGER.
 
 MESSENGER (_kneels_).
 Greeting and health from Synorix! More than once
 You have refused his hand. When last I saw you,
 You all but yielded. He entreats you now
 For your last answer. When he struck at Sinnatus--
 As I have many a time declared to you--
 He knew not at the moment who had fasten'd
 About his throat--he begs you to forget it.
 As scarce his act:--a random stroke: all else
 Was love for you: he prays you to believe him.
 
 CAMMA.
 I pray him to believe--that I believe him.
 
 MESSENGER.
 Why that is well. You mean to marry him?
 
 CAMMA.
 I mean to marry him--if that be well.
 
 MESSENGER.
 This very day the Romans crown him king
 For all his faithful services to Rome.
 He wills you then this day to marry him,
 And so be throned together in the sight
 Of all the people, that the world may know
 You twain are reconciled, and no more feuds
 Disturb our peaceful vassalage to Rome.
 
 CAMMA.
 To-day? Too sudden. I will brood upon it.
 When do they crown him?
 
 MESSENGER.
                         Even now.
 
 CAMMA.
                                   And where?
 
 MESSENGER.
 Here by your temple.
 
 CAMMA.
 
                      Come once more to me
 Before the crowning,--I will answer you.
 
                                [_Exit Messenger_.
 
 PHOEBE.
 Great Artemis! O Camma, can it be well,
 Or good, or wise, that you should clasp a hand
 Red with the sacred blood of Sinnatus?
 
 CAMMA.
 Good! mine own dagger driven by Synorix found
 All good in the true heart of Sinnatus,
 And quench'd it there for ever. Wise!
 Life yields to death and wisdom bows to Fate,
 Is wisest, doing so. Did not this man
 Speak well? We cannot fight imperial Rome,
 But he and I are both Galatian-born,
 And tributary sovereigns, he and I
 Might teach this Rome--from knowledge of our people--
 Where to lay on her tribute--heavily here
 And lightly there. Might I not live for that,
 And drown all poor self-passion in the sense
 Of public good?
 
 PHOEBE.
 I am sure you will not marry him.
 
 CAMMA.
 Are you so sure? I pray you wait and see.
 
         [_Shouts (from the distance_), 'Synorix! Synorix!'
 
 CAMMA.
 Synorix, Synorix! So they cried Sinnatus
 Not so long since--they sicken me. The One
 Who shifts his policy suffers something, must
 Accuse himself, excuse himself; the Many
 Will feel no shame to give themselves the lie.
 
 PHOEBE.
 Most like it was the Roman soldier shouted.
 
 CAMMA.
 Their shield-borne patriot of the morning star
 Hang'd at mid-day, their traitor of the dawn
 The clamour'd darling of their afternoon!
 And that same head they would have play'd at ball with
 And kick'd it featureless--they now would crown.
 
                                 [_Flourish of trumpets_.
 
     _Enter a Galatian_ NOBLEMAN _with crown on a cushion_.
 
 NOBLE (_kneels_).
 Greeting and health from Synorix. He sends you
 This diadem of the first Galatian Queen,
 That you may feed your fancy on the glory of it,
 And join your life this day with his, and wear it
 Beside him on his throne. He waits your answer.
 
 CAMMA.
 Tell him there is one shadow among the shadows,
 One ghost of all the ghosts--as yet so new,
 So strange among them--such an alien there,
 So much of husband in it still--that if
 The shout of Synorix and Camma sitting
 Upon one throne, should reach it, _it_ would rise
 _He!_... HE, with that red star between the ribs,
 And my knife there--and blast the king and me,
 And blanch the crowd with horror. I dare not, sir!
 Throne him--and then the marriage--ay and tell him
 That I accept the diadem of Galatia--
                                 [_All are amazed_.
 Yea, that ye saw me crown myself withal.
                                 [_Puts on the crown_.
 I wait him his crown'd queen.
 
 NOBLE.
 So will I tell him.
 
                        [_Exit_.
 
 Music. Two Priestesses go up the steps before the shrine, draw the
 curtains on either side (discovering the Goddess), then open the gates
 and remain on steps, one on either side, and kneel. A priestess goes
 off and returns with a veil of marriage, then assists Phoebe to veil
 Camma. At the same time Priestesses enter and stand on either side of
 the Temple. Camma and all the Priestesses kneel, raise their hands to
 the Goddess, and bow down.
 
           [_Shouts_, 'Synorix! Synorix!' _All rise_.
 
 CAMMA.
 Fling wide the doors, and let the new-made children
 Of our imperial mother see the show.
 
           [_Sunlight pours through the doors_.
 
 I have no heart to do it. (_To Phoebe_). Look for me!
 
           [_Crouches_. PHOEBE _looks out_.
 
             [_Shouts_, 'Synorix! Synorix!'
 
 PHOEBE.
 He climbs the throne. Hot blood, ambition, pride
 So bloat and redden his face--O would it were
 His third last apoplexy! O bestial!
 O how unlike our goodly Sinnatus.
 
 CAMMA (_on the ground_).
 You wrong him surely; far as the face goes
 A goodlier-looking man than Sinnatus.
 
 PHOEBE (_aside_).
 How dare she say it? I could hate her for it
 But that she is distracted.    [_A flourish of trumpets_.
 
 CAMMA.
                             Is he crown'd?
 
 PHOEBE.
 Ay, there they crown him.
 
              [_Crowd without shout_, 'Synorix! Synorix!'
 
     [_A Priestess brings a box of spices to_ CAMMA,
     _who throws them on the altar-flame_.
 
 CAMMA.
 Rouse the dead altar-flame, fling in the spices,
 Nard, Cinnamon, amomum, benzoin.
 Let all the air reel into a mist of odour,
 As in the midmost heart of Paradise.
 Lay down the Lydian carpets for the king.
 The king should pace on purple to his bride,
 And music there to greet my lord the king.    [_Music_.
 (_To Phoebe_). Dost thou remember when I wedded Sinnatus?
 Ay, thou wast there--whether from maiden fears
 Or reverential love for him I loved,
 Or some strange second-sight, the marriage cup
 Wherefrom we make libation to the Goddess
 So shook within my hand, that the red wine
 Ran down the marble and lookt like blood, like blood.
 
 PHOEBE.
 I do remember your first-marriage fears.
 
 CAMMA.
 I have no fears at this my second marriage.
 See here--I stretch my hand out--hold it there.
 How steady it is!
 
 PHOEBE.
                   Steady enough to stab him!
 
 CAMMA.
 O hush! O peace! This violence ill becomes
 The silence of our Temple. Gentleness,
 Low words best chime with this solemnity.
 
 _Enter a procession of Priestesses and Children bearing
 garlands and golden goblets, and strewing flowers_.
 
 _Enter_ SYNORIX (_as King, with gold laurel-wreath crown
 and purple robes), followed by_ ANTONIUS, PUBLIUS,
 _Noblemen, Guards, and the Populace_.
 
 CAMMA.
 
 Hail, King!
 
 SYNORIX.
 
             Hail, Queen!
 The wheel of Fate has roll'd me to the top.
 I would that happiness were gold, that I
 Might cast my largess of it to the crowd!
 I would that every man made feast to-day
 Beneath the shadow of our pines and planes!
 For all my truer life begins to-day.
 The past is like a travell'd land now sunk
 Below the horizon--like a barren shore
 That grew salt weeds, but now all drown'd in love
 And glittering at full tide--the bounteous bays
 And havens filling with a blissful sea.
 Nor speak I now too mightily, being King
 And happy! happiest, Lady, in my power
 To make you happy.
 
 CAMMA.
                    Yes, sir.
 
 SYNORIX.
                              Our Antonius,
 Our faithful friend of Rome, tho' Rome may set
 A free foot where she will, yet of his courtesy
 Entreats he may be present at our marriage.
 
 CAMMA.
 Let him come--a legion with him, if he will.
 (_To_ ANTONIUS.) Welcome, my lord Antonius, to our Temple.
 (_To_ SYNORIX.) You on this side the altar.
 (_To_ ANTONIUS.) You on that.
 Call first upon the Goddess, Synorix.
 
     [_All face the Goddess. Priestesses, Children, Populace,
     and Guards kneel--the others remain standing_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 O Thou, that dost inspire the germ with life,
 The child, a thread within the house of birth,
 And give him limbs, then air, and send him forth
 The glory of his father--Thou whose breath
 Is balmy wind to robe our hills with grass,
 And kindle all our vales with myrtle-blossom,
 And roll the golden oceans of our grain,
 And sway the long grape-bunches of our vines,
 And fill all hearts with fatness and the lust
 Of plenty--make me happy in my marriage!
 
 CHORUS (_chanting_).
 
     Artemis, Artemis, hear him, Ionian Artemis!
 
 CAMMA.
 O Thou that slayest the babe within the womb
 Or in the being born, or after slayest him
 As boy or man, great Goddess, whose storm-voice
 Unsockets the strong oak, and rears his root
 Beyond his head, and strows our fruits, and lays
 Our golden grain, and runs to sea and makes it
 Foam over all the fleeted wealth of kings
 And peoples, hear.
 Whose arrow is the plague--whose quick flash splits
 The mid-sea mast, and rifts the tower to the rock,
 And hurls the victor's column down with him
 That crowns it, hear.
 Who causest the safe earth to shudder and gape,
 And gulf and flatten in her closing chasm
 Domed cities, hear.
 Whose lava-torrents blast and blacken a province
 To a cinder, hear.
 Whose winter-cataracts find a realm and leave it
 A waste of rock and ruin, hear. I call thee
 To make my marriage prosper to my wish!
 
 CHORUS.
 Artemis, Artemis, hear her, Ephesian Artemis!
 
 CAMMA.
 Artemis, Artemis, hear me, Galatian Artemis!
 I call on our own Goddess in our own Temple.
 
 CHORUS.
 
     Artemis, Artemis, hear her, Galatian Artemis!
 
                                  [_Thunder. All rise_.
 
 SYNORIX (_aside_).
 Thunder! Ay, ay, the storm was drawing hither
 Across the hills when I was being crown'd.
 I wonder if I look as pale as she?
 
 CAMMA.
 Art thou--still bent--on marrying?
 
 SYNORIX.
                                    Surely--yet
 These are strange words to speak to Artemis.
 
 CAMMA.
 Words are not always what they seem, my King.
 I will be faithful to thee till thou die.
 
 SYNORIX.
 I thank thee, Camma,--I thank thee.
 
 CAMMA (_turning to_ ANTONIUS).
                                     Antonius,
 Much graced are we that our Queen Rome in you
 Deigns to look in upon our barbarisms.
 
     [_Turns, goes up steps to altar before the Goddess.
     Takes a cup from off the altar. Holds it towards_
     ANTONIUS. ANTONIUS _goes up to the foot of the
     steps, opposite to_ SYNORIX.
 
 You see this cup, my lord.    [_Gives it to him_.
 
 ANTONIUS.
                            Most curious!
 The many-breasted mother Artemis
 Emboss'd upon it.
 
 CAMMA.
                   It is old, I know not
 How many hundred years. Give it me again.
 It is the cup belonging our own Temple.
 
       [_Puts it back on altar, and takes up the cup
       of Act I. Showing it to_ ANTONIUS.
 
 Here is another sacred to the Goddess,
 The gift of Synorix; and the Goddess, being
 For this most grateful, wills, thro' me her Priestess,
 In honour of his gift and of our marriage,
 That Synorix should drink from his own cup.
 
 SYNORIX.
 I thank thee, Camma,--I thank thee.
 
 CAMMA.
                                     For--my lord--
 It is our ancient custom in Galatia
 That ere two souls be knit for life and death,
 They two should drink together from one cup,
 In symbol of their married unity,
 Making libation to the Goddess. Bring me
 The costly wines we use in marriages.
 
         [_They bring in a large jar of wine_.
         CAMMA _pours wine into cup_.
 
 (_To_ SYNORIX.) See here, I fill it.
 (_To_ ANTONIUS.) Will you drink, my lord?
 
 ANTONIUS.
 I? Why should I? I am not to be married.
 
 CAMMA.
 But that might bring a Roman blessing on us.
 
 ANTONIUS (_refusing cup_).
 Thy pardon, Priestess!
 
 CAMMA.
                        Thou art in the right.
 This blessing is for Synorix and for me.
 See first I make libation to the Goddess,
                             [_Makes libation_.
 And now I drink.    [_Drinks and fills the cup again_.
                  Thy turn, Galatian King.
 Drink and drink deep--our marriage will be fruitful.
 Drink and drink deep, and thou wilt make me happy.
 
       [SYNORIX _goes up to her. She hands him the cup. He drinks_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 There, Gamma! I have almost drain'd the cup--
 A few drops left.
 
 CAMMA.
                   Libation to the Goddess.
 
       [_He throws the remaining drops on the altar
       and gives_ CAMMA _the cup_.
 
 CAMMA (_placing the cup on the altar_).
 Why then the Goddess hears.
       [_Comes down and forward to tripod_. ANTONIUS _follows_.
                             Antonius,
 Where wast thou on that morning when I came
 To plead to thee for Sinnatus's life,
 Beside this temple half a year ago?
 
 ANTONIUS.
 I never heard of this request of thine.
 
 SYNORIX (_coming forward hastily to foot of tripod steps_).
 I sought him and I could not find him. Pray you,
 Go on with the marriage rites.
 
 CAMMA.
                                Antonius----
 'Camma!' who spake?
 
 ANTONIUS.
                     Not I.
 
 PHOEBE.
                            Nor any here.
 
 CAMMA.
 I am all but sure that some one spake. Antonius,
 If you had found him plotting against Rome,
 Would you have tortured Sinnatus to death?
 
 ANTONIUS.
 No thought was mine of torture or of death,
 But had I found him plotting, I had counsell'd him
 To rest from vain resistance. Rome is fated
 To rule the world. Then, if he had not listen'd,
 I might have sent him prisoner to Rome.
 
 SYNORIX.
 Why do you palter with the ceremony?
 Go on with the marriage rites.
 
 CAMMA.
                                They are finish'd.
 
 SYNORIX.
                                                   How!
 
 CAMMA.
 Thou hast drunk deep enough to make me happy.
 Dost thou not feel the love I bear to thee
 Glow thro' thy veins?
 
 SYNORIX.
                       The love I bear to thee
 Glows thro' my veins since first I look'd on thee.
 But wherefore slur the perfect ceremony?
 The sovereign of Galatia weds his Queen.
 Let all be done to the fullest in the sight
 Of all the Gods.
                  Nay, rather than so clip
 The flowery robe of Hymen, we would add
 Some golden fringe of gorgeousness beyond
 Old use, to make the day memorial, when
 Synorix, first King, Camma, first Queen o' the Realm,
 Drew here the richest lot from Fate, to live
 And die together.
                   This pain--what is it?--again?
 I had a touch of this last year--in--Rome.
 Yes, yes. (_To_ ANTONIUS.) Your arm--a moment--It will pass.
 I reel beneath the weight of utter joy--
 This all too happy day, crown--queen at once.
                                          [_Staggers_.
 O all ye Gods--Jupiter!--Jupiter!    [_Falls backward_.
 
 CAMMA.
 Dost thou cry out upon the Gods of Rome?
 Thou art Galatian-born. Our Artemis
 Has vanquish'd their Diana.
 
 SYNORIX (_on the ground_).
                             I am poison'd.
 She--close the Temple door. Let her not fly.
 
 CAMMA (_leaning on tripod_).
 Have I not drunk of the same cup with thee?
 
 SYNORIX.
 Ay, by the Gods of Rome and all the world,
 She too--she too--the bride! the Queen! and I--
 Monstrous! I that loved her.
 
 CAMMA.
                              I loved _him_.
 
 SYNORIX.
 O murderous mad-woman! I pray you lift me
 And make me walk awhile. I have heard these poisons
 May be walk'd down.
         [ANTONIUS _and_ PUBLIUS _raise him up_.
                     My feet are tons of lead,
 They will break in the earth--I am sinking--hold me--
 Let me alone.
                [_They leave him; he sinks down on ground_.
               Too late--thought myself wise--
 A woman's dupe. Antonius, tell the Senate
 I have been most true to Rome--would have been true
 To _her_--if--if----    [_Falls as if dead_.
 
 CAMMA (_coming and leaning over him_).
                     So falls the throne of an hour.
 
 SYNORIX (_half rising_).
 Throne? is it thou? the Fates are throned, not we--
 Not guilty of ourselves--thy doom and mine--
 Thou--coming my way too--Camma--good-night.
                                        [_Dies_.
 
 CAMMA (_upheld by weeping Priestesses_).
 Thy way? poor worm, crawl down thine own black hole
 To the lowest Hell. Antonius, is he there?
 I meant thee to have follow'd--better thus.
 Nay, if my people must be thralls of Rome,
 He is gentle, tho' a Roman.
              [_Sinks back into the arms of the Priestesses_.
 
 ANTONIUS.
                            Thou art one
 With thine own people, and tho' a Roman I
 Forgive thee, Camma.
 
 CAMMA (_raising herself_).
                     'CAMMA!'--why there again
 I am most sure that some one call'd. O women,
 Ye will have Roman masters. I am glad
 I shall not see it. Did not some old Greek
 Say death was the chief good? He had my fate for it,
 Poison'd. (_Sinks back again_.) Have I the crown on? I will go
 To meet him, crown'd! crown'd victor of my will--
 On my last voyage--but the wind has fail'd--
 Growing dark too--but light enough to row.
 Row to the blessed Isles! the blessed Isles!--
 Sinnatus!
 Why comes he not to meet me? It is the crown
 Offends him--and my hands are too sleepy
 To lift it off.    [PHOEBE _takes the crown off_.
                 Who touch'd me then? I thank you.
                    [_Rises, with outspread arms_.
 There--league on league of ever-shining shore
 Beneath an ever-rising sun--I see him--
 'Camma, Camma!' Sinnatus, Sinnatus!    [_Dies_.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE FALCON
 
 
 
 DRAMATIS PERSONAE.
 
 The Count Federigo Degli Alberighi.
 Filippo, _Count's foster-brother_.
 The lady Giovanna.
 Elisabetta, _the Count's nurse_.
 
 
 
 THE FALCON
 
 
 SCENE.--_An Italian Cottage. Castle and Mountains seen through
 Window_.
 
 Elisabetta discovered seated on stool in window darning. The Count
 with Falcon on his hand comes down through the door at back. A
 withered wreath on the wall.
 
 
 ELISABETTA.
 So, my lord, the Lady Giovanna, who hath been away so long, came back
 last night with her son to the castle.
 
 COUNT.
 Hear that, my bird! Art thou not jealous of her?
 My princess of the cloud, my plumed purveyor,
 My far-eyed queen of the winds--thou that canst soar
 Beyond the morning lark, and howsoe'er
 Thy quarry wind and wheel, swoop down upon him
 Eagle-like, lightning-like--strike, make his feathers
 Glance in mid heaven.    [_Crosses to chair_.
                       I would thou hadst a mate!
 Thy breed will die with thee, and mine with me:
 I am as lone and loveless as thyself.    [_Sits in chair_.
 Giovanna here! Ay, ruffle thyself--_be_ jealous!
 Thou should'st be jealous of her. Tho' I bred thee
 The full-train'd marvel of all falconry,
 And love thee and thou me, yet if Giovanna
 Be here again--No, no! Buss me, my bird!
 The stately widow has no heart for me.
 Thou art the last friend left me upon earth--
 No, no again to that.    [_Rises and turns_.
                       My good old nurse,
 I had forgotten thou wast sitting there.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Ay, and forgotten thy foster-brother too.
 
 COUNT.
 Bird-babble for my falcon! Let it pass.
 What art thou doing there?
 
 ELISABETTA.
                            Darning your lordship.
 We cannot flaunt it in new feathers now:
 Nay, if we _will_ buy diamond necklaces
 To please our lady, we must darn, my lord.
 This old thing here (_points to necklace round her neck_),
                     they are but blue beads--my Piero,
 God rest his honest soul, he bought 'em for me,
 Ay, but he knew I meant to marry him.
 How couldst thou do it, my son? How couldst thou do it?
 
 COUNT.
 She saw it at a dance, upon a neck
 Less lovely than her own, and long'd for it.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 She told thee as much?
 
 COUNT.
                        No, no--a friend of hers.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Shame on her that she took it at thy hands,
 She rich enough to have bought it for herself!
 
 COUNT.
 She would have robb'd me then of a great pleasure.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 But hath she yet return'd thy love?
 
 COUNT.
                                     Not yet!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 She should return thy necklace then.
 
 COUNT.
                                      Ay, if
 She knew the giver; but I bound the seller
 To silence, and I left it privily
 At Florence, in her palace.
 
 ELISABETTA.
                             And sold thine own
 To buy it for her. She not know? She knows
 There's none such other----
 
 COUNT.
                            Madman anywhere.
 Speak freely, tho' to call a madman mad
 Will hardly help to make him sane again.
 
     _Enter_ FILIPPO.
 
 FILIPPO.
 Ah, the women, the women! Ah, Monna Giovanna, you here again! you that
 have the face of an angel and the heart of a--that's too positive! You
 that have a score of lovers and have not a heart for any of them--
 that's positive-negative: you that have _not_ the head of a toad, and
 _not_ a heart like the jewel in it--that's too negative; you that have
 a cheek like a peach and a heart like the stone in it--that's positive
 again--that's better!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Sh--sh--Filippo!
 
 FILIPPO (_turns half round_).
 Here has our master been a-glorifying and a-velveting and a-silking
 himself, and a-peacocking and a-spreading to catch her eye for a dozen
 year, till he hasn't an eye left in his own tail to flourish among the
 peahens, and all along o' you, Monna Giovanna, all along o' you!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Sh--sh--Filippo! Can't you hear that you are saying behind his back
 what you see you are saying afore his face?
 
 COUNT.
 Let him--he never spares me to my face!
 
 FILIPPO.
 No, my lord, I never spare your lordship to your lordship's face, nor
 behind your lordship's back, nor to right, nor to left, nor to round
 about and back to your lordship's face again, for I'm honest, your
 lordship.
 
 COUNT.
 Come, come, Filippo, what is there in the larder?
     [ELISABETTA _crosses to fireplace and puts on wood_.
 
 FILIPPO.
 Shelves and hooks, shelves and hooks, and when I see the shelves I am
 like to hang myself on the hooks.
 
 COUNT.
 No bread?
 
 FILIPPO.
 Half a breakfast for a rat!
 
 COUNT,
 Milk?
 
 FILIPPO.
 Three laps for a cat!
 
 COUNT.
 Cheese?
 
 FILIPPO.
 A supper for twelve mites.
 
 COUNT.
 Eggs?
 
 FILIPPO.
 One, but addled.
 
 COUNT.
 No bird?
 
 FILIPPO.
 Half a tit and a hern's bill.
 
 COUNT.
 Let be thy jokes and thy jerks, man! Anything or nothing?
 
 FILIPPO.
 Well, my lord, if all-but-nothing be anything, and one plate of dried
 prunes be all-but-nothing, then there is anything in your lordship's
 larder at your lordship's service, if your lordship care to call for
 it.
 
 COUNT.
 Good mother, happy was the prodigal son,
 For he return'd to the rich father; I
 But add my poverty to thine. And all
 Thro' following of my fancy. Pray thee make
 Thy slender meal out of those scraps and shreds
 Filippo spoke of. As for him and me,
 There sprouts a salad in the garden still.
 (_To the Falcon_?) Why didst thou miss thy quarry yester-even?
 To-day, my beauty, thou must dash us down
 Our dinner from the skies. Away, Filippo!
                      [_Exit, followed by_ FILIPPO.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 I knew it would come to this. She has beggared him. I always knew it
 would come to this! (_Goes up to table as if to resume darning, and
 looks out of window_.) Why, as I live, there is Monna Giovanna coming
 down the hill from the castle. Stops and stares at our cottage. Ay,
 ay! stare at it: it's all you have left us. Shame upon you! She
 beautiful! sleek as a miller's mouse! Meal enough, meat enough, well
 fed; but beautiful--bah! Nay, see, why she turns down the path
 through our little vineyard, and I sneezed three times this morning.
 Coming to visit my lord, for the first time in her life too! Why,
 bless the saints! I'll be bound to confess her love to him at last. I
 forgive her, I forgive her! I knew it would come to this--I always
 knew it must come to this! (_Going up to door during latter part of
 speech and opens it_.) Come in, Madonna, come in. (_Retires to front
 of table and curtseys as the_ LADY GIOVANNA _enters, then moves chair
 towards the hearth_.) Nay, let me place this chair for your ladyship.
 
     [LADY GIOVANNA _moves slowly down stage, then crosses
     to chair, looking about her, bows as she sees the
     Madonna over fireplace, then sits in chair_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Can I speak with the Count?
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Ay, my lady, but won't you speak with the old woman first, and tell
 her all about it and make her happy? for I've been on my knees every
 day for these half-dozen years in hope that the saints would send us
 this blessed morning; and he always took you so kindly, he always took
 the world so kindly. When he was a little one, and I put the bitters
 on my breast to wean him, he made a wry mouth at it, but he took it so
 kindly, and your ladyship has given him bitters enough in this world,
 and he never made a wry mouth at you, he always took you so kindly--
 which is more than I did, my lady, more than I did--and he so
 handsome--and bless your sweet face, you look as beautiful this
 morning as the very Madonna her own self--and better late than never--
 but come when they will--then or now--it's all for the best, come when
 they will--they are made by the blessed saints--these marriages.
                                    [_Raises her hands_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Marriages? I shall never marry again!
 
 ELISABETTA (_rises and turns_).
 Shame on her then!
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                    Where is the Count?
 
 ELISABETTA.
                                          Just gone
 To fly his falcon.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                    Call him back and say
 I come to breakfast with him.
 
 ELISABETTA.
                               Holy mother!
 To breakfast! Oh sweet saints! one plate of prunes!
 Well, Madam, I will give your message to him.
                                              [_Exit_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 His falcon, and I come to ask for his falcon,
 The pleasure of his eyes--boast of his hand--
 Pride of his heart--the solace of his hours--
 His one companion here--nay, I have heard
 That, thro' his late magnificence of living
 And this last costly gift to mine own self,
                              [_Shows diamond necklace_.
 He hath become so beggar'd, that his falcon
 Ev'n wins his dinner for him in the field.
 That must be talk, not truth, but truth or talk,
 How can I ask for his falcon?
                        [_Rises and moves as she speaks_.
                               O my sick boy!
 My daily fading Florio, it is thou
 Hath set me this hard task, for when I say
 What can I do--what can I get for thee?
 He answers, 'Get the Count to give me his falcon,
 And that will make me well.' Yet if I ask,
 He loves me, and he knows I know he loves me!
 Will he not pray me to return his love--
 To marry him?--(_pause_)--I can never marry him.
 His grandsire struck my grandsire in a brawl
 At Florence, and my grandsire stabb'd him there.
 The feud between our houses is the bar
 I cannot cross; I dare not brave my brother,
 Break with my kin. My brother hates him, scorns
 The noblest-natured man alive, and I--
 Who have that reverence for him that I scarce
 Dare beg him to receive his diamonds back--
 How can I, dare I, ask him for his falcon?
                     [_Puts diamonds in her casket_.
 
     _Re-enter_ COUNT _and_ FILIPPO. COUNT _turns to_ FILIPPO.
 
 COUNT.
 Do what I said; I cannot do it myself.
 
 FILIPPO.
 Why then, my lord, we are pauper'd out and out.
 
 COUNT.
 Do what I said!    [_Advances and bows low_.
 Welcome to this poor cottage, my dear lady.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 And welcome turns a cottage to a palace.
 
 COUNT.
 'Tis long since we have met!
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                              To make amends
 I come this day to break my fast with you.
 
 COUNT.
 
 I am much honour'd--yes--    [_Turns to_ FILIPPO.
 Do what I told thee. Must I do it myself?
 
 FlLIPPO.
 I will, I will. (_Sighs_.) Poor fellow!
                                            [_Exit_.
 
 COUNT.
 Lady, you bring your light into my cottage
 Who never deign'd to shine into my palace.
 My palace wanting you was but a cottage;
 My cottage, while you grace it, is a palace.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 In cottage or in palace, being still
 Beyond your fortunes, you are still the king
 Of courtesy and liberality.
 
 COUNT.
 I trust I still maintain my courtesy;
 My liberality perforce is dead
 Thro' lack of means of giving.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                                Yet I come
 To ask a gift.    [_Moves toward him a little_.
 
 COUNT.
                It will be hard, I fear,
 To find one shock upon the field when all
 The harvest has been carried.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                               But my boy--
 (_Aside_.) No, no! not yet--I cannot!
 
 COUNT.
                                       Ay, how is he,
 That bright inheritor of your eyes--your boy?
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Alas, my Lord Federigo, he hath fallen
 Into a sickness, and it troubles me.
 
 COUNT.
 Sick! is it so? why, when he came last year
 To see me hawking, he was well enough:
 And then I taught him all our hawking-phrases.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Oh yes, and once you let him fly your falcon.
 
 COUNT.
 How charm'd he was! what wonder?--A gallant boy,
 A noble bird, each perfect of the breed.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA (_sinks in chair_).
 What do you rate her at?
 
 COUNT.
                          My bird? a hundred
 Gold pieces once were offer'd by the Duke.
 I had no heart to part with her for money.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 No, not for money.
                      [COUNT _turns away and sighs_.
                    Wherefore do you sigh?
 
 COUNT.
 I have lost a friend of late.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                               I could sigh with you
 For fear of losing more than friend, a son;
 And if he leave me--all the rest of life--
 That wither'd wreath were of more worth to me.
                       [_Looking at wreath on wall_.
 
 COUNT.
 That wither'd wreath is of more worth to me
 Than all the blossom, all the leaf of this
 New-wakening year.    [_Goes and takes down wreath_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                    And yet I never saw
 The land so rich in blossom as this year.
 
 COUNT (_holding wreath toward her_).
 Was not the year when this was gather'd richer?
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 
 How long ago was that?
 
 COUNT.
                        Alas, ten summers!
 A lady that was beautiful as day
 Sat by me at a rustic festival
 With other beauties on a mountain meadow,
 And she was the most beautiful of all;
 Then but fifteen, and still as beautiful.
 The mountain flowers grew thickly round about.
 I made a wreath with some of these; I ask'd
 A ribbon from her hair to bind it with;
 I whisper'd, Let me crown you Queen of Beauty,
 And softly placed the chaplet on her head.
 A colour, which has colour'd all my life,
 Flush'd in her face; then I was call'd away;
 And presently all rose, and so departed.
 Ah! she had thrown my chaplet on the grass,
 And there I found it.
       [_Lets his hands fall, holding wreath despondingly_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA (_after pause_).
 How long since do you say?
 
 COUNT.
 That was the very year before you married.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 When I was married you were at the wars.
 
 COUNT.
 Had she not thrown my chaplet on the grass,
 It may be I had never seen the wars.
         [_Replaces wreath whence he had taken it_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Ah, but, my lord, there ran a rumour then
 That you were kill'd in battle. I can tell you
 True tears that year were shed for you in Florence.
 
 COUNT.
 It might have been as well for me. Unhappily
 I was but wounded by the enemy there
 And then imprison'd.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                      Happily, however,
 I see you quite recover'd of your wound.
 
 COUNT.
 No, no, not quite, Madonna, not yet, not yet.
 
     _Re-enter_ FILIPPO.
 
 FILIPPO.
 My lord, a word with you.
 
 COUNT.
 Pray, pardon me!
 
     [LADY GIOVANNA _crosses, and passes behind chair and
     takes down wreath; then goes to chair by table_.
 
 COUNT (_to_ FILIPPO).
 What is it, Filippo?
 
 FILIPPO.
                      Spoons, your lordship.
 
 COUNT.
                                             Spoons!
 
 FILIPPO.
 Yes, my lord, for wasn't my lady born with a golden spoon in her
 ladyship's mouth, and we haven't never so much as a silver one for the
 golden lips of her ladyship.
 
 COUNT.
 Have we not half a score of silver spoons?
 
 FILIPPO.
 Half o' one, my lord!
 
 COUNT.
 How half of one?
 
 FILIPPO.
 I trod upon him even now, my lord, in my hurry, and broke him.
 
 COUNT.
 And the other nine?
 
 FILIPPO.
 Sold! but shall I not mount with your lordship's leave to her
 ladyship's castle, in your lordship's and her ladyship's name, and
 confer with her ladyship's seneschal, and so descend again with some
 of her ladyship's own appurtenances?
 
 COUNT.
 Why--no, man. Only see your cloth be clean.
 
                                   [_Exit_ FILIPPO.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Ay, ay, this faded ribbon was the mode
 In Florence ten years back. What's here? a scroll
 Pinned to the wreath.
                       My lord, you have said so much
 Of this poor wreath that I was bold enough
 To take it down, if but to guess what flowers
 Had made it; and I find a written scroll
 That seems to run in rhymings. Might I read?
 
 COUNT.
 
 Ay, if you will.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                  It should be if you can.
 (_Reads_.) 'Dead mountain.' Nay, for who could trace a hand
 So wild and staggering?
 
 COUNT.
                         This was penn'd, Madonna,
 Close to the grating on a winter morn
 In the perpetual twilight of a prison,
 When he that made it, having his right hand
 Lamed in the battle, wrote it with his left.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 O heavens! the very letters seem to shake
 With cold, with pain perhaps, poor prisoner! Well,
 Tell me the words--or better--for I see
 There goes a musical score along with them,
 Repeat them to their music.
 
 COUNT.
                             You can touch
 No chord in me that would not answer you
 In music.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
           That is musically said.
 
     [COUNT _takes guitar_. LADY GIOVANNA _sits listening
     with wreath in her hand, and quietly removes
     scroll and places it on table at the end of the song_.
 
 COUNT (_sings, playing guitar_).
 
     'Dead mountain flowers, dead mountain-meadow flowers,
     Dearer than when you made your mountain gay,
     Sweeter than any violet of to-day,
     Richer than all the wide world-wealth of May,
     To me, tho' all your bloom has died away,
     You bloom again, dead mountain-meadow flowers.'
 
         _Enter_ ELISABETTA _with cloth_.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 A word with you, my lord!
 
 COUNT (_singing_).
                           'O mountain flowers!'
 
 ELISABETTA.
 A word, my lord! (_Louder_).
 
 COUNT (_sings_).
                  'Dead flowers!'
 
 ELISABETTA.
                                  A word, my lord! (_Louder_).
 
 COUNT.
 I pray you pardon me again!
 
           [LADY GIOVANNA _looking at wreath_.
 
 (COUNT _to_ ELISABETTA.)
                             What is it?
 
 ELISABETTA.
 My lord, we have but one piece of earthenware to
 serve the salad in to my lady, and that cracked!
 
 COUNT.
 Why then, that flower'd bowl my ancestor
 Fetch'd from the farthest east--we never use it
 For fear of breakage--but this day has brought
 A great occasion. You can take it, nurse!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 I did take it, my lord, but what with my lady's
 coming that had so flurried me, and what with the
 fear of breaking it, I did break it, my lord: it is
 broken!
 
 COUNT.
 My one thing left of value in the world!
 No matter! see your cloth be white as snow!
 
 ELISABETTA (_pointing thro' window_).
 White? I warrant thee, my son, as the snow yonder
 on the very tip-top o' the mountain.
 
 COUNT.
 And yet to speak white truth, my good old mother,
 I have seen it like the snow on the moraine.
 
 ELISABETTA:
 How can your lordship say so? There my lord!
                                     [_Lays cloth_.
 O my dear son, be not unkind to me.
 And one word more.    [_Going--returns_.
 
 COUNT (_touching guitar_).
                    Good! let it be but one.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Hath she return'd thy love?
 
 COUNT.
                             Not yet!
 
 ELISABETTA.
                                      And will she?
 
 COUNT (_looking at_ LADY GIOVANNA).
 I scarce believe it!
 
 ELISABETTA.
                      Shame upon her then!    [_Exit_.
 
 COUNT (_sings_).
 
 'Dead mountain flowers'----
                            Ah well, my nurse has broken
 The thread of my dead flowers, as she has broken
 My china bowl. My memory is as dead.
                               [_Goes and replaces guitar_.
 Strange that the words at home with me so long
 Should fly like bosom friends when needed most.
 So by your leave if you would hear the rest,
 The writing.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA (_holding wreath toward him_).
              There! my lord, you are a poet,
 And can you not imagine that the wreath,
 Set, as you say, so lightly on her head,
 Fell with her motion as she rose, and she,
 A girl, a child, then but fifteen, however
 Flutter'd or flatter'd by your notice of her,
 Was yet too bashful to return for it?
 
 COUNT.
 Was it so indeed? was it so? was it so?
 
     [_Leans forward to take wreath, and touches_ LADY
     GIOVANNA'S _hand, which she withdraws hastily;
     he places wreath on corner of chair_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA (_with dignity_).
 I did not say, my lord, that it was so;
 I said you might imagine it was so.
 
     _Enter_ FILIPPO _with bowl of salad, which he places on table_.
 
 FILIPPO.
 Here's a fine salad for my lady, for tho' we have been a soldier, and
 ridden by his lordship's side, and seen the red of the battle-field,
 yet are we now drill-sergeant to his lordship's lettuces, and profess
 to be great in green things and in garden-stuff.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 I thank thee, good Filippo.             [_Exit_ FILIPPO.
 
     _Enter_ ELISABETTA _with bird on a dish which she places on
 table_.
 
 ELISABETTA (close to table).
 Here's a fine fowl for my lady; I had scant time to do him in. I hope
 he be not underdone, for we be undone in the doing of him.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 I thank you, my good nurse.
 
 FILIPPO (_re-entering with plate of prunes_).
 And here are fine fruits for my lady--prunes, my lady, from the tree
 that my lord himself planted here in the blossom of his boyhood--and
 so I, Filippo, being, with your ladyship's pardon, and as your
 ladyship knows, his lordship's own foster-brother, would commend them
 to your ladyship's most peculiar appreciation.
                                       [_Puts plate on table_.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Filippo!
 
 LADY GIOVANNA (COUNT _leads her to table_).
 Will you not eat with me, my lord?
 
 COUNT.
                                    I cannot,
 Not a morsel, not one morsel. I have broken
 My fast already. I will pledge you. Wine!
 Filippo, wine!
 
     [_Sits near table_; FILIPPO _brings flask, fills
     the_ COUNT'S _goblet, then_ LADY GIOVANNA'S;
     ELISABETTA _stands at the back of_ LADY
     GIOVANNA'S _chair_.
 
 COUNT.
               It is but thin and cold,
 Not like the vintage blowing round your castle.
 We lie too deep down in the shadow here.
 Your ladyship lives higher in the sun.
 
                      [_They pledge each other and drink_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 If I might send you down a flask or two
 Of that same vintage? There is iron in it.
 It has been much commended as a medicine.
 I give it my sick son, and if you be
 Not quite recover'd of your wound, the wine
 Might help you. None has ever told me yet
 The story of your battle and your wound.
 
 FILIPPO (_coming forward_).
 I can tell you, my lady, I can tell you.
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Filippo! will you take the word out of your master's own mouth?
 
 FILIPPO.
 Was it there to take? Put it there, my lord.
 
 COUNT.
 Giovanna, my dear lady, in this same battle
 We had been beaten--they were ten to one.
 The trumpets of the fight had echo'd down,
 I and Filippo here had done our best,
 And, having passed unwounded from the field,
 Were seated sadly at a fountain side,
 Our horses grazing by us, when a troop,
 Laden with booty and with a flag of ours
 Ta'en in the fight----
 
 FILIPPO.
                      Ay, but we fought for it back,
 And kill'd----
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Filippo!
 
 COUNT.
          A troop of horse----
 
 FILIPPO.
                              Five hundred!
 
 COUNT.
 Say fifty!
 
 FILIPPO.
            And we kill'd 'em by the score!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Filippo!
 
 FILIPPO.
          Well, well, well! I bite my tongue.
 
 COUNT.
 We may have left their fifty less by five.
 However, staying not to count how many,
 But anger'd at their flaunting of our flag,
 We mounted, and we dash'd into the heart of 'em.
 I wore the lady's chaplet round my neck;
 It served me for a blessed rosary.
 I am sure that more than one brave fellow owed
 His death to the charm in it.
 
 ELISABETTA.
                               Hear that, my lady!
 
 COUNT.
 I cannot tell how long we strove before
 Our horses fell beneath us; down we went
 Crush'd, hack'd at, trampled underfoot. The night,
 As some cold-manner'd friend may strangely do us
 The truest service, had a touch of frost
 That help'd to check the flowing of the blood.
 My last sight ere I swoon'd was one sweet face
 Crown'd with the wreath. _That_ seem'd to come and go.
 They left us there for dead!
 
 ELISABETTA.
                              Hear that, my lady!
 
 FILIPPO.
 Ay, and I left two fingers there for dead. See, my lady!
                                        (_Showing his hand_.)
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 I see, Filippo!
 
 FILIPPO.
 And I have small hope of the gentleman gout in my great toe.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 And why, Filippo?    [_Smiling absently_.
 
 FILIPPO.
 I left him there for dead too!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 She smiles at him--how hard the woman is!
 My lady, if your ladyship were not
 Too proud to look upon the garland, you
 Would find it stain'd----
 
 COUNT (_rising_).
                          Silence, Elisabetta!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Stain'd with the blood of the best heart that ever
 Beat for one woman. [_Points to wreath on chair_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA (_rising slowly_).
                    I can eat no more!
 
 COUNT.
 You have but trifled with our homely salad,
 But dallied with a single lettuce-leaf;
 Not eaten anything.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                     Nay, nay, I cannot.
 You know, my lord, I told you I was troubled.
 My one child Florio lying still so sick,
 I bound myself, and by a solemn vow,
 That I would touch no flesh till he were well
 Here, or else well in Heaven, where all is well.
 
     [ELISABETTA _clears table of bird and salad_; FILIPPO _snatches
     up the plate of prunes and holds them to_ LADY GIOVANNA.
 
 FILIPPO.
 But the prunes, my lady, from the tree that his lordship----
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Not now, Filippo. My lord Federigo,
 Can I not speak with you once more alone?
 
 COUNT.
 You hear, Filippo? My good fellow, go!
 
 FILIPPO.
 But the prunes that your lordship----
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Filippo!
 
 COUNT.
 Ay, prune our company of thine own and go!
 
 ELISABETTA.
 Filippo!
 
 FILIPPO (_turning_).
 Well, well! the women!
                           [Exit.
 
 COUNT.
 And thou too leave us, my dear nurse, alone.
 
 ELISABETTA (_folding up cloth and going_).
 
 And me too! Ay, the dear nurse will leave you alone;
 but, for all that, she that has eaten the yolk is scarce
 like to swallow the shell.
 
     [_Turns and curtseys stiffly to_ LADY GIOVANNA, _then
     exit_. LADY GIOVANNA _takes out diamond necklace from casket_.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 I have anger'd your good nurse; these old-world servants
 Are all but flesh and blood with those they serve.
 My lord, I have a present to return you,
 And afterwards a boon to crave of you.
 
 COUNT.
 No, my most honour'd and long-worshipt lady,
 Poor Federigo degli Alberighi
 Takes nothing in return from you except
 Return of his affection--can deny
 Nothing to you that you require of him.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Then I require you to take back your diamonds--
                                  [_Offering necklace_.
 I doubt not they are yours. No other heart
 Of such magnificence in courtesy
 Beats--out of heaven. They seem'd too rich a prize
 To trust with any messenger. I came
 In person to return them.    [_Count draws back_.
                           If the phrase
 'Return' displease you, we will say--exchange them
 For your--for your----
 
 COUNT (_takes a step toward her and then back_).
                       For mine--and what of mine?
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 Well, shall we say this wreath and your sweet rhymes?
 
 COUNT.
 But have you ever worn my diamonds?
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                                     No!
 For that would seem accepting of your love.
 I cannot brave my brother--but be sure
 That I shall never marry again, my lord!
 
 COUNT.
 Sure?
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
       Yes!
 
 COUNT.
            Is this your brother's order?
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                                           No!
 For he would marry me to the richest man
 In Florence; but I think you know the saying--
 'Better a man without riches, than riches without a man.'
 
 COUNT.
 A noble saying--and acted on would yield
 A nobler breed of men and women. Lady,
 I find you a shrewd bargainer. The wreath
 That once you wore outvalues twentyfold
 The diamonds that you never deign'd to wear.
 But lay them there for a moment!
 
     [_Points to table_. LADY GIOVANNA _places necklace on table_.
 
                                  And be you
 Gracious enough to let me know the boon
 By granting which, if aught be mine to grant,
 I should be made more happy than I hoped
 Ever to be again.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                   Then keep your wreath,
 But you will find me a shrewd bargainer still.
 I cannot keep your diamonds, for the gift
 I ask for, to my mind and at this present
 Outvalues all the jewels upon earth.
 
 COUNT.
 It should be love that thus outvalues all.
 You speak like love, and yet you love me not.
 I have nothing in this world but love for you.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 
 Love? it _is_ love, love for my dying boy,
 Moves me to ask it of you.
 
 COUNT.
                            What? my time?
 Is it my time? Well, I can give my time
 To him that is a part of you, your son.
 Shall I return to the castle with you? Shall I
 Sit by him, read to him, tell him my tales,
 Sing him my songs? You know that I can touch
 The ghittern to some purpose.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                               No, not that!
 I thank you heartily for that--and you,
 I doubt not from your nobleness of nature,
 Will pardon me for asking what I ask.
 
 COUNT.
 Giovanna, dear Giovanna, I that once
 The wildest of the random youth of Florence
 Before I saw you--all my nobleness
 Of nature, as you deign to call it, draws
 From you, and from my constancy to you.
 No more, but speak.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                     I will. You know sick people,
 More specially sick children, have strange fancies,
 Strange longings; and to thwart them in their mood
 May work them grievous harm at times, may even
 Hasten their end. I would you had a son!
 It might be easier then for you to make
 Allowance for a mother--her--who comes
 To rob you of your one delight on earth.
 How often has my sick boy yearn'd for this!
 I have put him off as often; but to-day
 I dared not--so much weaker, so much worse
 For last day's journey. I was weeping for him:
 He gave me his hand: 'I should be well again
 If the good Count would give me----
 
 COUNT.
                                     Give me.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                                               His falcon.
 
 COUNT (_starts back_).
 My falcon!
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
            Yes, your falcon, Federigo!
 
 COUNT.
 Alas, I cannot!
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                 Cannot? Even so!
 I fear'd as much. O this unhappy world!
 How shall I break it to him? how shall I tell him?
 The boy may die: more blessed were the rags
 Of some pale beggar-woman seeking alms
 For her sick son, if he were like to live,
 Than all my childless wealth, if mine must die.
 I was to blame--the love you said you bore me--
 My lord, we thank you for your entertainment,
                            [_With a stately curtsey_.
 And so return--Heaven help him!--to our son.
                                      [_Turns--_
 
 COUNT (_rushes forward_).
 Stay, stay, I am most unlucky, most unhappy.
 You never had look'd in on me before,
 And when you came and dipt your sovereign head
 Thro' these low doors, you ask'd to eat with me.
 I had but emptiness to set before you,
 No not a draught of milk, no not an egg,
 Nothing but my brave bird, my noble falcon,
 My comrade of the house, and of the field.
 She had to die for it--she died for you.
 Perhaps I thought with those of old, the nobler
 The victim was, the more acceptable
 Might be the sacrifice. I fear you scarce
 Will thank me for your entertainment now.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA (_returning_).
 I bear with him no longer.
 
 COUNT.
                            No, Madonna!
 And he will have to bear with it as he may.
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 I break with him for ever!
 
 COUNT.
                            Yes, Giovanna,
 But he will keep his love to you for ever!
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
 You? you? not you! My brother! my hard brother!
 O Federigo, Federigo, I love you!
 Spite of ten thousand brothers, Federigo.
                                   [_falls at his feet_.
 
 COUNT (_impetuously_).
 Why then the dying of my noble bird
 Hath served me better than her living--then
                          [_Takes diamonds from table_.
 These diamonds are both yours and mine--have won
 Their value again--beyond all markets--there
 I lay them for the first time round your neck.
                          [_Lays necklace round her neck_.
 And then this chaplet--No more feuds, but peace,
 Peace and conciliation! I will make
 Your brother love me. See, I tear away
 The leaves were darken'd by the battle--
                    [_Pulls leaves off and throws them down_.
                                          --crown you
 Again with the same crown my Queen of Beauty.
                          [_Places wreath on her head_.
 Rise--I could almost think that the dead garland
 Will break once more into the living blossom.
 Nay, nay, I pray you rise.
                              [_Raises her with both hands_.
                            We two together
 Will help to heal your son--your son and mine--
 We shall do it--we shall do it.    [_Embraces her_.
 The purpose of my being is accomplish'd,
 And I am happy!
 
 LADY GIOVANNA.
                 And I too, Federigo.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE PROMISE OF MAY
 
   'A surface man of theories, true to none.'
 
 
 
 _DRAMATIS PERSONAE.
 
 FARMER DOBSON.
 Mr. PHILIP EDGAR (_afterwards_ Mr. HAROLD).
 FARMER STEER (DORA _and_ EVA'S _Father_).
 Mr. WILSON (_a Schoolmaster_).
 HIGGINS       |
 JAMES         |
 DAN SMITH     | _Farm Labourers_.
 JACKSON       |
 ALLEN         |
 DORA STEER.
 EVA STEER.
 SALLY ALLEN   |
 MILLY         | _Farm Servants_.
 
 _Farm Servants, Labourers, etc_.
 
 
 
 THE PROMISE OF MAY
 
 
 
 
 ACT I.
 
 
 SCENE.--_Before Farmhouse_.
 
 Farming Men and Women. Farming Men carrying forms, &c., Women carrying
 baskets of knives and forks, &c.
 
 
 1ST FARMING MAN.
 Be thou a-gawin' to the long barn?
 
 2ND FARMING MAN.
 Ay, to be sewer! Be thou?
 
 1ST FARMING MAN.
 Why, o' coorse, fur it be the owd man's birthdaaey. He be heighty this
 very daaey, and 'e telled all on us to be i' the long barn by one
 o'clock, fur he'll gie us a big dinner, and haaefe th' parish'll be
 theer, an' Miss Dora, an' Miss Eva, an' all!
 
 2ND FARMING MAN.
 Miss Dora be coomed back, then?
 
 1ST FARMING MAN.
 Ay, haaefe an hour ago. She be in theer, now. (_Pointing to house_.)
 Owd Steer wur afeaerd she wouldn't be back i' time to keep his
 birthdaaey, and he wur in a tew about it all the murnin'; and he sent
 me wi' the gig to Littlechester to fetch 'er; and 'er an' the owd man
 they fell a kissin' o' one another like two sweet-'arts i' the poorch
 as soon as he clapt eyes of 'er.
 
 2ND FARMING MAN.
 Foaelks says he likes Miss Eva the best.
 
 1ST FARMING MAN.
 Naaey, I knaws nowt o' what foaelks says, an' I caaeres nowt neither.
 Foaelks doesn't hallus knaw thessens; but sewer I be, they be two o'
 the purtiest gels ye can see of a summer murnin'.
 
 2ND FARMING MAN.
 Beaent Miss Eva gone off a bit of 'er good looks o' laaete?
 
 1ST FARMING MAN.
 Noae, not a bit.
 
 2ND FARMING MAN.
 Why cooem awaaey, then, to the long barn.
                                   [_Exeunt_.
 
     DORA _looks out of window. Enter_ DOBSON.
 
 DORA (_singing_).
 
     The town lay still in the low sun-light,
     The hen cluckt late by the white farm gate,
     The maid to her dairy came in from the cow,
     The stock-dove coo'd at the fall of night,
     The blossom had open'd on every bough;
         O joy for the promise of May, of May,
         O joy for the promise of May.
 
 (_Nodding at_ DOBSON.) I'm coming down, Mr. Dobson. I haven't seen Eva
 yet. Is she anywhere in the garden?
 
 DOBSON.
 Noae, Miss. I ha'n't seed 'er neither.
 
 DORA (_enters singing_).
 
     But a red fire woke in the heart of the town,
     And a fox from the glen ran away with the hen,
     And a cat to the cream, and a rat to the cheese;
     And the stock-dove coo'd, till a kite dropt down,
     And a salt wind burnt the blossoming trees;
         O grief for the promise of May, of May,
         O grief for the promise of May.
 
 I don't know why I sing that song; I don't love it.
 
 DOBSON.
 Blessings on your pretty voice, Miss Dora. Wheer did they larn ye
 that?
 
 DORA.
 In Cumberland, Mr. Dobson.
 
 DOBSON.
 An' how did ye leaeve the owd uncle i' Coomberland?
 
 DORA.
 Getting better, Mr. Dobson. But he'll never be the same man again.
 
 DOBSON.
 An' how d'ye find the owd man 'ere?
 
 DORA.
 As well as ever. I came back to keep his birthday.
 
 DOBSON.
 Well, I be coomed to keep his birthdaaey an' all. The owd man be
 heighty to-daaey, beaent he?
 
 DORA.
 Yes, Mr. Dobson. And the day's bright like a friend, but the wind east
 like an enemy. Help me to move this bench for him into the sun. (_They
 move bench_.) No, not that way--here, under the apple tree. Thank you.
 Look how full of rosy blossom it is.
                   [_Pointing to apple tree_.
 
 DOBSON.
 Theer be redder blossoms nor them, Miss Dora.
 
 DORA.
 Where do they blow, Mr. Dobson?
 
 DOBSON.
 Under your eyes, Miss Dora.
 
 DORA.
 Do they?
 
 DOBSON.
 And your eyes be as blue as----
 
 DORA.
 What, Mr. Dobson? A butcher's frock?
 
 DOBSON.
 Noae, Miss Dora; as blue as----
 
 DORA.
 Bluebell, harebell, speedwell, bluebottle, succory, forget-me-not?
 
 DOBSON.
 Noae, Miss Dora; as blue as----
 
 DORA.
 The sky? or the sea on a blue day?
 
 DOBSON.
 Naaey then. I meaen'd they be as blue as violets.
 
 DORA.
 Are they?
 
 DOBSON.
 Theer ye goaes ageaen, Miss, niver believing owt I says to ye--hallus
 a-fobbing ma off, tho' ye knaws I love ye. I warrants ye'll think moor
 o' this young Squire Edgar as ha' coomed among us--the Lord knaws how
 --ye'll think more on 'is little finger than hall my hand at the
 haltar.
 
 DORA.
 Perhaps, Master Dobson. I can't tell, for I have never seen him. But
 my sister wrote that he was mighty pleasant, and had no pride in him.
 
 DOBSON.
 He'll be arter you now, Miss Dora.
 
 DORA.
 Will he? How can I tell?
 
 DOBSON.
 He's been arter Miss Eva, haaen't he?
 
 DORA.
 Not that I know.
 
 DOBSON.
 Didn't I spy 'em a-sitting i' the woodbine harbour togither?
 
 DORA.
 What of that? Eva told me that he was taking her likeness. He's an
 artist.
 
 DOBSON.
 What's a hartist? I doaent believe he's iver a 'eart under his
 waistcoat. And I tells ye what, Miss Dora: he's no respect for the
 Queen, or the parson, or the justice o' peace, or owt. I ha' heaerd 'im
 a-gawin' on 'ud make your 'air--God bless it!--stan' on end. And wuss
 nor that. When theer wur a meeting o' farmers at Littlechester t'other
 daaey, and they was all a-crying out at the bad times, he cooms up, and
 he calls out among our oaen men, 'The land belongs to the
 people!'
 
 DORA.
 And what did _you_ say to that?
 
 DOBSON.
 Well, I says, s'pose my pig's the land, and you says it belongs to the
 parish, and theer be a thousand i' the parish, taaekin' in the women
 and childer; and s'pose I kills my pig, and gi'es it among 'em, why
 there wudn't be a dinner for nawbody, and I should ha' lost the pig.
 
 DORA.
 And what did he say to that?
 
 DOBSON.
 Nowt--what could he saaey? But I taaekes 'im fur a bad lot and a burn
 fool, and I haaetes the very sight on him.
 
 DORA. (_Looking at_ DOBSON.)
 Master Dobson, you are a comely man to look at.
 
 DOBSON.
 I thank you for that, Miss Dora, onyhow.
 
 DORA.
 Ay, but you turn right ugly when you're in an ill temper; and I
 promise you that if you forget yourself in your behaviour to this
 gentleman, my father's friend, I will never change word with you
 again.
 
     _Enter_ FARMING MAN _from barn_.
 
 FARMING MAN.
 Miss, the farming men 'ull hev their dinner i' the long barn, and the
 master 'ud be straaenge an' pleased if you'd step in fust, and see that
 all be right and reg'lar fur 'em afoor he cooem.
                                        [_Exit_.
 
 DORA.
 I go. Master Dobson, did you hear what I said?
 
 DOBSON.
 Yeas, yeas! I'll not meddle wi' 'im if he doaent meddle wi' meae.
 (_Exit_ DORA.) Coomly, says she. I niver thowt o' mysen i' that waaey;
 but if she'd taaeke to ma i' that waaey, or ony waaey, I'd slaaeve out my
 life fur 'er. 'Coomly to look at,' says she--but she said it
 spiteful-like. To look at--yeas, 'coomly'; and she mayn't be so fur out
 theer. But if that be nowt to she, then it be nowt to me. (_Looking off
 stage_.) Schoolmaster! Why if Steer han't haxed schoolmaster to
 dinner, thaw 'e knaws I was hallus ageaen heving schoolmaster i' the
 parish! fur him as be handy wi' a book bean't but haaefe a hand at a
 pitchfork.
 
     _Enter_ WILSON.
 
 Well, Wilson. I seed that one cow o' thine i' the pinfold ageaen as I
 wur a-coomin' 'ere.
 
 WILSON.
 Very likely, Mr. Dobson. She _will_ break fence.
 I can't keep her in order.
 
 DOBSON.
 An' if tha can't keep thy one cow i' horder, how can tha keep all thy
 scholards i' horder? But let that goae by. What dost a knaw o' this Mr.
 Hedgar as be a-lodgin' wi' ye? I coom'd upon 'im t'other daaey lookin'
 at the coontry, then a-scrattin upon a bit o' paaeper, then a-lookin'
 ageaen; and I taaeked 'im fur soom sort of a land-surveyor--but a beaent.
 
 WILSON.
 He's a Somersetshire man, and a very civil-spoken gentleman.
 
 DOBSON.
 Gentleman! What be he a-doing here ten mile an' moor fro' a raaeil? We
 laaeys out o' the waaey fur gentlefoaelk altogither--leastwaaeys they
 niver cooms 'ere but fur the trout i' our beck, fur they be knaw'd as
 far as Littlechester. But 'e doaent fish neither.
 
 WILSON.
 Well, it's no sin in a gentleman not to fish.
 
 DOBSON.
 Noa, but I haaetes 'im.
 
 WILSON.
 Better step out of his road, then, for he's walking to us, and with a
 book in his hand.
 
 DOBSON.
 An' I haaetes boooeks an' all, fur they puts foaelk off the owd waaeys.
 
     _Enter_ EDGAR, _reading--not seeing_ DOBSON _and_ WILSON.
 
 EDGAR.
 This author, with his charm of simple style
 And close dialectic, all but proving man
 An automatic series of sensations,
 Has often numb'd me into apathy
 Against the unpleasant jolts of this rough road
 That breaks off short into the abysses--made me
 A Quietist taking all things easily.
 
 DOBSON. (_Aside_.)
 There mun be summut wrong theer, Wilson, fur I doaent understan' it.
 
 WILSON. (_Aside_.)
 Nor I either, Mr. Dobson.
 
 DOBSON. (_Scornfully_.)
 An' thou doaent understan' it neither--and thou schoolmaster an' all.
 
 EDGAR.
 What can a man, then, live for but sensations,
 Pleasant ones? men of old would undergo
 Unpleasant for the sake of pleasant ones
 Hereafter, like the Moslem beauties waiting
 To clasp their lovers by the golden gates.
 For me, whose cheerless Houris after death
 Are Night and Silence, pleasant ones--the while--
 If possible, here! to crop the flower and pass.
 
 DOBSON.
 Well, I never 'eard the likes o' that afoor.
 
 WILSON. (_Aside_.)
 But I have, Mr. Dobson. It's the old Scripture text, 'Let us eat and
 drink, for to-morrow we die.' I'm sorry for it, for, tho' he never
 comes to church, I thought better of him.
 
 EDGAR.
 'What are we,' says the blind old man in Lear?
 'As flies to the Gods; they kill us for their sport.'
 
 DOBSON. (_Aside_.)
 Then the owd man i' Lear should be shaaemed of hissen, but noaen o' the
 parishes goae's by that naaeme 'ereabouts.
 
 EDGAR.
 The Gods! but they, the shadows of ourselves,
 Have past for ever. It is Nature kills,
 And not for _her_ sport either. She knows nothing.
 Man only knows, the worse for him! for why
 Cannot _he_ take his pastime like the flies?
 And if my pleasure breed another's pain,
 Well--is not that the course of Nature too,
 From the dim dawn of Being--her main law
 Whereby she grows in beauty--that her flies
 Must massacre each other? this poor Nature!
 
 DOBSON.
 Natur! Natur! Well, it be i' _my_ natur to knock 'im o' the 'eaed now;
 but I weaent.
 
 EDGAR.
 A Quietist taking all things easily--why--
 Have I been dipping into this again
 To steel myself against the leaving her?
               (_Closes book, seeing_ WILSON.)
 Good day!
 
 WILSON.
 Good day, sir.
 
 (DOBSON _looks hard at_ EDGAR.)
 
 EDGAR. (_To_ DOBSON.)
 Have I the pleasure, friend, of knowing you?
 
 DOBSON.
 Dobson.
 
 EDGAR.
 Good day, then, Dobson.    [_Exit_.
 
 DOBSON.
 'Good daaey then, Dobson!' Civil-spoken i'deed! Why, Wilson, tha 'eaerd
 'im thysen--the feller couldn't find a Mister in his mouth fur me, as
 farms five hoonderd haaecre.
 
 WILSON.
 You never find one for me, Mr. Dobson.
 
 DOBSON.
 Noae, fur thou be nobbut schoolmaster; but I taaekes 'im fur a Lunnun
 swindler, and a burn fool.
 
 WILSON.
 He can hardly be both, and he pays me regular
 every Saturday.
 
 DOBSON.
 Yeas; but I haaetes 'im.
 
     _Enter_ STEER, FARM MEN _and_ WOMEN.
 
 STEER. (_Goes and sits under apple tree_.)
 Hev' ony o' ye seen Eva?
 
 DOBSON.
 Noae, Mr. Steer.
 
 STEER.
 Well, I reckons they'll hev' a fine cider-crop to-year if the blossom
 'owds. Good murnin', neighbours, and the saaeme to you, my men. I
 taaekes it kindly of all o' you that you be coomed--what's the
 newspaaeper word, Wilson?--celebrate--to celebrate my birthdaaey i' this
 fashion. Niver man 'ed better friends, and I will saaey niver master
 'ed better men: fur thaw I may ha' fallen out wi' ye sometimes, the
 fault, mebbe, wur as much mine as yours; and, thaw I says it mysen,
 niver men 'ed a better master--and I knaws what men be, and what
 masters be, fur I wur nobbut a laaebourer, and now I be a landlord--
 burn a plowman, and now, as far as money goaes, I be a gentleman, thaw
 I beaent naw scholard, fur I 'ednt naw time to maaeke mysen a scholard
 while I wur maaekin' mysen a gentleman, but I ha taaeen good care to
 turn out boaeth my darters right down fine laaedies.
 
 DOBSON.
 An' soae they be.
 
 1ST FARMING MAN.
 Soae they be! soae they be!
 
 2ND FARMING MAN.
 The Lord bless boaeth on 'em!
 
 3RD FARMING MAN.
 An' the saaeme to you, Master.
 
 4TH FARMING MAN.
 And long life to boaeth on 'em. An' the saaeme to you, Master Steer,
 likewise.
 
 STEER.
 Thank ye!
 
 _Enter_ EVA.
 Wheer 'asta been?
 
 EVA. (_Timidly_.)
 Many happy returns of the day, father.
 
 STEER.
 They can't be many, my dear, but I 'oaepes they'll be 'appy.
 
 DOBSON.
 Why, tha looks haaele anew to last to a hoonderd.
 
 STEER.
 An' why shouldn't I last to a hoonderd? Haaele! why shouldn't I be
 haaele? fur thaw I be heighty this very daaey, I niver 'es sa much as
 one pin's prick of paaein; an' I can taaeke my glass along wi' the
 youngest, fur I niver touched a drop of owt till my oaen wedding-daaey,
 an' then I wur turned huppads o' sixty. Why shouldn't I be haaele? I
 ha' plowed the ten-aaecre--it be mine now--afoor ony o' ye wur burn--ye
 all knaws the ten-aaecre--I mun ha' plowed it moor nor a hoonderd
 times; hallus hup at sunrise, and I'd drive the plow straaeit as a line
 right i' the faaece o' the sun, then back ageaen, a-follering my oaen
 shadder--then hup ageaen i' the faaece o' the sun. Eh! how the sun 'ud
 shine, and the larks 'ud sing i' them daaeys, and the smell o' the
 mou'd an' all. Eh! if I could ha' gone on wi' the plowin' nobbut the
 smell o' the mou'd 'ud ha' maaede ma live as long as Jerusalem.
 
 EVA.
 Methusaleh, father.
 
 STEER.
 Ay, lass, but when thou be as owd as me thou'll put one word fur
 another as I does.
 
 DOBSON.
 But, Steer, thaw thou be haaele anew I seed tha a-limpin' up just now
 wi' the roomatics i' the knee.
 
 STEER.
 Roomatics! Noae; I laaeme't my knee last night running arter a thief.
 Beaent there house-breaekers down i' Littlechester, Dobson--doaent ye
 hear of ony?
 
 DOBSON.
 Ay, that there be. Immanuel Goldsmiths was broke into o' Monday night,
 and ower a hoonderd pounds worth o' rings stolen.
 
 STEER.
 So I thowt, and I heaerd the winder--that's the winder at the end o'
 the passage, that goaes by thy chaumber. (_Turning to_ EVA.) Why, lass,
 what maaeakes tha sa red? Did 'e git into thy chaumber?
 
 EVA.
 Father!
 
 STEER.
 Well, I runned arter thief i' the dark, and fell ageaen coalscuttle and
 my kneeae gev waaey or I'd ha' cotched 'im, but afoor I coomed up he got
 thruff the winder ageaen.
 
 EVA.
 Got thro' the window again?
 
 STEER.
 Ay, but he left the mark of 'is foot i' the flowerbed; now theer be
 noaen o' my men, thinks I to mysen, 'ud ha' done it 'cep' it were Dan
 Smith, fur I cotched 'im once a-stealin' coaels an' I sent fur 'im, an'
 I measured his foot wi' the mark i' the bed, but it wouldn't fit--
 seeaems to me the mark wur maaede by a Lunnun boot. (_Looks at_ EVA.)
 Why, now, what maaekes tha sa white?
 
 EVA.
 Fright, father!
 
 STEER.
 Maaeke thysen eaesy. I'll hev the winder naaeiled up, and put Towser
 under it.
 
 EVA. (_Clasping her hands_.)
 No, no, father! Towser'll tear him all to pieces.
 
 STEER.
 Let him keep awaaey, then; but coom, coom! let's be gawin. They ha'
 broached a barrel of aaele i' the long barn, and the fiddler be theer,
 and the lads and lasses 'ull hev a dance.
 
 EVA. (_Aside_.)
 Dance! small heart have I to dance. I should seem to be dancing upon a
 grave.
 
 STEER.
 Wheer be Mr. Edgar? about the premises?
 
 DOBSON.
 Hallus about the premises!
 
 STEER.
 So much the better, so much the better. I likes 'im, and Eva likes
 'im. Eva can do owt wi' 'im; look for 'im, Eva, and bring 'im to the
 barn. He 'ant naw pride in 'im, and we'll git 'im to speechify for us
 arter dinner.
 
 EVA.
 Yes, father!    [_Exit_.
 
 STEER.
 Coom along then, all the rest o' ye! Churchwarden be a coomin, thaw me
 and 'im we niver 'grees about the tithe; and Parson mebbe, thaw he
 niver mended that gap i' the glebe fence as I telled 'im; and
 Blacksmith, thaw he niver shoes a herse to my likings; and Baaeker,
 thaw I sticks to hoaem-maaede--but all on 'em welcome, all on 'em
 welcome; and I've hed the long barn cleared out of all the machines,
 and the sacks, and the taaeters, and the mangles, and theer'll be room
 anew for all o' ye. Foller me.
 
 ALL.
 Yeas, yeas! Three cheers for Mr. Steer!
               [_All exeunt except_ DOBSON _into barn_.
 
     _Enter_ EDGAR.
 
 DOBSON (_who is going, turns_).
 Squire!--if so be you be a squire.
 
 EDGAR.
 Dobbins, I think.
 
 DOBSON.
 Dobbins, you thinks; and I thinks ye weaers a Lunnun boot.
 
 EDGAR.
 Well?
 
 DOBSON.
 And I thinks I'd like to taaeke the measure o' your foot.
 
 EDGAR.
 Ay, if you'd like to measure your own length upon the grass.
 
 DOBSON.
 Coom, coom, that's a good un. Why, I could throw four o' ye; but I
 promised one of the Misses I wouldn't meddle wi' ye, and I weaent.
                                    [_Exit into barn_.
 
 EDGAR.
 Jealous of me with Eva! Is it so?
 Well, tho' I grudge the pretty jewel, that I
 Have worn, to such a clod, yet that might be
 The best way out of it, if the child could keep
 Her counsel. I am sure I wish her happy.
 But I must free myself from this entanglement.
 I have all my life before me--so has she--
 Give her a month or two, and her affections
 Will flower toward the light in some new face.
 Still I am half-afraid to meet her now.
 She will urge marriage on me. I hate tears.
 Marriage is but an old tradition. I hate
 Traditions, ever since my narrow father,
 After my frolic with his tenant's girl,
 Made younger elder son, violated the whole
 Tradition of our land, and left his heir,
 Born, happily, with some sense of art, to live
 By brush and pencil. By and by, when Thought
 Comes down among the crowd, and man perceives that
 The lost gleam of an after-life but leaves him
 A beast of prey in the dark, why then the crowd
 May wreak my wrongs upon my wrongers. Marriage!
 That fine, fat, hook-nosed uncle of mine, old Harold,
 Who leaves me all his land at Littlechester,
 He, too, would oust me from his will, if I
 Made such a marriage. And marriage in itself--
 The storm is hard at hand will sweep away
 Thrones, churches, ranks, traditions, customs, marriage
 One of the feeblest! Then the man, the woman,
 Following their best affinities, will each
 Bid their old bond farewell with smiles, not tears;
 Good wishes, not reproaches; with no fear
 Of the world's gossiping clamour, and no need
 Of veiling their desires.
                           Conventionalism,
 Who shrieks by day at what she does by night,
 Would call this vice; but one time's vice may be
 The virtue of another; and Vice and Virtue
 Are but two masks of self; and what hereafter
 Shall mark out Vice from Virtue in the gulf
 Of never-dawning darkness?
 
     _Enter_ EVA.
 
                            My sweet Eva,
 Where have you lain in ambush all the morning?
 They say your sister, Dora, has return'd,
 And that should make you happy, if you love her!
 But you look troubled.
 
 EVA.
 Oh, I love her so,
 I was afraid of her, and I hid myself.
 We never kept a secret from each other;
 She would have seen at once into my trouble,
 And ask'd me what I could not answer. Oh, Philip,
 Father heard you last night. Our savage mastiff,
 That all but kill'd the beggar, will be placed
 Beneath the window, Philip.
 
 EDGAR.
 Savage, is he?
 What matters? Come, give me your hand and kiss me
 This beautiful May-morning.
 
 EVA.
                             The most beautiful
 May we have had for many years!
 
 EDGAR.
                                 And here
 Is the most beautiful morning of this May.
 Nay, you must smile upon me! There--you make
 The May and morning still more beautiful,
 You, the most beautiful blossom of the May.
 
 EVA.
 Dear Philip, all the world is beautiful
 If we were happy, and could chime in with it.
 
 EDGAR.
 True; for the senses, love, are for the world;
 That for the senses.
 
 EVA.
                      Yes.
 
 EDGAR.
                           And when the man,
 The child of evolution, flings aside
 His swaddling-bands, the morals of the tribe,
 He, following his own instincts as his God,
 Will enter on the larger golden age;
 No pleasure then taboo'd: for when the tide
 Of full democracy has overwhelm'd
 This Old world, from that flood will rise the New,
 Like the Love-goddess, with no bridal veil,
 Ring, trinket of the Church, but naked Nature
 In all her loveliness.
 
 EVA.
 What are you saying?
 
 EDGAR.
 That, if we did not strain to make ourselves
 Better and higher than Nature, we might be
 As happy as the bees there at their honey
 In these sweet blossoms.
 
 EVA.
                          Yes; how sweet they smell!
 
 EDGAR.
 There! let me break some off for you.
                           [_Breaking branch off_.
 
 EVA.
                                       My thanks.
 But, look, how wasteful of the blossom you are!
 One, two, three, four, five, six--you have robb'd poor father
 Of ten good apples. Oh, I forgot to tell you
 He wishes you to dine along with us,
 And speak for him after--you that are so clever!
 
 EDGAR.
 I grieve I cannot; but, indeed--
 
 EVA.
                                 What is it?
 
 EDGAR.
 Well, business. I must leave you, love, to-day.
 
 EVA.
 Leave me, to-day! And when will you return?
 
 EDGAR.
 I cannot tell precisely; but--
 
 EVA.
                               But what?
 
 EDGAR.
 I trust, my dear, we shall be always friends.
 
 EVA.
 After all that has gone between us--friends!
 What, only friends?    [_Drops branch_.
 
 EDGAR.
 All that has gone between us
 Should surely make us friends.
 
 EVA.
 But keep us lovers.
 
 EDGAR.
 Child, do you love me now?
 
 EVA.
 Yes, now and ever.
 
 EDGAR.
 Then you should wish us both to love for ever.
 But, if you _will_ bind love to one for ever,
 Altho' at first he take his bonds for flowers,
 As years go on, he feels them press upon him,
 Begins to flutter in them, and at last
 Breaks thro' them, and so flies away for ever;
 While, had you left him free use of his wings,
 Who knows that he had ever dream'd of flying?
 
 EVA.
 But all that sounds so wicked and so strange;
 'Till death us part'--those are the only words,
 The true ones--nay, and those not true enough,
 For they that love do not believe that death
 Will part them. Why do you jest with me, and try
 To fright me? Tho' you are a gentleman,
 I but a farmer's daughter--
 
 EDGAR.
                            Tut! you talk
 Old feudalism. When the great Democracy
 Makes a new world--
 
 EVA.
                    And if you be not jesting,
 Neither the old world, nor the new, nor father,
 Sister, nor you, shall ever see me more.
 
 EDGAR (_moved_).
 Then--(_aside_) Shall I say it?--(_aloud_) fly with me to-day.
 
 EVA.
 No! Philip, Philip, if you do not marry me,
 I shall go mad for utter shame and die.
 
 EDGAR.
 Then, if we needs must be conventional,
 When shall your parish-parson bawl our banns
 Before your gaping clowns?
 
 EVA.
                            Not in our church--
 I think I scarce could hold my head up there.
 Is there no other way?
 
 EDGAR.
                        Yes, if you cared
 To fee an over-opulent superstition,
 Then they would grant you what they call a licence
 To marry. Do you wish it?
 
 EVA.
                           _Do_ I wish it?
 
 EDGAR.
 In London.
 
 EVA.
            You will write to me?
 
 EDGAR.
                                  I will.
 
 EVA.
 And I will fly to you thro' the night, the storm--
 Yes, tho' the fire should run along the ground,
 As once it did in Egypt. Oh, you see,
 I was just out of school, I had no mother--
 My sister far away--and you, a gentleman,
 Told me to trust you: yes, in everything--
 _That_ was the only _true_ love; and I trusted--
 Oh, yes, indeed, I would have died for you.
 How could you--Oh, how could you?--nay, how could I?
 But now you will set all right again, and I
 Shall not be made the laughter of the village,
 And poor old father not die miserable.
 
 DORA (_singing in the distance_).
 
     'O joy for the promise of May, of May,
     O joy for the promise of May.'
 
 EDGAR.
 Speak not so loudly; that must be your sister.
 You never told her, then, of what has past
 Between us.
 
 EVA.
             Never!
 
 EDGAR.
                    Do not till I bid you.
 
 EVA.
 No, Philip, no.    [_Turns away_.
 
 EDGAR (_moved_).
                 How gracefully there she stands
 Weeping--the little Niobe! What! we prize
 The statue or the picture all the more
 When we have made them ours! Is she less loveable,
 Less lovely, being wholly mine? To stay--
 Follow my art among these quiet fields,
 Live with these honest folk--
                              And play the fool!
 No! she that gave herself to me so easily
 Will yield herself as easily to another.
 
 EVA.
 Did you speak, Philip?
 
 EDGAR.
                        Nothing more, farewell.
 
                                  [_They embrace_.
 
 DORA (_coming nearer_).
 
    'O grief for the promis May, of May,
     O grief for the promise of May.'
 
 EDGAR (_still embracing her_).
 Keep up your heart until we meet again.
 
 EVA.
 If that should break before we meet again?
 
 EDGAR.
 Break! nay, but call for Philip when you will,
 And he returns.
 
 EVA.
                 Heaven hears you, Philip Edgar!
 
 EDGAR (_moved_).
 And _he_ would hear you even from the grave.
 Heaven curse him if he come not at your call!
                                           [_Exit_.
 
     _Enter_ DORA.
 
 DORA.
 Well, Eva!
 
 EVA.
 Oh, Dora, Dora, how long you have been away from home! Oh, how often I
 have wished for you! It seemed to me that we were parted for ever.
 
 DORA.
 For ever, you foolish child! What's come over you? We parted like the
 brook yonder about the alder island, to come together again in a
 moment and to go on together again, till one of us be married. But
 where is this Mr. Edgar whom you praised so in your first letters? You
 haven't even mentioned him in your last?
 
 EVA.
 He has gone to London.
 
 DORA.
 Ay, child; and you look thin and pale. Is it for his absence? Have you
 fancied yourself in love with him? That's all nonsense, you know, such
 a baby as you are. But you shall tell me all about it.
 
 EVA.
 Not now--presently. Yes, I have been in trouble, but I am happy--I
 think, quite happy now.
 
 DORA (_taking EVA'S hand_).
 Come, then, and make them happy in the long barn, for father is in
 his glory, and there is a piece of beef like a house-side, and a
 plum-pudding as big as the round haystack. But see they are coming
 out for the dance already. Well, my child, let us join them.
 
     _Enter all from barn laughing_. EVA _sits reluctantly
     under apple tree_. STEER _enters smoking, sits by_ EVA.
 
     _Dance_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT II.
 
 
 Five years have elapsed between Acts I. and II.
 
 SCENE.--_A meadow. On one side a pathway going over
 a rustic bridge. At back the farmhouse among
 trees. In the distance a church spire_.
 
 DOBSON _and_ DORA.
 
 
 DOBSON.
 So the owd uncle i' Coomberland be deaed, Miss Dora, beaent he?
 
 DORA.
 Yes, Mr. Dobson, I've been attending on his death-bed and his burial.
 
 DOBSON.
 It be five year sin' ye went afoor to him, and it seems to me nobbut
 t'other day. Hesn't he left ye nowt?
 
 DORA.
 No, Mr. Dobson.
 
 DOBSON.
 But he were mighty fond o' ye, warn't he?
 
 DORA.
 Fonder of poor Eva--like everybody else.
 
 DOBSON (_handing_ DORA _basket of roses_).
 Not like me, Miss Dora; and I ha' browt these roses to ye--I forgits
 what they calls 'em, but I hallus gi'ed soom on 'em to Miss Eva at
 this time o' year. Will ya taaeke 'em? fur Miss Eva, she set the bush
 by my dairy winder afoor she went to school at Littlechester--so I
 allus browt soom on 'em to her; and now she be gone, will ye taaeke
 'em, Miss Dora?
 
 DORA.
 I thank you. They tell me that yesterday you mentioned her name too
 suddenly before my father. See that you do not do so again!
 
 DOBSON.
 Noae; I knaws a deal better now. I seed how the owd man wur vext.
 
 DORA.
 I take them, then, for Eva's sake.
                        [_Takes basket, places some in her dress_.
 
 DOBSON.
 Eva's saaeke. Yeas. Poor gel, poor gel! I can't abeaer to think on 'er
 now, fur I'd ha' done owt fur 'er mysen; an' ony o' Steer's men, an'
 ony o' my men 'ud ha' done owt fur 'er, an' all the parish 'ud ha'
 done owt fur 'er, fur we was all on us proud on 'er, an' them theer be
 soom of her oaen roses, an' she wur as sweet as ony on 'em--the Lord
 bless 'er--'er oaen sen; an' weaent ye taaeke 'em now, Miss Dora, fur 'er
 saaeke an' fur my saaeke an' all?
 
 DORA.
 Do you want them back again?
 
 DOBSON.
 Noae, noae! Keep 'em. But I hed a word to saaey to ye.
 
 DORA.
 Why, Farmer, you should be in the hayfield looking after your men; you
 couldn't have more splendid weather.
 
 DOBSON.
 I be a going theer; but I thowt I'd bring tha them roses fust. The
 weather's well anew, but the glass be a bit shaaeky. S'iver we've led
 moaest on it.
 
 DORA.
 Ay! but you must not be too sudden with it either, as you were last
 year, when you put it in green, and your stack caught fire.
 
 DOBSON.
 I were insured, Miss, an' I lost nowt by it. But I weaent be too sudden
 wi' it; and I feel sewer, Miss Dora, that I ha' been noaen too sudden
 wi' you, fur I ha' sarved for ye well nigh as long as the man sarved
 for 'is sweet'art i' Scriptur'. Weaent ye gi'e me a kind answer at
 last?
 
 DORA.
 I have no thought of marriage, my friend. We have been in such grief
 these five years, not only on my sister's account, but the ill success
 of the farm, and the debts, and my father's breaking down, and his
 blindness. How could I think of leaving him?
 
 DOBSON.
 Eh, but I be well to do; and if ye would nobbut hev me, I would taaeke
 the owd blind man to my oaen fireside. You should hev him allus wi' ye.
 
 DORA.
 You are generous, but it cannot be. I cannot love you; nay, I think I
 never can be brought to love any man. It seems to me that I hate men,
 ever since my sister left us. Oh, see here. (_Pulls out a letter_.) I
 wear it next my heart. Poor sister, I had it five years ago. 'Dearest
 Dora,--I have lost myself, and am lost for ever to you and my poor
 father. I thought Mr. Edgar the best of men, and he has proved himself
 the worst. Seek not for me, or you may find me at the bottom of the
 river.--EVA.'
 
 DOBSON.
 Be that my fault?
 
 DORA.
 No; but how should I, with this grief still at my heart, take to the
 milking of your cows, the fatting of your calves, the making of your
 butter, and the managing of your poultry?
 
 DOBSON.
 Naae'y, but I hev an owd woman as 'ud see to all that; and you should
 sit i' your oaen parlour quite like a laaedy, ye should!
 
 DORA.
 It cannot be.
 
 DOBSON.
 And plaaey the pianner, if ye liked, all daaey long, like a laaedy, ye
 should an' all.
 
 DORA.
 It cannot be.
 
 DOBSON.
 And I would loove tha moor nor ony gentleman 'ud I loove tha.
 
 DORA.
 No, no; it cannot be.
 
 DOBSON.
 And p'raps ye hears 'at I soomtimes taaekes a drop too much; but that
 be all along o' you, Miss, because ye weaent hev me; but, if ye would,
 I could put all that o' one side eaesy anew.
 
 DORA.
 Cannot you understand plain words, Mr. Dobson? I tell you, it cannot
 be.
 
 DOBSON.
 Eh, lass! Thy feyther eddicated his darters to marry gentlefoaelk, and
 see what's coomed on it.
 
 DORA.
 That is enough, Farmer Dobson. You have shown me that, though fortune
 had born _you_ into the estate of a gentleman, you would still have
 been Farmer Dobson. You had better attend to your hayfield. Good
 afternoon.
                                           [_Exit_.
 
 DOBSON.
 'Farmer Dobson'! Well, I be Farmer Dobson; but I thinks Farmer
 Dobson's dog 'ud ha' knaw'd better nor to cast her sister's misfortin
 inter 'er teeth arter she'd been a-readin' me the letter wi' 'er voice
 a-shaaekin', and the drop in 'er eye. Theer she goaes! Shall I foller
 'er and ax 'er to maaeke it up? Noae, not yet. Let 'er cool upon it; I
 likes 'er all the better fur taaekin' me down, like a laaedy, as she be.
 Farmer Dobson! I be Farmer Dobson, sewer anew; but if iver I cooms
 upo' Gentleman Hedgar ageaen, and doaent laaey my cartwhip athurt 'is
 shou'ders, why then I beaent Farmer Dobson, but summun else--blaaeme't
 if I beaent!
 
     _Enter_ HAYMAKERS _with a load of hay_.
 
 The last on it, eh?
 
 1ST HAYMAKER.
 Yeas.
 
 DOBSON.
 Hoaem wi' it, then.    [_Exit surlily_.
 
 1ST HAYMAKER.
 Well, it be the last loaed hoaem.
 
 2ND HAYMAKER.
 Yeas, an' owd Dobson should be glad on it. What maaekes 'im allus sa
 glum?
 
 SALLY ALLEN.
 Glum! he be wus nor glum. He coom'd up to me yisterdaaey i' the
 haaeyfield, when meae and my sweet'art was a workin' along o' one side
 wi' one another, and he sent 'im awaaey to t'other end o' the field;
 and when I axed 'im why, he telled me 'at sweet'arts niver worked well
 togither; and I telled _'im_ 'at sweet'arts allus worked best
 togither; and then he called me a rude naaeme, and I can't abide 'im.
 
 JAMES.
 Why, lass, doaent tha knaw he be sweet upo' Dora Steer, and she weaent
 sa much as look at 'im? And wheniver 'e sees two sweet'arts togither
 like thou and me, Sally, he be fit to bust hissen wi' spites and
 jalousies.
 
 SALLY.
 Let 'im bust hissen, then, for owt _I_ cares.
 
 1ST HAYMAKER.
 Well but, as I said afoor, it be the last loaed hoaem; do thou and thy
 sweet'art sing us hoaem to supper--'The Last Loaed Hoaem.'
 
 ALL.
 Ay! 'The Last Loaed Hoaem.'
 
                 _Song_.
 
     What did ye do, and what did ye saaey,
     Wi' the wild white rose, an' the woodbine sa gaae'y,
     An' the midders all mow'd, an' the sky sa blue--
     What did ye saaey, and what did ye do,
     When ye thowt there were nawbody watchin' o' you,
     And you an' your Sally was forkin' the haaey,
         At the end of the daaey,
         For the last loaed hoaem?
 
     What did we do, and what did we saaey,
     Wi' the briar sa green, an' the willer sa graaey,
     An' the midders all mow'd, an' the sky sa blue--
     Do ye think I be gawin' to tell it to you,
     What we mowt saaey, and what we mowt do,
     When me an' my Sally was forkin' the haaey,
         At the end of the daaey,
         For the last loaed hoaem?
 
     But what did ye saaey, and what did ye do,
     Wi' the butterflies out, and the swallers at plaae'y,
     An' the midders all mow'd, an' the sky sa blue?
     Why, coom then, owd feller, I'll tell it to you;
     For me an' my Sally we swear'd to be true,
     To be true to each other, let 'appen what maaey,
         Till the end of the daaey
         And the last loaed hoaem.
 
 ALL.
 Well sung!
 
 JAMES.
 Fanny be the naaeme i' the song, but I swopt it fur _she_.
                                        [_Pointing to_ SALLY.
 
 SALLY.
 Let ma aloaen afoor foaelk, wilt tha?
 
 1ST HAYMAKER.
 Ye shall sing that ageaen to-night, fur owd Dobson'll gi'e us a bit o'
 supper.
 
 SALLY.
 I weaent goae to owd Dobson; he wur rude to me i' tha haaeyfield, and
 he'll be rude to me ageaen to-night. Owd Steer's gotten all his grass
 down and wants a hand, and I'll goae to him.
 
 1ST HAYMAKER.
 Owd Steer gi'es nubbut cowd tea to '_is_ men, and owd Dobson gi'es
 beer.
 
 SALLY.
 But I'd like owd Steer's cowd tea better nor Dobson's beer. Good-bye.
                                                               [Going.
 
 JAMES.
 Gi'e us a buss fust, lass.
 
 SALLY.
 I tell'd tha to let ma aloaen!
 
 JAMES.
 Why, wasn't thou and me a-bussin' o' one another t'other side o' the
 haaeycock, when owd Dobson coom'd upo' us? I can't let tha aloaen if I
 would, Sally.
                                    [Offering to kiss her.
 
 SALLY.
 Git along wi' ye, do!    [_Exit_.
                            [_All laugh; exeunt singing_.
 
     'To be true to each other, let 'appen what maaey,
         Till the end o' the daae'y
         An' the last loaed hoaem.'
 
         _Enter_ HAROLD.
 
 HAROLD.
 Not Harold! 'Philip Edgar, Philip Edgar!'
 Her phantom call'd me by the name she loved.
 I told her I should hear her from the grave.
 Ay! yonder is her casement. I remember
 Her bright face beaming starlike down upon me
 Thro' that rich cloud of blossom. Since I left her
 Here weeping, I have ranged the world, and sat
 Thro' every sensual course of that full feast
 That leaves but emptiness.
 
               _Song_.
 
     'To be true to each other, let 'appen what maaey,
         To the end o' the daae'y
         An' the last loaed hoaem.'
 
 HAROLD.
 Poor Eva! O my God, if man be only
 A willy-nilly current of sensations--
 Reaction needs must follow revel--yet--
 Why feel remorse, he, knowing that he must have
 Moved in the iron grooves of Destiny?
 Remorse then is a part of Destiny,
 Nature a liar, making us feel guilty
 Of her own faults.
 My grandfather--of him
 They say, that women--
 O this mortal house,
 Which we are born into, is haunted by
 The ghosts of the dead passions of dead men;
 And these take flesh again with our own flesh,
 And bring us to confusion.
 He was only
 A poor philosopher who call'd the mind
 Of children a blank page, a tabula rasa.
 There, there, is written in invisible inks
 'Lust, Prodigality, Covetousness, Craft,
 Cowardice, Murder'--and the heat and fire
 Of life will bring them out, and black enough,
 So the child grow to manhood: better death
 With our first wail than life--
 
 Song (further off).
 
     'Till the end o' the daaey
     An' the last loaed hoaem,
         Load hoaem.'
 
 This bridge again! (Steps on the bridge.)
 How often have I stood
 With Eva here! The brook among its flowers!
 Forget-me-not, meadowsweet, willow-herb.
 I had some smattering of science then,
 Taught her the learned names, anatomized
 The flowers for her--and now I only wish
 This pool were deep enough, that I might plunge
 And lose myself for ever.
 
         _Enter_ DAN SMITH (_singing_).
 
       Gee oop! whoae! Gee oop! whoae!
     Scizzars an' Pumpy was good uns to goae
           Thruf slush an' squad
           When roaeds was bad,
     But hallus ud stop at the Vine-an'-the-Hop,
       Fur boaeth on 'em knaw'd as well as mysen
         That beer be as good fur 'erses as men.
           Gee oop! whoae! Gee oop! whoae!
         Scizzars an' Pumpy was good uns to goae.
 
 The beer's gotten oop into my 'eaed. S'iver I mun git along back to the
 farm, fur she tell'd ma to taaeke the cart to Littlechester.
 
     _Enter_ DORA.
 
 Half an hour late! why are you loitering here? Away with you at once.
 
                                     [_Exit_ DAN SMITH.
                         (_Seeing_ HAROLD _on bridge_.)
 
 Some madman, is it, Gesticulating there upon the bridge? I am half
 afraid to pass.
 
 HAROLD.
                         Sometimes I wonder,
 When man has surely learnt at last that all
 His old-world faith, the blossom of his youth,
 Has faded, falling fruitless--whether then
 All of us, all at once, may not be seized
 With some fierce passion, not so much for Death
 As against Life! all, all, into the dark--
 No more!--and science now could drug and balm us
 Back into nescience with as little pain
 As it is to fall asleep.
                          This beggarly life,
 This poor, flat, hedged-in field--no distance--this
 Hollow Pandora-box,
 With all the pleasures flown, not even Hope
 Left at the bottom!
                     Superstitious fool,
 What brought me here? To see her grave? her ghost?
 Her ghost is everyway about me here.
 
 DORA (_coming forward_).
 Allow me, sir, to pass you.
 
 HAROLD.
                             Eva!
 
 DORA.
                                  Eva!
 
 HAROLD.
 What are you? Where do you come from?
 
 DORA.
                                       From the farm
 Here, close at hand.
 
 HAROLD.
                      Are you--you are--that Dora,
 The sister. I have heard of you. The likeness
 Is very striking.
 
 DORA.
                   You knew Eva, then?
 
 HAROLD.
 Yes--I was thinking of her when--O yes,
 Many years back, and never since have met
 Her equal for pure innocence of nature,
 And loveliness of feature.
 
 DORA.
                            No, nor I.
 
 HAROLD.
 Except, indeed, I have found it once again
 In your own self.
 
 DORA.
                   You flatter me. Dear Eva
 Was always thought the prettier.
 
 HAROLD.
                                  And _her_ charm
 Of voice is also yours; and I was brooding
 Upon a great unhappiness when you spoke.
 
 DORA.
 Indeed, you seem'd in trouble, sir.
 
 HAROLD.
                                     And you
 Seem my good angel who may help me from it.
 
 DORA (_aside_).
 How worn he looks, poor man! who is it, I wonder.
 How can I help him? (_Aloud_.) Might I ask your name?
 
 HAROLD.
 Harold.
 
 DORA.
         I never heard her mention you.
 
 HAROLD.
 I met her first at a farm in Cumberland--
 Her uncle's.
 
 DORA.
              She was there six years ago.
 
 HAROLD.
 And if she never mention'd me, perhaps
 The painful circumstances which I heard--
 I will not vex you by repeating them--
 Only last week at Littlechester, drove me
 From out her memory. She has disappear'd,
 They told me, from the farm--and darker news.
 
 DORA.
 She has disappear'd, poor darling, from the world--
 Left but one dreadful line to say, that we
 Should find her in the river; and we dragg'd
 The Littlechester river all in vain:
 Have sorrow'd for her all these years in vain.
 And my poor father, utterly broken down
 By losing her--she was his favourite child--
 Has let his farm, all his affairs, I fear,
 But for the slender help that I can give,
 Fall into ruin. Ah! that villain, Edgar,
 If he should ever show his face among us,
 Our men and boys would hoot him, stone him, hunt him
 With pitchforks off the farm, for all of them
 Loved her, and she was worthy of all love.
 
 HAROLD.
 They say, we should forgive our enemies.
 
 DORA.
 Ay, if the wretch were dead I might forgive him;
 We know not whether he be dead or living.
 
 HAROLD.
 What Edgar?
 
 DORA.
             Philip Edgar of Toft Hall
 In Somerset. Perhaps you know him?
 
 HAROLD.
                                    Slightly.
 (_Aside_.) Ay, for how slightly have I known myself.
 
 DORA.
 This Edgar, then, is living?
 
 HAROLD.
                              Living? well--
 One Philip Edgar of Toft Hall in Somerset
 Is lately dead.
 
 DORA.
                 Dead!--is there more than one?
 
 HAROLD.
 Nay--now--not one, (_aside_) for I am Philip Harold.
 
 DORA.
 That one, is he then--dead!
 
 HAROLD.
                  (_Aside_.) My father's death,
 Let her believe it mine; this, for the moment,
 Will leave me a free field.
 
 DORA.
                             Dead! and this world
 Is brighter for his absence as that other
 Is darker for his presence.
 
 HAROLD.
                             Is not this
 To speak too pitilessly of the dead?
 
 DORA.
 My five-years' anger cannot die at once,
 Not all at once with death and him. I trust
 I shall forgive him--by-and-by--not now.
 O sir, you seem to have a heart; if you
 Had seen us that wild morning when we found
 Her bed unslept in, storm and shower lashing
 Her casement, her poor spaniel wailing for her,
 That desolate letter, blotted with her tears,
 Which told us we should never see her more--
 Our old nurse crying as if for her own child,
 My father stricken with his first paralysis,
 And then with blindness--had you been one of us
 And seen all this, then you would know it is not
 So easy to forgive--even the dead.
 
 HAROLD.
 But sure am I that of your gentleness
 You will forgive him. She, you mourn for, seem'd
 A miracle of gentleness--would not blur
 A moth's wing by the touching; would not crush
 The fly that drew her blood; and, were she living,
 Would not--if penitent--have denied him _her_
 Forgiveness. And perhaps the man himself,
 When hearing of that piteous death, has suffer'd
 More than we know. But wherefore waste your heart
 In looking on a chill and changeless Past?
 Iron will fuse, and marble melt; the Past
 Remains the Past. But you are young, and--pardon me--
 As lovely as your sister. Who can tell
 What golden hours, with what full hands, may be
 Waiting you in the distance? Might I call
 Upon your father--I have seen the world--
 And cheer his blindness with a traveller's tales?
 
 DORA.
 Call if you will, and when you will. I cannot
 Well answer for my father; but if you
 Can tell me anything of our sweet Eva
 When in her brighter girlhood, I at least
 Will bid you welcome, and will listen to you.
 Now I must go.
 
 HAROLD.
                But give me first your hand:
 I do not dare, like an old friend, to shake it.
 I kiss it as a prelude to that privilege
 When you shall know me better.
 
 DORA.
                     (_Aside_.) How beautiful
 His manners are, and how unlike the farmer's!
 You are staying here?
 
 HAROLD.
                       Yes, at the wayside inn
 Close by that alder-island in your brook,
 'The Angler's Home.'
 
 DORA.
                      Are _you_ one?
 
 HAROLD.
                                     No, but I
 Take some delight in sketching, and the country
 Has many charms, altho' the inhabitants
 Seem semi-barbarous.
 
 DORA.
                      I am glad it pleases you;
 Yet I, born here, not only love the country,
 But its inhabitants too; and you, I doubt not,
 Would take to them as kindly, if you cared
 To live some time among them.
 
 HAROLD.
                               If I did,
 Then one at least of its inhabitants
 Might have more charm for me than all the country.
 
 DORA.
 That one, then, should be grateful for your preference.
 
 HAROLD.
 I cannot tell, tho' standing in her presence.
 (_Aside_.) She colours!
 
 DORA.
                         Sir!
 
 HAROLD.
                              Be not afraid of me,
 For these are no conventional flourishes.
 I do most earnestly assure you that
 Your likeness--
                    [_Shouts and cries without_.
 
 DORA.
 What was that? my poor blind father--
 
     _Enter_ FARMING MAN.
 
 FARMING MAN.
 Miss Dora, Dan Smith's cart hes runned ower a laaedy i' the holler
 laaene, and they ha' ta'en the body up inter your chaumber, and they be
 all a-callin' for ye.
 
 DORA.
 The body!--Heavens! I come!
 
 HAROLD.
                             But you are trembling.
 Allow me to go with you to the farm.      [_Exeunt_.
 
     _Enter_ DOBSON.
 
 DOBSON.
 What feller wur it as 'a' been a-talkin' fur haaefe an hour wi' my
 Dora? (_Looking after him_.) Seeaems I ommost knaws the back on 'im--
 drest like a gentleman, too. Damn all gentlemen, says I! I should ha'
 thowt they'd hed anew o' gentlefoaelk, as I telled 'er to-daaey when she
 fell foul upo' me.
 
 Minds ma o' summun. I could sweaer to that; but that be all one, fur I
 haaetes 'im afoor I knaws what 'e be. Theer! he turns round. Philip
 Hedgar o' Soomerset! Philip Hedgar o' Soomerset!--Noae--yeas--thaw the
 feller's gone and maaede such a litter of his faaece.
 
 Eh lad, if it be thou, I'll Philip tha! a-plaaeyin' the saaeme gaaeme wi'
 my Dora--I'll Soomerset tha.
 
 I'd like to drag 'im thruff the herse-pond, and she to be a-lookin' at
 it. I'd like to leather 'im black and blue, and she to be a-laughin'
 at it. I'd like to fell 'im as deaed as a bullock! (_Clenching his
 fist_.) But what 'ud she saaey to that? She telled me once not to
 meddle wi' 'im, and now she be fallen out wi' ma, and I can't coom at
 'er.
 
 It mun be _him_. Noae! Fur she'd niver 'a been talkin' haaefe an hour
 wi' the divil 'at killed her oaen sister, or she beaent Dora Steer.
 
 Yeas! Fur she niver knawed 'is faaece when 'e wur 'ere afoor; but I'll
 maaeke 'er knaw! I'll maaeke 'er knaw!
 
     _Enter_ HAROLD.
 
 Naaey, but I mun git out on 'is waaey now, or I shall be the death on
 'im.    [_Exit_.
 
 HAROLD.
 How the clown glared at me! that Dobbins, is it,
 With whom I used to jar? but can he trace me
 Thro' five years' absence, and my change of name,
 The tan of southern summers and the beard?
 I may as well avoid him.
                          Ladylike!
 Lilylike in her stateliness and sweetness!
 How came she by it?--a daughter of the fields,
 This Dora!
 She gave her hand, unask'd, at the farm-gate;
 I almost think she half return'd the pressure
 Of mine. What, I that held the orange blossom
 Dark as the yew? but may not those, who march
 Before their age, turn back at times, and make
 Courtesy to custom? and now the stronger motive,
 Misnamed free-will--the crowd would call it conscience--
 Moves me--to what? I am dreaming; for the past
 Look'd thro' the present, Eva's eyes thro' her's--
 A spell upon me! Surely I loved Eva
 More than I knew! or is it but the past
 That brightens in retiring? Oh, last night,
 Tired, pacing my new lands at Littlechester,
 I dozed upon the bridge, and the black river
 Flow'd thro' my dreams--if dreams they were. She rose
 From the foul flood and pointed toward the farm,
 And her cry rang to me across the years,
 'I call you, Philip Edgar, Philip Edgar!
 Come, you will set all right again, and father
 Will not die miserable.' I could make his age
 A comfort to him--so be more at peace
 With mine own self. Some of my former friends
 Would find my logic faulty; let them. Colour
 Flows thro' my life again, and I have lighted
 On a new pleasure. Anyhow we must
 Move in the line of least resistance when
 The stronger motive rules.
                            But she hates Edgar.
 May not this Dobbins, or some other, spy
 Edgar in Harold? Well then, I must make her
 Love Harold first, and then she will forgive
 Edgar for Harold's sake. She said herself
 She would forgive him, by-and-by, not now--
 For her own sake _then_, if not for mine--not now--
 But by-and-by.
 
     _Enter_ DOBSON _behind_.
 
 DOBSON.
 By-and-by--eh, lad, dosta knaw this paaeper? Ye dropt it upo' the road.
 'Philip Edgar, Esq.' Ay, you be a pretty squire. I ha' fun' ye out, I
 hev. Eh, lad, dosta knaw what tha meaens wi' by-and-by? Fur if ye be
 goin' to sarve our Dora as ye sarved our Eva--then, by-and-by, if she
 weaent listen to me when I be a-tryin' to saaeve 'er--if she weaent--look
 to thysen, for, by the Lord, I'd think na moor o' maaekin' an end o'
 tha nor a carrion craw--noae--thaw they hanged ma at 'Size fur it.
 
 HAROLD.
 Dobbins, I think!
 
 DOBSON.
 I beaent Dobbins.
 
 HAROLD.
 Nor am I Edgar, my good fellow.
 
 DOBSON.
 Tha lies! What hasta been saaeyin' to _my_ Dora?
 
 HAROLD.
 I have been telling her of the death of one Philip Edgar of Toft Hall,
 Somerset.
 
 DOBSON.
 Tha lies!
 
 HAROLD (_pulling out a newspaper_).
 Well, my man, it seems that you can read. Look there--under the deaths.
 
 DOBSON.
 'O' the 17th, Philip Edgar, o' Toft Hall, Soomerset.' How coom thou to
 be sa like 'im, then?
 
 HAROLD.
 Naturally enough; for I am closely related to the dead man's family.
 
 DOBSON.
 An 'ow coom thou by the letter to 'im?
 
 HAROLD.
 Naturally again; for as I used to transact all his business for him, I
 had to look over his letters. Now then, see these (_takes out
 letters_). Half a score of them, all directed to me--Harold.
 
 DOBSON.
 'Arold! 'Arold! 'Arold, so they be.
 
 HAROLD.
 My name is Harold! Good day, Dobbins!
                                  [_Exit_.
 DOBSON.
 'Arold! The feller's cleaen daaezed, an' maaezed, an' maaeted, an' muddled
 ma. Deaed! It mun be true, fur it wur i' print as black as owt. Naaeay,
 but 'Good daaey, Dobbins.' Why, that wur the very twang on 'im. Eh,
 lad, but whether thou be Hedgar, or Hedgar's business man, thou hesn't
 naw business 'ere wi' _my_ Dora, as I knaws on, an' whether thou calls
 thysen Hedgar or Harold, if thou stick to she I'll stick to thee--
 stick to tha like a weasel to a rabbit, I will. Ay! and I'd like to
 shoot tha like a rabbit an' all. 'Good daaey, Dobbins.' Dang tha!
 
 
 
 
 ACT III.
 
 
 SCENE.--_A room in_ STEER'S _House. Door leading into bedroom at the
 back_.
 
 
 DORA (_ringing a handbell_).
 Milly!
 
     _Enter_ MILLY.
 
 MILLY.
 The little 'ymn? Yeaes, Miss; but I wur so ta'en up wi' leaedin' the owd
 man about all the blessed murnin' 'at I ha' nobbut larned mysen haaefe
 on it.
 
  'O man, forgive thy mortal foe,
   Nor ever strike him blow for blow;
   For all the souls on earth that live
   To be forgiven must forgive.
   Forgive him seventy times and seven:
   For all the blessed souls in Heaven
   Are both forgivers and forgiven.'
 
 But I'll git the book ageaen, and larn mysen the rest, and saaey it to
 ye afoor dark; ye ringed fur that, Miss, didn't ye?
 
 DORA.
 No, Milly; but if the farming-men be come for their wages, to send
 them up to me.
 
 MILLY.
 Yeaes, Miss.    [_Exit.
 
 DORA (_sitting at desk counting money_).
 Enough at any rate for the present. (_Enter_ FARMING MEN.) Good
 afternoon, my friends. I am sorry Mr. Steer still continues too unwell
 to attend to you, but the schoolmaster looked to the paying you your
 wages when I was away, didn't he?
 
 MEN.
 Yeaes; and thanks to ye.
 
 DORA.
 Some of our workmen have left us, but he sent me an alphabetical list
 of those that remain, so, Allen, I may as well begin with you.
 
 ALLEN (_with his hand to his ear_).
 Halfabitical! Taaeke one o' the young 'uns fust, Miss, fur I be a bit
 deaf, and I wur hallus scaaered by a big word; leaestwaaeys, I should be
 wi' a lawyer.
 
 DORA.
 I spoke of your names, Allen, as they are arranged here (_shows
 book_)--according to their first letters.
 
 ALLEN.
 Letters! Yeas, I sees now. Them be what they larns the childer' at
 school, but I were burn afoor schoolin-time.
 
 DORA.
 But, Allen, tho' you can't read, you could whitewash that cottage of
 yours where your grandson had the fever.
 
 ALLEN.
 I'll hev it done o' Monday.
 
 DORA.
 Else if the fever spread, the parish will have to thank you for it.
 
 ALLEN.
 Meae? why, it be the Lord's doin', noaen o' mine; d'ye think _I'd_ gi'e
 'em the fever? But I thanks ye all the saaeme, Miss. (_Takes money_.)
 
 DORA (_calling out names_).
 Higgins, Jackson, Luscombe, Nokes, Oldham, Skipworth! (_All take
 money_.) Did you find that you worked at all the worse upon the cold
 tea than you would have done upon the beer?
 
 HIGGINS.
 Noae, Miss; we worked naw wuss upo' the cowd tea; but we'd ha' worked
 better upo' the beer.
 
 DORA.
 Come, come, you worked well enough, and I am much obliged to all of
 you. There's for you, and you, and you. Count the money and see if
 it's all right.
 
 MEN.
 All right, Miss; and thank ye kindly.
 
           [_Exeunt_ LUSCOMBE, NOKES, OLDHAM, SKIPWORTH.
 
 DORA.
 Dan Smith, my father and I forgave you stealing our coals.
 
       [DAN SMITH _advances to_ DORA.
 
 DAN SMITH (_bellowing_).
 Whoy, O lor, Miss! that wur sa long back, and the walls sa thin, and
 the winders brokken, and the weather sa cowd, and my missus a-gittin'
 ower 'er lyin'-in.
 
 DORA.
 Didn't I say that we had forgiven you? But, Dan Smith, they tell me
 that you--and you have six children--spent all your last Saturday's
 wages at the ale-house; that you were stupid drunk all Sunday, and so
 ill in consequence all Monday, that you did not come into the
 hayfield. Why should I pay you your full wages?
 
 DAN SMITH.
 I be ready to taaeke the pledge.
 
 DORA.
 And as ready to break it again. Besides it was you that were driving
 the cart--and I fear you were tipsy then, too--when you lamed the lady
 in the hollow lane.
 
 DAN SMITH (_bellowing_).
 O lor, Miss! noae, noae, noae! Ye sees the holler laaene be hallus sa dark
 i' the arternoon, and wheere the big eshtree cuts athurt it, it gi'es
 a turn like, and 'ow should I see to laaeme the laaedy, and meae coomin'
 along pretty sharp an' all?
 
 DORA.
 Well, there are your wages; the next time you waste them at a pothouse
 you get no more from me. (_Exit_ DAN SMITH.) Sally Allen, you worked
 for Mr. Dobson, didn't you?
 
 SALLY (_advancing_).
 Yeaes, Miss; but he wur so rough wi' ma, I couldn't abide 'im.
 
 DORA.
 Why should he be rough with you? You are as good as a man in the
 hayfield. What's become of your brother?
 
 SALLY.
 'Listed for a soaedger, Miss, i' the Queen's Real Hard Tillery.
 
 DORA.
 And your sweetheart--when are you and he to be married?
 
 SALLY.
 At Michaelmas, Miss, please God.
 
 DORA.
 You are an honest pair. I will come to your wedding.
 
 SALLY.
 An' I thanks ye fur that, Miss, moor nor fur the waaege.
 
 (_Going--returns_.)
 
 'A cotched ma about the waaeist, Miss, when 'e wur 'ere afoor, an' axed
 ma to be 'is little sweet-art, an soae I knaw'd 'im when I seed 'im
 ageaen an I telled feyther on 'im.
 
 DORA.
 What is all this, Allen?
 
 ALLEN.
 Why, Miss Dora, meae and my maaetes, us three, we wants to hev three
 words wi' ye.
 
 HIGGINS.
 That be 'im, and meae, Miss.
 
 JACKSON.
 An' meae, Miss.
 
 ALLEN.
 An' we weaent mention naw naaemes, we'd as lief talk o' the Divil afoor
 ye as 'im, fur they says the master goaes cleaen off his 'eaed when he
 'eaers the naaeme on 'im; but us three, arter Sally'd telled us on 'im,
 we fun' 'im out a-walkin' i' West Field wi' a white 'at, nine o'clock,
 upo' Tuesday murnin', and all on us, wi' your leave, we wants to
 leather 'im.
 
 DORA.
 Who?
 
 ALLEN.
 Him as did the mischief here, five year' sin'.
 
 DORA.
 Mr. Edgar?
 
 ALLEN.
 Theer, Miss! You ha' naaemed 'im--not me.
 
 DORA.
 He's dead, man--dead; gone to his account--dead and buried.
 
 ALLEN.
 I beae'nt sa sewer o' that, fur Sally knaw'd 'im; Now then?
 
 DORA.
 Yes; it was in the Somersetshire papers.
 
 ALLEN.
 Then yon mun be his brother, an'--we'll leather '_im_.
 
 DORA.
 I never heard that he had a brother. Some foolish mistake of Sally's;
 but what! would you beat a man for his brother's fault? That were a
 wild justice indeed. Let bygones be bygones. Go home.' Goodnight!
 (_All exeunt_.) I have once more paid them all. The work of the farm
 will go on still, but for how long? We are almost at the bottom of the
 well: little more to be drawn from it--and what then? Encumbered as we
 are, who would lend us anything? We shall have to sell all the land,
 which Father, for a whole life, has been getting together, again, and
 that, I am sure, would be the death of him. What am I to do? Farmer
 Dobson, were I to marry him, has promised to keep our heads above
 water; and the man has doubtless a good heart, and a true and lasting
 love for me: yet--though I can be sorry for him--as the good Sally
 says, 'I can't abide him'--almost brutal, and matched with my Harold
 is like a hedge thistle by a garden rose. But then, he, too--will he
 ever be of one faith with his wife? which is my dream of a true
 marriage. Can I fancy him kneeling with me, and uttering the same
 prayer; standing up side by side with me, and singing the same hymn? I
 fear not. Have I done wisely, then, in accepting him? But may not a
 girl's love-dream have too much romance in it to be realised all at
 once, or altogether, or anywhere but in Heaven? And yet I had once a
 vision of a pure and perfect marriage, where the man and the woman,
 only differing as the stronger and the weaker, should walk hand in
 hand together down this valley of tears, as they call it so truly, to
 the grave at the bottom, and lie down there together in the darkness
 which would seem but for a moment, to be wakened again together by the
 light of the resurrection, and no more partings for ever and for ever.
 (_Walks up and down. She sings_.)
 
     'O happy lark, that warblest high
       Above thy lowly nest,
     O brook, that brawlest merrily by
       Thro' fields that once were blest,
     O tower spiring to the sky,
       O graves in daisies drest,
     O Love and Life, how weary am I,
       And how I long for rest.'
 
 There, there, I am a fool! Tears! I have sometimes been moved to tears
 by a chapter of fine writing in a novel; but what have I to do with
 tears now? All depends on me--Father, this poor girl, the farm,
 everything; and they both love me--I am all in all to both; and he
 loves me too, I am quite sure of that. Courage, courage! and all will
 go well. (_Goes to bedroom door; opens it_.) How dark your room is!
 Let me bring you in here where there is still full daylight. (_Brings_
 EVA _forward_.) Why, you look better.
 
 EVA.
 And I feel so much better that I trust I may be able by-and-by to help
 you in the business of the farm; but I must not be known yet. Has
 anyone found me out, Dora?
 
 DORA.
 Oh, no; you kept your veil too close for that when they carried you
 in; since then, no one has seen you but myself.
 
 EVA.
 Yes--this Milly.
 
 DORA.
 Poor blind Father's little guide, Milly, who came to us three years
 after you were gone, how should she know you? But now that you have
 been brought to us as it were from the grave, dearest Eva, and have
 been here so long, will you not speak with Father today?
 
 EVA.
 Do you think that I may? No, not yet. I am not equal to it yet.
 
 DORA.
 Why? Do you still suffer from your fall in the hollow lane?
 
 EVA.
 Bruised; but no bones broken.
 
 DORA.
 I have always told Father that the huge old ashtree there would cause
 an accident some day; but he would never cut it down, because one of
 the Steers had planted it there in former times.
 
 EVA.
 If it had killed one of the Steers there the other day, it might have
 been better for her, for him, and for you.
 
 DORA.
 Come, come, keep a good heart! Better for me! That's good. How better
 for me?
 
 EVA.
 You tell me you have a lover. Will he not fly from you if he learn the
 story of my shame and that I am still living?
 
 DORA.
 No; I am sure that when we are married he will be willing that you and
 Father should live with us; for, indeed, he tells me that he met you
 once in the old times, and was much taken with you, my dear.
 
 EVA.
 Taken with me; who was he? Have you told him I am here?
 
 DORA.
 No; do you wish it?
 
 EVA.
 See, Dora; you yourself are ashamed of me (_weeps_), and I do not
 wonder at it.
 
 DORA.
 But I should wonder at myself if it were so. Have we not been all in
 all to one another from the time when we first peeped into the bird's
 nest, waded in the brook, ran after the butterflies, and prattled to
 each other that we would marry fine gentlemen, and played at being
 fine ladies?
 
 EVA.
 That last was my Father's fault, poor man. And this lover of yours--
 this Mr. Harold--is a gentleman?
 
 DORA.
 That he is, from head to foot. I do believe I lost my heart to him the
 very first time we met, and I love him so much--
 
 EVA.
 Poor Dora!
 
 DORA.
 That I dare not tell him how much I love him.
 
 EVA.
 Better not. Has he offered you marriage, this gentleman?
 
 DORA
 Could I love him else?
 
 EVA.
 And are you quite sure that after marriage this gentleman will not be
 shamed of his poor farmer's daughter among the ladies in his
 drawing-room?
 
 DORA.
 Shamed of me in a drawing-room! Wasn't Miss Vavasour, our
 schoolmistress at Littlechester, a lady born? Were not our
 fellow-pupils all ladies? Wasn't dear mother herself at least by one
 side a lady? Can't I speak like a lady; pen a letter like a lady; talk
 a little French like a lady; play a little like a lady? Can't a girl
 when she loves her husband, and he her, make herself anything he
 wishes her to be? Shamed of me in a drawing-room, indeed! See here! 'I
 hope your Lordship is quite recovered of your gout?' (_Curtsies_.)
 'Will your Ladyship ride to cover to-day? (_Curtsies_.) I can
 recommend our Voltigeur.' 'I am sorry that we could not attend your
 Grace's party on the 10th!' (_Curtsies_.) There, I am glad my nonsense
 has made you smile!
 
 EVA.
 I have heard that 'your Lordship,' and 'your Ladyship,' and 'your
 Grace' are all growing old-fashioned!
 
 DORA.
 But the love of sister for sister can never be old-fashioned. I have
 been unwilling to trouble you with questions, but you seem somewhat
 better to-day. We found a letter in your bedroom torn into bits. I
 couldn't make it out. What was it?
 
 EVA.
 From him! from him! He said we had been most happy together, and he
 trusted that some time we should meet again, for he had not forgotten
 his promise to come when I called him. But that was a mockery, you
 know, for he gave me no address, and there was no word of marriage;
 and, O Dora, he signed himself 'Yours gratefully'--fancy, Dora,
 'gratefully'! 'Yours gratefully'!
 
 DORA.
 Infamous wretch! (_Aside_.) Shall I tell her he is dead? No; she is
 still too feeble.
 
 EVA.
 Hark! Dora, some one is coming. I cannot and I will not see anybody.
 
 DORA.
 It is only Milly.
 
     _Enter_ MILLY, _with basket of roses_.
 
 DORA.
 Well, Milly, why do you come in so roughly? The sick lady here might
 have been asleep.
 
 MILLY.
 Pleaese, Miss, Mr. Dobson telled me to saaey he's browt some of Miss
 Eva's roses for the sick laaedy to smell on.
 
 DORA.
 Take them, dear. Say that the sick lady thanks him! Is he here?
 
 MILLY.
 Yeaes, Miss; and he wants to speaek to ye partic'lar,
 
 DORA.
 Tell him I cannot leave the sick lady just yet.
 
 MILLY.
 Yea's, Miss; but he says he wants to tell ye summut very partic'lar.
 
 DORA.
 Not to-day. What are you staying for?
 
 MILLY.
 Why, Miss, I be afeard I shall set him a-sweaering like onythink.
 
 DORA.
 And what harm will that do you, so that you do not copy his bad
 manners? Go, child. (_Exit_ MILLY.) But, Eva, why did you write 'Seek
 me at the bottom of the river'?
 
 EVA.
 Why? because I meant it!--that dreadful night! that lonely walk to
 Littlechester, the rain beating in my face all the way, dead midnight
 when I came upon the bridge; the river, black, slimy, swirling under
 me in the lamplight, by the rotten wharfs--but I was so mad, that I
 mounted upon the parapet--
 
 DORA.
 You make me shudder!
 
 EVA.
 To fling myself over, when I heard a voice, 'Girl, what are you doing
 there? It was a Sister of Mercy, come from the death-bed of a pauper,
 who had died in his misery blessing God, and the Sister took me to her
 house, and bit by bit--for she promised secrecy--I told her all.
 
 DORA.
 And what then?
 
 EVA.
 She would have persuaded me to come back here, but I couldn't. Then
 she got me a place as nursery governess, and when the children grew
 too old for me, and I asked her once more to help me, once more she
 said, 'Go home;' but I hadn't the heart or face to do it. And then--
 what would Father say? I sank so low that I went into service--the
 drudge of a lodging-house--and when the mistress died, and I appealed
 to the Sister again, her answer--I think I have it about me--yes,
 there it is!
 
 DORA (_reads_).
 'My dear Child,--I can do no more for you. I
 have done wrong in keeping your secret; your Father
 must be now in extreme old age. Go back to him and
 ask his forgiveness before he dies.--SISTER AGATHA.'
 Sister Agatha is right. Don't you long for Father's
 forgiveness?
 
 EVA.
 I would almost die to have it!
 
 DORA.
 And he may die before he gives it; may drop off any day, any hour. You
 must see him at once. (_Rings bell. Enter_ MILLY.) Milly, my dear, how
 did you leave Mr. Steer?
 
 MILLY.
 He's been a-moaenin' and a-groaenin' in 'is sleep, but I thinks he be
 wakkenin' oop.
 
 DORA.
 Tell him that I and the lady here wish to see him. You see she is
 lamed, and cannot go down to him.
 
 MILLY.
 Yeaes, Miss, I will.    [_Exit_ MILLY.
 
 DORA.
 I ought to prepare you. You must not expect to find our Father as he
 was five years ago. He is much altered; but I trust that your return--
 for you know, my dear, you were always his favourite--will give him,
 as they say, a new lease of life.
 
 EVA (_clinging to_ DORA).
 Oh, Dora, Dora!
 
     _Enter_ STEER, _led by_ MILLY.
 
 STEER.
 Hes the cow cawved?
 
 DORA.
 No. Father.
 
 STEER.
 Be the colt deaed?
 
 DORA.
 No, Father.
 
 STEER.
 He wur sa bellows'd out wi' the wind this murnin', 'at I tell'd 'em to
 gallop 'im. Be he deaed?
 
 DORA.
 Not that I know.
 
 STEER.
 That hasta sent fur me, then, fur?
 
 DORA (_taking_ STEER'S _arm_).
 Well, Father, I have a surprise for you.
 
 STEER.
 I ha niver been surprised but once i' my life, and I went blind
 upon it.
 
 DORA.
 Eva has come home.
 
 STEER.
 Hoaem? fro' the bottom o' the river?
 
 DORA.
 No, Father, that was a mistake. She's here again.
 
 STEER.
 The Steers was all gentlefoaelks i' the owd times, an' I worked early
 an' laaete to maaeke 'em all gentle-foaelks ageaen. The land belonged to
 the Steers i' the owd times, an' it belongs to the Steers ageaen: I
 bowt it back ageaen; but I couldn't buy my darter back ageaen when she
 lost hersen, could I? I eddicated boaeth on em to marry gentlemen, an'
 one on 'em went an' lost hersen i' the river.
 
 DORA.
 No, father, she's here.
 
 STEER.
 Here! she moaent coom here. What would her mother saaey? If it be her
 ghoaest, we mun abide it. We can't keep a ghoaest out.
 
 EVA (_falling at his feet_).
 O forgive me! forgive me!
 
 STEER.
 Who said that? Taaeke me awaaey, little gell. It be one o' my bad daaeys.
                                           [_Exit_ STEER _led by_ MILLY.
 
 DORA (_smoothing_ EVA'S _forehead_).
 Be not so cast down, my sweet Eva. You heard him say it was one of his
 bad days. He will be sure to know you to-morrow.
 
 EVA.
 It is almost the last of my bad days, I think. I am very faint. I must
 lie down. Give me your arm. Lead me back again.
              [DORA _takes_ EVA _into inner room_.
 
     _Enter_ MILLY.
 
 MILLY.
 Miss Dora! Miss Dora!
 
 DORA (_returning and leaving the bedroom door ajar_).
 Quiet! quiet! What is it?
 
 MILLY.
 Mr. 'Arold, Miss.
 
 DORA.
 Below?
 
 MILLY.
 Yeaes, Miss. He be saaeyin' a word to the owd man, but he'll coom up if
 ye lets 'im.
 
 DORA.
 Tell him, then, that I'm waiting for him.
 
 MILLY.
 Yeaes, Miss.
                [_Exit_. DORA _sits pensively and waits_.
 
     _Enter_ HAROLD.
 
 HAROLD.
 You are pale, my Dora! but the ruddiest cheek
 That ever charm'd the plowman of your wolds
 Might wish its rose a lily, could it look
 But half as lovely. I was speaking with
 Your father, asking his consent--you wish'd me--
 That we should marry: he would answer nothing,
 I could make nothing of him; but, my flower,
 You look so weary and so worn! What is it
 Has put you out of heart?
 
 DORA.
                           It puts me in heart
 Again to see you; but indeed the state
 Of my poor father puts me out of heart.
 Is yours yet living?
 
 HAROLD.
                      No--I told you.
 
 DORA.
                                      When?
 
 HAROLD.
 Confusion!--Ah well, well! the state we all
 Must come to in our spring-and-winter world
 If we live long enough! and poor Steer looks
 The very type of Age in a picture, bow'd
 To the earth he came from, to the grave he goes to,
 Beneath the burthen of years.
 
 DORA.
 More like the picture
 Of Christian in my 'Pilgrim's Progress' here,
 Bow'd to the dust beneath the burthen of sin.
 
 HAROLD.
 Sin! What sin?
 
 DORA.
                Not his own.
 
 HAROLD.
                             That nursery-tale
 Still read, then?
 
 DORA.
                   Yes; our carters and our shepherds
 Still find a comfort there.
 
 HAROLD.
                             Carters and shepherds!
 
 DORA.
 Scorn! I hate scorn. A soul with no religion--
 My mother used to say that such a one
 Was without rudder, anchor, compass--might be
 Blown everyway with every gust and wreck
 On any rock; and tho' you are good and gentle,
 Yet if thro' any want--
 
 HAROLD.
                        Of this religion?
 Child, read a little history, you will find
 The common brotherhood of man has been
 Wrong'd by the cruelties of his religions
 More than could ever have happen'd thro' the want
 Of any or all of them.
 
 DORA.
                       --But, O dear friend,
 If thro' the want of any--I mean the true one--
 And pardon me for saying it--you should ever
 Be tempted into doing what might seem
 Not altogether worthy of you, I think
 That I should break my heart, for you have taught me
 To love you.
 
 HAROLD.
              What is this? some one been stirring
 Against me? he, your rustic amourist,
 The polish'd Damon of your pastoral here,
 This Dobson of your idyll?
 
 DORA.
                            No, Sir, no!
 Did you not tell me he was crazed with jealousy,
 Had threaten'd ev'n your life, and would say anything?
 Did _I_ not promise not to listen to him,
 Not ev'n to see the man?
 
 HAROLD.
                          Good; then what is it
 That makes you talk so dolefully?
 
 DORA.
                                   I told you--
 My father. Well, indeed, a friend just now,
 One that has been much wrong'd, whose griefs are
 mine,
 
 Was warning me that if a gentleman
 Should wed a farmer's daughter, he would be
 Sooner or later shamed of her among
 The ladies, born his equals.
 
 HAROLD.
                              More fool he!
 What I that have been call'd a Socialist,
 A Communist, a Nihilist--what you will!--
 
 DORA.
 What are all these?
 
 HAROLD.
                     Utopian idiotcies.
 They did not last three Junes. Such rampant weeds
 Strangle each other, die, and make the soil
 For Caesars, Cromwells, and Napoleons
 To root their power in. I have freed myself
 From all such dreams, and some will say because
 I have inherited my Uncle. Let them.
 But--shamed of you, my Empress! I should prize
 The pearl of Beauty, 'even if I found it
 Dark with the soot of slums.
 
 DORA.
                              But I can tell you,
 We Steers are of old blood, tho' we be fallen.
 See there our shield. (_Pointing to arms on mantelpiece_.)
 For I have heard the Steers
 Had land in Saxon times; and your own name
 Of Harold sounds so English and so old
 I am sure you must be proud of it.
 
 HAROLD.
                                    Not I!
 As yet I scarcely feel it mine. I took it
 For some three thousand acres. I have land now
 And wealth, and lay both at your feet.
 
 DORA.
                                        And _what_ was
 Your name before?
 
 HAROLD.
                   Come, come, my girl, enough
 Of this strange talk. I love you and you me.
 True, I have held opinions, hold some still,
 Which you would scarce approve of: for all that,
 I am a man not prone to jealousies,
 Caprices, humours, moods; but very ready
 To make allowances, and mighty slow
 To feel offences. Nay, I do believe
 I could forgive--well, almost anything--
 And that more freely than your formal priest,
 Because I know more fully than _he_ can
 What poor earthworms are all and each of us,
 Here crawling in this boundless Nature. Dora,
 If marriage ever brought a woman happiness
 I doubt not I can make you happy.
 
 DORA.
                                   You make me
 Happy already.
 
 HAROLD.
                And I never said
 As much before to any woman living.
 
 DORA.
 No?
 
 HAROLD.
     No! by this true kiss, _you_ are the first
 I ever have loved truly.    [_They kiss each other_.
 
 EVA (_with a wild cry_).
 Philip Edgar!
 
 HAROLD.
 The phantom cry! _You_--did _you_ hear a cry?
 
 DORA.
 She must be crying out 'Edgar' in her sleep.
 
 HAROLD.
 Who must be crying out 'Edgar' in her sleep?
 
 DORA.
 Your pardon for a minute. She must be waked.
 
 HAROLD
 Who must be waked?
 
 DORA.
                    I am not deaf: you fright me.
 What ails you?
 
 HAROLD.
                Speak.
 
 DORA.
                       You know her, Eva.
 
 HAROLD.
                                          Eva!
              [EVA _opens the door and stands in the entry_.
 She!
 
 EVA.
      Make her happy, then, and I forgive you.
                                     [_Falls dead_.
 
 DORA.
 Happy! What? Edgar? Is it so? Can it be?
 They told me so. Yes, yes! I see it all now.
 O she has fainted. Sister, Eva, sister!
 He is yours again--he will love _you_ again;
 I give him back to you again. Look up!
 One word, or do but smile! Sweet, do you hear me?
                          [_Puts her hand on_ EVA'S _heart_.
 There, there--the heart, O God!--the poor young heart
 Broken at last--all still--and nothing left
 To live for.
                 [_Falls on body of her sister_.
 
 HAROLD.
              Living ... dead ... She said 'all still.
 Nothing to live for.'
                       She--she knows me--now ...
            (_A pause_.)
 She knew me from the first, she juggled with me,
 She hid this sister, told me she was dead--
 I have wasted pity on her--not dead now--
 No! acting, playing on me, both of them.
 _They_ drag the river for her! no, not they!
 Playing on me--not dead now--a swoon--a scene--
 Yet--how she made her wail as for the dead!
 
     _Enter_ MILLY.
 
 MILLY.
 Pleaese, Mister 'Arold.
 
 HAROLD (_roughly_).
 Well?
 
 MlLLY.
 The owd man's coom'd ageaen to 'issen, an' wants
 To hev a word wi' ye about the marriage.
 
 HAROLD.
 The what?
 
 MILLY.
           The marriage.
 
 HAROLD.
                         The marriage?
 
 MILLY.
                                       Yeaes, the marriage.
 Granny says marriages be maaede i' 'eaven.
 
 HAROLD.
 She lies! They are made in Hell. Child, can't you see?
 Tell them to fly for a doctor.
 
 MILLY.
                                O law--yeaes, Sir!
 I'll run fur 'im mysen.    [_Exit_.
 
 HAROLD.
                         All silent there,
 Yes, deathlike! Dead? I dare not look: if dead,
 Were it best to steal away, to spare myself,
 And her too, pain, pain, pain?
                                My curse on all
 This world of mud, on all its idiot gleams
 Of pleasure, all the foul fatalities
 That blast our natural passions into pains!
 
     _Enter_ DOBSON.
 
 DOBSON.
 You, Master Hedgar, Harold, or whativer
 They calls ye, for I warrants that ye goaes
 By haaefe a scoor o' naaemes--out o' the chaumber.
                           [_Dragging him past the body_.
 
 HAROLD.
 Not that way, man! Curse on your brutal strength!
 I cannot pass that way.
 
 DOBSON.
                         Out o' the chaumber!
 I'll mash tha into nowt.
 
 HAROLD.
                          The mere wild-beast!
 
 DOBSON.
 Out o' the chaumber, dang tha!
 
 HAROLD.
 Lout, churl, clown!
 
     [_While they are shouting and struggling_ DORA
     _rises and comes between them_.
 
 DORA (_to_ DOBSON).
 Peace, let him be: it is the chamber of Death!
 Sir, you are tenfold more a gentleman,
 A hundred times more worth a woman's love,
 Than this, this--but I waste no words upon him:
 His wickedness is like my wretchedness--
 Beyond all language.
                (_To_ HAROLD.)
                      You--you see her there!
 Only fifteen when first you came on her,
 And then the sweetest flower of all the wolds,
 So lovely in the promise of her May,
 So winsome in her grace and gaiety,
 So loved by all the village people here,
 So happy in herself and in her home--
 
 DOBSON (_agitated_).
 Theer, theer! ha' done. I can't abeaer to see her.
                                            [_Exit_.
 
 DORA.
 A child, and all as trustful as a child!
 Five years of shame and suffering broke the heart
 That only beat for you; and he, the father,
 Thro' that dishonour which you brought upon us,
 Has lost his health, his eyesight, even his mind.
 
 HAROLD (_covering his face_).
 Enough!
 
 DORA.
         It seem'd so; only there was left
 A second daughter, and to her you came
 Veiling one sin to act another.
 
 HAROLD.
                                 No!
 You wrong me there! hear, hear me! I wish'd, if you--    [_Pauses_.
 
 DORA.
 If I--
 
 HAROLD.
       Could love me, could be brought to love me
 As I loved you--
 
 DORA.
                 What then?
 
 HAROLD.
                            I wish'd, I hoped
 To make, to make--
 
 DORA.
                   _What_ did you hope to make?
 
 HAROLD.
 'Twere best to make an end of my lost life.
 O Dora, Dora!
 
 DORA.
               _What_ did you hope to make?
 
 HAROLD.
 Make, make! I cannot find the word--forgive it--
 Amends.
 
 DORA.
         For what? to whom?
 
 HAROLD.
                            To him, to you!
                                  [_Falling at her feet_.
 
 DORA.
 To _him_! to _me_!
                    No, not with all your wealth,
 Your land, your life! Out in the fiercest storm
 That ever made earth tremble--he, nor I--
 The shelter of _your_ roof--not for one moment--
 Nothing from _you_!
 Sunk in the deepest pit of pauperism,
 Push'd from all doors as if we bore the plague,
 Smitten with fever in the open field,
 Laid famine-stricken at the gates of Death--
 Nothing from you!
 But she there--her last word
 Forgave--and I forgive you. If you ever
 Forgive yourself, you are even lower and baser
 Than even I can well believe you. Go!
 
            [_He lies at her feet. Curtain falls_.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Jonathan Ingram, Tapio Riikonen and Distributed Proofreaders
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 QUEEN MARY and HAROLD
 
 BY
 
 ALFRED LORD TENNYSON, POET LAUREATE
 
 
 [Illustration]
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 QUEEN MARY: A DRAMA
 HAROLD: A DRAMA
 
 
 
 QUEEN MARY: A DRAMA.
 
 
 
 _DRAMATIS PERSONAE_
 
 QUEEN MARY.
 PHILIP, _King of Naples and Sicily, afterwards King of Spain_.
 THE PRINCESS ELIZABETH.
 REGINALD POLE, _Cardinal and Papal Legate_.
 SIMON RENARD, _Spanish Ambassador_.
 LE SIEUR DE NOAILLES, _French Ambassador_.
 THOMAS CRANMER, _Archbishop of Canterbury_.
 SIR NICHOLAS HEATH, _Archbishop of York; Lord Chancellor after Gardiner_.
 EDWARD COURTENAY, _Earl of Devon_.
 LORD WILLIAM HOWARD, _afterwards Lord Howard, and Lord High Admiral_.
 LORD WILLIAMS OF THAME.
 LORD PAGET.
 LORD PETRE.
 STEPHEN GARDINER, _Bishop of Winchester and Lord Chancellor_.
 EDMUND BONNER, _Bishop of London_.
 THOMAS THIRLBY, _Bishop of Ely_.
 SIR THOMAS WYATT     |
 SIR THOMAS STAFFORD  |  _Insurrectionary Leaders_.
 SIR RALPH BAGENHALL.
 SIR ROBERT SOUTHWELL.
 SIR HENRY BEDINGFIELD.
 SIR WILLIAM CECIL.
 SIR THOMAS WHITE, _Lord Mayor of London_.
 THE DUKE OF ALVA     |
 THE COUNT DE FERIA   | _attending on Philip_.
 PETER MARTYR.
 FATHER COLE.
 FATHER BOURNE.
 VILLA GARCIA.
 SOTO.
 CAPTAIN BRETT     |
 ANTHONY KNYVETT   | _Adherents of Wyatt_.
 PETERS, _Gentleman of Lord Howard_.
 ROGER, _Servant to Noailles_.
 WILLIAM, _Servant to Wyatt_.
 STEWARD OF HOUSEHOLD _to the Princess Elizabeth_.
 OLD NOKES _and_ NOKES.
 MARCHIONESS OF EXETER, _Mother of Courtenay_.
 LADY CLARENCE          |
 LADY MAGDALEN DACRES   | _Ladies in Waiting to the Queen_.
 ALICE                  | _to the Princess Elizabeth_.
 MAID OF HONOUR         |
 JOAN     |
 TIB      | _two Country Wives_.
 
 Lords _and other_ Attendants, Members _of the_ Privy Council,
 Members _of_ Parliament, Two Gentlemen, Aldermen,
 Citizens, Peasants, Ushers, Messengers, Guards, Pages,
 Gospellers, Marshalmen, _etc_.
 
 
 
 QUEEN MARY.
 
 
 
 
 ACT I.
 
 
 SCENE I.--ALDGATE RICHLY DECORATED.
 
 CROWD. MARSHALMEN.
 
 
 MARSHALMAN. Stand back, keep a clear lane! When will her Majesty pass,
 sayst thou? why now, even now; wherefore draw back your heads and your
 horns before I break them, and make what noise you will with your
 tongues, so it be not treason. Long live Queen Mary, the lawful and
 legitimate daughter of Harry the Eighth! Shout, knaves!
 
 CITIZENS. Long live Queen Mary!
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. That's a hard word, legitimate; what does it mean?
 
 SECOND CITIZEN. It means a bastard.
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. Nay, it means true-born.
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. Why, didn't the Parliament make her a bastard?
 
 SECOND CITIZEN.  No; it was the Lady Elizabeth.
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. That was after, man; that was after.
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. Then which is the bastard?
 
 SECOND CITIZEN. Troth, they be both bastards by Act of Parliament and
 Council.
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. Ay, the Parliament can make every true-born man of us a
 bastard. Old Nokes, can't it make thee a bastard? thou shouldst know,
 for thou art as white as three Christmasses.
 
 OLD NOKES (_dreamily_). Who's a-passing? King Edward or King Richard?
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. No, old Nokes.
 
 OLD NOKES. It's Harry!
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. It's Queen Mary.
 
 OLD NOKES. The blessed Mary's a-passing!
                                  [_Falls on his knees_.
 
 NOKES. Let father alone, my masters! he's past your questioning.
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. Answer thou for him, then thou'rt no such cockerel
 thyself, for thou was born i' the tail end of old Harry the Seventh.
 
 NOKES. Eh! that was afore bastard-making began. I was born true man at
 five in the forenoon  i' the tail of old Harry, and so they can't make
 me a bastard.
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. But if Parliament can make the Queen a bastard, why, it
 follows all the more that they can make thee one, who art fray'd i'
 the knees, and out at elbow, and bald o' the back, and bursten at the
 toes, and down at heels.
 
 NOKES. I was born of a true man and a ring'd wife, and I can't argue
 upon it; but I and my old woman 'ud burn upon it, that would we.
 
 MARSHALMAN. What are you cackling of bastardy under the Queen's own
 nose? I'll have you flogg'd and burnt too, by the Rood I will.
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. He swears by the Rood. Whew!
 
 SECOND CITIZEN. Hark! the trumpets.
 
     [_The Procession passes_, MARY _and_ ELIZABETH _riding
     side by side, and disappears under the gate_.
 
 CITIZENS. Long live Queen Mary! down with all traitors! God save her
 Grace; and death to Northumberland!
                             [_Exeunt_.
 
     _Manent_ TWO GENTLEMEN.
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. By God's light a noble creature, right royal!
 
 SECOND GENTLEMAN. She looks comelier than ordinary to-day; but to my
 mind the Lady Elizabeth is the more noble and royal.
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. I mean the Lady Elizabeth. Did you hear (I have a
 daughter in her service who reported it) that she met the Queen at
 Wanstead with five hundred horse, and the Queen (tho' some say they be
 much divided) took her hand, call'd her sweet sister, and kiss'd not
 her alone, but all the ladies of her following.
 
 SECOND GENTLEMAN. Ay, that was in her hour of joy; there will be
 plenty to sunder and unsister them again: this Gardiner for one, who
 is to be made Lord Chancellor, and will pounce like a wild beast out
 of his cage to worry Cranmer.
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. And furthermore, my daughter said that when there
 rose a talk of the late rebellion, she spoke even of Northumberland
 pitifully, and of the good Lady Jane as a poor innocent child who had
 but obeyed her father; and furthermore, she said that no one in her
 time should be burnt for heresy.
 
 SECOND GENTLEMAN. Well, sir, I look for happy times.
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. There is but one thing against them. I know not if
 you know.
 
 SECOND GENTLEMAN. I suppose you touch upon the rumour that Charles,
 the master of the world, has offer'd her his son Philip, the Pope and
 the Devil. I trust it is but a rumour.
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. She is going now to the Tower to loose the prisoners
 there, and among them Courtenay, to be made Earl of Devon, of royal
 blood, of splendid feature, whom the council and all her people wish
 her to marry. May it be so, for we are many of us Catholics, but few
 Papists, and the Hot Gospellers will go mad upon it.
 
 SECOND GENTLEMAN. Was she not betroth'd in her babyhood to the Great
 Emperor himself?
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. Ay, but he's too old.
 
 SECOND GENTLEMAN. And again to her cousin Reginald Pole, now Cardinal;
 but I hear that he too is full of aches and broken before his day.
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. O, the Pope could dispense with his Cardinalate, and
 his achage, and his breakage,  if that were all: will you not follow
 the procession?
 
 SECOND GENTLEMAN. No; I have seen enough for this day.
 
 FIRST GENTLEMAN. Well, I shall follow; if I can get near enough I
 shall judge with my own eyes whether her Grace incline to this
 splendid scion of Plantagenet.
 
                                        [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--A ROOM IN LAMBETH PALACE.
 
 
 CRANMER. To Strasburg, Antwerp, Frankfort, Zurich, Worms,
 Geneva, Basle--our Bishops from their sees
 Or fled, they say, or flying--Poinet, Barlow,
 Bale, Scory, Coverdale; besides the Deans
 Of Christchurch, Durham, Exeter, and Wells--
 Ailmer and Bullingham, and hundreds more;
 So they report: I shall be left alone.
 No: Hooper, Ridley, Latimer will not fly.
 
     _Enter_ PETER MARTYR.
 
 PETER MARTYR. Fly, Cranmer! were there nothing else, your name
 Stands first of those who sign'd the Letters Patent
 That gave her royal crown to Lady Jane.
 
 CRANMER.
 Stand first it may, but it was written last:
 Those that are now her Privy Council, sign'd
 Before me: nay, the Judges had pronounced
 That our young Edward might bequeath the crown
 Of England, putting by his father's will.
 Yet I stood out, till Edward sent for me.
 The wan boy-king, with his fast-fading eyes
 Fixt hard on mine, his frail transparent hand,
 Damp with the sweat of death, and griping mine,
 Whisper'd me, if I loved him, not to yield
 His Church of England to the Papal wolf
 And Mary; then I could no more--I sign'd.
 Nay, for bare shame of inconsistency,
 She cannot pass her traitor council by,
 To make me headless.
 
 PETER MARTYR.        That might be forgiven.
 I tell you, fly, my Lord. You do not own
 The bodily presence in the Eucharist,
 Their wafer and perpetual sacrifice:
 Your creed will be your death.
 
 CRANMER.                       Step after step,
 Thro' many voices crying right and left,
 Have I climb'd back into the primal church,
 And stand within the porch, and Christ with me:
 My flight were such a scandal to the faith,
 The downfall of so many simple souls,
 I dare not leave my post.
 
 PETER MARTYR.             But you divorced
 Queen Catharine and her father; hence, her hate
 Will burn till you are burn'd.
 
 CRANMER.                       I cannot help it.
 The Canonists and Schoolmen were with me.
 'Thou shalt not wed thy brother's wife.'--'Tis written,
 'They shall be childless.' True, Mary was born,
 But France would not accept her for a bride
 As being born from incest; and this wrought
 Upon the king; and child by child, you know,
 Were momentary sparkles out as quick
 Almost as kindled; and he brought his doubts
 And fears to me. Peter, I'll swear for him
 He _did_ believe the bond incestuous.
 But wherefore am I trenching on the time
 That should already have seen your steps a mile
 From me and Lambeth? God be with you! Go.
 
 PETER MARTYR. Ah, but how fierce a letter you wrote against
 Their superstition when they slander'd you
 For setting up a mass at Canterbury
 To please the Queen.
 
 CRANMER.             It was a wheedling monk
 Set up the mass.
 
 PETER MARTYR.    I know it, my good Lord.
 But you so bubbled over with hot terms
 Of Satan, liars, blasphemy, Antichrist,
 She never will forgive you. Fly, my Lord, fly!
 
 CRANMER. I wrote it, and God grant me power to burn!
 
 PETER MARTYR. They have given me a safe conduct: for all that
 I dare not stay. I fear, I fear, I see you,
 Dear friend, for the last time; farewell, and fly.
 
 CRANMER. Fly and farewell, and let me die the death.
                                        [_Exit_ PETER MARTYR.
 
     _Enter_ OLD SERVANT.
 
 O, kind and gentle master, the Queen's Officers
 Are here in force to take you to the Tower.
 
 CRANMER. Ay, gentle friend, admit them. I will go.
 I thank my God it is too late to fly.
 
                                 [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--ST. PAUL'S CROSS.
 
 FATHER BOURNE _in the pulpit_. A CROWD. MARCHIONESS OF EXETER,
 COURTENAY. _The_ SIEUR DE NOAILLES _and his man_ ROGER _in front
 of the stage. Hubbub_.
 
 
 NOAILLES. Hast thou let fall those papers in the  palace?
 
 ROGER. Ay, sir.
 
 NOAILLES.       'There will be no peace for Mary till
 Elizabeth lose her head.'
 
 ROGER.                    Ay, sir.
 
 NOAILLES. And the other, 'Long live Elizabeth the Queen!'
 
 ROGER. Ay, sir; she needs must tread upon them.
 
 NOAILLES.                                       Well.
 These beastly swine make such a grunting here,
 I cannot catch what Father Bourne is saying.
 
 ROGER. Quiet a moment, my masters; hear what the shaveling has to say
 for himself.
 
 CROWD. Hush--hear!
 
 BOURNE.--and so this unhappy land, long divided in itself, and
 sever'd from the faith, will return into the one true fold, seeing
 that our gracious Virgin Queen hath----
 
 CROWD. No pope! no pope!
 
 ROGER (_to those about him, mimicking_ BOURNE).--hath sent for the
 holy legate of the holy father the Pope, Cardinal Pole, to give us all
 that holy absolution which----
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. Old Bourne to the life!
 
 SECOND CITIZEN. Holy absolution! holy Inquisition!
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. Down with the Papist!
                                         [_Hubbub_.
 
 BOURNE.--and now that your good bishop,
 Bonner, who hath lain so long under bonds for the
 faith--
                                         [_Hubbub_.
 
 NOAILLES. Friend Roger, steal thou in among the crowd,
 And get the swine to shout Elizabeth.
 Yon gray old Gospeller, sour as midwinter,
 Begin with him.
 
 ROGER (_goes_). By the mass, old friend, we'll have no pope here while
 the Lady Elizabeth lives.
 
 GOSPELLER. Art thou of the true faith, fellow, that swearest by the
 mass?
 
 ROGER. Ay, that am I, new converted, but the old leaven sticks to my
 tongue yet.
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. He says right; by the mass we'll have no mass here.
 
 VOICES OF THE CROWD. Peace! hear him; let his own words damn the
 Papist. From thine own mouth I judge thee--tear him down!
 
 BOURNE.--and since our Gracious Queen, let me call her our second
 Virgin Mary, hath begun to re-edify the true temple----,
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. Virgin Mary! we'll have no virgins here--we'll have the
 Lady Elizabeth!
 
     [_Swords are drawn, a knife is hurled and sticks in
     the pulpit. The mob throng to the pulpit stairs_.
 
 MARCHIONESS OF EXETER. Son Courtenay, wilt thou see the holy father
 Murdered before thy face? up, son, and save him! They love thee, and
 thou canst not come to harm.
 
 COURTENAY (_in the pulpit_). Shame, shame, my masters! are you
 English-born, And set yourselves by hundreds against one?
 
 CROWD. A Courtenay! a Courtenay!
 
     [_A train of Spanish servants crosses at the back of the stage_.
 
 NOAILLES. These birds of passage come before their time:
 Stave off the crowd upon the Spaniard there.
 
 ROGER. My masters, yonder's fatter game for you
 Than this old gaping gurgoyle: look you there--
 The Prince of Spain coming to wed our Queen!
 After him, boys! and pelt him from the city.
 
     [_They seize stones and follow the Spaniards.
     Exeunt on the other side_ MARCHIONESS OF
     EXETER _and_ ATTENDANTS.
 
 NOAILLES (_to_ ROGER).
 Stand from me. If Elizabeth lose her head--
 That makes for France.
 And if her people, anger'd thereupon,
 Arise against her and dethrone the Queen--
 That makes for France.
 And if I breed confusion anyway--
 That makes for France.
                        Good-day, my Lord of Devon;
 A bold heart yours to beard that raging mob!
 
 COURTENAY. My mother said, Go up; and up I went.
 I knew they would not do me any wrong,
 For I am mighty popular with them, Noailles.
 
 NOAILLES. You look'd a king.
 
 COURTENAY.                   Why not? I am king's blood.
 
 NOAILLES. And in the whirl of change may come to be one.
 
 COURTENAY. Ah!
 
 NOAILLES. But does your gracious Queen entreat you kinglike?
 
 COURTENAY. 'Fore God, I think she entreats me like a child.
 
 NOAILLES. You've but a dull life in this maiden court, I fear, my
 Lord?
 
 COURTENAY. A life of nods and yawns.
 
 NOAILLES. So you would honour my poor house to-night,
 We might enliven you. Divers honest fellows,
 The Duke of Suffolk lately freed from prison,
 Sir Peter Carew and Sir Thomas Wyatt,
 Sir Thomas Stafford, and some more--we play.
 
 COURTENAY. At what?
 
 NOAILLES.           The Game of Chess.
 
 COURTENAY.                             The Game of Chess!
 I can play well, and I shall beat you there.
 
 NOAILLES. Ay, but we play with Henry, King of France,
 And certain of his court.
 His Highness makes his moves across the Channel,
 We answer him with ours, and there are messengers
 That go between us.
 
 COURTENAY. Why, such a game, sir, were whole years a playing.
 
 NOAILLES. Nay; not so long I trust. That all depends
 Upon the skill and swiftness of the players.
 
 COURTENAY. The King is skilful at it?
 
 NOAILLES.                             Very, my Lord.
 
 COURTENAY. And the stakes high?
 
 NOAILLES.         But not beyond your means.
 
 COURTENAY. Well, I'm the first of players, I shall win.
 
 NOAILLES. With our advice and in our company,
 And so you well attend to the king's moves,
 I think you may.
 
 COURTENAY. When do you meet?
 
 NOAILLES.                    To-night.
 
 COURTENAY (_aside_).
 I will be there; the fellow's at his tricks--
 Deep--I shall fathom him. (_Aloud_) Good morning,
 Noailles.
              [_Exit_ COURTENAY.
 
 NOAILLES. Good-day, my Lord. Strange game of chess! a King
 That with her own pawns plays against a Queen,
 Whose play is all to find herself a King.
 Ay; but this fine blue-blooded Courtenay seems
 Too princely for a pawn. Call him a Knight,
 That, with an ass's, not a horse's head,
 Skips every way, from levity or from fear.
 Well, we shall use him somehow, so that Gardiner
 And Simon Renard spy not out our game
 Too early. Roger, thinkest thou that anyone
 Suspected thee to be my man?
 
 ROGER.                       Not one, sir.
 
 NOAILLES. No! the disguise was perfect. Let's away.
                                               [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.--LONDON. A ROOM IN THE PALACE.
 ELIZABETH. _Enter_ COURTENAY.
 
 
 COURTENAY. So yet am I,
 Unless my friends and mirrors lie to me,
 A goodlier-looking fellow than this Philip.
 Pah!
 The Queen is ill advised: shall I turn traitor?
 They've almost talked me into it: yet the word
 Affrights me somewhat: to be such a one
 As Harry Bolingbroke hath a lure in it.
 Good now, my Lady Queen, tho' by your age,
 And by your looks you are not worth the having,
 Yet by your crown you are.    [_Seeing_ ELIZABETH.
                            The Princess there?
 If I tried her and la--she's amorous.
 Have we not heard of her in Edward's time,
 Her freaks and frolics with the late Lord Admiral?
 I do believe she'd yield. I should be still
 A party in the state; and then, who knows--
 
 ELIZABETH. What are you musing on, my Lord of Devon?
 
 COURTENAY. Has not the Queen--
 
 ELIZABETH.                    Done what, Sir?
 
 COURTENAY.                                   --made you follow
 The Lady Suffolk and the Lady Lennox?--
 You,
 The heir presumptive.
 
 ELIZABETH.            Why do you ask? you know it.
 
 COURTENAY. You needs must bear it hardly.
 
 ELIZABETH.                                No, indeed!
 I am utterly submissive to the Queen.
 
 COURTENAY. Well, I was musing upon that; the Queen
 Is both my foe and yours: we should be friends.
 
 ELIZABETH. My Lord, the hatred of another to us
 Is no true bond of friendship.
 
 COURTENAY.                     Might it not
 Be the rough preface of some closer bond?
 
 ELIZABETH. My Lord, you late were loosed from out the Tower,
 Where, like a butterfly in a chrysalis,
 You spent your life; that broken, out you flutter
 Thro' the new world, go zigzag, now would settle
 Upon this flower, now that; but all things here
 At court are known; you have solicited
 The Queen, and been rejected.
 
 COURTENAY.                    Flower, she!
 Half faded! but you, cousin, are fresh and sweet
 As the first flower no bee has ever tried.
 
 ELIZABETH. Are you the bee to try me? why, but now
 I called you butterfly.
 
 COURTENAY.              You did me wrong,
 I love not to be called a butterfly:
 Why do you call me butterfly?
 
 ELIZABETH. Why do you go so gay then?
 
 COURTENAY.                            Velvet and gold.
 This dress was made me as the Earl of Devon
 To take my seat in; looks it not right royal?
 
 ELIZABETH. So royal that the Queen forbad you wearing it.
 
 COURTENAY. I wear it then to spite her.
 
 ELIZABETH.                              My Lord, my Lord;
 I see you in the Tower again. Her Majesty
 Hears you affect the Prince--prelates kneel to
 you.--
 
 COURTENAY. I am the noblest blood in Europe, Madam,
 A Courtenay of Devon, and her cousin.
 
 ELIZABETH. She hears you make your boast that after all
 She means to wed you. Folly, my good Lord.
 
 COURTENAY. How folly? a great party in the state
 Wills me to wed her.
 
 ELIZABETH.          Failing her, my Lord,
 Doth not as great a party in the state
 Will you to wed me?
 
 COURTENAY.          Even so, fair lady.
 
 ELIZABETH. You know to flatter ladies.
 
 COURTENAY.                             Nay, I meant
 True matters of the heart.
 
 ELIZABETH.                 _My_ heart, my Lord,
 Is no great party in the state as yet.
 
 COURTENAY. Great, said you? nay, you shall be great. I love you,
 Lay my life in your hands. Can you be close?
 
 ELIZABETH. Can you, my Lord?
 
 COURTENAY.                   Close as a miser's casket.
 Listen:
 The King of France, Noailles the Ambassador,
 The Duke of Suffolk and Sir Peter Carew,
 Sir Thomas Wyatt, I myself, some others,
 Have sworn this Spanish marriage shall not be.
 If Mary will not hear us--well--conjecture--
 Were I in Devon with my wedded bride,
 The people there so worship me--Your ear;
 You shall be Queen.
 
 ELIZABETH.          You speak too low, my Lord;
 I cannot hear you.
 
 COURTENAY.         I'll repeat it.
 
 ELIZABETH.                         No!
 Stand further off, or you may lose your head.
 
 COURTENAY. I have a head to lose for your sweet
 sake.
 
 ELIZABETH. Have you, my Lord? Best keep it for your own.
 Nay, pout not, cousin.
 Not many friends are mine, except indeed
 Among the many. I believe you mine;
 And so you may continue mine, farewell,
 And that at once.
 
     _Enter_ MARY, _behind_.
 
 MARY. Whispering--leagued together
 To bar me from my Philip.
 
 COURTENAY.                Pray--consider--
 
 ELIZABETH (_seeing the_ QUEEN).
 Well, that's a noble horse of yours, my Lord.
 I trust that he will carry you well to-day,
 And heal your headache.
 
 COURTENAY.              You are wild; what headache?
 Heartache, perchance; not headache.
 
 ELIZABETH (_aside to_ COURTENAY). Are you blind?
 
         [COURTENAY _sees the_ QUEEN _and exit. Exit_ MARY.
 
 
   _Enter_ LORD WILLIAM HOWARD.
 
 HOWARD. Was that my Lord of Devon? do not you
 Be seen in corners with my Lord of Devon.
 He hath fallen out of favour with the Queen.
 She fears the Lords may side with you and him
 Against her marriage; therefore is he dangerous.
 And if this Prince of fluff and feather come
 To woo you, niece, he is dangerous everyway.
 
 ELIZABETH. Not very dangerous that way, my good uncle.
 
 HOWARD. But your own state is full of danger here.
 The disaffected, heretics, reformers,
 Look to you as the one to crown their ends.
 Mix not yourself with any plot I pray you;
 Nay, if by chance you hear of any such,
 Speak not thereof--no, not to your best friend,
 Lest you should be confounded with it. Still--
 Perinde ac cadaver--as the priest says,
 You know your Latin--quiet as a dead body.
 What was my Lord of Devon telling you?
 
 ELIZABETH. Whether he told me anything or not,
 I follow your good counsel, gracious uncle.
 Quiet as a dead body.
 
 HOWARD.               You do right well.
 I do not care to know; but this I charge you,
 Tell Courtenay nothing. The Lord Chancellor
 (I count it as a kind of virtue in him,
 He hath not many), as a mastiff dog
 May love a puppy cur for no more reason
 Than that the twain have been tied up together,
 Thus Gardiner--for the two were fellow-prisoners
 So many years in yon accursed Tower--
 Hath taken to this Courtenay. Look to it, niece,
 He hath no fence when Gardiner questions him;
 All oozes out; yet him--because they know him
 The last White Rose, the last Plantagenet
 (Nay, there is Cardinal Pole, too), the people
 Claim as their natural leader--ay, some say,
 That you shall marry him, make him King belike.
 
 ELIZABETH. Do they say so, good uncle?
 
 HOWARD.                                Ay, good niece!
 You should be plain and open with me, niece.
 You should not play upon me.
 
 ELIZABETH.                   No, good uncle.
 
     _Enter_ GARDINER.
 
 GARDINER. The Queen would see your Grace upon the moment.
 
 ELIZABETH. Why, my lord Bishop?
 
 GARDINER. I think she means to counsel your withdrawing
 To Ashridge, or some other country house.
 
 ELIZABETH. Why, my lord Bishop?
 
 GARDINER. I do but bring the message, know no more.
 Your Grace will hear her reasons from herself.
 
 ELIZABETH. 'Tis mine own wish fulfill'd before the word
 Was spoken, for in truth I had meant to crave
 Permission of her Highness to retire
 To Ashridge, and pursue my studies there.
 
 GARDINER. Madam, to have the wish before the word
 Is man's good Fairy--and the Queen is yours.
 I left her with rich jewels in her hand,
 Whereof 'tis like enough she means to make
 A farewell present to your Grace.
 
 ELIZABETH.                        My Lord,
 I have the jewel of a loyal heart.
 
 GARDINER. I doubt it not, Madam, most loyal.
                                   [_Bows low and exit_.
 
 HOWARD.                                      See,
 This comes of parleying with my Lord of Devon.
 Well, well, you must obey; and I myself
 Believe it will be better for your welfare.
 Your time will come.
 
 ELIZABETH.           I think my time will come.
 Uncle,
 I am of sovereign nature, that I know,
 Not to be quell'd; and I have felt within me
 Stirrings of some great doom when God's just hour
 Peals--but this fierce old Gardiner--his big baldness,
 That irritable forelock which he rubs,
 His buzzard beak and deep-incavern'd eyes
 Half fright me.
 
 HOWARD.         You've a bold heart; keep it so.
 He cannot touch you save that you turn traitor;
 And so take heed I pray you--you are one
 Who love that men should smile upon you, niece.
 They'd smile you into treason--some of them.
 
 ELIZABETH. I spy the rock beneath the smiling sea.
 But if this Philip, the proud Catholic prince,
 And this bald priest, and she that hates me, seek
 In that lone house, to practise on my life,
 By poison, fire, shot, stab--
 
 HOWARD. They will not, niece.
 Mine is the fleet and all the power at sea--
 Or will be in a moment. If they dared
 To harm you, I would blow this Philip and all
 Your trouble to the dogstar and the devil.
 
 ELIZABETH. To the Pleiads, uncle; they have lost
 a sister.
 
 HOWARD. But why say that? what have you done
 to lose her?
 Come, come, I will go with you to the Queen.
 
                                         [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE V.--A ROOM IN THE PALACE.
 
 MARY _with_ PHILIP'S _miniature_. ALICE.
 
 
 MARY (_kissing the miniature_).
 Most goodly, King-like and an Emperor's son,--
 A king to be,--is he not noble, girl?
 
 ALICE. Goodly enough, your Grace, and yet, methinks,
 I have seen goodlier.
 
 MARY.                 Ay; some waxen doll
 Thy baby eyes have rested on, belike;
 All red and white, the fashion of our land.
 But my good mother came (God rest her soul)
 Of Spain, and I am Spanish in myself,
 And in my likings.
 
 ALICE.             By your Grace's leave
 Your royal mother came of Spain, but took
 To the English red and white. Your royal father
 (For so they say) was all pure lily and rose
 In his youth, and like a lady.
 
 MARY.                          O, just God!
 Sweet mother, you had time and cause enough
 To sicken of his lilies and his roses.
 Cast off, betray'd, defamed, divorced, forlorn!
 And then the King--that traitor past forgiveness,
 The false archbishop fawning on him, married
 The mother of Elizabeth--a heretic
 Ev'n as _she_ is; but God hath sent me here
 To take such order with all heretics
 That it shall be, before I die, as tho'
 My father and my brother had not lived.
 What wast thou saying of this Lady Jane,
 Now in the Tower?
 
 ALICE.            Why, Madam, she was passing
 Some chapel down in Essex, and with her
 Lady Anne Wharton, and the Lady Anne
 Bow'd to the Pyx; but Lady Jane stood up
 Stiff as the very backbone of heresy.
 And wherefore bow ye not, says Lady Anne,
 To him within there who made Heaven and Earth?
 I cannot, and I dare not, tell your Grace
 What Lady Jane replied.
 
 MARY.                   But I will have it.
 
 ALICE. She said--pray pardon me, and pity her--
 She hath harken'd evil counsel--ah! she said,
 The baker made him.
 
 MARY.               Monstrous! blasphemous!
 She ought to burn. Hence, thou (_Exit_ ALICE). No--being traitor
 Her head will fall: shall it? she is but a child.
 We do not kill the child for doing that
 His father whipt him into doing--a head
 So full of grace and beauty! would that mine
 Were half as gracious! O, my lord to be,
 My love, for thy sake only.
 I am eleven years older than he is.
 But will he care for that?
 No, by the holy Virgin, being noble,
 But love me only: then the bastard sprout,
 My sister, is far fairer than myself.
 Will he be drawn to her?
 No, being of the true faith with myself.
 Paget is for him--for to wed with Spain
 Would treble England--Gardiner is against him;
 The Council, people, Parliament against him;
 But I will have him! My hard father hated me;
 My brother rather hated me than loved;
 My sister cowers and hates me. Holy Virgin,
 Plead with thy blessed Son; grant me my prayer:
 Give me my Philip; and we two will lead
 The living waters of the Faith again
 Back thro' their widow'd channel here, and watch
 The parch'd banks rolling incense, as of old,
 To heaven, and kindled with the palms of Christ!
 
     _Enter_ USHER.
 
 Who waits, sir?
 
 USHER.          Madam, the Lord Chancellor.
 
 MARY. Bid him come in. (_Enter_ GARDINER.)
 Good morning, my good Lord.
 
                                [_Exit_ USHER.
 
 GARDINER. That every morning of your Majesty
 May be most good, is every morning's prayer
 Of your most loyal subject, Stephen Gardiner.
 
 MARY. Come you to tell me this, my Lord?
 
 GARDINER.                                And more.
 Your people have begun to learn your worth.
 Your pious wish to pay King Edward's debts,
 Your lavish household curb'd, and the remission
 Of half that subsidy levied on the people,
 Make all tongues praise and all hearts beat for you.
 I'd have you yet more loved: the realm is poor,
 The exchequer at neap-tide: we might withdraw
 Part of our garrison at Calais.
 
 MARY.                           Calais!
 Our one point on the main, the gate of France!
 I am Queen of England; take mine eyes, mine heart,
 But do not lose me Calais.
 
 GARDINER.                  Do not fear it.
 Of that hereafter. I say your Grace is loved.
 That I may keep you thus, who am your friend
 And ever faithful counsellor, might I speak?
 
 MARY. I can forespeak your speaking. Would I marry
 Prince Philip, if all England hate him? That is
 Your question, and I front it with another:
 Is it England, or a party? Now, your answer.
 
 GARDINER. My answer is, I wear beneath my dress
 A shirt of mail: my house hath been assaulted,
 And when I walk abroad, the populace,
 With fingers pointed like so many daggers,
 Stab me in fancy, hissing Spain and Philip;
 And when I sleep, a hundred men-at-arms
 Guard my poor dreams for England. Men would murder me,
 Because they think me favourer of this marriage.
 
 MARY. And that were hard upon you, my Lord Chancellor.
 
 GARDINER. But our young Earl of Devon--
 
 MARY.                                  Earl of Devon?
 I freed him from the Tower, placed him at Court;
 I made him Earl of Devon, and--the fool--
 He wrecks his health and wealth on courtesans,
 And rolls himself in carrion like a dog.
 
 GARDINER. More like a school-boy that hath broken bounds,
 Sickening himself with sweets.
 
 MARY.                          I will not hear of him.
 Good, then, they will revolt: but I am Tudor,
 And shall control them.
 
 GARDINER.               I will help you, Madam,
 Even to the utmost. All the church is grateful.
 You have ousted the mock priest, repulpited
 The shepherd of St. Peter, raised the rood again,
 And brought us back the mass. I am all thanks
 To God and to your Grace: yet I know well,
 Your people, and I go with them so far,
 Will brook nor Pope nor Spaniard here to play
 The tyrant, or in commonwealth or church.
 
 MARY (_showing the picture).
 _Is this the face of one who plays the tyrant?
 Peruse it; is it not goodly, ay, and gentle?
 
 GARDINER. Madam, methinks a cold face and a haughty.
 And when your Highness talks of Courtenay--
 Ay, true--a goodly one. I would his life
 Were half as goodly (_aside_).
 
 MARY.               What is that you mutter?
 
 GARDINER. Oh, Madam, take it bluntly; marry Philip,
 And be stepmother of a score of sons!
 The prince is known in Spain, in Flanders, ha!
 For Philip--
 
 MARY.       You offend us; you may leave us.
 You see thro' warping glasses.
 
 GARDINER.                      If your Majesty--
 
 MARY. I have sworn upon the body and blood of Christ
 I'll none but Philip.
 
 GARDINER.             Hath your Grace so sworn?
 
 MARY. Ay, Simon Renard knows it.
 
 GARDINER.                        News to me!
 It then remains for your poor Gardiner,
 So you still care to trust him somewhat less
 Than Simon Renard, to compose the event
 In some such form as least may harm your Grace.
 
 MARY. I'll have the scandal sounded to the mud.
 I know it a scandal.
 
 GARDINER. All my hope is now
 It may be found a scandal.
 
 MARY. You offend us.
 
 GARDINER (_aside_).
 These princes are like children, must be physick'd,
 The bitter in the sweet. I have lost mine office,
 It may be, thro' mine honesty, like a fool.
                                          [_Exit_.
 
     _Enter_ USHER.
 
 MARY. Who waits?
 
 USHER. The Ambassador from France, your Grace.
 
 MARY (_sits down_).
 Bid him come in. Good morning, Sir de Noailles.
 
                                       [_Exit_ USHER,
 
 NOAILLES (_entering_).
 A happy morning to your Majesty.
 
 MARY. And I should some time have a happy morning;
 I have had none yet. What says the King your master?
 
 NOAILLES. Madam, my master hears with much alarm,
 That you may marry Philip, Prince of Spain--
 Foreseeing, with whate'er unwillingness,
 That if this Philip be the titular king
 Of England, and at war with him, your Grace
 And kingdom will be suck'd into the war,
 Ay, tho' you long for peace; wherefore, my master,
 If but to prove your Majesty's goodwill,
 Would fain have some fresh treaty drawn between you.
 
 MARY. Why some fresh treaty? wherefore should I do it?
 Sir, if we marry, we shall still maintain
 All former treaties with his Majesty.
 Our royal word for that! and your good master,
 Pray God he do not be the first to break them,
 Must be content with that; and so, farewell.
 
 NOAILLES (_going, returns_).
 I would your answer had been other, Madam,
 For I foresee dark days.
 
 MARY.                    And so do I, sir;
 Your master works against me in the dark.
 I do believe he holp Northumberland
 Against me.
 
 NOAILLES.   Nay, pure phantasy, your Grace.
 Why should he move against you?
 
 MARY.                           Will you hear why?
 Mary of Scotland,--for I have not own'd
 My sister, and I will not,--after me
 Is heir of England; and my royal father,
 To make the crown of Scotland one with ours,
 Had mark'd her for my brother Edward's bride;
 Ay, but your king stole her a babe from Scotland
 In order to betroth her to your Dauphin.
 See then:
 Mary of Scotland, married to your Dauphin,
 Would make our England, France;
 Mary of England, joining hands with Spain,
 Would be too strong for France.
 Yea, were there issue born to her, Spain and we,
 One crown, might rule the world. There lies your fear.
 That is your drift. You play at hide and seek.
 Show me your faces!
 
 NOAILLES.           Madam, I am amazed:
 French, I must needs wish all good things for France.
 That must be pardon'd me; but I protest
 Your Grace's policy hath a farther flight
 Than mine into the future. We but seek
 Some settled ground for peace to stand upon.
 
 MARY. Well, we will leave all this, sir, to our council.
 Have you seen Philip ever?
 
 NOAILLES.                  Only once.
 
 MARY. Is this like Philip?
 
 NOAILLES.                  Ay, but nobler-looking.
 
 MARY. Hath he the large ability of the Emperor?
 
 NOAILLES. No, surely.
 
 MARY. I can make allowance for thee,
 Thou speakest of the enemy of thy king.
 
 NOAILLES. Make no allowance for the naked truth.
 He is every way a lesser man than Charles;
 Stone-hard, ice-cold--no dash of daring in him.
 
 MARY. If cold, his life is pure.
 
 NOAILLES.                        Why (_smiling_), no, indeed.
 
 MARY. Sayst thou?
 
 NOAILLES.         A very wanton life indeed (_smiling_).
 
 MARY. Your audience is concluded, sir.
 
                            [_Exit_ NOAILLES.
 
                                        You cannot
 Learn a man's nature from his natural foe.
 
     _Enter_ USHER.
 
 Who waits?
 
 USHER.     The Ambassador of Spain, your Grace.
                                            [_Exit_.
 
     _Enter_ SIMON RENARD.
 
 MARY (_rising to meet him_).
 Thou art ever welcome, Simon Renard. Hast thou
 Brought me the letter which thine Emperor promised
 Long since, a formal offer of the hand Of Philip?
 
 RENARD. Nay, your Grace, it hath not reach'd me.
 I know not wherefore--some mischance of flood,
 And broken bridge, or spavin'd horse, or wave
 And wind at their old battle: he must have written.
 
 MARY. But Philip never writes me one poor word.
 Which in his absence had been all my wealth.
 Strange in a wooer!
 
 RENARD.             Yet I know the Prince,
 So your king-parliament suffer him to land,
 Yearns to set foot upon your island shore.
 
 MARY. God change the pebble which his kingly foot
 First presses into some more costly stone
 Than ever blinded eye. I'll have one mark it
 And bring it me. I'll have it burnish'd firelike;
 I'll set it round with gold, with pearl, with diamond.
 Let the great angel of the church come with him;
 Stand on the deck and spread his wings for sail!
 God lay the waves and strow the storms at sea,
 And here at land among the people! O Renard,
 I am much beset, I am almost in despair.
 Paget is ours. Gardiner perchance is ours;
 But for our heretic Parliament--
 
 RENARD.                         O Madam,
 You fly your thoughts like kites. My master, Charles,
 Bad you go softly with your heretics here,
 Until your throne had ceased to tremble. Then
 Spit them like larks for aught I care. Besides,
 When Henry broke the carcase of your church
 To pieces, there were many wolves among you
 Who dragg'd the scatter'd limbs into their den.
 The Pope would have you make them render these;
 So would your cousin, Cardinal Pole; ill counsel!
 These let them keep at present; stir not yet
 This matter of the Church lands. At his coming
 Your star will rise.
 
 MARY.                My star! a baleful one.
 I see but the black night, and hear the wolf.
 What star?
 
 RENARD.    Your star will be your princely son,
 Heir of this England and the Netherlands!
 And if your wolf the while should howl for more,
 We'll dust him from a bag of Spanish gold.
 I do believe, I have dusted some already,
 That, soon or late, your Parliament is ours.
 
 MARY. Why do they talk so foully of your Prince,
 Renard?
 
 RENARD. The lot of Princes. To sit high
 Is to be lied about.
 
 MARY.                They call him cold,
 Haughty, ay, worse.
 
 RENARD.             Why, doubtless, Philip shows
 Some of the bearing of your blue blood--still
 All within measure--nay, it well becomes him.
 
 MARY. Hath he the large ability of his father?
 
 RENARD. Nay, some believe that he will go beyond him.
 
 MARY. Is this like him?
 
 RENARD.                 Ay, somewhat; but your Philip
 Is the most princelike Prince beneath the sun.
 This is a daub to Philip.
 
 MARY.                     Of a pure life?
 
 RENARD. As an angel among angels. Yea, by Heaven,
 The text--Your Highness knows it, 'Whosoever
 Looketh after a woman,' would not graze
 The Prince of Spain. You are happy in him there,
 Chaste as your Grace!
 
 MARY.                 I am happy in him there.
 
 RENARD. And would be altogether happy, Madam,
 So that your sister were but look'd to closer.
 You have sent her from the court, but then she goes,
 I warrant, not to hear the nightingales,
 But hatch you some new treason in the woods.
 
 MARY. We have our spies abroad to catch her tripping,
 And then if caught, to the Tower.
 
 RENARD.                           The Tower! the block!
 The word has turn'd your Highness pale; the thing
 Was no such scarecrow in your father's time.
 I have heard, the tongue yet quiver'd with the jest
 When the head leapt--so common! I do think
 To save your crown that it must come to this.
 
 MARY. No, Renard; it must never come to this.
 
 RENARD. Not yet; but your old Traitors of the Tower--
 Why, when you put Northumberland to death,
 The sentence having past upon them all,
 Spared you the Duke of Suffolk, Guildford Dudley,
 Ev'n that young girl who dared to wear your crown?
 
 MARY. Dared? nay, not so; the child obey'd her father.
 Spite of her tears her father forced it on her.
 
 RENARD. Good Madam, when the Roman wish'd to reign,
 He slew not him alone who wore the purple,
 But his assessor in the throne, perchance
 A child more innocent than Lady Jane.
 
 MARY. I am English Queen, not Roman Emperor.
 
 RENARD. Yet too much mercy is a want of mercy,
 And wastes more life. Stamp out the fire, or this
 Will smoulder and re-flame, and burn the throne
 Where you should sit with Philip: he will not come
 Till she be gone.
 
 MARY.             Indeed, if that were true--
 For Philip comes, one hand in mine, and one
 Steadying the tremulous pillars of the Church--
 But no, no, no. Farewell. I am somewhat faint
 With our long talk. Tho' Queen, I am not Queen
 Of mine own heart, which every now and then
 Beats me half dead: yet stay, this golden chain--
 My father on a birthday gave it me,
 And I have broken with my father--take
 And wear it as memorial of a morning
 Which found me full of foolish doubts, and leaves me
 As hopeful.
 
 RENARD (_aside_). Whew--the folly of all follies
 Is to be love-sick for a shadow. (_Aloud_) Madam,
 This chains me to your service, not with gold,
 But dearest links of love. Farewell, and trust me,
 Philip is yours.
                     [_Exit_.
 
 MARY.            Mine--but not yet all mine.
 
     _Enter_ USHER.
 
 USHER. Your Council is in Session, please your Majesty.
 
 MARY. Sir, let them sit. I must have time to breathe.
 No, say I come. (_Exit_ USHER.) I won by boldness once.
 The Emperor counsell'd me to fly to Flanders.
 I would not; but a hundred miles I rode,
 Sent out my letters, call'd my friends together,
 Struck home and won.
 And when the Council would not crown me--thought
 To bind me first by oaths I could not keep,
 And keep with Christ and conscience--was it boldness
 Or weakness that won there? when I, their Queen,
 Cast myself down upon my knees before them,
 And those hard men brake into woman tears,
 Ev'n Gardiner, all amazed, and in that passion
 Gave me my Crown.
 
     _Enter_ ALICE.
 
                   Girl; hast thou ever heard
 Slanders against Prince Philip in our Court?
 
 ALICE. What slanders? I, your Grace; no, never.
 
 MARY.                                           Nothing?
 
 ALICE. Never, your Grace.
 
 MARY. See that you neither hear them nor repeat!
 
 ALICE (_aside_).
 Good Lord! but I have heard a thousand such.
 Ay, and repeated them as often--mum!
 Why comes that old fox-Fleming back again?
 
     _Enter_ RENARD.
 
 RENARD. Madam, I scarce had left your Grace's presence
 Before I chanced upon the messenger
 Who brings that letter which we waited for--
 The formal offer of Prince Philip's hand.
 It craves an instant answer, Ay or No.
 
 MARY. An instant Ay or No! the Council sits.
 Give it me quick.
 
 ALICE (_stepping before her_).
                   Your Highness is all trembling.
 
 MARY. Make way.    [_Exit into the Council Chamber_.
 
 ALICE.          O, Master Renard, Master Renard,
 If you have falsely painted your fine Prince;
 Praised, where you should have blamed him, I pray God
 No woman ever love you, Master Renard.
 It breaks my heart to hear her moan at night
 As tho' the nightmare never left her bed.
 
 RENARD. My pretty maiden, tell me, did you ever
 Sigh for a beard?
 
 ALICE.            That's not a pretty question.
 
 RENARD. Not prettily put? I mean, my pretty maiden,
 A pretty man for such a pretty maiden.
 
 ALICE. My Lord of Devon is a pretty man.
 I hate him. Well, but if I have, what then?
 
 RENARD. Then, pretty maiden, you should know that whether
 A wind be warm or cold, it serves to fan
 A kindled fire.
 
 ALICE.          According to the song.
 
     His friends would praise him, I believed 'em,
       His foes would blame him, and I scorn'd 'em,
     His friends--as Angels I received 'em,
       His foes--the Devil had suborn'd 'em.
 
 RENARD. Peace, pretty maiden.
 I hear them stirring in the Council Chamber.
 Lord Paget's 'Ay' is sure--who else? and yet,
 They are all too much at odds to close at once
 In one full-throated No! Her Highness comes.
 
     _Enter_ MARY.
 
 ALICE. How deathly pale!--a chair, your Highness
                 [_Bringing one to the_ QUEEN.
 
 RENARD. Madam,
 The Council?
 
 MARY.        Ay! My Philip is all mine.
 
                   [_Sinks into chair, half fainting_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT II
 
 
 SCENE I.--ALINGTON CASTLE.
 
 
 SIR THOMAS WYATT. I do not hear from Carew or the Duke
 Of Suffolk, and till then I should not move.
 The Duke hath gone to Leicester; Carew stirs
 In Devon: that fine porcelain Courtenay,
 Save that he fears he might be crack'd in using,
 (I have known a semi-madman in my time
 So fancy-ridd'n) should be in Devon too.
 
     _Enter_ WILLIAM.
 
 News abroad, William?
 
 WILLIAM. None so new, Sir Thomas, and none so old, Sir Thomas. No new
 news that Philip comes to wed Mary, no old news that all men hate it.
 Old Sir Thomas would have hated it. The bells are ringing at
 Maidstone. Doesn't your worship hear?
 
 WYATT. Ay, for the Saints are come to reign again.
 Most like it is a Saint's-day. There's no call
 As yet for me; so in this pause, before
 The mine be fired, it were a pious work
 To string my father's sonnets, left about
 Like loosely-scatter'd jewels, in fair order,
 And head them with a lamer rhyme of mine,
 To grace his memory.
 
 WILLIAM. Ay, why not, Sir Thomas? He was a fine courtier, he; Queen
 Anne loved him. All the women loved him. I loved him, I was in Spain
 with him. I couldn't eat in Spain, I couldn't sleep in Spain. I hate
 Spain, Sir Thomas.
 
 WYATT. But thou could'st drink in Spain if I remember.
 
 WILLIAM. Sir Thomas, we may grant the wine. Old Sir Thomas always
 granted the wine.
 
 WYATT. Hand me the casket with my father's sonnets.
 
 WILLIAM. Ay--sonnets--a fine courtier of the old Court, old Sir
 Thomas.    [_Exit_.
 
 WYATT. Courtier of many courts, he loved the more
 His own gray towers, plain life and letter'd peace,
 To read and rhyme in solitary fields,
 The lark above, the nightingale below,
 And answer them in song. The sire begets
 Not half his likeness in the son. I fail
 Where he was fullest: yet--to write it down.
                                     [_He writes_.
 
     _Re-enter_ WILLIAM.
 
 WILLIAM. There _is_ news, there _is_ news, and no call for
 sonnet-sorting now, nor for sonnet-making either, but ten thousand
 men on Penenden Heath all calling after your worship, and your
 worship's name heard into Maidstone market, and your worship the first
 man in Kent and Christendom, for the Queen's down, and the world's up,
 and your worship a-top of it.
 
 WYATT. Inverted Aesop--mountain out of mouse.
 Say for ten thousand ten--and pothouse knaves,
 Brain-dizzied with a draught of morning ale.
 
     _Enter_ ANTONY KNYVETT.
 
 WILLIAM. Here's Antony Knyvett.
 
 KNYVETT. Look you, Master Wyatt,
 Tear up that woman's work there.
 
 WYATT.                           No; not these,
 Dumb children of my father, that will speak
 When I and thou and all rebellions lie
 Dead bodies without voice. Song flies you know
 For ages.
 
 KNYVETT.  Tut, your sonnet's a flying ant,
 Wing'd for a moment.
 
 WYATT.               Well, for mine own work,
                                 [_Tearing the paper_.
 It lies there in six pieces at your feet;
 For all that I can carry it in my head.
 
 KNYVETT. If you can carry your head upon your shoulders.
 
 WYATT. I fear you come to carry it off my shoulders,
 And sonnet-making's safer.
 
 KNYVETT.                   Why, good Lord,
 Write you as many sonnets as you will.
 Ay, but not now; what, have you eyes, ears, brains?
 This Philip and the black-faced swarms of Spain,
 The hardest, cruellest people in the world,
 Come locusting upon us, eat us up,
 Confiscate lands, goods, money--Wyatt, Wyatt,
 Wake, or the stout old island will become
 A rotten limb of Spain. They roar for you
 On Penenden Heath, a thousand of them--more--
 All arm'd, waiting a leader; there's no glory
 Like his who saves his country: and you sit
 Sing-songing here; but, if I'm any judge,
 By God, you are as poor a poet, Wyatt,
 As a good soldier.
 
 WYATT.             You as poor a critic
 As an honest friend: you stroke me on one cheek,
 Buffet the other. Come, you bluster, Antony!
 You know I know all this. I must not move
 Until I hear from Carew and the Duke.
 I fear the mine is fired before the time.
 
 KNYVETT (_showing a paper_).
 But here's some Hebrew. Faith, I half forgot it.
 Look; can you make it English? A strange youth
 Suddenly thrust it on me, whisper'd, 'Wyatt,'
 And whisking round a corner, show'd his back
 Before I read his face.
 
 WYATT.                  Ha! Courtenay's cipher.    [_Reads_.
 'Sir Peter Carew fled to France: it is thought the Duke will be taken.
 I am with you still; but, for appearance sake, stay with the Queen.
 Gardiner knows, but the Council are all at odds, and the Queen hath no
 force for resistance. Move, if you move, at once.'
 
 Is Peter Carew fled? Is the Duke taken?
 Down scabbard, and out sword! and let Rebellion
 Roar till throne rock, and crown fall. No; not that;
 But we will teach Queen Mary how to reign.
 Who are those that shout below there?
 
 KNYVETT. Why, some fifty
 That follow'd me from Penenden Heath in hope
 To hear you speak.
 
 WYATT.             Open the window, Knyvett;
 The mine is fired, and I will speak to them.
 
 Men of Kent; England of England; you that have kept your old customs
 upright, while all the rest of England bow'd theirs to the Norman, the
 cause that hath brought us together is not the cause of a county or a
 shire, but of this England, in whose crown our Kent is the fairest
 jewel. Philip shall not wed Mary; and ye have called me to be your
 leader. I know Spain. I have been there with my father; I have seen
 them in their own land; have marked the haughtiness of their nobles;
 the cruelty of their priests. If this man marry our Queen, however
 the Council and the Commons may fence round his power with restriction,
 he will be King, King of England, my masters; and the Queen, and the
 laws, and the people, his slaves. What? shall we have Spain on the
 throne and in the parliament; Spain in the pulpit and on the law-bench;
 Spain in all the great offices of state; Spain in our ships, in our
 forts, in our houses, in our beds?
 
 CROWD. No! no! no Spain!
 
 WILLIAM. No Spain in our beds--that were worse than all. I have been
 there with old Sir Thomas, and the beds I know. I hate Spain.
 
 A PEASANT. But, Sir Thomas, must we levy war against the Queen's
 Grace?
 
 WYATT. No, my friend; war _for_ the Queen's Grace--to save her from
 herself and Philip--war against Spain. And think not we shall be
 alone--thousands  will flock to us. The Council, the Court itself, is
 on our side. The Lord Chancellor himself is on our side. The King of
 France is with us; the King of Denmark is with us; the world is with
 us--war  against Spain! And if we move not now, yet it will be known
 that we have moved; and if Philip come to be King, O, my God! the
 rope, the rack, the thumbscrew, the stake, the fire. If we move not
 now, Spain moves, bribes our nobles with her gold, and creeps, creeps
 snake-like about our legs till we cannot move at all; and ye know, my
 masters, that wherever Spain hath ruled she hath wither'd all beneath
 her. Look at the New World--a paradise made hell; the red man, that
 good helpless creature, starved, maim'd, flogg'd, flay'd, burn'd,
 boil'd, buried alive, worried by dogs; and here, nearer home, the
 Netherlands, Sicily, Naples, Lombardy. I say no more--only this, their
 lot is yours. Forward to London with me! forward to London! If ye love
 your liberties or your skins, forward to London!
 
 CROWD. Forward to London! A Wyatt! a Wyatt!
 
 WYATT. But first to Rochester, to take the guns
 From out the vessels lying in the river.
 Then on.
 
 A PEASANT. Ay, but I fear we be too few, Sir Thomas.
 
 WYATT. Not many yet. The world as yet, my friend,
 Is not half-waked; but every parish tower
 Shall clang and clash alarum as we pass,
 And pour along the land, and swoll'n and fed
 With indraughts and side-currents, in full force
 Roll upon London.
 
 CROWD.            A Wyatt! a Wyatt! Forward!
 
 KNYVETT. Wyatt, shall we proclaim Elizabeth?
 
 WYATT. I'll think upon it, Knyvett.
 
 KNYVETT.                            Or Lady Jane?
 
 WYATT. No, poor soul; no.
 Ah, gray old castle of Alington, green field
 Beside the brimming Medway, it may chance
 That I shall never look upon you more.
 
 KNYVETT. Come, now, you're sonnetting again.
 
 WYATT.                                       Not I.
 I'll have my head set higher in the state;
 Or--if the Lord God will it--on the stake.
 
                                      [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--GUILDHALL.
 
 SIR THOMAS WHITE (The Lord Mayor), LORD WILLIAM HOWARD, SIR RALPH
 BAGENHALL, ALDERMEN _and_ CITIZENS.
 
 
 WHITE. I trust the Queen comes hither with her guards.
 
 HOWARD. Ay, all in arms.
 
         [_Several of the citizens move hastily out of the hall_.
 
                          Why do they hurry out there?
 
 WHITE. My Lord, cut out the rotten from your apple,
 Your apple eats the better. Let them go.
 They go like those old Pharisees in John
 Convicted by their conscience, arrant cowards,
 Or tamperers with that treason out of Kent.
 When will her Grace be here?
 
 HOWARD.                      In some few minutes.
 She will address your guilds and companies.
 I have striven in vain to raise a man for her.
 But help her in this exigency, make
 Your city loyal, and be the mightiest man
 This day in England.
 
 WHITE.               I am Thomas White.
 Few things have fail'd to which I set my will.
 I do my most and best.
 
 HOWARD.                You know that after
 The Captain Brett, who went with your train bands
 To fight with Wyatt, had gone over to him
 With all his men, the Queen in that distress
 Sent Cornwallis and Hastings to the traitor,
 Feigning to treat with him about her marriage--
 Know too what Wyatt said.
 
 WHITE.                    He'd sooner be,
 While this same marriage question was being argued,
 Trusted than trust--the scoundrel--and demanded
 Possession of her person and the Tower.
 
 HOWARD. And four of her poor Council too, my Lord,
 As hostages.
 
 WHITE.       I know it. What do and say
 Your Council at this hour?
 
 HOWARD.                    I will trust you.
 We fling ourselves on you, my Lord. The Council,
 The Parliament as well, are troubled waters;
 And yet like waters of the fen they know not
 Which way to flow. All hangs on her address,
 And upon you, Lord Mayor.
 
 WHITE.                    How look'd the city
 When now you past it? Quiet?
 
 HOWARD.                      Like our Council,
 Your city is divided. As we past,
 Some hail'd, some hiss'd us. There were citizens
 Stood each before his shut-up booth, and look'd
 As grim and grave as from a funeral.
 And here a knot of ruffians all in rags,
 With execrating execrable eyes,
 Glared at the citizen. Here was a young mother,
 Her face on flame, her red hair all blown back,
 She shrilling 'Wyatt,' while the boy she held
 Mimick'd and piped her 'Wyatt,' as red as she
 In hair and cheek; and almost elbowing her,
 So close they stood, another, mute as death,
 And white as her own milk; her babe in arms
 Had felt the faltering of his mother's heart,
 And look'd as bloodless. Here a pious Catholic,
 Mumbling and mixing up in his scared prayers
 Heaven and earth's Maries; over his bow'd shoulder
 Scowl'd that world-hated and world-hating beast,
 A haggard Anabaptist. Many such groups.
 The names of Wyatt, Elizabeth, Courtenay,
 Nay the Queen's right to reign--'fore God, the rogues--
 Were freely buzzed among them. So I say
 Your city is divided, and I fear
 One scruple, this or that way, of success
 Would turn it thither. Wherefore now the Queen
 In this low pulse and palsy of the state,
 Bad me to tell you that she counts on you
 And on myself as her two hands; on you,
 In your own city, as her right, my Lord,
 For you are loyal.
 
 WHITE.             Am I Thomas White?
 One word before she comes. Elizabeth--
 Her name is much abused among these traitors.
 Where is she? She is loved by all of us.
 I scarce have heart to mingle in this matter,
 If she should be mishandled.
 
 HOWARD.                      No; she shall not.
 The Queen had written her word to come to court:
 Methought I smelt out Renard in the letter,
 And fearing for her, sent a secret missive,
 Which told her to be sick. Happily or not,
 It found her sick indeed.
 
 WHITE.                    God send her well;
 Here comes her Royal Grace.
 
     _Enter_ GUARDS, MARY _and_ GARDINER. SIR THOMAS
     WHITE _leads her to a raised seat on the dais_.
 
 WHITE. I, the Lord Mayor, and these our companies
 And guilds of London, gathered here, beseech
 Your Highness to accept our lowliest thanks
 For your most princely presence; and we pray
 That we, your true and loyal citizens,
 From your own royal lips, at once may know
 The wherefore of this coming, and so learn
 Your royal will, and do it.--I, Lord Mayor
 Of London, and our guilds and companies.
 
 MARY. In mine own person am I come to you,
 To tell you what indeed ye see and know,
 How traitorously these rebels out of Kent
 Have made strong head against ourselves and you.
 They would not have me wed the Prince of Spain:
 That was their pretext--so they spake at first--
 But we sent divers of our Council to them,
 And by their answers to the question ask'd,
 It doth appear this marriage is the least
 Of all their quarrel.
 They have betrayed the treason of their hearts:
 Seek to possess our person, hold our Tower,
 Place and displace our councillors, and use
 Both us and them according as they will.
 Now what I am ye know right well--your Queen;
 To whom, when I was wedded to the realm
 And the realm's laws (the spousal ring whereof,
 Not ever to be laid aside, I wear
 Upon this finger), ye did promise full
 Allegiance and obedience to the death.
 Ye know my father was the rightful heir
 Of England, and his right came down to me
 Corroborate by your acts of Parliament:
 And as ye were most loving unto him,
 So doubtless will ye show yourselves to me.
 Wherefore, ye will not brook that anyone
 Should seize our person, occupy our state,
 More specially a traitor so presumptuous
 As this same Wyatt, who hath tamper'd with
 A public ignorance, and, under colour
 Of such a cause as hath no colour, seeks
 To bend the laws to his own will, and yield
 Full scope to persons rascal and forlorn,
 To make free spoil and havock of your goods.
 Now as your Prince, I say,
 I, that was never mother, cannot tell
 How mothers love their children; yet, methinks,
 A prince as naturally may love his people
 As these their children; and be sure your Queen
 So loves you, and so loving, needs must deem
 This love by you return'd as heartily;
 And thro' this common knot and bond of love,
 Doubt not they will be speedily overthrown.
 As to this marriage, ye shall understand
 We made thereto no treaty of ourselves,
 And set no foot theretoward unadvised
 Of all our Privy Council; furthermore,
 This marriage had the assent of those to whom
 The king, my father, did commit his trust;
 Who not alone esteem'd it honourable,
 But for the wealth and glory of our realm,
 And all our loving subjects, most expedient.
 As to myself,
 I am not so set on wedlock as to choose
 But where I list, nor yet so amorous
 That I must needs be husbanded; I thank God,
 I have lived a virgin, and I noway doubt
 But that with God's grace, I can live so still.
 Yet if it might please God that I should leave
 Some fruit of mine own body after me,
 To be your king, ye would rejoice thereat,
 And it would be your comfort, as I trust;
 And truly, if I either thought or knew
 This marriage should bring loss or danger to you,
 My subjects, or impair in any way
 This royal state of England, I would never
 Consent thereto, nor marry while I live;
 Moreover, if this marriage should not seem,
 Before our own High Court of Parliament,
 To be of rich advantage to our realm,
 We will refrain, and not alone from this,
 Likewise from any other, out of which
 Looms the least chance of peril to our realm.
 Wherefore be bold, and with your lawful Prince
 Stand fast against our enemies and yours,
 And fear them not. I fear them not. My Lord,
 I leave Lord William Howard in your city,
 To guard and keep you whole and safe from all
 The spoil and sackage aim'd at by these rebels,
 Who mouth and foam against the Prince of Spain.
 
 VOICES. Long live Queen Mary!
                               Down with Wyatt!
                                                The Queen!
 
 WHITE. Three voices from our guilds and companies!
 You are shy and proud like Englishmen, my masters,
 And will not trust your voices. Understand:
 Your lawful Prince hath come to cast herself
 On loyal hearts and bosoms, hoped to fall
 Into the wide-spread arms of fealty,
 And finds you statues. Speak at once--and all!
 For whom?
 Our sovereign Lady by King Harry's will;
 The Queen of England--or the Kentish Squire?
 I know you loyal. Speak! in the name of God!
 The Queen of England or the rabble of Kent?
 The reeking dungfork master of the mace!
 Your havings wasted by the scythe and spade--
 Your rights and charters hobnail'd into slush--
 Your houses fired--your gutters bubbling blood--
 
 ACCLAMATION. No! No! The Queen! the Queen!
 
 WHITE.                                     Your Highness hears
 This burst and bass of loyal harmony,
 And how we each and all of us abhor
 The venomous, bestial, devilish revolt
 Of Thomas Wyatt. Hear us now make oath
 To raise your Highness thirty thousand men,
 And arm and strike as with one hand, and brush
 This Wyatt from our shoulders, like a flea
 That might have leapt upon us unawares.
 Swear with me, noble fellow-citizens, all,
 With all your trades, and guilds, and companies.
 
 CITIZENS. We swear!
 
 MARY. We thank your Lordship and your loyal city.
                                   [_Exit_ MARY _attended_.
 
 WHITE. I trust this day, thro' God, I have saved the crown.
 
 FIRST ALDERMAN. Ay, so my Lord of Pembroke in command
 Of all her force be safe; but there are doubts.
 
 SECOND ALDERMAN. I hear that Gardiner, coming with the Queen,
 And meeting Pembroke, bent to his saddle-bow,
 As if to win the man by flattering him.
 _Is_ he so safe to fight upon her side?
 
 FIRST ALDERMAN. If not, there's no man safe.
 
 WHITE.                                       Yes, Thomas White.
 I am safe enough; no man need flatter me.
 
 SECOND ALDERMAN. Nay, no man need; but did you mark our Queen?
 The colour freely play'd into her face,
 And the half sight which makes her look so stern,
 Seem'd thro' that dim dilated world of hers,
 To read our faces; I have never seen her
 So queenly or so goodly.
 
 WHITE.                   Courage, sir,
 _That_ makes or man or woman look their goodliest.
 Die like the torn fox dumb, but never whine
 Like that poor heart, Northumberland, at the block.
 
 BAGENHALL. The man had children, and he whined for those.
 Methinks most men are but poor-hearted, else
 Should we so doat on courage, were it commoner?
 The Queen stands up, and speaks for her own self;
 And all men cry, She is queenly, she is goodly.
 Yet she's no goodlier; tho' my Lord Mayor here,
 By his own rule, he hath been so bold to-day,
 Should look more goodly than the rest of us.
 
 WHITE. Goodly? I feel most goodly heart and hand,
 And strong to throw ten Wyatts and all Kent.
 Ha! ha! sir; but you jest; I love it: a jest
 In time of danger shows the pulses even.
 Be merry! yet, Sir Ralph, you look but sad.
 I dare avouch you'd stand up for yourself,
 Tho' all the world should bay like winter wolves.
 
 BAGENHALL. Who knows? the man is proven by the hour.
 
 WHITE. The man should make the hour, not this the man;
 And Thomas White will prove this Thomas Wyatt,
 And he will prove an Iden to this Cade,
 And he will play the Walworth to this Wat;
 Come, sirs, we prate; hence all--gather your men--
 Myself must bustle. Wyatt comes to Southwark;
 I'll have the drawbridge hewn into the Thames,
 And see the citizens arm'd. Good day; good day.
                                        [_Exit_ WHITE.
 
 BAGENHALL. One of much outdoor bluster.
 
 HOWARD.                                 For all that,
 Most honest, brave, and skilful; and his wealth
 A fountain of perennial alms--his fault
 So thoroughly to believe in his own self.
 
 BAGENHALL. Yet thoroughly to believe in one's own self,
 So one's own self be thorough, were to do
 Great things, my Lord.
 
 HOWARD.                It may be.
 
 BAGENHALL.                        I have heard
 One of your Council fleer and jeer at him.
 
 HOWARD. The nursery-cocker'd child will jeer at aught
 That may seem strange beyond his nursery.
 The statesman that shall jeer and fleer at men,
 Makes enemies for himself and for his king;
 And if he jeer not seeing the true man
 Behind his folly, he is thrice the fool;
 And if he see the man and still will jeer,
 He is child and fool, and traitor to the State.
 Who is he? let me shun him.
 
 BAGENHALL.                    Nay, my Lord,
 He is damn'd enough already.
 
 HOWARD.                      I must set
 The guard at Ludgate. Fare you well, Sir Ralph.
 
 BAGENHALL. 'Who knows?' I am for England. But who knows,
 That knows the Queen, the Spaniard, and the Pope,
 Whether I be for Wyatt, or the Queen?
 
                                 [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--LONDON BRIDGE.
 
 
     _Enter_ SIR THOMAS WYATT _and_ BRETT.
 
 WYATT. Brett, when the Duke of Norfolk moved against us
 Thou cried'st 'A Wyatt!' and flying to our side
 Left his all bare, for which I love thee, Brett.
 Have for thine asking aught that I can give,
 For thro' thine help we are come to London Bridge;
 But how to cross it balks me. I fear we cannot.
 
 BRETT. Nay, hardly, save by boat, swimming, or wings.
 
 WYATT. Last night I climb'd into the gate-house, Brett,
 And scared the gray old porter and his wife.
 And then I crept along the gloom and saw
 They had hewn the drawbridge down into the river.
 It roll'd as black as death; and that same tide
 Which, coming with our coming, seem'd to smile
 And sparkle like our fortune as thou saidest,
 Ran sunless down, and moan'd against the piers.
 But o'er the chasm I saw Lord William Howard
 By torchlight, and his guard; four guns gaped at me,
 Black, silent mouths: had Howard spied me there
 And made them speak, as well he might have done,
 Their voice had left me none to tell you this.
 What shall we do?
 
 BRETT.            On somehow. To go back
 Were to lose all.
 
 WYATT.            On over London Bridge
 We cannot: stay we cannot; there is ordnance
 On the White Tower and on the Devil's Tower,
 And pointed full at Southwark; we must round
 By Kingston Bridge.
 
 BRETT.              Ten miles about.
 
 WYATT.                               Ev'n so.
 But I have notice from our partisans
 Within the city that they will stand by us
 If Ludgate can be reach'd by dawn to-morrow.
 
     _Enter one of_ WYATT'S MEN.
 
 MAN. Sir Thomas, I've found this paper; pray
 your worship read it; I know not my letters; the old
 priests taught me nothing.
 
 WYATT (_reads_). 'Whosoever will apprehend the traitor Thomas Wyatt
 shall have a hundred pounds for reward.'
 
 MAN. Is that it? That's a big lot of money.
 
 WYATT. Ay, ay, my friend; not read it? 'tis not written
 Half plain enough. Give me a piece of paper!
                                  [_Writes 'THOMAS WYATT' large_.
 There, any man can read that.    [_Sticks it in his cap_.
 
 BRETT. But that's foolhardy.
 
 WYATT. No! boldness, which will give my followers boldness.
 
     _Enter_ MAN _with a prisoner_.
 
 MAN. We found him, your worship, a plundering o' Bishop Winchester's
 house; he says he's a poor gentleman.
 
 WYATT. Gentleman! a thief! Go hang him. Shall we make
 Those that we come to serve our sharpest foes?
 
 BRETT. Sir Thomas--
 
 WYATT.             Hang him, I say.
 
 BRETT. Wyatt, but now you promised me a boon.
 
 WYATT. Ay, and I warrant this fine fellow's life.
 
 BRETT. Ev'n so; he was my neighbour once in Kent.
 He's poor enough, has drunk and gambled out
 All that he had, and gentleman he was.
 We have been glad together; let him live.
 
 WYATT. He has gambled for his life, and lost, he hangs.
 No, no, my word's my word. Take thy poor gentleman!
 Gamble thyself at once out of my sight,
 Or I will dig thee with my dagger. Away!
 Women and children!
 
     _Enter a Crowd of_ WOMEN _and_ CHILDREN.
 
 FIRST WOMAN. O Sir Thomas, Sir Thomas, pray you go away, Sir Thomas,
 or you'll make the White Tower a black 'un for us this blessed day.
 He'll be the death on us; and you'll set the Divil's Tower a-spitting,
 and he'll smash all our bits o' things worse than Philip o' Spain.
 
 SECOND WOMAN. Don't ye now go to think that we be for Philip o' Spain.
 
 THIRD WOMAN. No, we know that ye be come to kill the Queen, and we'll
 pray for you all on our bended knees. But o' God's mercy don't ye kill
 the Queen here, Sir Thomas; look ye, here's little Dickon, and little
 Robin, and little Jenny--though she's but a side-cousin--and all on
 our knees, we pray you to kill the Queen further off, Sir Thomas.
 
 WYATT. My friends, I have not come to kill the Queen
 Or here or there: I come to save you all,
 And I'll go further off.
 
 CROWD. Thanks, Sir Thomas, we be beholden to you, and we'll pray for
 you on our bended knees till our lives' end.
 
 WYATT. Be happy, I am your friend. To Kingston, forward!
 
                                       [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.--ROOM IN THE GATEHOUSE OF WESTMINSTER PALACE.
 
 MARY, ALICE, GARDINER, RENARD, LADIES.
 
 
 GARDINER. Their cry is, Philip never shall be king.
 
 MARY. Lord Pembroke in command of all our force
 Will front their cry and shatter them into dust.
 
 ALICE. Was not Lord Pembroke with Northumberland?
 O madam, if this Pembroke should be false?
 
 MARY. No, girl; most brave and loyal, brave and loyal.
 His breaking with Northumberland broke Northumberland.
 At the park gate he hovers with our guards.
 These Kentish ploughmen cannot break the guards.
 
     _Enter_ MESSENGER.
 
 MESSENGER. Wyatt, your Grace, hath broken thro' the guards
 And gone to Ludgate.
 
 GARDINER.            Madam, I much fear
 That all is lost; but we can save your Grace.
 The river still is free. I do beseech you,
 There yet is time, take boat and pass to Windsor.
 
 MARY. I pass to Windsor and I lose my crown.
 
 GARDINER. Pass, then, I pray your Highness, to the Tower.
 
 MARY. I shall but be their prisoner in the Tower.
 
 CRIES _without_. The traitor! treason! Pembroke!
 
 LADIES.                                          Treason! treason!
 
 MARY. Peace.
 False to Northumberland, is he false to me?
 Bear witness, Renard, that I live and die
 The true and faithful bride of Philip--A sound
 Of feet and voices thickening hither--blows--
 Hark, there is battle at the palace gates,
 And I will out upon the gallery.
 
 LADIES. No, no, your Grace; see there the arrows flying.
 
 MARY. I am Harry's daughter, Tudor, and not fear.
                                   [_Goes out on the gallery_.
 The guards are all driven in, skulk into corners
 Like rabbits to their holes. A gracious guard
 Truly; shame on them! they have shut the gates!
 
     _Enter_ SIR ROBERT SOUTHWELL.
 
 SOUTHWELL. The porter, please your Grace, hath shut the gates
 On friend and foe. Your gentlemen-at-arms,
 If this be not your Grace's order, cry
 To have the gates set wide again, and they
 With their good battleaxes will do you right
 Against all traitors.
 
 MARY. They are the flower of England; set the gates wide.
 
                                           [_Exit_ SOUTHWELL.
 
     _Enter_ COURTENAY.
 
 COURTENAY. All lost, all lost, all yielded! A barge, a barge!
 The Queen must to the Tower.
 
 MARY.                        Whence come you, sir?
 
 COURTENAY. From Charing Cross; the rebels broke us there,
 And I sped hither with what haste I might
 To save my royal cousin.
 
 MARY.                    Where is Pembroke?
 
 COURTENAY. I left him somewhere in the thick of it.
 
 MARY. Left him and fled; and thou that would'st be King,
 And hast nor heart nor honour. I myself
 Will down into the battle and there bide
 The upshot of my quarrel, or die with those
 That are no cowards and no Courtenays.
 
 COURTENAY. I do not love your Grace should call me coward.
 
     _Enter another_ MESSENGER.
 
 MESSENGER. Over, your Grace, all crush'd; the brave Lord William
 Thrust him from Ludgate, and the traitor flying
 To Temple Bar, there by Sir Maurice Berkeley
 Was taken prisoner.
 
 MARY.               To the Tower with _him_!
 
 MESSENGER. 'Tis said he told Sir Maurice there was one
 Cognisant of this, and party thereunto,
 My Lord of Devon.
 
 MARY.             To the Tower with _him_!
 
 COURTENAY. O la, the Tower, the Tower, always the Tower,
 I shall grow into it--I shall be the Tower.
 
 MARY. Your Lordship may not have so long to wait. Remove him!
 
 COURTENAY. La, to whistle out my life,
 And carve my coat upon the walls again!
                              [_Exit_ COURTENAY _guarded_.
 
 MESSENGER. Also this Wyatt did confess the Princess
 Cognisant thereof, and party thereunto.
 
 MARY. What? whom--whom did you say?
 
 MESSENGER.                          Elizabeth,
 Your Royal sister.
 
 MARY.              To the Tower with _her_!
 My foes are at my feet and I am Queen.
 
               [GARDINER _and her_ LADIES _kneel to her_.
 
 GARDINER (_rising_).
 There let them lie, your foot-stool! (_Aside_.) Can I strike
 Elizabeth?--not now and save the life
 Of Devon: if I save him, he and his
 Are bound to me--may strike hereafter. (_Aloud_.) Madam,
 What Wyatt said, or what they said he said,
 Cries of the moment and the street--
 
 MARY. He said it.
 
 GARDINER. Your courts of justice will determine that.
 
 RENARD (_advancing_).
 I trust by this your Highness will allow
 Some spice of wisdom in my telling you,
 When last we talk'd, that Philip would not come
 Till Guildford Dudley and the Duke of Suffolk,
 And Lady Jane had left us.
 
 MARY.                      They shall die.
 
 RENARD. And your so loving sister?
 
 MARY.                              She shall die.
 My foes are at my feet, and Philip King.
 
                                     [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT III.
 
 
 
 SCENE I.--THE CONDUIT IN GRACECHURCH,
 
 _Painted with the Nine Worthies, among them King Henry VIII. holding a
 book, on it inscribed_ 'Verbum Dei'.
 
 
     _Enter_ SIR RALPH BAGENHALL _and_ SIR THOMAS STAFFORD.
 
 BAGENHALL. A hundred here and hundreds hang'd in Kent.
 The tigress had unsheath'd her nails at last,
 And Renard and the Chancellor sharpen'd them.
 In every London street a gibbet stood.
 They are down to-day. Here by this house was one;
 The traitor husband dangled at the door,
 And when the traitor wife came out for bread
 To still the petty treason therewithin,
 Her cap would brush his heels.
 
 STAFFORD.                      It is Sir Ralph,
 And muttering to himself as heretofore.
 Sir, see you aught up yonder?
 
 BAGENHALL.                    I miss something.
 The tree that only bears dead fruit is gone.
 
 STAFFORD. What tree, sir?
 
 BAGENHALL.                Well, the tree in Virgil, sir,
 That bears not its own apples.
 
 STAFFORD.                      What! the gallows?
 
 BAGENHALL. Sir, this dead fruit was ripening overmuch,
 And had to be removed lest living Spain
 Should sicken at dead England.
 
 STAFFORD.                      Not so dead,
 But that a shock may rouse her.
 
 BAGENHALL.                      I believe
 Sir Thomas Stafford?
 
 STAFFORD.            I am ill disguised.
 
 BAGENHALL. Well, are you not in peril here?
 
 STAFFORD.                                   I think so.
 I came to feel the pulse of England, whether
 It beats hard at this marriage. Did you see it?
 
 BAGENHALL. Stafford, I am a sad man and a serious.
 Far liefer had I in my country hall
 Been reading some old book, with mine old hound
 Couch'd at my hearth, and mine old flask of wine
 Beside me, than have seen it: yet I saw it.
 
 STAFFORD. Good, was it splendid?
 
 BAGENHALL.                       Ay, if Dukes, and Earls,
 And Counts, and sixty Spanish cavaliers,
 Some six or seven Bishops, diamonds, pearls,
 That royal commonplace too, cloth of gold,
 Could make it so.
 
 STAFFORD.         And what was Mary's dress?
 
 BAGENHALL. Good faith, I was too sorry for the woman
 To mark the dress. She wore red shoes!
 
 STAFFORD.                              Red shoes!
 
 BAGENHALL. Scarlet, as if her feet were wash'd in blood,
 As if she had waded in it.
 
 STAFFORD.                  Were your eyes
 So bashful that you look'd no higher?
 
 BAGENHALL.                            A diamond,
 And Philip's gift, as proof of Philip's love,
 Who hath not any for any,--tho' a true one,
 Blazed false upon her heart.
 
 STAFFORD.                    But this proud Prince--
 
 BAGENHALL. Nay, he is King, you know, the King of Naples.
 The father ceded Naples, that the son
 Being a King, might wed a Queen--O he
 Flamed in brocade--white satin his trunk-hose,
 Inwrought with silver,--on his neck a collar,
 Gold, thick with diamonds; hanging down from this
 The Golden Fleece--and round his knee, misplaced,
 Our English Garter, studded with great emeralds,
 Rubies, I know not what. Have you had enough
 Of all this gear?
 
 STAFFORD. Ay, since you hate the telling it.
 How look'd the Queen?
 
 BAGENHALL.            No fairer for her jewels.
 And I could see that as the new-made couple
 Came from the Minster, moving side by side
 Beneath one canopy, ever and anon
 She cast on him a vassal smile of love,
 Which Philip with a glance of some distaste,
 Or so methought, return'd. I may be wrong, sir.
 This marriage will not hold.
 
 STAFFORD.                    I think with you.
 The King of France will help to break it.
 
 BAGENHALL.                                France!
 We have once had half of France, and hurl'd our battles
 Into the heart of Spain; but England now
 Is but a ball chuck'd between France and Spain,
 His in whose hand she drops; Harry of Bolingbroke
 Had holpen Richard's tottering throne to stand,
 Could Harry have foreseen that all our nobles
 Would perish on the civil slaughter-field,
 And leave the people naked to the crown,
 And the crown naked to the people; the crown
 Female, too! Sir, no woman's regimen
 Can save us. We are fallen, and as I think,
 Never to rise again.
 
 STAFFORD.            You are too black-blooded.
 I'd make a move myself to hinder that:
 I know some lusty fellows there in France.
 
 BAGENHALL. You would but make us weaker, Thomas Stafford.
 Wyatt was a good soldier, yet he fail'd,
 And strengthen'd Philip.
 
 STAFFORD.                Did not his last breath
 Clear Courtenay and the Princess from the charge
 Of being his co-rebels?
 
 BAGENHALL.              Ay, but then
 What such a one as Wyatt says is nothing:
 We have no men among us. The new Lords
 Are quieted with their sop of Abbeylands,
 And ev'n before the Queen's face Gardiner buys them
 With Philip's gold. All greed, no faith, no courage!
 Why, ev'n the haughty prince, Northumberland,
 The leader of our Reformation, knelt
 And blubber'd like a lad, and on the scaffold
 Recanted, and resold himself to Rome.
 
 STAFFORD. I swear you do your country wrong, Sir Ralph.
 I know a set of exiles over there,
 Dare-devils, that would eat fire and spit it out
 At Philip's beard: they pillage Spain already.
 The French King winks at it. An hour will come
 When they will sweep her from the seas. No men?
 Did not Lord Suffolk die like a true man?
 Is not Lord William Howard a true man?
 Yea, you yourself, altho' you are black-blooded:
 And I, by God, believe myself a man.
 Ay, even in the church there is a man--
 Cranmer.
 Fly would he not, when all men bad him fly.
 And what a letter he wrote against the Pope!
 There's a brave man, if any.
 
 BAGENHALL.                   Ay; if it hold.
 
 CROWD (_coming on_).
 God save their Graces!
 
 STAFFORD.              Bagenhall, I see
 The Tudor green and white. (_Trumpets_.) They are coming now.
 And here's a crowd as thick as herring-shoals.
 
 BAGENHALL. Be limpets to this pillar, or we are torn
 Down the strong wave of brawlers.
 
 CROWD. God save their Graces!
 
         [_Procession of Trumpeters, Javelin-men, etc.; then
         Spanish and Flemish Nobles intermingled_.
 
 STAFFORD. Worth seeing, Bagenhall! These black dog-Dons
 Garb themselves bravely. Who's the long-face there,
 Looks very Spain of very Spain?
 
 BAGENHALL.                      The Duke
 Of Alva, an iron soldier.
 
 STAFFORD.                 And the Dutchman,
 Now laughing at some jest?
 
 BAGENHALL.                 William of Orange,
 William the Silent.
 
 STAFFORD.           Why do they call him so?
 
 BAGENHALL. He keeps, they say, some secret that may cost
 Philip his life.
 
 STAFFORD.        But then he looks so merry.
 
 BAGENHALL. I cannot tell you why they call him so.
 
     [_The_ KING _and_ QUEEN _pass, attended by Peers of
     the Realm, Officers of State, etc. Cannon shot off_.
 
 CROWD. Philip and Mary, Philip and Mary!
 Long live the King and Queen, Philip and Mary!
 
 STAFFORD. They smile as if content with one another.
 
 BAGENHALL. A smile abroad is oft a scowl at home.
 
                   [KING _and_ QUEEN _pass on. Procession_.
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. I thought this Philip had been one of those black
 devils of Spain, but he hath a yellow beard.
 
 SECOND CITIZEN. Not red like Iscariot's.
 
 FIRST CITIZEN. Like a carrot's, as thou say'st, and English carrot's
 better than Spanish licorice; but I thought he was a beast.
 
 THIRD CITIZEN. Certain I had heard that every Spaniard carries a tail
 like a devil under his trunk-hose.
 
 TAILOR. Ay, but see what trunk-hoses! Lord! they be fine; I never
 stitch'd none such. They make amends for the tails.
 
 FOURTH CITIZEN. Tut! every Spanish priest will tell you that all
 English heretics have tails.
 
 FIFTH CITIZEN. Death and the Devil--if he find I have one--
 
 FOURTH CITIZEN. Lo! thou hast call'd them up! here they come--a pale
 horse for Death and Gardiner for the Devil.
 
     _Enter_ GARDINER _(turning back from the procession)_.
 
 GARDINER. Knave, wilt thou wear thy cap before the Queen?
 
 MAN. My Lord, I stand so squeezed among the crowd
 I cannot lift my hands unto my head.
 
 GARDINER. Knock off his cap there, some of you about him!
 See there be others that can use their hands.
 Thou art one of Wyatt's men?
 
 MAN.                         No, my Lord, no.
 
 GARDINER. Thy name, thou knave?
 
 MAN.                            I am nobody, my Lord.
 
 GARDINER (_shouting_).
 God's passion! knave, thy name?
 
 MAN.                            I have ears to hear.
 
 GARDINER. Ay, rascal, if I leave thee ears to hear.
 Find out his name and bring it me (_to_ ATTENDANT).
 
 ATTENDANT.                        Ay, my Lord.
 
 GARDINER. Knave, thou shalt lose thine ears and find thy tongue,
 And shalt be thankful if I leave thee that.
                          [_Coming before the Conduit_.
 The conduit painted--the nine worthies--ay!
 But then what's here? King Harry with a scroll.
 Ha--Verbum Dei--verbum--word of God!
 God's passion! do you know the knave that painted it?
 
 ATTENDANT. I do, my Lord.
 
 GARDINER.                 Tell him to paint it out,
 And put some fresh device in lieu of it--
 A pair of gloves, a pair of gloves, sir; ha?
 There is no heresy there.
 
 ATTENDANT.                I will, my Lord;
 The man shall paint a pair of gloves. I am sure
 (Knowing the man) he wrought it ignorantly,
 And not from any malice.
 
 GARDINER.                Word of God
 In English! over this the brainless loons
 That cannot spell Esaias from St. Paul,
 Make themselves drunk and mad, fly out and flare
 Into rebellions. I'll have their bibles burnt.
 The bible is the priest's. Ay! fellow, what!
 Stand staring at me! shout, you gaping rogue!
 
 MAN. I have, my Lord, shouted till I am hoarse.
 
 GARDINER. What hast thou shouted, knave?
 
 MAN.                                     Long live Queen Mary!
 
 GARDINER. Knave, there be two. There be both King and Queen,
 Philip and Mary. Shout!
 
 MAN.                    Nay, but, my Lord,
 The Queen comes first, Mary and Philip.
 
 GARDINER.                               Shout, then,
 Mary and Philip!
 
 MAN.             Mary and Philip!
 
 GARDINER.                         Now,
 Thou hast shouted for thy pleasure, shout for mine!
 Philip and Mary!
 
 MAN.             Must it be so, my Lord?
 
 GARDINER. Ay, knave.
 
 MAN.                 Philip and Mary!
 
 GARDINER.                             I distrust thee.
 Thine is a half voice and a lean assent.
 What is thy name?
 
 MAN.              Sanders.
 
 GARDINER.                  What else?
 
 MAN.                                  Zerubbabel.
 
 GARDINER. Where dost thou live?
 
 MAN.                            In Cornhill.
 
 GARDINER.                                    Where, knave, where?
 
 MAN. Sign of the Talbot.
 
 GARDINER.                Come to me to-morrow.--
 Rascal!--this land is like a hill of fire,
 One crater opens when another shuts.
 But so I get the laws against the heretic,
 Spite of Lord Paget and Lord William Howard,
 And others of our Parliament, revived,
 I will show fire on my side--stake and fire--
 Sharp work and short. The knaves are easily cow'd.
 Follow their Majesties.
                            [_Exit. The crowd following_.
 
 BAGENHALL.              As proud as Becket.
 
 STAFFORD. You would not have him murder'd as Becket was?
 
 BAGENHALL. No--murder fathers murder: but I say
 There is no man--there was one woman with us--
 It was a sin to love her married, dead
 I cannot choose but love her.
 
 STAFFORD.                     Lady Jane?
 
 CROWD (_going off_).
 God save their Graces!
 
 STAFFORD.              Did you see her die?
 
 BAGENHALL. No, no; her innocent blood had blinded me.
 You call me too black-blooded--true enough
 Her dark dead blood is in my heart with mine.
 If ever I cry out against the Pope
 Her dark dead blood that ever moves with mine
 Will stir the living tongue and make the cry.
 
 STAFFORD. Yet doubtless you can tell me how she died?
 
 BAGENHALL. Seventeen--and knew eight languages--in music
 Peerless--her needle perfect, and her learning
 Beyond the churchmen; yet so meek, so modest,
 So wife-like humble to the trivial boy
 Mismatch'd with her for policy! I have heard
 She would not take a last farewell of him,
 She fear'd it might unman him for his end.
 She could not be unmann'd--no, nor outwoman'd--
 Seventeen--a rose of grace!
 Girl never breathed to rival such a rose;
 Rose never blew that equall'd such a bud.
 
 STAFFORD.                                 Pray you go on.
 
 BAGENHALL. She came upon the scaffold,
 And said she was condemn'd to die for treason;
 She had but follow'd the device of those
 Her nearest kin: she thought they knew the laws.
 But for herself, she knew but little law,
 And nothing of the titles to the crown;
 She had no desire for that, and wrung her hands,
 And trusted God would save her thro' the blood
 Of Jesus Christ alone.
 
 STAFFORD.              Pray you go on.
 
 BAGENHALL. Then knelt and said the Misere Mei--
 But all in English, mark you; rose again,
 And, when the headsman pray'd to be forgiven,
 Said, 'You will give me my true crown at last,
 But do it quickly;' then all wept but she,
 Who changed not colour when she saw the block,
 But ask'd him, childlike: 'Will you take it off
 Before I lay me down?' 'No, madam,' he said,
 Gasping; and when her innocent eyes were bound,
 She, with her poor blind hands feeling--'where is it?
 Where is it?'--You must fancy that which follow'd,
 If you have heart to do it!
 
 CROWD (_in the distance_).
                             God save their Graces!
 
 STAFFORD. Their Graces, our disgraces! God confound them!
 Why, she's grown bloodier! when I last was here,
 This was against her conscience--would be murder!
 
 BAGENHALL. The 'Thou shall do no murder,' which God's hand
 Wrote on her conscience, Mary rubb'd out pale--
 She could not make it white--and over that,
 Traced in the blackest text of Hell--'Thou shall!'
 And sign'd it--Mary!
 
 STAFFORD.            Philip and the Pope
 Must have sign'd too. I hear this Legate's coming
 To bring us absolution from the Pope.
 The Lords and Commons will bow down before him--
 You are of the house? what will you do, Sir Ralph?
 
 BAGENHALL. And why should I be bolder than the rest,
 Or honester than all?
 
 STAFFORD.             But, sir, if I--
 And oversea they say this state of yours
 Hath no more mortice than a tower of cards;
 And that a puff would do it--then if I
 And others made that move I touch'd upon,
 Back'd by the power of France, and landing here,
 Came with a sudden splendour, shout, and show,
 And dazzled men and deafen'd by some bright
 Loud venture, and the people so unquiet--
 And I the race of murder'd Buckingham--
 Not for myself, but for the kingdom--Sir,
 I trust that you would fight along with us.
 
 BAGENHALL. No; you would fling your lives into the gulf.
 
 STAFFORD. But if this Philip, as he's like to do,
 Left Mary a wife-widow here alone,
 Set up a viceroy, sent his myriads hither
 To seize upon the forts and fleet, and make us
 A Spanish province; would you not fight then?
 
 BAGENHALL. I think I should fight then.
 
 STAFFORD.                               I am sure of it.
 Hist! there's the face coming on here of one
 Who knows me. I must leave you. Fare you well,
 You'll hear of me again.
 
 BAGENHALL.               Upon the scaffold.
 
                                       [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--ROOM IN WHITEHALL PALACE.
 
 MARY. _Enter_ PHILIP _and_ CARDINAL POLE.
 
 
 POLE. Ave Maria, gratia plena, Benedicta tu in mulieribus.
 
 MARY. Loyal and royal cousin, humblest thanks.
 Had you a pleasant voyage up the river?
 
 POLE. We had your royal barge, and that same chair,
 Or rather throne of purple, on the deck.
 Our silver cross sparkled before the prow,
 The ripples twinkled at their diamond-dance,
 The boats that follow'd, were as glowing-gay
 As regal gardens; and your flocks of swans,
 As fair and white as angels; and your shores
 Wore in mine eyes the green of Paradise.
 My foreign friends, who dream'd us blanketed
 In ever-closing fog, were much amazed
 To find as fair a sun as might have flash'd
 Upon their lake of Garda, fire the Thames;
 Our voyage by sea was all but miracle;
 And here the river flowing from the sea,
 Not toward it (for they thought not of our tides),
 Seem'd as a happy miracle to make glide--
 In quiet--home your banish'd countryman.
 
 MARY. We heard that you were sick in Flanders, cousin.
 
 POLE. A dizziness.
 
 MARY.              And how came you round again?
 
 POLE. The scarlet thread of Rahab saved her life;
 And mine, a little letting of the blood.
 
 MARY. Well? now?
 
 POLE.            Ay, cousin, as the heathen giant
 Had but to touch the ground, his force return'd--
 Thus, after twenty years of banishment,
 Feeling my native land beneath my foot,
 I said thereto: 'Ah, native land of mine,
 Thou art much beholden to this foot of mine,
 That hastes with full commission from the Pope
 To absolve thee from thy guilt of heresy.
 Thou hast disgraced me and attainted me,
 And mark'd me ev'n as Cain, and I return
 As Peter, but to bless thee: make me well.'
 Methinks the good land heard me, for to-day
 My heart beats twenty, when I see you, cousin.
 Ah, gentle cousin, since your Herod's death,
 How oft hath Peter knock'd at Mary's gate!
 And Mary would have risen and let him in,
 But, Mary, there were those within the house
 Who would not have it.
 
 MARY.                  True, good cousin Pole;
 And there were also those without the house
 Who would not have it.
 
 POLE.                  I believe so, cousin.
 State-policy and church-policy are conjoint,
 But Janus-faces looking diverse ways.
 I fear the Emperor much misvalued me.
 But all is well; 'twas ev'n the will of God,
 Who, waiting till the time had ripen'd, now,
 Makes me his mouth of holy greeting. 'Hail,
 Daughter of God, and saver of the faith.
 Sit benedictus fructus ventris tui!'
 
 MARY. Ah, heaven!
 
 POLE.             Unwell, your Grace?
 
 MARY.                                 No, cousin, happy--
 Happy to see you; never yet so happy
 Since I was crown'd.
 
 POLE.                Sweet cousin, you forget
 That long low minster where you gave your hand
 To this great Catholic King.
 
 PHILIP.                      Well said, Lord Legate.
 
 MARY. Nay, not well said; I thought of you, my liege,
 Ev'n as I spoke.
 
 PHILIP.          Ay, Madam; my Lord Paget
 Waits to present our Council to the Legate.
 Sit down here, all; Madam, between us you.
 
 POLE. Lo, now you are enclosed with boards of cedar,
 Our little sister of the Song of Songs!
 You are doubly fenced and shielded sitting here
 Between the two most high-set thrones on earth,
 The Emperor's highness happily symboll'd by
 The King your husband, the Pope's Holiness
 By mine own self.
 
 MARY.             True, cousin, I am happy.
 When will you that we summon both our houses
 To take this absolution from your lips,
 And be regather'd to the Papal fold?
 
 POLE. In Britain's calendar the brightest day
 Beheld our rough forefathers break their Gods,
 And clasp the faith in Christ; but after that
 Might not St. Andrew's be her happiest day?
 
 MARY. Then these shall meet upon St. Andrew's day.
 
     _Enter_ PAGET, _who presents the Council. Dumb show_.
 
 POLE. I am an old man wearied with my journey,
 Ev'n with my joy. Permit me to withdraw.
 To Lambeth?
 
 PHILIP.     Ay, Lambeth has ousted Cranmer.
 It was not meet the heretic swine should live
 In Lambeth.
 
 MARY.       There or anywhere, or at all.
 
 PHILIP. We have had it swept and garnish'd after him.
 
 POLE. Not for the seven devils to enter in?
 
 PHILIP. No, for we trust they parted in the swine.
 
 POLE. True, and I am the Angel of the Pope.
 Farewell, your Graces.
 
 PHILIP.                Nay, not here--to me;
 I will go with you to the waterside.
 
 POLE. Not be my Charon to the counter side?
 
 PHILIP. No, my Lord Legate, the Lord Chancellor goes.
 
 POLE. And unto no dead world; but Lambeth palace,
 Henceforth a centre of the living faith.
 
                         [_Exeunt_ PHILIP, POLE, PAGET, _etc_.
 
     _Manet_ MARY.
 
 MARY. He hath awaked! he hath awaked!
 He stirs within the darkness!
 Oh, Philip, husband! now thy love to mine
 Will cling more close, and those bleak manners thaw,
 That make me shamed and tongue-tied in my love.
 The second Prince of Peace--
 The great unborn defender of the Faith,
 Who will avenge me of mine enemies--
 He comes, and my star rises.
 The stormy Wyatts and Northumberlands,
 The proud ambitions of Elizabeth,
 And all her fieriest partisans--are pale
 Before my star!
 The light of this new learning wanes and dies:
 The ghosts of Luther and Zuinglius fade
 Into the deathless hell which is their doom
 Before my star!
 His sceptre shall go forth from Ind to Ind!
 His sword shall hew the heretic peoples down!
 His faith shall clothe the world that will be his,
 Like universal air and sunshine! Open,
 Ye everlasting gates! The King is here!--
 My star, my son!
 
     _Enter_ PHILIP, DUKE OF ALVA, _etc_.
 
                  Oh, Philip, come with me;
 Good news have I to tell you, news to make
 Both of us happy--ay, the Kingdom too.
 Nay come with me--one moment!
 
 PHILIP (_to_ ALVA).           More than that:
 There was one here of late--William the Silent
 They call him--he is free enough in talk,
 But tells me nothing. You will be, we trust,
 Sometime the viceroy of those provinces--
 He must deserve his surname better.
 
 ALVA.                               Ay, sir;
 Inherit the Great Silence.
 
 PHILIP.                    True; the provinces
 Are hard to rule and must be hardly ruled;
 Most fruitful, yet, indeed, an empty rind,
 All hollow'd out with stinging heresies;
 And for their heresies, Alva, they will fight;
 You must break them or they break you.
 
 ALVA (_proudly_).                      The first.
 
 PHILIP. Good!
 Well, Madam, this new happiness of mine?
 
                                     [_Exeunt_.
 
     _Enter_ THREE PAGES.
 
 FIRST PAGE. News, mates! a miracle, a miracle! news!
 The bells must ring; Te Deums must be sung;
 The Queen hath felt the motion of her babe!
 
 SECOND PAGE. Ay; but see here!
 
 FIRST PAGE.                    See what?
 
 SECOND PAGE.                             This paper, Dickon.
 I found it fluttering at the palace gates:--
 'The Queen of England is delivered of a dead dog!'
 
 THIRD PAGE. These are the things that madden her. Fie upon it!
 
 FIRST PAGE. Ay; but I hear she hath a dropsy, lad,
 Or a high-dropsy, as the doctors call it.
 
 THIRD PAGE. Fie on her dropsy, so she have a dropsy!
 I know that she was ever sweet to me.
 
 FIRST PAGE. For thou and thine are Roman to the core.
 
 THIRD PAGE. So thou and thine must be. Take heed!
 
 FIRST PAGE.                                       Not I,
 And whether this flash of news be false or true,
 So the wine run, and there be revelry,
 Content am I. Let all the steeples clash,
 Till the sun dance, as upon Easter Day.
 
                                     [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--GREAT HALL IN WHITEHALL.
 
 _At the far end a dais. On this three chairs, two under one canopy
 for_ MARY _and_ PHILIP, _another on the right of these for_ POLE.
 _Under the dais on_ POLE'S _side, ranged along the wall, sit all the
 Spiritual Peers, and along the wall opposite, all the Temporal. The
 Commons on cross benches in front, a line of approach to the dais
 between them. In the foreground_, SIR RALPH BAGENHALL _and other
 Members of the Commons_.
 
 
 FIRST MEMBER. St. Andrew's day; sit close, sit close, we are friends.
 Is reconciled the word? the Pope again?
 It must be thus; and yet, cocksbody! how strange
 That Gardiner, once so one with all of us
 Against this foreign marriage, should have yielded
 So utterly!--strange! but stranger still that he,
 So fierce against the Headship of the Pope,
 Should play the second actor in this pageant
 That brings him in; such a cameleon he!
 
 SECOND MEMBER. This Gardiner turn'd his coat in Henry's time;
 The serpent that hath slough'd will slough again.
 
 THIRD MEMBER. Tut, then we all are serpents.
 
 SECOND MEMBER. Speak for yourself.
 
 THIRD MEMBER. Ay, and for Gardiner! being English citizen,
 How should he bear a bridegroom out of Spain?
 The Queen would have him! being English churchman
 How should he bear the headship of the Pope?
 The Queen would have it! Statesmen that are wise
 Shape a necessity, as a sculptor clay,
 To their own model.
 
 SECOND MEMBER. Statesmen that are wise
 Take truth herself for model. What say you?
                           [_To_ SIR RALPH BAGENHALL.
 
 BAGENHALL. We talk and talk.
 
 FIRST MEMBER. Ay, and what use to talk?
 Philip's no sudden alien--the Queen's husband,
 He's here, and king, or will be--yet cocksbody!
 So hated here! I watch'd a hive of late;
 My seven-years' friend was with me, my young boy;
 Out crept a wasp, with half the swarm behind.
 'Philip!' says he. I had to cuff the rogue
 For infant treason.
 
 THIRD MEMBER.       But they say that bees,
 If any creeping life invade their hive
 Too gross to be thrust out, will build him round,
 And bind him in from harming of their combs.
 And Philip by these articles is bound
 From stirring hand or foot to wrong the realm.
 
 SECOND MEMBER. By bonds of beeswax, like your creeping thing;
 But your wise bees had stung him first to death.
 
 THIRD MEMBER. Hush, hush!
 You wrong the Chancellor: the clauses added
 To that same treaty which the emperor sent us
 Were mainly Gardiner's: that no foreigner
 Hold office in the household, fleet, forts, army;
 That if the Queen should die without a child,
 The bond between the kingdoms be dissolved;
 That Philip should not mix us any way
 With his French wars--
 
 SECOND MEMBER. Ay, ay, but what security,
 Good sir, for this, if Philip----
 
 THIRD MEMBER. Peace--the Queen, Philip, and Pole.
                                    [_All rise, and stand_.
 
     _Enter_ MARY, PHILIP, _and_ POLE.
 
     [GARDINER _conducts them to the three chairs of state_.
     PHILIP _sits on the_ QUEEN'S _left_, POLE _on her right_.
 
 GARDINER. Our short-lived sun, before his winter plunge,
 Laughs at the last red leaf, and Andrew's Day.
 
 MARY. Should not this day be held in after years
 More solemn than of old?
 
 PHILIP.                  Madam, my wish
 Echoes your Majesty's.
 
 POLE.                  It shall be so.
 
 GARDINER. Mine echoes both your Graces'; (_aside_) but the Pope--
 Can we not have the Catholic church as well
 Without as with the Italian? if we cannot,
 Why then the Pope.
                    My lords of the upper house,
 And ye, my masters, of the lower house,
 Do ye stand fast by that which ye resolved?
 
 VOICES. We do.
 
 GARDINER. And be you all one mind to supplicate
 The Legate here for pardon, and acknowledge
 The primacy of the Pope?
 
 VOICES.                  We are all one mind.
 
 GARDINER. Then must I play the vassal to this Pole.    [_Aside_.
 
     [_He draws a paper from under his robes and
     presents it to the_ KING _and_ QUEEN, _who look
     through it and return it to him; then ascends
     a tribune, and reads_.
 
 We, the Lords Spiritual and Temporal,
 And Commons here in Parliament assembled,
 Presenting the whole body of this realm
 Of England, and dominions of the same,
 Do make most humble suit unto your Majesties,
 In our own name and that of all the state,
 That by your gracious means and intercession
 Our supplication be exhibited
 To the Lord Cardinal Pole, sent here as Legate
 From our most Holy Father Julius, Pope,
 And from the Apostolic see of Rome;
 And do declare our penitence and grief
 For our long schism and disobedience,
 Either in making laws and ordinances
 Against the Holy Father's primacy,
 Or else by doing or by speaking aught
 Which might impugn or prejudice the same;
 By this our supplication promising,
 As well for our own selves as all the realm,
 That now we be and ever shall be quick,
 Under and with your Majesties' authorities,
 To do to the utmost all that in us lies
 Towards the abrogation and repeal
 Of all such laws and ordinances made;
 Whereon we humbly pray your Majesties,
 As persons undefiled with our offence,
 So to set forth this humble suit of ours
 That we the rather by your intercession
 May from the Apostolic see obtain,
 Thro' this most reverend Father, absolution,
 And full release from danger of all censures
 Of Holy Church that we be fall'n into,
 So that we may, as children penitent,
 Be once again received into the bosom
 And unity of Universal Church;
 And that this noble realm thro' after years
 May in this unity and obedience
 Unto the holy see and reigning Pope
 Serve God and both your Majesties.
 
 VOICES. Amen.
                  [_All sit.
 
     [He again presents the petition to the_ KING _and_
     QUEEN, _who hand it reverentially to_ POLE.
 
 POLE (_sitting_). This is the loveliest day that ever smiled
 On England. All her breath should, incenselike,
 Rise to the heavens in grateful praise of Him
 Who now recalls her to His ancient fold.
 Lo! once again God to this realm hath given
 A token of His more especial Grace;
 For as this people were the first of all
 The islands call'd into the dawning church
 Out of the dead, deep night of heathendom,
 So now are these the first whom God hath given
 Grace to repent and sorrow for their schism;
 And if your penitence be not mockery,
 Oh how the blessed angels who rejoice
 Over one saved do triumph at this hour
 In the reborn salvation of a land
 So noble.    [_A pause_.
           For ourselves we do protest
 That our commission is to heal, not harm;
 We come not to condemn, but reconcile;
 We come not to compel, but call again;
 We come not to destroy, but edify;
 Nor yet to question things already done;
 These are forgiven--matters of the past--
 And range with jetsam and with offal thrown
 Into the blind sea of forgetfulness.    [_A pause_.
 Ye have reversed the attainder laid on us
 By him who sack'd the house of God; and we,
 Amplier than any field on our poor earth
 Can render thanks in fruit for being sown,
 Do here and now repay you sixty-fold,
 A hundred, yea, a thousand thousand-fold,
 With heaven for earth.
 
     [_Rising and stretching forth his hands. All kneel but_
     SIR RALPH BAGENHALL, _who rises and remains standing_.
 
                        The Lord who hath redeem'd us
 With His own blood, and wash'd us from our sins,
 To purchase for Himself a stainless bride;
 He, whom the Father hath appointed Head
 Of all his church, He by His mercy absolve you!    [_A pause_.
 And we by that authority Apostolic,
 Given unto us, his Legate, by the Pope,
 Our Lord and Holy Father, Julius,
 God's Vicar and Vicegerent upon earth,
 Do here absolve you and deliver you
 And every one of you, and all the realm
 And its dominions from all heresy,
 All schism, and from all and every censure,
 Judgment, and pain accruing thereupon;
 And also we restore you to the bosom
 And unity of Universal Church.
                          [_Turning to_ GARDINER.
 Our letters of commission will declare this plainlier.
 
     [QUEEN _heard sobbing. Cries of_ Amen! Amen! _Some of the
     Members embrace one another. All but_ SIR RALPH BAGENHALL
     _pass out into the neighboring chapel, whence is heard
     the Te Deum_.
 
 BAGENHALL. We strove against the papacy from the first,
 In William's time, in our first Edward's time,
 And in my master Henry's time; but now,
 The unity of Universal Church,
 Mary would have it; and this Gardiner follows;
 The unity of Universal Hell,
 Philip would have it; and this Gardiner follows!
 A Parliament of imitative apes!
 Sheep at the gap which Gardiner takes, who not
 Believes the Pope, nor any of them believe--
 These spaniel-Spaniard English of the time,
 Who rub their fawning noses in the dust,
 For that is Philip's gold-dust, and adore
 This Vicar of their Vicar. Would I had been
 Born Spaniard! I had held my head up then.
 I am ashamed that I am Bagenhall,
 English.
 
     _Enter_ OFFICER.
 
 OFFICER. Sir Ralph Bagenhall!
 
 BAGENHALL.                    What of that?
 
 OFFICER. You were the one sole man in either house
 Who stood upright when both the houses fell.
 
 BAGENHALL. The houses fell!
 
 OFFICER.                    I mean the houses knelt
 Before the Legate.
 
 BAGENHALL.         Do not scrimp your phrase,
 But stretch it wider; say when England fell.
 
 OFFICER. I say you were the one sole man who stood.
 
 BAGENHALL. I am the one sole man in either house,
 Perchance in England, loves her like a son.
 
 OFFICER. Well, you one man, because you stood upright,
 Her Grace the Queen commands you to the Tower.
 
 BAGENHALL. As traitor, or as heretic, or for what?
 
 OFFICER. If any man in any way would be
 The one man, he shall be so to his cost.
 
 BAGENHALL. What! will she have my head?
 
 OFFICER.                                A round fine likelier.
 Your pardon.    [_Calling to_ ATTENDANT.
              By the river to the Tower.
 
                                     [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.--WHITEHALL. A ROOM IN THE PALACE.
 MARY, GARDINER, POLE, PAGET, BONNER, _etc_.
 
 
 MARY. The King and I, my Lords, now that all traitors
 Against our royal state have lost the heads
 Wherewith they plotted in their treasonous malice,
 Have talk'd together, and are well agreed
 That those old statutes touching Lollardism
 To bring the heretic to the stake, should be
 No longer a dead letter, but requicken'd.
 
 ONE OF THE COUNCIL. Why, what hath fluster'd Gardiner? how he rubs
 His forelock!
 
 PAGET.        I have changed a word with him
 In coming, and may change a word again.
 
 GARDINER. Madam, your Highness is our sun, the King
 And you together our two suns in one;
 And so the beams of both may shine upon us,
 The faith that seem'd to droop will feel your light,
 Lift head, and flourish; yet not light alone,
 There must be heat--there must be heat enough
 To scorch and wither heresy to the root.
 For what saith Christ? 'Compel them to come in.'
 And what saith Paul? 'I would they were cut off
 That trouble you.' Let the dead letter live!
 Trace it in fire, that all the louts to whom
 Their A B C is darkness, clowns and grooms
 May read it! so you quash rebellion too,
 For heretic and traitor are all one:
 Two vipers of one breed--an amphisbaena,
 Each end a sting: Let the dead letter burn!
 
 PAGET. Yet there be some disloyal Catholics,
 And many heretics loyal; heretic throats
 Cried no God-bless-her to the Lady Jane,
 But shouted in Queen Mary. So there be
 Some traitor-heretic, there is axe and cord.
 To take the lives of others that are loyal,
 And by the churchman's pitiless doom of fire,
 Were but a thankless policy in the crown,
 Ay, and against itself; for there are many.
 
 MARY. If we could burn out heresy, my Lord Paget,
 We reck not tho' we lost this crown of England--
 Ay! tho' it were ten Englands!
 
 GARDINER.                      Right, your Grace.
 Paget, you are all for this poor life of ours,
 And care but little for the life to be.
 
 PAGET. I have some time, for curiousness, my Lord
 Watch'd children playing at _their_ life to be,
 And cruel at it, killing helpless flies;
 Such is our time--all times for aught I know.
 
 GARDINER. We kill the heretics that sting the soul--
 They, with right reason, flies that prick the flesh.
 
 PAGET. They had not reach'd right reason; little children!
 They kill'd but for their pleasure and the power
 They felt in killing.
 
 GARDINER.            A spice of Satan, ha!
 Why, good! what then? granted!--we are fallen creatures;
 Look to your Bible, Paget! we are fallen.
 
 PAGET. I am but of the laity, my Lord Bishop,
 And may not read your Bible, yet I found
 One day, a wholesome scripture, 'Little children,
 Love one another.'
 
 GARDINER.          Did you find a scripture,
 'I come not to bring peace but a sword'? The sword
 Is in her Grace's hand to smite with. Paget,
 You stand up here to fight for heresy,
 You are more than guess'd at as a heretic,
 And on the steep-up track of the true faith
 Your lapses are far seen.
 
 PAGET.                    The faultless Gardiner!
 
 MARY. You brawl beyond the question; speak, Lord Legate!
 
 POLE. Indeed, I cannot follow with your Grace:
 Rather would say--the shepherd doth not kill
 The sheep that wander from his flock, but sends
 His careful dog to bring them to the fold.
 Look to the Netherlands, wherein have been
 Such holocausts of heresy! to what end?
 For yet the faith is not established there.
 
 GARDINER. The end's not come.
 
 POLE. No--nor this way will come,
 Seeing there lie two ways to every end,
 A better and a worse--the worse is here
 To persecute, because to persecute
 Makes a faith hated, and is furthermore
 No perfect witness of a perfect faith
 In him who persecutes: when men are tost
 On tides of strange opinion, and not sure
 Of their own selves, they are wroth with their own selves,
 And thence with others; then, who lights the faggot?
 Not the full faith, no, but the lurking doubt.
 Old Rome, that first made martyrs in the Church,
 Trembled for her own gods, for these were trembling--
 But when did our Rome tremble?
 
 PAGET.                         Did she not
 In Henry's time and Edward's?
 
 POLE.                         What, my Lord!
 The Church on Peter's rock? never! I have seen
 A pine in Italy that cast its shadow
 Athwart a cataract; firm stood the pine--
 The cataract shook the shadow. To my mind,
 The cataract typed the headlong plunge and fall
 Of heresy to the pit: the pine was Rome.
 You see, my Lords,
 It was the shadow of the Church that trembled;
 Your church was but the shadow of a church,
 Wanting the Papal mitre.
 
 GARDINER (_muttering_).  Here be tropes.
 
 POLE. And tropes are good to clothe a naked truth,
 And make it look more seemly.
 
 GARDINER.                     Tropes again!
 
 POLE. You are hard to please. Then without tropes, my Lord,
 An overmuch severeness, I repeat,
 When faith is wavering makes the waverer pass
 Into more settled hatred of the doctrines
 Of those who rule, which hatred by and by
 Involves the ruler (thus there springs to light
 That Centaur of a monstrous Commonweal,
 The traitor-heretic) then tho' some may quail,
 Yet others are that dare the stake and fire,
 And their strong torment bravely borne, begets
 An admiration and an indignation,
 And hot desire to imitate; so the plague
 Of schism spreads; were there but three or four
 Of these misleaders, yet I would not say
 Burn! and we cannot burn whole towns; they are many,
 As my Lord Paget says.
 
 GARDINER.              Yet my Lord Cardinal--
 
 POLE. I am your Legate; please you let me finish.
 Methinks that under our Queen's regimen
 We might go softlier than with crimson rowel
 And streaming lash. When Herod-Henry first
 Began to batter at your English Church,
 This was the cause, and hence the judgment on her.
 She seethed with such adulteries, and the lives
 Of many among your churchmen were so foul
 That heaven wept and earth blush'd. I would advise
 That we should thoroughly cleanse the Church within
 Before these bitter statutes be requicken'd.
 So after that when she once more is seen
 White as the light, the spotless bride of Christ,
 Like Christ himself on Tabor, possibly
 The Lutheran may be won to her again;
 Till when, my Lords, I counsel tolerance.
 
 GARDINER. What, if a mad dog bit your hand, my Lord,
 Would you not chop the bitten finger off,
 Lest your whole body should madden with the poison?
 I would not, were I Queen, tolerate the heretic,
 No, not an hour. The ruler of a land
 Is bounden by his power and place to see
 His people be not poison'd. Tolerate them!
 Why? do they tolerate you? Nay, many of them
 Would burn--have burnt each other; call they not
 The one true faith, a loathsome idol-worship?
 Beware, Lord Legate, of a heavier crime
 Than heresy is itself; beware, I say,
 Lest men accuse you of indifference
 To all faiths, all religion; for you know
 Right well that you yourself have been supposed
 Tainted with Lutheranism in Italy.
 
 POLE (_angered_). But you, my Lord, beyond all supposition,
 In clear and open day were congruent
 With that vile Cranmer in the accursed lie
 Of good Queen Catherine's divorce--the spring
 Of all those evils that have flow'd upon us;
 For you yourself have truckled to the tyrant,
 And done your best to bastardise our Queen,
 For which God's righteous judgment fell upon you
 In your five years of imprisonment, my Lord,
 Under young Edward. Who so bolster'd up
 The gross King's headship of the Church, or more
 Denied the Holy Father!
 
 GARDINER.               Ha! what! eh?
 But you, my Lord, a polish'd gentleman,
 A bookman, flying from the heat and tussle,
 You lived among your vines and oranges,
 In your soft Italy yonder! You were sent for.
 You were appeal'd to, but you still preferr'd
 Your learned leisure. As for what I did
 I suffer'd and repented. You, Lord Legate
 And Cardinal-Deacon, have not now to learn
 That ev'n St. Peter in his time of fear
 Denied his Master, ay, and thrice, my Lord.
 
 POLE. But not for five-and-twenty years, my Lord.
 
 GARDINER. Ha! good! it seems then I was summon'd hither
 But to be mock'd and baited. Speak, friend Bonner,
 And tell this learned Legate he lacks zeal.
 The Church's evil is not as the King's,
 Cannot be heal'd by stroking. The mad bite
 Must have the cautery--tell him--and at once.
 What would'st thou do hadst thou his power, thou
 That layest so long in heretic bonds with me;
 Would'st thou not burn and blast them root and branch?
 
 BONNER. Ay, after you, my Lord.
 
 GARDINER.                       Nay, God's passion, before me! speak'
 
 BONNER. I am on fire until I see them flame.
 
 GARDINER. Ay, the psalm-singing weavers, cobblers, scum--
 But this most noble prince Plantagenet,
 Our good Queen's cousin--dallying over seas
 Even when his brother's, nay, his noble mother's,
 Head fell--
 
 POLE.      Peace, madman!
 Thou stirrest up a grief thou canst not fathom.
 Thou Christian Bishop, thou Lord Chancellor
 Of England! no more rein upon thine anger
 Than any child! Thou mak'st me much ashamed
 That I was for a moment wroth at thee.
 
 MARY. I come for counsel and ye give me feuds,
 Like dogs that set to watch their master's gate,
 Fall, when the thief is ev'n within the walls,
 To worrying one another. My Lord Chancellor,
 You have an old trick of offending us;
 And but that you are art and part with us
 In purging heresy, well we might, for this
 Your violence and much roughness to the Legate,
 Have shut you from our counsels. Cousin Pole,
 You are fresh from brighter lands. Retire with me.
 His Highness and myself (so you allow us)
 Will let you learn in peace and privacy
 What power this cooler sun of England hath
 In breeding godless vermin. And pray Heaven
 That you may see according to our sight.
 Come, cousin.
                  [_Exeunt_ QUEEN _and_ POLE, _etc_.
 
 GARDINER. Pole has the Plantagenet face,
 But not the force made them our mightiest kings.
 Fine eyes--but melancholy, irresolute--
 A fine beard, Bonner, a very full fine beard.
 But a weak mouth, an indeterminate--ha?
 
 BONNER. Well, a weak mouth, perchance.
 
 GARDINER.                              And not like thine
 To gorge a heretic whole, roasted or raw.
 
 BONNER. I'd do my best, my Lord; but yet the Legate
 Is here as Pope and Master of the Church,
 And if he go not with you--
 
 GARDINER.                  Tut, Master Bishop,
 Our bashful Legate, saw'st not how he flush'd?
 Touch him upon his old heretical talk,
 He'll burn a diocese to prove his orthodoxy.
 And let him call me truckler. In those times,
 Thou knowest we had to dodge, or duck, or die;
 I kept my head for use of Holy Church;
 And see you, we shall have to dodge again,
 And let the Pope trample our rights, and plunge
 His foreign fist into our island Church
 To plump the leaner pouch of Italy.
 For a time, for a time.
 Why? that these statutes may be put in force,
 And that his fan may thoroughly purge his floor.
 
 BONNER. So then you hold the Pope--
 
 GARDINER.                          I hold the Pope!
 What do I hold him? what do I hold the Pope?
 Come, come, the morsel stuck--this Cardinal's fault--
 I have gulpt it down. I am wholly for the Pope,
 Utterly and altogether for the Pope,
 The Eternal Peter of the changeless chair,
 Crown'd slave of slaves, and mitred king of kings,
 God upon earth! what more? what would you have?
 Hence, let's be gone.
 
     _Enter_ USHER.
 
 USHER.                Well that you be not gone,
 My Lord. The Queen, most wroth at first with you,
 Is now content to grant you full forgiveness,
 So that you crave full pardon of the Legate.
 I am sent to fetch you.
 
 GARDINER.               Doth Pole yield, sir, ha!
 Did you hear 'em? were you by?
 
 USHER.                         I cannot tell you,
 His bearing is so courtly-delicate;
 And yet methinks he falters: their two Graces
 Do so dear-cousin and royal-cousin him,
 So press on him the duty which as Legate
 He owes himself, and with such royal smiles--
 
 GARDINER. Smiles that burn men. Bonner, it will be carried.
 He falters, ha? 'fore God, we change and change;
 Men now are bow'd and old, the doctors tell you,
 At three-score years; then if we change at all
 We needs must do it quickly; it is an age
 Of brief life, and brief purpose, and brief patience,
 As I have shown to-day. I am sorry for it
 If Pole be like to turn. Our old friend Cranmer,
 Your more especial love, hath turn'd so often,
 He knows not where he stands, which, if this pass,
 We two shall have to teach him; let 'em look to it,
 Cranmer and Hooper, Ridley and Latimer,
 Rogers and Ferrar, for their time is come,
 Their hour is hard at hand, their 'dies Irae'
 Their 'dies Illa,' which will test their sect.
 I feel it but a duty--you will find in it
 Pleasure as well as duty, worthy Bonner,--
 To test their sect. Sir, I attend the Queen
 To crave most humble pardon--of her most
 Royal, Infallible, Papal Legate-cousin.
 
                                   [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE V.--WOODSTOCK.
 
 ELIZABETH, LADY IN WAITING.
 
 
 ELIZABETH. So they have sent poor Courtenay over sea.
 
 LADY. And banish'd us to Woodstock, and the fields.
 The colours of our Queen are green and white,
 These fields are only green, they make me gape.
 
 ELIZABETH. There's whitethorn, girl.
 
   LADY. Ay, for an hour in May.
 But court is always May, buds out in masques,
 Breaks into feather'd merriments, and flowers
 In silken pageants. Why do they keep us here?
 Why still suspect your Grace?
 
 ELIZABETH.                    Hard upon both.
     [_Writes on the window with a diamond_.
 
     Much suspected, of me
     Nothing proven can be.
           Quoth Elizabeth, prisoner.
 
 LADY. What hath your Highness written?
 
 ELIZABETH.                             A true rhyme.
 
 LADY. Cut with a diamond; so to last like truth.
 
 ELIZABETH. Ay, if truth last.
 
 LADY.                         But truth, they say, will out,
 So it must last. It is not like a word,
 That comes and goes in uttering.
 
 ELIZABETH.                       Truth, a word!
 The very Truth and very Word are one.
 But truth of story, which I glanced at, girl,
 Is like a word that comes from olden days,
 And passes thro' the peoples: every tongue
 Alters it passing, till it spells and speaks
 Quite other than at first.
 
 LADY.                      I do not follow.
 
 ELIZABETH. How many names in the long sweep of time
 That so foreshortens greatness, may but hang
 On the chance mention of some fool that once
 Brake bread with us, perhaps: and my poor chronicle
 Is but of glass. Sir Henry Bedingfield
 May split it for a spite.
 
 LADY.                     God grant it last,
 And witness to your Grace's innocence,
 Till doomsday melt it.
 
 ELIZABETH.             Or a second fire,
 Like that which lately crackled underfoot
 And in this very chamber, fuse the glass,
 And char us back again into the dust
 We spring from. Never peacock against rain
 Scream'd as you did for water.
 
 LADY.                          And I got it.
 I woke Sir Henry--and he's true to you
 I read his honest horror in his eyes.
 
 ELIZABETH. Or true to you?
 
 LADY.                      Sir Henry Bedingfield!
 I will have no man true to me, your Grace,
 But one that pares his nails; to me? the clown!
 
 ELIZABETH. Out, girl! you wrong a noble gentleman.
 
 LADY. For, like his cloak, his manners want the nap
 And gloss of court; but of this fire he says.
 Nay swears, it was no wicked wilfulness,
 Only a natural chance.
 
 ELIZABETH.             A chance--perchance
 One of those wicked wilfuls that men make,
 Nor shame to call it nature. Nay, I know
 They hunt my blood. Save for my daily range
 Among the pleasant fields of Holy Writ
 I might despair. But there hath some one come;
 The house is all in movement. Hence, and see.
 
                                      [_Exit_ LADY.
 
 MILKMAID (_singing without_).
 
     Shame upon you, Robin,
         Shame upon you now!
     Kiss me would you? with my hands
         Milking the cow?
         Daisies grow again,
         Kingcups blow again,
     And you came and kiss'd me milking the cow.
 
     Robin came behind me,
         Kiss'd me well I vow;
     Cuff him could I? with my hands
         Milking the cow?
         Swallows fly again,
         Cuckoos cry again,
     And you came and kiss'd me milking the cow.
 
     Come, Robin, Robin,
         Come and kiss me now;
     Help it can I? with my hands
         Milking the cow?
         Ringdoves coo again,
         All things woo again.
     Come behind and kiss me milking the cow!
 
 ELIZABETH. Right honest and red-cheek'd; Robin was violent,
 And she was crafty--a sweet violence,
 And a sweet craft. I would I were a milkmaid,
 To sing, love, marry, churn, brew, bake, and die,
 Then have my simple headstone by the church,
 And all things lived and ended honestly.
 I could not if I would. I am Harry's daughter:
 Gardiner would have my head. They are not sweet,
 The violence and the craft that do divide
 The world of nature; what is weak must lie;
 The lion needs but roar to guard his young;
 The lapwing lies, says 'here' when they are there.
 Threaten the child; 'I'll scourge you if you did it:'
 What weapon hath the child, save his soft tongue,
 To say 'I did not?' and my rod's the block.
 I never lay my head upon the pillow
 But that I think, 'Wilt thou lie there to-morrow?'
 How oft the falling axe, that never fell,
 Hath shock'd me back into the daylight truth
 That it may fall to-day! Those damp, black, dead
 Nights in the Tower; dead--with the fear of death
 Too dead ev'n for a death-watch! Toll of a bell,
 Stroke of a clock, the scurrying of a rat
 Affrighted me, and then delighted me,
 For there was life--And there was life in death--
 The little murder'd princes, in a pale light,
 Rose hand in hand, and whisper'd, 'come away!
 The civil wars are gone for evermore:
 Thou last of all the Tudors, come away!
 With us is peace!' The last? It was a dream;
 I must not dream, not wink, but watch. She has gone,
 Maid Marian to her Robin--by and by
 Both happy! a fox may filch a hen by night,
 And make a morning outcry in the yard;
 But there's no Renard here to 'catch her tripping.'
 Catch me who can; yet, sometime I have wish'd
 That I were caught, and kill'd away at once
 Out of the flutter. The gray rogue, Gardiner,
 Went on his knees, and pray'd me to confess
 In Wyatt's business, and to cast myself
 Upon the good Queen's mercy; ay, when, my Lord?
 God save the Queen! My jailor--
 
     _Enter_ SIR HENRY BEDINGFIELD.
 
 BEDINGFIELD. One, whose bolts,
 That jail you from free life, bar you from death.
 There haunt some Papist ruffians hereabout
 Would murder you.
 
 ELIZABETH.        I thank you heartily, sir,
 But I am royal, tho' your prisoner,
 And God hath blest or cursed me with a nose--
 Your boots are from the horses.
 
 BEDINGFIELD.                    Ay, my Lady.
 When next there comes a missive from the Queen
 It shall be all my study for one hour
 To rose and lavender my horsiness,
 Before I dare to glance upon your Grace.
 
 ELIZABETH. A missive from the Queen: last time she wrote,
 I had like to have lost my life: it takes my breath:
 O God, sir, do you look upon your boots,
 Are you so small a man? Help me: what think you,
 Is it life or death.
 
 BEDINGFIELD.         I thought not on my boots;
 The devil take all boots were ever made
 Since man went barefoot. See, I lay it here,
 For I will come no nearer to your Grace;
 
     [_Laying down the letter_.
 
 And, whether it bring you bitter news or sweet,
 And God hath given your Grace a nose, or not,
 I'll help you, if I may.
 
 ELIZABETH.               Your pardon, then;
 It is the heat and narrowness of the cage
 That makes the captive testy; with free wing
 The world were all one Araby. Leave me now,
 Will you, companion to myself, sir?
 
 BEDINGFIELD.                        Will I?
 With most exceeding willingness, I will;
 You know I never come till I be call'd.
                                     [_Exit_.
 
 ELIZABETH. It lies there folded: is there venom in it?
 A snake--and if I touch it, it may sting.
 Come, come, the worst!
 Best wisdom is to know the worst at once.    [_Reads:_
 
 'It is the King's wish, that you should wed Prince Philibert of Savoy.
 You are to come to Court on the instant; and think of this in your
 coming.    'MARY THE QUEEN.'
 
 Think I have many thoughts;
 I think there may be birdlime here for me;
 I think they fain would have me from the realm;
 I think the Queen may never bear a child;
 I think that I may be some time the Queen,
 Then, Queen indeed: no foreign prince or priest
 Should fill my throne, myself upon the steps.
 I think I will not marry anyone,
 Specially not this landless Philibert
 Of Savoy; but, if Philip menace me,
 I think that I will play with Philibert,
 As once the Holy Father did with mine,
 Before my father married my good mother,--
 For fear of Spain.
 
     _Enter_ LADY.
 
 LADY.             O Lord! your Grace, your Grace,
 I feel so happy: it seems that we shall fly
 These bald, blank fields, and dance into the sun
 That shines on princes.
 
 ELIZABETH.              Yet, a moment since,
 I wish'd myself the milkmaid singing here,
 To kiss and cuff among the birds and flowers--
 A right rough life and healthful.
 
 LADY.                             But the wench
 Hath her own troubles; she is weeping now;
 For the wrong Robin took her at her word.
 Then the cow kick'd, and all her milk was spilt.
 Your Highness such a milkmaid?
 
 ELIZABETH.                     I had kept
 My Robins and my cows in sweeter order
 Had I been such.
 
 LADY (_slyly_).  And had your Grace a Robin?
 
 ELIZABETH. Come, come, you are chill here; you want the sun
 That shines at court; make ready for the journey.
 Pray God, we 'scape the sunstroke. Ready at once.
 
                                           [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE VI.--LONDON. A ROOM IN THE PALACE.
 
 LORD PETRE _and_ LORD WILLIAM HOWARD.
 
 
 PETRE. You cannot see the Queen. Renard denied her,
 Ev'n now to me.
 
 HOWARD.         Their Flemish go-between
 And all-in-all. I came to thank her Majesty
 For freeing my friend Bagenhall from the Tower;
 A grace to me! Mercy, that herb-of-grace,
 Flowers now but seldom.
 
 PETRE.                  Only now perhaps.
 Because the Queen hath been three days in tears
 For Philip's going--like the wild hedge-rose
 Of a soft winter, possible, not probable,
 However you have prov'n it.
 
 HOWARD.                     I must see her.
 
     _Enter_ RENARD.
 
 RENARD. My Lords, you cannot see her Majesty.
 
 HOWARD. Why then the King! for I would have him bring it
 Home to the leisure wisdom of his Queen,
 Before he go, that since these statutes past,
 Gardiner out-Gardiners Gardiner in his heat,
 Bonner cannot out-Bonner his own self--
 Beast!--but they play with fire as children do,
 And burn the house. I know that these are breeding
 A fierce resolve and fixt heart-hate in men
 Against the King, the Queen, the Holy Father,
 The faith itself. Can I not see him?
 
 RENARD.                              Not now.
 And in all this, my Lord, her Majesty
 Is flint of flint, you may strike fire from her,
 Not hope to melt her. I will give your message.
 
                           [_Exeunt_ PETRE _and_ HOWARD.
 
     _Enter_ PHILIP _(musing)_
 
 PHILIP. She will not have Prince Philibert of Savoy,
 I talk'd with her in vain--says she will live
 And die true maid--a goodly creature too.
 Would _she_ had been the Queen! yet she must have him;
 She troubles England: that she breathes in England
 Is life and lungs to every rebel birth
 That passes out of embryo.
                            Simon Renard!
 This Howard, whom they fear, what was he saying?
 
 RENARD. What your imperial father said, my liege,
 To deal with heresy gentlier. Gardiner burns,
 And Bonner burns; and it would seem this people
 Care more for our brief life in their wet land,
 Than yours in happier Spain. I told my Lord
 He should not vex her Highness; she would say
 These are the means God works with, that His church
 May flourish.
 
 PHILIP.       Ay, sir, but in statesmanship
 To strike too soon is oft to miss the blow.
 Thou knowest I bad my chaplain, Castro, preach
 Against these burnings.
 
 RENARD.                 And the Emperor
 Approved you, and when last he wrote, declared
 His comfort in your Grace that you were bland
 And affable to men of all estates,
 In hope to charm them from their hate of Spain.
 
 PHILIP. In hope to crush all heresy under Spain.
 But, Renard, I am sicker staying here
 Than any sea could make me passing hence,
 Tho' I be ever deadly sick at sea.
 So sick am I with biding for this child.
 Is it the fashion in this clime for women
 To go twelve months in bearing of a child?
 The nurses yawn'd, the cradle gaped, they led
 Processions, chanted litanies, clash'd their bells,
 Shot off their lying cannon, and her priests
 Have preach'd, the fools, of this fair prince to come;
 Till, by St. James, I find myself the fool.
 Why do you lift your eyebrow at me thus?
 
 RENARD. I never saw your Highness moved till now.
 
 PHILIP. So weary am I of this wet land of theirs,
 And every soul of man that breathes therein.
 
 RENARD. My liege, we must not drop the mask before
 The masquerade is over--
 
 PHILIP.                 --Have I dropt it?
 I have but shown a loathing face to you,
 Who knew it from the first.
 
     _Enter_ MARY.
 
 MARY (_aside_).             With Renard. Still
 Parleying with Renard, all the day with Renard,
 And scarce a greeting all the day for me--
 And goes to-morrow.
                        [_Exit_ MARY.
 
 PHILIP (_to_ RENARD, _who advances to him_).
                     Well, sir, is there more?
 
 RENARD (_who has perceived the QUEEN_).
 May Simon Renard speak a single word?
 
 PHILIP. Ay.
 
 RENARD.     And be forgiven for it?
 
 PHILIP.                             Simon Renard
 Knows me too well to speak a single word
 That could not be forgiven.
 
 RENARD.                     Well, my liege,
 Your Grace hath a most chaste and loving wife.
 
 PHILIP. Why not? The Queen of Philip should be chaste.
 
 RENARD. Ay, but, my Lord, you know what Virgil sings,
 Woman is various and most mutable.
 
 PHILIP. She play the harlot! never.
 
 RENARD.                             No, sire, no,
 Not dream'd of by the rabidest gospeller.
 There was a paper thrown into the palace,
 'The King hath wearied of his barren bride.'
 She came upon it, read it, and then rent it,
 With all the rage of one who hates a truth
 He cannot but allow. Sire, I would have you--
 What should I say, I cannot pick my words--
 Be somewhat less--majestic to your Queen.
 
 PHILIP. Am I to change my manners, Simon Renard,
 Because these islanders are brutal beasts?
 Or would you have me turn a sonneteer,
 And warble those brief-sighted eyes of hers?
 
 RENARD. Brief-sighted tho' they be, I have seen them, sire,
 When you perchance were trifling royally
 With some fair dame of court, suddenly fill
 With such fierce fire--had it been fire indeed
 It would have burnt both speakers.
 
 PHILIP.                            Ay, and then?
 
 RENARD. Sire, might it not be policy in some matter
 Of small importance now and then to cede
 A point to her demand?
 
 PHILIP.                Well, I am going.
 
 RENARD. For should her love when you are gone, my liege,
 Witness these papers, there will not be wanting
 Those that will urge her injury--should her love--
 And I have known such women more than one--
 Veer to the counterpoint, and jealousy
 Hath in it an alchemic force to fuse
 Almost into one metal love and hate,--
 And she impress her wrongs upon her Council,
 And these again upon her Parliament--
 We are not loved here, and would be then perhaps
 Not so well holpen in our wars with France,
 As else we might be--here she comes.
 
     _Enter_ MARY.
 
 MARY.                                O Philip!
 Nay, must you go indeed?
 
 PHILIP.                  Madam, I must.
 
 MARY. The parting of a husband and a wife
 Is like the cleaving of a heart; one half
 Will flutter here, one there.
 
 PHILIP.                       You say true, Madam.
 
 MARY. The Holy Virgin will not have me yet
 Lose the sweet hope that I may bear a prince.
 If such a prince were born and you not here!
 
 PHILIP. I should be here if such a prince were born.
 
 MARY. But must you go?
 
 PHILIP.                Madam, you know my father,
 Retiring into cloistral solitude
 To yield the remnant of his years to heaven,
 Will shift the yoke and weight of all the world
 From off his neck to mine. We meet at Brussels.
 But since mine absence will not be for long,
 Your Majesty shall go to Dover with me,
 And wait my coming back.
 
 MARY.                    To Dover? no,
 I am too feeble. I will go to Greenwich,
 So you will have me with you; and there watch
 All that is gracious in the breath of heaven
 Draw with your sails from our poor land, and pass
 And leave me, Philip, with my prayers for you.
 
 PHILIP. And doubtless I shall profit by your prayers.
 
 MARY. Methinks that would you tarry one day more
 (The news was sudden) I could mould myself
 To bear your going better; will you do it?
 
 PHILIP. Madam, a day may sink or save a realm.
 
 MARY. A day may save a heart from breaking too.
 
 PHILIP. Well, Simon Renard, shall we stop a day?
 
 RENARD. Your Grace's business will not suffer, sire,
 For one day more, so far as I can tell.
 
 PHILIP. Then one day more to please her Majesty.
 
 MARY. The sunshine sweeps across my life again.
 O if I knew you felt this parting, Philip,
 As I do!
 
 PHILIP.  By St. James I do protest,
 Upon the faith and honour of a Spaniard,
 I am vastly grieved to leave your Majesty.
 Simon, is supper ready?
 
 RENARD.                 Ay, my liege,
 I saw the covers laying.
 
 PHILIP.                  Let us have it.
 
                                    [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV.
 
 
 SCENE I.--A ROOM IN THE PALACE.
 
 MARY, CARDINAL POLE.
 
 
 MARY. What have you there?
 
 POLE.                      So please your Majesty,
 A long petition from the foreign exiles
 To spare the life of Cranmer. Bishop Thirlby,
 And my Lord Paget and Lord William Howard,
 Crave, in the same cause, hearing of your Grace.
 Hath he not written himself--infatuated--
 To sue you for his life?
 
 MARY.                    His life? Oh, no;
 Not sued for that--he knows it were in vain.
 But so much of the anti-papal leaven
 Works in him yet, he hath pray'd me not to sully
 Mine own prerogative, and degrade the realm
 By seeking justice at a stranger's hand
 Against my natural subject. King and Queen,
 To whom he owes his loyalty after God,
 Shall these accuse him to a foreign prince?
 Death would not grieve him more. I cannot be
 True to this realm of England and the Pope
 Together, says the heretic.
 
 POLE.                       And there errs;
 As he hath ever err'd thro' vanity.
 A secular kingdom is but as the body
 Lacking a soul; and in itself a beast.
 The Holy Father in a secular kingdom
 Is as the soul descending out of heaven
 Into a body generate.
 
 MARY.                 Write to him, then.
 
 POLE. I will.
 
 MARY.         And sharply, Pole.
 
 POLE.                            Here come the Cranmerites!
 
     _Enter_ THIRLBY, LORD PAGET, LORD WILLIAM HOWARD.
 
 HOWARD. Health to your Grace! Good morrow, my Lord Cardinal;
 We make our humble prayer unto your Grace
 That Cranmer may withdraw to foreign parts,
 Or into private life within the realm.
 In several bills and declarations, Madam,
 He hath recanted all his heresies.
 
 PAGET. Ay, ay; if Bonner have not forged the bills.    [_Aside_.
 
 MARY. Did not More die, and Fisher? he must burn.
 
 HOWARD. He hath recanted, Madam.
 
 MARY.                            The better for him.
 He burns in Purgatory, not in Hell.
 
 HOWARD. Ay, ay, your Grace; but it was never seen
 That any one recanting thus at full,
 As Cranmer hath, came to the fire on earth.
 
 MARY. It will be seen now, then.
 
 THIRLBY.                         O Madam, Madam!
 I thus implore you, low upon my knees,
 To reach the hand of mercy to my friend.
 I have err'd with him; with him I have recanted.
 What human reason is there why my friend
 Should meet with lesser mercy than myself?
 
 MARY. My Lord of Ely, this. After a riot
 We hang the leaders, let their following go.
 Cranmer is head and father of these heresies,
 New learning as they call it; yea, may God
 Forget me at most need when I forget
 Her foul divorce--my sainted mother--No!--
 
 HOWARD. Ay, ay, but mighty doctors doubted there.
 The Pope himself waver'd; and more than one
 Row'd in that galley--Gardiner to wit,
 Whom truly I deny not to have been
 Your faithful friend and trusty councillor.
 Hath not your Highness ever read his book.
 His tractate upon True Obedience,
 Writ by himself and Bonner?
 
 MARY.                       I will take
 Such order with all bad, heretical books
 That none shall hold them in his house and live,
 Henceforward. No, my Lord.
 
 HOWARD.                    Then never read it.
 The truth is here. Your father was a man
 Of such colossal kinghood, yet so courteous,
 Except when wroth, you scarce could meet his eye
 And hold your own; and were he wroth indeed,
 You held it less, or not at all. I say,
 Your father had a will that beat men down;
 Your father had a brain that beat men down--
 
 POLE. Not me, my Lord.
 
 HOWARD.                No, for you were not here;
 You sit upon this fallen Cranmer's throne;
 And it would more become you, my Lord Legate,
 To join a voice, so potent with her Highness,
 To ours in plea for Cranmer than to stand
 On naked self-assertion.
 
 MARY.                    All your voices
 Are waves on flint. The heretic must burn.
 
 HOWARD. Yet once he saved your Majesty's own life;
 Stood out against the King in your behalf.
 At his own peril.
 
 MARY.             I know not if he did;
 And if he did I care not, my Lord Howard.
 My life is not so happy, no such boon,
 That I should spare to take a heretic priest's,
 Who saved it or not saved. Why do you vex me?
 
 PAGET. Yet to save Cranmer were to serve the Church,
 Your Majesty's I mean; he is effaced,
 Self-blotted out; so wounded in his honour,
 He can but creep down into some dark hole
 Like a hurt beast, and hide himself and die;
 But if you burn him,--well, your Highness knows
 The saying, 'Martyr's blood--seed of the Church.'
 
 MARY. Of the true Church; but his is none, nor will be.
 You are too politic for me, my Lord Paget.
 And if he have to live so loath'd a life,
 It were more merciful to burn him now.
 
 THIRLBY. O yet relent. O, Madam, if you knew him
 As I do, ever gentle, and so gracious,
 With all his learning--
 
 MARY.                  Yet a heretic still.
 His learning makes his burning the more just.
 
 THIRLBY. So worshipt of all those that came across him;
 The stranger at his hearth, and all his house--
 
 MARY. His children and his concubine, belike.
 
 THIRLBY. To do him any wrong was to beget
 A kindness from him, for his heart was rich,
 Of such fine mould, that if you sow'd therein
 The seed of Hate, it blossom'd Charity.
 
 POLE. 'After his kind it costs him nothing,' there's
 An old world English adage to the point.
 These are but natural graces, my good Bishop,
 Which in the Catholic garden are as flowers,
 But on the heretic dunghill only weeds.
 
 HOWARD. Such weeds make dunghills gracious.
 
 MARY.                                       Enough, my Lords.
 It is God's will, the Holy Father's will,
 And Philip's will, and mine, that he should burn.
 He is pronounced anathema.
 
 HOWARD.                    Farewell, Madam,
 God grant you ampler mercy at your call
 Than you have shown to Cranmer.
                                    [_Exeunt_ LORDS.
 
 POLE.                           After this,
 Your Grace will hardly care to overlook
 This same petition of the foreign exiles
 For Cranmer's life.
 
 MARY.               Make out the writ to-night.
 
                                           [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--OXFORD. CRANMER IN PRISON.
 
 
 CRANMER. Last night, I dream'd the faggots were alight,
 And that myself was fasten'd to the stake, I
 And found it all a visionary flame,
 Cool as the light in old decaying wood;
 And then King Harry look'd from out a cloud,
 And bad me have good courage; and I heard
 An angel cry 'There is more joy in Heaven,'--
 And after that, the trumpet of the dead.
                                     [_Trumpets without_.
 Why, there are trumpets blowing now: what is it?
 
     _Enter_ FATHER COLE.
 
 COLE. Cranmer, I come to question you again;
 Have you remain'd in the true Catholic faith
 I left you in?
 
 CRANMER.       In the true Catholic faith,
 By Heaven's grace, I am more and more confirm'd.
 Why are the trumpets blowing, Father Cole?
 
 COLE. Cranmer, it is decided by the Council
 That you to-day should read your recantation
 Before the people in St. Mary's Church.
 And there be many heretics in the town,
 Who loathe you for your late return to Rome,
 And might assail you passing through the street,
 And tear you piecemeal: so you have a guard.
 
 CRANMER. Or seek to rescue me. I thank the Council.
 
 COLE. Do you lack any money?
 
 CRANMER.                     Nay, why should I?
 The prison fare is good enough for me.
 
 COLE. Ay, but to give the poor.
 
 CRANMER.                        Hand it me, then!
 I thank you.
 
 COLE.        For a little space, farewell;
 Until I see you in St. Mary's Church.
                                  [_Exit_ COLE.
 
 CRANMER. It is against all precedent to burn
 One who recants; they mean to pardon me.
 To give the poor--they give the poor who die.
 Well, burn me or not burn me I am fixt;
 It is but a communion, not a mass:
 A holy supper, not a sacrifice;
 No man can make his Maker--Villa Garcia.
 
     _Enter_ VILLA GARCIA.
 
 VILLA GARCIA. Pray you write out this paper for me, Cranmer.
 
 CRANMER. Have I not writ enough to satisfy you?
 
 VILLA GARCIA. It is the last.
 
 CRANMER.                      Give it me, then.
                                            [_He writes_.
 
 VILLA GARCIA.                                   Now sign.
 
 CRANMER. I have sign'd enough, and I will sign no more.
 
 VILLA GARCIA. It is no more than what you have sign'd already,
 The public form thereof.
 
 CRANMER.                 It may be so;
 I sign it with my presence, if I read it.
 
 VILLA GARCIA. But this is idle of you. Well, sir, well,
 You are to beg the people to pray for you;
 Exhort them to a pure and virtuous life;
 Declare the Queen's right to the throne; confess
 Your faith before all hearers; and retract
 That Eucharistic doctrine in your book.
 Will you not sign it now?
 
 CRANMER.                  No, Villa Garcia,
 I sign no more. Will they have mercy on me?
 
 VILLA GARCIA. Have you good hopes of mercy!
 So, farewell.
                  [_Exit_.
 
 CRANMER. Good hopes, not theirs, have I that I am fixt,
 Fixt beyond fall; however, in strange hours,
 After the long brain-dazing colloquies,
 And thousand-times recurring argument
 Of those two friars ever in my prison,
 When left alone in my despondency,
 Without a friend, a book, my faith would seem
 Dead or half-drown'd, or else swam heavily
 Against the huge corruptions of the Church,
 Monsters of mistradition, old enough
 To scare me into dreaming, 'what am I,
 Cranmer, against whole ages?' was it so,
 Or am I slandering my most inward friend,
 To veil the fault of my most outward foe--
 The soft and tremulous coward in the flesh?
 O higher, holier, earlier, purer church,
 I have found thee and not leave thee any more.
 It is but a communion, not a mass--
 No sacrifice, but a life-giving feast!
 (_Writes_.) So, so; this will I say--thus will I pray.
                                            [_Puts up the paper_.
 
     _Enter_ BONNER.
 
 BONNER. Good day, old friend; what, you look somewhat worn;
 And yet it is a day to test your health
 Ev'n at the best: I scarce have spoken with you
 Since when?--your degradation. At your trial
 Never stood up a bolder man than you;
 You would not cap the Pope's commissioner--
 Your learning, and your stoutness, and your heresy,
 Dumbfounded half of us. So, after that,
 We had to dis-archbishop and unlord,
 And make you simple Cranmer once again.
 The common barber dipt your hair, and I
 Scraped from your finger-points the holy oil;
 And worse than all, you had to kneel to _me_;
 Which was not pleasant for you, Master Cranmer.
 Now you, that would not recognise the Pope,
 And you, that would not own the Real Presence,
 Have found a real presence in the stake,
 Which frights you back into the ancient faith:
 And so you have recanted to the Pope.
 How are the mighty fallen, Master Cranmer!
 
 CRANMER. You have been more fierce against the Pope than I;
 But why fling back the stone he strikes me with?
     [_Aside_.
 O Bonner, if I ever did you kindness--
 Power hath been given you to try faith by fire--
 Pray you, remembering how yourself have changed,
 Be somewhat pitiful, after I have gone,
 To the poor flock--to women and to children--
 That when I was archbishop held with me.
 
 BONNER. Ay--gentle as they call you--live or die!
 Pitiful to this pitiful heresy?
 I must obey the Queen and Council, man.
 Win thro' this day with honour to yourself,
 And I'll say something for you--so--good-bye.
                                          [_Exit_.
 
 CRANMER. This hard coarse man of old hath crouch'd to me
 Till I myself was half ashamed for him.
 
     _Enter_ THIRLBY.
 
 Weep not, good Thirlby.
 
 THIRLBY.                Oh, my Lord, my Lord!
 My heart is no such block as Bonner's is:
 Who would not weep?
 
 CRANMER.            Why do you so my--lord me,
 Who am disgraced?
 
 THIRLBY.          On earth; but saved in heaven
 By your recanting.
 
 CRANMER.           Will they burn me, Thirlby?
 
 THIRLBY. Alas, they will; these burnings will not help
 The purpose of the faith; but my poor voice
 Against them is a whisper to the roar
 Of a spring-tide.
 
 CRANMER.          And they will surely burn me?
 
 THIRLBY. Ay; and besides, will have you in the church
 Repeat your recantation in the ears
 Of all men, to the saving of their souls,
 Before your execution. May God help you
 Thro' that hard hour!
 
 CRANMER.              And may God bless you, Thirlby!
 Well, they shall hear my recantation there.
 
                                  [_Exit_ THIRLBY.
 
 Disgraced, dishonour'd!--not by them, indeed,
 By mine own self--by mine own hand!
 O thin-skinn'd hand and jutting veins, 'twas you
 That sign'd the burning of poor Joan of Kent;
 But then she was a witch. You have written much,
 But you were never raised to plead for Frith,
 Whose dogmas I have reach'd: he was deliver'd
 To the secular arm to burn; and there was Lambert;
 Who can foresee himself? truly these burnings,
 As Thirlby says, are profitless to the burners,
 And help the other side. You shall burn too,
 Burn first when I am burnt.
 Fire--inch by inch to die in agony! Latimer
 Had a brief end--not Ridley. Hooper burn'd
 Three-quarters of an hour. Will my faggots
 Be wet as his were? It is a day of rain.
 I will not muse upon it.
 My fancy takes the burner's part, and makes
 The fire seem even crueller than it is.
 No, I not doubt that God will give me strength,
 Albeit I have denied him.
 
     _Enter_ SOTO _and_ VILLA GARCIA.
 
 VILLA GARCIA.             We are ready
 To take you to St. Mary's, Master Cranmer.
 
 CRANMER. And I: lead on; ye loose me from my bonds.
 
                                            [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--ST. MARY'S CHURCH.
 
 COLE _in the Pulpit_, LORD WILLIAMS OF THAME _presiding_. LORD WILLIAM
 HOWARD, LORD PAGET, _and others_. CRANMER _enters between_ SOTO _and_
 VILLA GARCIA, _and the whole Choir strike up_ 'Nunc Dimittis.' CRANMER
 _is set upon a Scaffold before the people_.
 
 
 COLE. Behold him--
               [_A pause: people in the foreground_.
 
 PEOPLE. Oh, unhappy sight!
 
 FIRST PROTESTANT. See how the tears run down his fatherly face.
 
 SECOND PROTESTANT. James, didst thou ever see a carrion crow Stand
 watching a sick beast before he dies?
 
 FIRST PROTESTANT. Him perch'd up there? I wish some thunderbolt Would
 make this Cole a cinder, pulpit and all.
 
 COLE. Behold him, brethren: he hath cause to weep!--
 So have we all: weep with him if ye will,
 Yet--
 It is expedient for one man to die,
 Yea, for the people, lest the people die.
 Yet wherefore should he die that hath return'd
 To the one Catholic Universal Church,
 Repentant of his errors?
 
 PROTESTANT _murmurs_. Ay, tell us that.
 
 COLE. Those of the wrong side will despise the man,
 Deeming him one that thro' the fear of death
 Gave up his cause, except he seal his faith
 In sight of all with flaming martyrdom.
 
 CRANMER. Ay.
 
 COLE.        Ye hear him, and albeit there may seem
 According to the canons pardon due
 To him that so repents, yet are there causes
 Wherefore our Queen and Council at this time
 Adjudge him to the death. He hath been a traitor,
 A shaker and confounder of the realm;
 And when the King's divorce was sued at Rome,
 He here, this heretic metropolitan,
 As if he had been the Holy Father, sat
 And judged it. Did I call him heretic?
 A huge heresiarch! never was it known
 That any man so writing, preaching so,
 So poisoning the Church, so long continuing,
 Hath found his pardon; therefore he must die,
 For warning and example.
                          Other reasons
 There be for this man's ending, which our Queen
 And Council at this present deem it not
 Expedient to be known.
 
 PROTESTANT _murmurs_.  I warrant you.
 
 COLE. Take therefore, all, example by this man,
 For if our Holy Queen not pardon him,
 Much less shall others in like cause escape,
 That all of you, the highest as the lowest,
 May learn there is no power against the Lord.
 There stands a man, once of so high degree,
 Chief prelate of our Church, archbishop, first
 In Council, second person in the realm,
 Friend for so long time of a mighty King;
 And now ye see downfallen and debased
 From councillor to caitiff--fallen so low,
 The leprous flutterings of the byway, scum
 And offal of the city would not change
 Estates with him; in brief, so miserable,
 There is no hope of better left for him,
 No place for worse.
                     Yet, Cranmer, be thou glad.
 This is the work of God. He is glorified
 In thy conversion: lo! thou art reclaim'd;
 He brings thee home: nor fear but that to-day
 Thou shalt receive the penitent thief's award,
 And be with Christ the Lord in Paradise.
 Remember how God made the fierce fire seem
 To those three children like a pleasant dew.
 Remember, too,
 The triumph of St. Andrew on his cross,
 The patience of St. Lawrence in the fire.
 Thus, if thou call on God and all the saints,
 God will beat down the fury of the flame,
 Or give thee saintly strength to undergo.
 And for thy soul shall masses here be sung
 By every priest in Oxford. Pray for him.
 
 CRANMER. Ay, one and all, dear brothers, pray for me;
 Pray with one breath, one heart, one soul for me.
 
 COLE. And now, lest anyone among you doubt
 The man's conversion and remorse of heart,
 Yourselves shall hear him speak. Speak, Master Cranmer,
 Fulfil your promise made me, and proclaim
 Your true undoubted faith, that all may hear.
 
 CRANMER. And that I will. O God, Father of Heaven!
 O Son of God, Redeemer of the world!
 O Holy Ghost! proceeding from them both,
 Three persons and one God, have mercy on me,
 Most miserable sinner, wretched man.
 I have offended against heaven and earth
 More grievously than any tongue can tell.
 Then whither should I flee for any help?
 I am ashamed to lift my eyes to heaven,
 And I can find no refuge upon earth.
 Shall I despair then?--God forbid! O God,
 For thou art merciful, refusing none
 That come to Thee for succour, unto Thee,
 Therefore, I come; humble myself to Thee;
 Saying, O Lord God, although my sins be great,
 For thy great mercy have mercy! O God the Son,
 Not for slight faults alone, when thou becamest
 Man in the Flesh, was the great mystery wrought;
 O God the Father, not for little sins
 Didst thou yield up thy Son to human death;
 But for the greatest sin that can be sinn'd,
 Yea, even such as mine, incalculable,
 Unpardonable,--sin against the light,
 The truth of God, which I had proven and known.
 Thy mercy must be greater than all sin.
 Forgive me, Father, for no merit of mine,
 But that Thy name by man be glorified,
 And Thy most blessed Son's, who died for man.
 
 Good people, every man at time of death
 Would fain set forth some saying that may live
 After his death and better humankind;
 For death gives life's last word a power to live,
 And, like the stone-cut epitaph, remain
 After the vanish'd voice, and speak to men.
 God grant me grace to glorify my God!
 And first I say it is a grievous case,
 Many so dote upon this bubble world,
 Whose colours in a moment break and fly,
 They care for nothing else. What saith St. John:
 'Love of this world is hatred against God.'
 Again, I pray you all that, next to God,
 You do unmurmuringly and willingly
 Obey your King and Queen, and not for dread
 Of these alone, but from the fear of Him
 Whose ministers they be to govern you.
 Thirdly, I pray you all to live together
 Like brethren; yet what hatred Christian men
 Bear to each other, seeming not as brethren,
 But mortal foes! But do you good to all
 As much as in you lieth. Hurt no man more
 Than you would harm your loving natural brother
 Of the same roof, same breast. If any do,
 Albeit he think himself at home with God,
 Of this be sure, he is whole worlds away.
 
 PROTESTANT _murmurs_. What sort of brothers then be those that lust
 To burn each other?
 
 WILLIAMS.           Peace among you, there!
 
 CRANMER. Fourthly, to those that own exceeding wealth,
 Remember that sore saying spoken once
 By Him that was the truth, 'How hard it is
 For the rich man to enter into Heaven;'
 Let all rich men remember that hard word.
 I have not time for more: if ever, now
 Let them flow forth in charity, seeing now
 The poor so many, and all food so dear.
 Long have I lain in prison, yet have heard
 Of all their wretchedness. Give to the poor,
 Ye give to God. He is with us in the poor.
 
 And now, and forasmuch as I have come
 To the last end of life, and thereupon
 Hangs all my past, and all my life to be,
 Either to live with Christ in Heaven with joy,
 Or to be still in pain with devils in hell;
 And, seeing in a moment, I shall find
                                        [_Pointing upwards_.
 Heaven or else hell ready to swallow me,
                                   [_Pointing downwards_.
 I shall declare to you my very faith
 Without all colour.
 
 COLE.               Hear him, my good brethren.
 
 CRANMER. I do believe in God, Father of all;
 In every article of the Catholic faith,
 And every syllable taught us by our Lord,
 His prophets, and apostles, in the Testaments,
 Both Old and New.
 
 COLE.           Be plainer, Master Cranmer.
 
 CRANMER. And now I come to the great cause that weighs
 Upon my conscience more than anything
 Or said or done in all my life by me;
 For there be writings I have set abroad
 Against the truth I knew within my heart,
 Written for fear of death, to save my life,
 If that might be; the papers by my hand
 Sign'd since my degradation--by this hand
                      [_Holding out his right hand_.
 Written and sign'd--I here renounce them all;
 And, since my hand offended, having written
 Against my heart, my hand shall first be burnt,
 So I may come to the fire.
                               [_Dead silence_.
 
     PROTESTANT _murmurs_.
 
 FIRST PROTESTANT. I knew it would be so.
 
 SECOND PROTESTANT.                       Our prayers are heard!
 
 THIRD PROTESTANT. God bless him!
 
 CATHOLIC _murmurs_.              Out upon him! out upon him!
 Liar! dissembler! traitor! to the fire!
 
 WILLIAMS (_raising his voice_).
 You know that you recanted all you said
 Touching the sacrament in that same book
 You wrote against my Lord of Winchester;
 Dissemble not; play the plain Christian man.
 
 CRANMER. Alas, my Lord,
 I have been a man loved plainness all my life;
 I _did_ dissemble, but the hour has come
 For utter truth and plainness; wherefore, I say,
 I hold by all I wrote within that book.
 Moreover,
 As for the Pope I count him Antichrist,
 With all his devil's doctrines; and refuse,
 Reject him, and abhor him. I have said.
 
 [_Cries on all sides_, 'Pull him down! Away with him!'
 
 COLE. Ay, stop the heretic's mouth! Hale him away!
 
 WILLIAMS. Harm him not, harm him not! have him to the fire!
 
     [CRANMER _goes out between Two Friars, smiling; hands are
     reached to him from the crowd_. LORD WILLIAM HOWARD _and_
     LORD PAGET _are left alone in the church_.
 
 PAGET. The nave and aisles all empty as a fool's jest!
 No, here's Lord William Howard. What, my Lord,
 You have not gone to see the burning?
 
 HOWARD.                               Fie!
 To stand at ease, and stare as at a show,
 And watch a good man burn. Never again.
 I saw the deaths of Latimer and Ridley.
 Moreover, tho' a Catholic, I would not,
 For the pure honour of our common nature,
 Hear what I might--another recantation
 Of Cranmer at the stake.
 
 PAGET.                   You'd not hear that.
 He pass'd out smiling, and he walk'd upright;
 His eye was like a soldier's, whom the general
 He looks to and he leans on as his God,
 Hath rated for some backwardness and bidd'n him
 Charge one against a thousand, and the man
 Hurls his soil'd life against the pikes and dies.
 
 HOWARD. Yet that he might not after all those papers
 Of recantation yield again, who knows?
 
 PAGET. Papers of recantation! Think you then
 That Cranmer read all papers that he sign'd?
 Or sign'd all those they tell us that he sign'd?
 Nay, I trow not: and you shall see, my Lord,
 That howsoever hero-like the man
 Dies in the fire, this Bonner or another
 Will in some lying fashion misreport
 His ending to the glory of their church.
 And you saw Latimer and Ridley die?
 Latimer was eighty, was he not? his best
 Of life was over then.
 
 HOWARD.                His eighty years
 Look'd somewhat crooked on him in his frieze;
 But after they had stript him to his shroud,
 He stood upright, a lad of twenty-one,
 And gather'd with his hands the starting flame,
 And wash'd his hands and all his face therein,
 Until the powder suddenly blew him dead.
 Ridley was longer burning; but he died
 As manfully and boldly, and, 'fore God,
 I know them heretics, but right English ones.
 If ever, as heaven grant, we clash with Spain,
 Our Ridley-soldiers and our Latimer-sailors
 Will teach her something.
 
 PAGET.                    Your mild Legate Pole
 Will tell you that the devil helpt them thro' it.
               [_A murmur of the Crowd in the distance_.
 Hark, how those Roman wolfdogs howl and bay him!
 
 HOWARD. Might it not be the other side rejoicing
 In his brave end?
 
 PAGET.            They are too crush'd, too broken,
 They can but weep in silence.
 
 HOWARD.                       Ay, ay, Paget,
 They have brought it in large measure on themselves.
 Have I not heard them mock the blessed Host
 In songs so lewd, the beast might roar his claim
 To being in God's image, more than they?
 Have I not seen the gamekeeper, the groom.
 Gardener, and huntsman, in the parson's place,
 The parson from his own spire swung out dead,
 And Ignorance crying in the streets, and all men
 Regarding her? I say they have drawn the fire
 On their own heads: yet, Paget, I do hold
 The Catholic, if he have the greater right,
 Hath been the crueller.
 
 PAGET.                  Action and re-action,
 The miserable see-saw of our child-world,
 Make us despise it at odd hours, my Lord.
 Heaven help that this re-action not re-act
 Yet fiercelier under Queen Elizabeth,
 So that she come to rule us.
 
 HOWARD.                      The world's mad.
 
 PAGET. My Lord, the world is like a drunken man,
 Who cannot move straight to his end--but reels
 Now to the right, then as far to the left,
 Push'd by the crowd beside--and underfoot
 An earthquake; for since Henry for a doubt--
 Which a young lust had clapt upon the back,
 Crying, 'Forward!'--set our old church rocking, men
 Have hardly known what to believe, or whether
 They should believe in anything; the currents
 So shift and change, they see not how they are borne,
 Nor whither. I conclude the King a beast;
 Verily a lion if you will--the world
 A most obedient beast and fool--myself
 Half beast and fool as appertaining to it;
 Altho' your Lordship hath as little of each
 Cleaving to your original Adam-clay,
 As may be consonant with mortality.
 
 HOWARD. We talk and Cranmer suffers.
 The kindliest man I ever knew; see, see,
 I speak of him in the past. Unhappy land!
 Hard-natured Queen, half-Spanish in herself,
 And grafted on the hard-grain'd stock of Spain--
 Her life, since Philip left her, and she lost
 Her fierce desire of bearing him a child,
 Hath, like a brief and bitter winter's day,
 Gone narrowing down and darkening to a close.
 There will be more conspiracies, I fear.
 
 PAGET. Ay, ay, beware of France.
 
 HOWARD.                          O Paget, Paget!
 I have seen heretics of the poorer sort,
 Expectant of the rack from day to day,
 To whom the fire were welcome, lying chain'd
 In breathless dungeons over steaming sewers,
 Fed with rank bread that crawl'd upon the tongue,
 And putrid water, every drop a worm,
 Until they died of rotted limbs; and then
 Cast on the dunghill naked, and become
 Hideously alive again from head to heel,
 Made even the carrion-nosing mongrel vomit
 With hate and horror.
 
 PAGET.                Nay, you sicken _me_
 To hear you.
 
 HOWARD.      Fancy-sick; these things are done,
 Done right against the promise of this Queen
 Twice given.
 
 PAGET.       No faith with heretics, my Lord!
 Hist! there be two old gossips--gospellers,
 I take it; stand behind the pillar here;
 I warrant you they talk about the burning.
 
     _Enter_ TWO OLD WOMEN. JOAN, _and after her_ TIB.
 
 JOAN. Why, it be Tib!
 
 TIB. I cum behind tha, gall, and couldn't make tha hear. Eh, the wind
 and the wet! What a day, what a day! nigh upo' judgement daay loike.
 Pwoaps be pretty things, Joan, but they wunt set i' the Lord's cheer
 o' that daay.
 
 JOAN. I must set down myself, Tib; it be a var waay vor my owld legs
 up vro' Islip. Eh, my rheumatizy be that bad howiver be I to win to
 the burnin'.
 
 TIB. I should saay 'twur ower by now. I'd ha' been here avore, but
 Dumble wur blow'd wi' the wind, and Dumble's the best milcher in
 Islip.
 
 JOAN. Our Daisy's as good 'z her.
 
 TIB. Noa, Joan.
 
 JOAN. Our Daisy's butter's as good'z hern.
 
 TIB. Noa, Joan.
 
 JOAN. Our Daisy's cheeses be better.
 
 TIB. Noa, Joan.
 
 JOAN. Eh, then ha' thy waay wi' me, Tib; ez thou hast wi' thy owld
 man.
 
 TIB. Ay, Joan, and my owld man wur up and awaay betimes wi' dree hard
 eggs for a good pleace at the burnin'; and barrin' the wet, Hodge 'ud
 ha' been a-harrowin' o' white peasen i' the outfield--and barrin' the
 wind, Dumble wur blow'd wi' the wind, so 'z we was forced to stick
 her, but we fetched her round at last. Thank the Lord therevore.
 Dumble's the best milcher in Islip.
 
 JOAN. Thou's thy way wi' man and beast, Tib. I wonder at tha', it
 beats me! Eh, but I do know ez Pwoaps and vires be bad things; tell
 'ee now, I heerd summat as summun towld summun o' owld Bishop
 Gardiner's end; there wur an owld lord a-cum to dine wi' un, and a wur
 so owld a couldn't bide vor his dinner, but a had to bide howsomiver,
 vor 'I wunt dine,' says my Lord Bishop, says he, 'not till I hears ez
 Latimer and Ridley be a-vire;' and so they bided on and on till vour
 o' the clock, till his man cum in post vro' here, and tells un ez the
 vire has tuk holt. 'Now,' says the Bishop, says he, 'we'll gwo to
 dinner;' and the owld lord fell to 's meat wi' a will, God bless un!
 but Gardiner wur struck down like by the hand o' God avore a could
 taste a mossel, and a set un all a-vire, so 'z the tongue on un cum
 a-lolluping out o' 'is mouth as black as a rat. Thank the Lord,
 therevore.
 
 PAGET. The fools!
 
 TIB. Ay, Joan; and Queen Mary gwoes on a-burnin' and a-burnin', to get
 her baaby born; but all her burnin's 'ill never burn out the hypocrisy
 that makes the water in her. There's nought but the vire of God's hell
 ez can burn out that.
 
 JOAN. Thank the Lord, therevore.
 
 PAGET. The fools!
 
 TIB. A-burnin', and a-burnin', and a-makin' o' volk madder and madder;
 but tek thou my word vor't, Joan,--and I bean't wrong not twice i' ten
 year--the burnin' o' the owld archbishop'll burn the Pwoap out o'
 this 'ere land vor iver and iver.
 
 HOWARD. Out of the church, you brace of cursed crones, Or I will have
 you duck'd! (_Women hurry out_.) Said I not right? For how should
 reverend prelate or throned prince Brook for an hour such brute
 malignity? Ah, what an acrid wine has Luther brew'd!
 
 PAGET. Pooh, pooh, my Lord! poor garrulous country-wives.
 Buy you their cheeses, and they'll side with you;
 You cannot judge the liquor from the lees.
 
 HOWARD. I think that in some sort we may. But see,
 
     _Enter_ PETERS.
 
 Peters, my gentleman, an honest Catholic,
 Who follow'd with the crowd to Cranmer's fire.
 One that would neither misreport nor lie,
 Not to gain paradise: no, nor if the Pope,
 Charged him to do it--he is white as death.
 Peters, how pale you look! you bring the smoke
 Of Cranmer's burning with you.
 
 PETERS.                        Twice or thrice
 The smoke of Cranmer's burning wrapt me round.
 
 HOWARD. Peters, you know me Catholic, but English.
 Did he die bravely? Tell me that, or leave
 All else untold.
 
 PETERS.          My Lord, he died most bravely.
 
 HOWARD. Then tell me all.
 
 PAGET.                    Ay, Master Peters, tell us.
 
 PETERS. You saw him how he past among the crowd;
 And ever as he walk'd the Spanish friars
 Still plied him with entreaty and reproach:
 But Cranmer, as the helmsman at the helm
 Steers, ever looking to the happy haven
 Where he shall rest at night, moved to his death;
 And I could see that many silent hands
 Came from the crowd and met his own; and thus
 When we had come where Ridley burnt with Latimer,
 He, with a cheerful smile, as one whose mind
 Is all made up, in haste put off the rags
 They had mock'd his misery with, and all in white,
 His long white beard, which he had never shaven
 Since Henry's death, down-sweeping to the chain,
 Wherewith they bound him to the stake, he stood
 More like an ancient father of the Church,
 Than heretic of these times; and still the friars
 Plied him, but Cranmer only shook his head,
 Or answer'd them in smiling negatives;
 Whereat Lord Williams gave a sudden cry:--
 'Make short! make short!' and so they lit the wood.
 Then Cranmer lifted his left hand to heaven,
 And thrust his right into the bitter flame;
 And crying, in his deep voice, more than once,
 'This hath offended--this unworthy hand!'
 So held it till it all was burn'd, before
 The flame had reach'd his body; I stood near--
 Mark'd him--he never uttered moan of pain:
 He never stirr'd or writhed, but, like a statue,
 Unmoving in the greatness of the flame,
 Gave up the ghost; and so past martyr-like--
 Martyr I may not call him--past--but whither?
 PAGET. To purgatory, man, to purgatory.
 
 PETERS. Nay, but, my Lord, he denied purgatory.
 
 PAGET. Why then to heaven, and God ha' mercy on him.
 
 HOWARD. Paget, despite his fearful heresies,
 I loved the man, and needs must moan for him;
 O Cranmer!
 
 PAGET.     But your moan is useless now:
 Come out, my Lord, it is a world of fools.
 
                                       [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT V.
 
 
 SCENE I.--LONDON. HALL IN THE PALACE.
 
 QUEEN, SIR NICHOLAS HEATH.
 
 
 HEATH. Madam,
 I do assure you, that it must be look'd to:
 Calais is but ill-garrison'd, in Guisnes
 Are scarce two hundred men, and the French fleet
 Rule in the narrow seas. It must be look'd to,
 If war should fall between yourself and France;
 Or you will lose your Calais.
 
 MARY.                         It shall be look'd to;
 I wish you a good morning, good Sir Nicholas:
 Here is the King.
                      [_Exit_ HEATH.
 
     _Enter_ PHILIP.
 
 PHILIP.           Sir Nicholas tells you true,
 And you must look to Calais when I go.
 
 MARY. Go? must you go, indeed--again--so soon?
 Why, nature's licensed vagabond, the swallow,
 That might live always in the sun's warm heart,
 Stays longer here in our poor north than you:--
 Knows where he nested--ever comes again.
 
 PHILIP. And, Madam, so shall I.
 
 MARY.                           O, will you? will you?
 I am faint with fear that you will come no more.
 
 PHILIP. Ay, ay; but many voices call me hence.
 
 MARY. Voices--I hear unhappy rumours--nay,
 I say not, I believe. What voices call you
 Dearer than mine that should be dearest to you?
 Alas, my Lord! what voices and how many?
 
 PHILIP. The voices of Castille and Aragon,
 Granada, Naples, Sicily, and Milan,--
 The voices of Franche-Comte, and the Netherlands,
 The voices of Peru and Mexico,
 Tunis, and Oran, and the Philippines,
 And all the fair spice-islands of the East.
 
 MARY (_admiringly_).
 You are the mightiest monarch upon earth,
 I but a little Queen: and, so indeed,
 Need you the more.
 
 PHILIP.            A little Queen! but when
 I came to wed your majesty, Lord Howard,
 Sending an insolent shot that dash'd the seas
 Upon us, made us lower our kingly flag
 To yours of England.
 
 MARY.                Howard is all English!
 There is no king, not were he ten times king,
 Ten times our husband, but must lower his flag
 To that of England in the seas of England.
 
 PHILIP. Is that your answer?
 
 MARY.                        Being Queen of England,
 I have none other.
 
 PHILIP.            So.
 
 MARY.                  But wherefore not
 Helm the huge vessel of your state, my liege,
 Here by the side of her who loves you most?
 
 PHILIP. No, Madam, no! a candle in the sun
 Is all but smoke--a star beside the moon
 Is all but lost; your people will not crown me--
 Your people are as cheerless as your clime;
 Hate me and mine: witness the brawls, the gibbets.
 Here swings a Spaniard--there an Englishman;
 The peoples are unlike as their complexion;
 Yet will I be your swallow and return--
 But now I cannot bide.
 
 MARY.                  Not to help _me?_
 They hate _me_ also for my love to you,
 My Philip; and these judgments on the land--
 Harvestless autumns, horrible agues, plague--
 
 PHILIP. The blood and sweat of heretics at the stake
 Is God's best dew upon the barren field.
 Burn more!
 
 MARY.      I will, I will; and you will stay?
 
 PHILIP. Have I not said? Madam, I came to sue
 Your Council and yourself to declare war.
 
 MARY. Sir, there are many English in your ranks
 To help your battle.
 
 PHILIP.              So far, good. I say
 I came to sue your Council and yourself
 To declare war against the King of France.
 
 MARY. Not to see me?
 
 PHILIP.              Ay, Madam, to see you.
 Unalterably and pesteringly fond!    [_Aside_.
 But, soon or late you must have war with France;
 King Henry warms your traitors at his hearth.
 Carew is there, and Thomas Stafford there.
 Courtenay, belike--
 
 MARY.              A fool and featherhead!
 
 PHILIP. Ay, but they use his name. In brief, this Henry
 Stirs up your land against you to the intent
 That you may lose your English heritage.
 And then, your Scottish namesake marrying
 The Dauphin, he would weld France, England, Scotland,
 Into one sword to hack at Spain and me.
 
 MARY. And yet the Pope is now colleagued with France;
 You make your wars upon him down in Italy:--
 Philip, can that be well?
 
 PHILIP.                   Content you, Madam;
 You must abide my judgment, and my father's,
 Who deems it a most just and holy war.
 The Pope would cast the Spaniard out of Naples:
 He calls us worse than Jews, Moors, Saracens.
 The Pope has pushed his horns beyond his mitre--
 Beyond his province. Now,
 Duke Alva will but touch him on the horns,
 And he withdraws; and of his holy head--
 For Alva is true son of the true church--
 No hair is harm'd. Will you not help me here?
 
 MARY. Alas! the Council will not hear of war.
 They say your wars are not the wars of England.
 They will not lay more taxes on a land
 So hunger-nipt and wretched; and you know
 The crown is poor. We have given the church-lands back:
 The nobles would not; nay, they clapt their hands
 Upon their swords when ask'd; and therefore God
 Is hard upon the people. What's to be done?
 Sir, I will move them in your cause again,
 And we will raise us loans and subsidies
 Among the merchants; and Sir Thomas Gresham
 Will aid us. There is Antwerp and the Jews.
 
 PHILIP. Madam, my thanks.
 
 MARY.                     And you will stay your going?
 
 PHILIP. And further to discourage and lay lame
 The plots of France, altho' you love her not,
 You must proclaim Elizabeth your heir.
 She stands between you and the Queen of Scots.
 
 MARY. The Queen of Scots at least is Catholic.
 
 PHILIP. Ay, Madam, Catholic; but I will not have
 The King of France the King of England too.
 
 MARY. But she's a heretic, and, when I am gone,
 Brings the new learning back.
 
 PHILIP.                       It must be done.
 You must proclaim Elizabeth your heir.
 
 MARY. Then it is done; but you will stay your going
 Somewhat beyond your settled purpose?
 
 PHILIP.                               No!
 
 MARY. What, not one day?
 
 PHILIP.                  You beat upon the rock.
 
 MARY. And I am broken there.
 
 PHILIP.                   Is this a place
 To wail in, Madam? what! a public hall.
 Go in, I pray you.
 
 MARY.              Do not seem so changed.
 Say go; but only say it lovingly.
 
 PHILIP. You do mistake. I am not one to change.
 I never loved you more.
 
 MARY.                   Sire, I obey you.
 Come quickly.
 
 PHILIP.       Ay.
                      [_Exit_ MARY.
 
     _Enter_ COUNT DE FERIA.
 
 FERIA (_aside_).  The Queen in tears!
 
 PHILIP.                               Feria!
 Hast thou not mark'd--come closer to mine ear--
 How doubly aged this Queen of ours hath grown
 Since she lost hope of bearing us a child?
 
 FERIA. Sire, if your Grace hath mark'd it, so have I.
 
 PHILIP. Hast thou not likewise mark'd Elizabeth,
 How fair and royal--like a Queen, indeed?
 
 FERIA. Allow me the same answer as before--
 That if your Grace hath mark'd her, so have I.
 
 PHILIP. Good, now; methinks my Queen is like enough
 To leave me by and by.
 
 FERIA.                 To leave you, sire?
 
 PHILIP. I mean not like to live. Elizabeth--
 To Philibert of Savoy, as you know,
 We meant to wed her; but I am not sure
 She will not serve me better--so my Queen
 Would leave me--as--my wife.
 
 FERIA.                       Sire, even so.
 
 PHILIP. She will not have Prince Philibert of Savoy.
 
 FERIA. No, sire.
 
 PHILIP.          I have to pray you, some odd time,
 To sound the Princess carelessly on this;
 Not as from me, but as your phantasy;
 And tell me how she takes it.
 
 FERIA.                         Sire, I will.
 
 PHILIP. I am not certain but that Philibert
 Shall be the man; and I shall urge his suit
 Upon the Queen, because I am not certain:
 You understand, Feria.
 
 FERIA.                 Sire, I do.
 
 PHILIP. And if you be not secret in this matter,
 You understand me there, too?
 
 FERIA.                        Sire, I do.
 
 PHILIP. You must be sweet and supple, like a Frenchman.
 She is none of those who loathe the honeycomb.
 
                                       [_Exit_ FERIA.
 
     _Enter_ RENARD.
 
 RENARD. My liege, I bring you goodly tidings.
 
 PHILIP. Well?
 
 RENARD. There _will_ be war with France, at last, my liege;
 Sir Thomas Stafford, a bull-headed ass,
 Sailing from France, with thirty Englishmen,
 Hath taken Scarboro' Castle, north of York;
 Proclaims himself protector, and affirms
 The Queen has forfeited her right to reign
 By marriage with an alien--other things
 As idle; a weak Wyatt! Little doubt
 This buzz will soon be silenced; but the Council
 (I have talk'd with some already) are for war.
 This the fifth conspiracy hatch'd in France;
 They show their teeth upon it; and your Grace,
 So you will take advice of mine, should stay
 Yet for awhile, to shape and guide the event.
 
 PHILIP. Good! Renard, I will stay then.
 
 RENARD.                                 Also, sire,
 Might I not say--to please your wife, the Queen?
 
 PHILIP. Ay, Renard, if you care to put it so.
 
                                          [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--A ROOM IN THE PALACE.
 
 MARY, _sitting: a rose in her hand_. LADY CLARENCE. ALICE _in the
 background_.
 
 
 MARY. Look! I have play'd with this poor rose so long
 I have broken off the head.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Your Grace hath been
 More merciful to many a rebel head
 That should have fallen, and may rise again.
 
 MARY. There were not many hang'd for Wyatt's rising.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Nay, not two hundred.
 
 MARY.                                I could weep for them
 And her, and mine own self and all the world.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. For her? for whom, your Grace?
 
     _Enter_ USHER.
 
 USHER. The Cardinal.
 
     _Enter_ CARDINAL POLE. (MARY _rises_.)
 
 MARY. Reginald Pole, what news hath plagued thy heart?
 What makes thy favour like the bloodless head
 Fall'n on the block, and held up by the hair?
 Philip?--
 
 POLE.    No, Philip is as warm in life
 As ever.
 
 MARY.    Ay, and then as cold as ever.
 Is Calais taken?
 
 POLE.            Cousin, there hath chanced
 A sharper harm to England and to Rome,
 Than Calais taken. Julius the Third
 Was ever just, and mild, and father-like;
 But this new Pope Caraffa, Paul the Fourth,
 Not only reft me of that legateship
 Which Julius gave me, and the legateship
 Annex'd to Canterbury--nay, but worse--
 And yet I must obey the Holy Father,
 And so must you, good cousin;--worse than all,
 A passing bell toll'd in a dying ear--
 He hath cited me to Rome, for heresy,
 Before his Inquisition.
 
 MARY.                   I knew it, cousin,
 But held from you all papers sent by Rome,
 That you might rest among us, till the Pope,
 To compass which I wrote myself to Rome,
 Reversed his doom, and that you might not seem
 To disobey his Holiness.
 
 POLE.                    He hates Philip;
 He is all Italian, and he hates the Spaniard;
 He cannot dream that _I_ advised the war;
 He strikes thro' me at Philip and yourself.
 Nay, but I know it of old, he hates me too;
 So brands me in the stare of Christendom
 A heretic!
 Now, even now, when bow'd before my time,
 The house half-ruin'd ere the lease be out;
 When I should guide the Church in peace at home,
 After my twenty years of banishment,
 And all my lifelong labour to uphold
 The primacy--a heretic. Long ago,
 When I was ruler in the patrimony,
 I was too lenient to the Lutheran,
 And I and learned friends among ourselves
 Would freely canvass certain Lutheranisms.
 What then, he knew I was no Lutheran.
 A heretic!
 He drew this shaft against me to the head,
 When it was thought I might be chosen Pope,
 But then withdrew it. In full consistory,
 When I was made Archbishop, he approved me.
 And how should he have sent me Legate hither,
 Deeming me heretic? and what heresy since?
 But he was evermore mine enemy,
 And hates the Spaniard--fiery-choleric,
 A drinker of black, strong, volcanic wines,
 That ever make him fierier. I, a heretic?
 Your Highness knows that in pursuing heresy
 I have gone beyond your late Lord Chancellor,--
 He cried Enough! enough! before his death.--
 Gone beyond him and mine own natural man
 (It was God's cause); so far they call me now,
 The scourge and butcher of their English church.
 
 MARY. Have courage, your reward is Heaven itself.
 
 POLE. They groan amen; they swarm into the fire
 Like flies--for what? no dogma. They know nothing;
 They burn for nothing.
 
 MARY.                  You have done your best.
 
 POLE. Have done my best, and as a faithful son,
 That all day long hath wrought his father's work,
 When back he comes at evening hath the door
 Shut on him by the father whom he loved,
 His early follies cast into his teeth,
 And the poor son turn'd out into the street
 To sleep, to die--I shall die of it, cousin.
 
 MARY. I pray you be not so disconsolate;
 I still will do mine utmost with the Pope.
 Poor cousin!
 Have not I been the fast friend of your life
 Since mine began, and it was thought we two
 Might make one flesh, and cleave unto each other
 As man and wife?
 
 POLE.            Ah, cousin, I remember
 How I would dandle you upon my knee
 At lisping-age. I watch'd you dancing once
 With your huge father; he look'd the Great Harry,
 You but his cockboat; prettily you did it,
 And innocently. No--we were not made
 One flesh in happiness, no happiness here;
 But now we are made one flesh in misery;
 Our bridemaids are not lovely--Disappointment,
 Ingratitude, Injustice, Evil-tongue,
 Labour-in-vain.
 
 MARY.           Surely, not all in vain.
 Peace, cousin, peace! I am sad at heart myself.
 
 POLE. Our altar is a mound of dead men's clay,
 Dug from the grave that yawns for us beyond;
 And there is one Death stands behind the Groom,
 And there is one Death stands behind the Bride--
 
 MARY. Have you been looking at the 'Dance of Death'?
 
 POLE. No; but these libellous papers which I found
 Strewn in your palace. Look you here--the Pope
 Pointing at me with 'Pole, the heretic,
 Thou hast burnt others, do thou burn thyself,
 Or I will burn thee;' and this other; see!--
 'We pray continually for the death
 Of our accursed Queen and Cardinal Pole.'
 This last--I dare not read it her.    [_Aside_.
 
 MARY.                              Away!
 Why do you bring me these?
 I thought you knew better. I never read,
 I tear them; they come back upon my dreams.
 The hands that write them should be burnt clean off
 As Cranmer's, and the fiends that utter them
 Tongue-torn with pincers, lash'd to death, or lie
 Famishing in black cells, while famish'd rats
 Eat them alive. Why do they bring me these?
 Do you mean to drive me mad?
 
 POLE.                        I had forgotten
 How these poor libels trouble you. Your pardon,
 Sweet cousin, and farewell! 'O bubble world,
 Whose colours in a moment break and fly!'
 Why, who said that? I know not--true enough!
 
     [_Puts up the papers, all but the last, which falls.
     Exit_ POLE.
 
 ALICE. If Cranmer's spirit were a mocking one,
 And heard these two, there might be sport for him.    [_Aside_.
 
 MARY. Clarence, they hate me; even while I speak
 There lurks a silent dagger, listening
 In some dark closet, some long gallery, drawn,
 And panting for my blood as I go by.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Nay, Madam, there be loyal papers too,
 And I have often found them.
 
 MARY.                        Find me one!
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Ay, Madam; but Sir Nicholas Heath, the Chancellor,
 Would see your Highness.
 
 MARY.                    Wherefore should I see him?
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Well, Madam, he may bring you news from Philip.
 
 MARY. So, Clarence.
 
 LADY CLARENCE.      Let me first put up your hair;
 It tumbles all abroad.
 
 MARY.                  And the gray dawn
 Of an old age that never will be mine
 Is all the clearer seen. No, no; what matters?
 Forlorn I am, and let me look forlorn.
 
     _Enter_ SIR NICHOLAS HEATH.
 
 HEATH. I bring your Majesty such grievous news
 I grieve to bring it. Madam, Calais is taken.
 
 MARY. What traitor spoke? Here, let my cousin Pole
 Seize him and burn him for a Lutheran.
 
 HEATH. Her Highness is unwell. I will retire.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Madam, your Chancellor, Sir Nicholas Heath.
 
 MARY. Sir Nicholas! I am stunn'd--Nicholas Heath?
 Methought some traitor smote me on the head.
 What said you, my good Lord, that our brave English
 Had sallied out from Calais and driven back
 The Frenchmen from their trenches?
 
 HEATH.                             Alas! no.
 That gateway to the mainland over which
 Our flag hath floated for two hundred years
 Is France again.
 
 MARY.            So; but it is not lost--
 Not yet. Send out: let England as of old
 Rise lionlike, strike hard and deep into
 The prey they are rending from her--ay, and rend
 The renders too. Send out, send out, and make
 Musters in all the counties; gather all
 From sixteen years to sixty; collect the fleet;
 Let every craft that carries sail and gun
 Steer toward Calais. Guisnes is not taken yet?
 
 HEATH. Guisnes is not taken yet.
 
 MARY.                            There yet is hope.
 
 HEATH. Ah, Madam, but your people are so cold;
 I do much fear that England will not care.
 Methinks there is no manhood left among us.
 
 MARY. Send out; I am too weak to stir abroad:
 Tell my mind to the Council--to the Parliament:
 Proclaim it to the winds. Thou art cold thyself
 To babble of their coldness. O would I were
 My father for an hour! Away now--Quick!
 
                                    [_Exit_ HEATH.
 
 I hoped I had served God with all my might!
 It seems I have not. Ah! much heresy
 Shelter'd in Calais. Saints I have rebuilt
 Your shrines, set up your broken images;
 Be comfortable to me. Suffer not
 That my brief reign in England be defamed
 Thro' all her angry chronicles hereafter
 By loss of Calais. Grant me Calais. Philip,
 We have made war upon the Holy Father
 All for your sake: what good could come of that?
 
 LADY CLARENCE. No, Madam, not against the Holy Father;
 You did but help King Philip's war with France,
 Your troops were never down in Italy.
 
 MARY. I am a byword. Heretic and rebel
 Point at me and make merry. Philip gone!
 And Calais gone! Time that I were gone too!
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Nay, if the fetid gutter had a voice
 And cried I was not clean, what should I care?
 Or you, for heretic cries? And I believe,
 Spite of your melancholy Sir Nicholas,
 Your England is as loyal as myself.
 
 MARY (_seeing the paper draft by_ POLE).
 There! there! another paper! Said you not
 Many of these were loyal? Shall I try
 If this be one of such?
 
 LADY CLARENCE.          Let it be, let it be.
 God pardon me! I have never yet found one.    [_Aside_.
 
 MARY (_reads_). 'Your people hate you as your husband hates you.'
 Clarence, Clarence, what have I done? what sin
 Beyond all grace, all pardon? Mother of God,
 Thou knowest never woman meant so well,
 And fared so ill in this disastrous world.
 My people hate me and desire my death.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. No, Madam, no.
 
 MARY. My husband hates me, and desires my death.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. No, Madam; these are libels.
 
 MARY. I hate myself, and I desire my death.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Long live your Majesty! Shall Alice sing you
 One of her pleasant songs? Alice, my child,
 Bring us your lute (ALICE _goes_). They say the gloom of Saul
 Was lighten'd by young David's harp.
 
 MARY.                                Too young!
 And never knew a Philip.
 
     _Re-enter_ ALICE.
 
                          Give _me_ the lute.
 He hates me!
                 (_She sings_.)
 
     Hapless doom of woman happy in betrothing!
     Beauty passes like a breath and love is lost in loathing:
     Low, my lute; speak low, my lute, but say the world is nothing--
     Low, lute, low!
 
     Love will hover round the flowers when they first awaken;
     Love will fly the fallen leaf, and not be overtaken;
     Low, my lute! oh low, my lute! we fade and are forsaken--
     Low, dear lute, low!
 
 Take it away! not low enough for me!
 
 ALICE. Your Grace hath a low voice.
 
 MARY.                               How dare you say it?
 Even for that he hates me. A low voice
 Lost in a wilderness where none can hear!
 A voice of shipwreck on a shoreless sea!
 A low voice from the dust and from the grave
     (_Sitting on the ground_).
 There, am I low enough now?
 
 ALICE. Good Lord! how grim and ghastly looks her Grace,
 With both her knees drawn upward to her chin.
 There was an old-world tomb beside my father's,
 And this was open'd, and the dead were found
 Sitting, and in this fashion; she looks a corpse.
 
     _Enter_ LADY MAGDALEN DACRES.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. Madam, the Count de Feria waits without,
 In hopes to see your Highness.
 
 LADY CLARENCE (_pointing to_ MARY).
 Wait he must--
 Her trance again. She neither sees nor hears,
 And may not speak for hours.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN.               Unhappiest
 Of Queens and wives and women!
 
 ALICE (_in the foreground with_ LADY MAGDALEN).
                                And all along
 Of Philip.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. Not so loud! Our Clarence there
 Sees ever such an aureole round the Queen,
 It gilds the greatest wronger of her peace,
 Who stands the nearest to her.
 
 ALICE.                         Ay, this Philip;
 I used to love the Queen with all my heart--
 God help me, but methinks I love her less
 For such a dotage upon such a man.
 I would I were as tall and strong as you.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. I seem half-shamed at times to be so tall.
 
 ALICE. You are the stateliest deer in all the herd--
 Beyond his aim--but I am small and scandalous,
 And love to hear bad tales of Philip.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN.                        Why?
 I never heard him utter worse of you
 Than that you were low-statured.
 
 ALICE.                           Does he think
 Low stature is low nature, or all women's
 Low as his own?
 
 LADY MAGDALEN.  There you strike in the nail.
 This coarseness is a want of phantasy.
 It is the low man thinks the woman low;
 Sin is too dull to see beyond himself.
 
 ALICE. Ah, Magdalen, sin is bold as well as dull.
 How dared he?
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. Stupid soldiers oft are bold.
 Poor lads, they see not what the general sees,
 A risk of utter ruin. I am _not_
 Beyond his aim, or was not.
 
 ALICE.                      Who? Not you?
 Tell, tell me; save my credit with myself.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. I never breathed it to a bird in the eaves,
 Would not for all the stars and maiden moon
 Our drooping Queen should know! In Hampton Court
 My window look'd upon the corridor;
 And I was robing;--this poor throat of mine,
 Barer than I should wish a man to see it,--
 When he we speak of drove the window back,
 And, like a thief, push'd in his royal hand;
 But by God's providence a good stout staff
 Lay near me; and you know me strong of arm;
 I do believe I lamed his Majesty's
 For a day or two, tho', give the Devil his due,
 I never found he bore me any spite.
 
 ALICE. I would she could have wedded that poor youth,
 My Lord of Devon--light enough, God knows,
 And mixt with Wyatt's rising--and the boy
 Not out of him--but neither cold, coarse, cruel,
 And more than all--no Spaniard.
 
 LADY CLARENCE.                  Not so loud.
 Lord Devon, girls! what are you whispering here?
 
 ALICE. Probing an old state-secret--how it chanced
 That this young Earl was sent on foreign travel,
 Not lost his head.
 
 LADY CLARENCE.     There was no proof against him.
 
 ALICE. Nay, Madam; did not Gardiner intercept
 A letter which the Count de Noailles wrote
 To that dead traitor Wyatt, with full proof
 Of Courtenay's treason? What became of that?
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Some say that Gardiner, out of love for him,
 Burnt it, and some relate that it was lost
 When Wyatt sack'd the Chancellor's house in Southwark.
 Let dead things rest.
 
 ALICE.                Ay, and with him who died
 Alone in Italy.
 
 LADY CLARENCE.  Much changed, I hear,
 Had put off levity and put graveness on.
 The foreign courts report him in his manner
 Noble as his young person and old shield.
 It might be so--but all is over now;
 He caught a chill in the lagoons of Venice,
 And died in Padua.
 
 MARY (_looking up suddenly_).
                    Died in the true faith?
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Ay, Madam, happily.
 
 MARY.                              Happier he than I.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. It seems her Highness hath awaken'd. Think you
 That I might dare to tell her that the Count--
 
 MARY. I will see no man hence for evermore,
 Saving my confessor and my cousin Pole.
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. It is the Count de Feria, my dear lady.
 
 MARY. What Count?
 
 LADY MAGDALEN.    The Count de Feria, from his Majesty
 King Philip.
 
 MARY.        Philip! quick! loop up my hair!
 Throw cushions on that seat, and make it throne-like.
 Arrange my dress--the gorgeous Indian shawl
 That Philip brought me in our happy days!--
 That covers all. So--am I somewhat Queenlike,
 Bride of the mightiest sovereign upon earth?
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Ay, so your Grace would bide a moment yet.
 
 MARY. No, no, he brings a letter. I may die
 Before I read it. Let me see him at once.
 
     _Enter_ COUNT DE FERIA (_kneels_).
 
 FERIA. I trust your Grace is well. (_Aside_) How her hand burns!
 
 MARY. I am not well, but it will better me,
 Sir Count, to read the letter which you bring.
 
 FERIA. Madam, I bring no letter.
 
 MARY.                            How! no letter?
 
 FERIA. His Highness is so vex'd with strange affairs--
 
 MARY. That his own wife is no affair of his.
 
 FERIA. Nay, Madam, nay! he sends his veriest love,
 And says, he will come quickly.
 
 MARY.                           Doth he, indeed?
 You, sir, do _you_ remember what _you_ said
 When last you came to England?
 
 FERIA.                         Madam, I brought
 My King's congratulations; it was hoped
 Your Highness was once more in happy state
 To give him an heir male.
 
 MARY.                     Sir, you said more;
 You said he would come quickly. I had horses
 On all the road from Dover, day and night;
 On all the road from Harwich, night and day;
 But the child came not, and the husband came not;
 And yet he will come quickly.... Thou hast learnt
 Thy lesson, and I mine. There is no need
 For Philip so to shame himself again.
 Return,
 And tell him that I know he comes no more.
 Tell him at last I know his love is dead,
 And that I am in state to bring forth death--
 Thou art commission'd to Elizabeth,
 And not to me!
 
 FERIA.         Mere compliments and wishes.
 But shall I take some message from your Grace?
 
 MARY. Tell her to come and close my dying eyes,
 And wear my crown, and dance upon my grave.
 
 FERIA. Then I may say your Grace will see your sister?
 Your Grace is too low-spirited. Air and sunshine.
 I would we had you, Madam, in our warm Spain.
 You droop in your dim London.
 
 MARY.                         Have him away!
 I sicken of his readiness.
 
 LADY CLARENCE.             My Lord Count,
 Her Highness is too ill for colloquy.
 
 FERIA (_kneels, and kisses her hand_).
 I wish her Highness better. (_Aside_) How her hand burns!
 
                                                    [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE III.--A HOUSE NEAR LONDON.
 
 ELIZABETH, STEWARD OF THE HOUSEHOLD, ATTENDANTS.
 
 
 ELIZABETH. There's half an angel wrong'd in your account;
 Methinks I am all angel, that I bear it
 Without more ruffling. Cast it o'er again.
 
 STEWARD. I were whole devil if I wrong'd you, Madam.
                                            [_Exit_ STEWARD.
 
 ATTENDANT. The Count de Feria, from the King of Spain.
 
 ELIZABETH. Ay!--let him enter. Nay, you need not go:
     [_To her_ LADIES.
 Remain within the chamber, but apart.
 We'll have no private conference. Welcome to
 England!
 
     _Enter_ FERIA.
 
 FERIA.   Fair island star!
 
 ELIZABETH.                 I shine! What else, Sir Count?
 
 FERIA. As far as France, and into Philip's heart.
 My King would know if you be fairly served,
 And lodged, and treated.
 
 ELIZABETH.               You see the lodging, sir,
 I am well-served, and am in everything
 Most loyal and most grateful to the Queen.
 
 FERIA. You should be grateful to my master, too.
 He spoke of this; and unto him you owe
 That Mary hath acknowledged you her heir.
 
 ELIZABETH. No, not to her nor him; but to the people,
 Who know my right, and love me, as I love
 The people! whom God aid!
 
 FERIA.                    You will be Queen,
 And, were I Philip--
 
 ELIZABETH.          Wherefore pause you--what?
 
 FERIA. Nay, but I speak from mine own self, not
 him;
 Your royal sister cannot last; your hand
 Will be much coveted! What a delicate one!
 Our Spanish ladies have none such--and there,
 Were you in Spain, this fine fair gossamer gold--
 Like sun-gilt breathings on a frosty dawn--
 That hovers round your shoulder--
 
 ELIZABETH.                       Is it so fine?
 Troth, some have said so.
 
 FERIA.                   --would be deemed a miracle.
 
 ELIZABETH. Your Philip hath gold hair and golden beard;
 There must be ladies many with hair like mine.
 
 FERIA, Some few of Gothic blood have golden hair,
 But none like yours.
 
 ELIZABETH.           I am happy you approve it.
 
 FERIA. But as to Philip and your Grace--consider,
 If such a one as you should match with Spain,
 What hinders but that Spain and England join'd,
 Should make the mightiest empire earth has known.
 Spain would be England on her seas, and England
 Mistress of the Indies.
 
 ELIZABETH.              It may chance, that England
 Will be the Mistress of the Indies yet,
 Without the help of Spain.
 
 FERIA.                     Impossible;
 Except you put Spain down.
 Wide of the mark ev'n for a madman's dream.
 
 ELIZABETH. Perhaps; but we have seamen.
 Count de Feria,
 I take it that the King hath spoken to you;
 But is Don Carlos such a goodly match?
 
 FERIA. Don Carlos, Madam, is but twelve years old.
 
 ELIZABETH. Ay, tell the King that I will muse upon it;
 He is my good friend, and I would keep him so;
 But--he would have me Catholic of Rome,
 And that I scarce can be; and, sir, till now
 My sister's marriage, and my father's marriages,
 Make me full fain to live and die a maid.
 But I am much beholden to your King.
 Have you aught else to tell me?
 
 FERIA.                          Nothing, Madam,
 Save that methought I gather'd from the Queen
 That she would see your Grace before she--died.
 
 ELIZABETH. God's death! and wherefore spake you not before?
 We dally with our lazy moments here,
 And hers are number'd. Horses there, without!
 I am much beholden to the King, your master.
 Why did you keep me prating? Horses, there!
 
                                    [_Exit_ ELIZABETH, _etc_.
 
 FERIA. So from a clear sky falls the thunderbolt!
 Don Carlos? Madam, if you marry Philip,
 Then I and he will snaffle your 'God's death,'
 And break your paces in, and make you tame;
 God's death, forsooth--you do not know King Philip.
 
                                              [_Exit_.
 
 
 
 SCENE IV.--LONDON. BEFORE THE PALACE.
 
 _A light burning within_. VOICES _of the night passing_.
 
 
 FIRST. Is not yon light in the Queen's chamber?
 
 SECOND.                                         Ay,
 They say she's dying.
 
 FIRST.                So is Cardinal Pole.
 May the great angels join their wings, and make
 Down for their heads to heaven!
 
 SECOND. Amen. Come on.
                           [_Exeunt_.
 
     TWO OTHERS.
 
 FIRST. There's the Queen's light. I hear she cannot live.
 
 SECOND. God curse her and her Legate! Gardiner burns
 Already; but to pay them full in kind,
 The hottest hold in all the devil's den
 Were but a sort of winter; sir, in Guernsey,
 I watch'd a woman burn; and in her agony
 The mother came upon her--a child was born--
 And, sir, they hurl'd it back into the fire,
 That, being but baptized in fire, the babe
 Might be in fire for ever. Ah, good neighbour,
 There should be something fierier than fire
 To yield them their deserts.
 
 FIRST.                       Amen to all
 Your wish, and further.
 
 A THIRD VOICE. Deserts! Amen to what? Whose deserts? Yours? You have a
 gold ring on your finger, and soft raiment about your body; and is not
 the woman up yonder sleeping after all she has done, in peace and
 quietness, on a soft bed, in a closed room, with light, fire, physic,
 tendance; and I have seen the true men of Christ lying famine-dead by
 scores, and under no ceiling but the cloud that wept on them, not for
 them.
 
 FIRST. Friend, tho' so late, it is not safe to preach.
 You had best go home. What are you?
 
 THIRD. What am I? One who cries continually with sweat and tears to
 the Lord God that it would please Him out of His infinite love to
 break down all kingship and queenship, all priesthood and prelacy; to
 cancel and abolish all bonds of human allegiance, all the magistracy,
 all the nobles, and all the wealthy; and to send us again, according
 to His promise, the one King, the Christ, and all things in common, as
 in the day of the first church, when Christ Jesus was King.
 
 FIRST. If ever I heard a madman,--let's away!
 Why, you long-winded--Sir, you go beyond me.
 I pride myself on being moderate.
 Good night! Go home. Besides, you curse so loud,
 The watch will hear you. Get you home at once.
 
                                           [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 SCENE V.--LONDON. A ROOM IN THE PALACE.
 
 _A Gallery on one side. The moonlight streaming through a range of
 windows on the wall opposite_. MARY, LADY CLARENCE, LADY MAGDALEN
 DACRES, ALICE. QUEEN _pacing the Gallery. A writing table in front_.
 QUEEN _comes to the table and writes and goes again, pacing the
 Gallery_.
 
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Mine eyes are dim: what hath she written? read.
 
 ALICE. 'I am dying, Philip; come to me.'
 
 LADY MAGDALEN. There--up and down, poor lady, up and down.
 
 ALICE. And how her shadow crosses one by one
 The moonlight casements pattern'd on the wall,
 Following her like her sorrow. She turns again.
 
     [QUEEN _sits and writes, and goes again_.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. What hath she written now?
 
 ALICE. Nothing; but 'come, come, come,' and all awry,
 And blotted by her tears. This cannot last.
 
     [QUEEN _returns_.
 
 MARY. I whistle to the bird has broken cage,
 And all in vain.    [_Sitting down_.
 Calais gone--Guisnes gone, too--and Philip gone!
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Dear Madam, Philip is but at the wars;
 I cannot doubt but that he comes again;
 And he is with you in a measure still.
 I never look'd upon so fair a likeness
 As your great King in armour there, his hand
 Upon his helmet.
                     [_Pointing to the portrait of Philip on the wall_.
 
 MARY.            Doth he not look noble?
 I had heard of him in battle over seas,
 And I would have my warrior all in arms.
 He said it was not courtly to stand helmeted
 Before the Queen. He had his gracious moment,
 Altho' you'll not believe me. How he smiles
 As if he loved me yet!
 
 LADY CLARENCE.         And so he does.
 
 MARY. He never loved me--nay, he could not love me.
 It was his father's policy against France.
 I am eleven years older than he,
 Poor boy!    [_Weeps_.
 
 ALICE. That was a lusty boy of twenty-seven;    [_Aside_.
 Poor enough in God's grace!
 
 MARY.                      --And all in vain!
 The Queen of Scots is married to the Dauphin,
 And Charles, the lord of this low world, is gone;
 And all his wars and wisdoms past away:
 And in a moment I shall follow him.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Nay, dearest Lady, see your good physician.
 
 MARY. Drugs--but he knows they cannot help me--says
 That rest is all--tells me I must not think--
 That I must rest--I shall rest by and by.
 Catch the wild cat, cage him, and when he springs
 And maims himself against the bars, say 'rest':
 Why, you must kill him if you would have him rest--
 Dead or alive you cannot make him happy.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Your Majesty has lived so pure a life,
 And done such mighty things by Holy Church,
 I trust that God will make you happy yet.
 
 MARY. What is the strange thing happiness? Sit down here:
 Tell me thine happiest hour.
 
 LADY CLARENCE.               I will, if that
 May make your Grace forget yourself a little.
 There runs a shallow brook across our field
 For twenty miles, where the black crow flies five,
 And doth so bound and babble all the way
 As if itself were happy. It was May-time,
 And I was walking with the man I loved.
 I loved him, but I thought I was not loved.
 And both were silent, letting the wild brook
 Speak for us--till he stoop'd and gather'd one
 From out a bed of thick forget-me-nots,
 Look'd hard and sweet at me, and gave it me.
 I took it, tho' I did not know I took it,
 And put it in my bosom, and all at once
 I felt his arms about me, and his lips--
 
 MARY. O God! I have been too slack, too slack;
 There are Hot Gospellers even among our guards--
 Nobles we dared not touch. We have but burnt
 The heretic priest, workmen, and women and children.
 Wet, famine, ague, fever, storm, wreck, wrath,--
 We have so play'd the coward; but by God's grace,
 We'll follow Philip's leading, and set up
 The Holy Office here--garner the wheat,
 And burn the tares with unquenchable fire!
 Burn!--
 Fie, what a savour! tell the cooks to close
 The doors of all the offices below.
 Latimer!
 Sir, we are private with our women here--
 Ever a rough, blunt, and uncourtly fellow--
 Thou light a torch that never will go out!
 'Tis out--mine flames. Women, the Holy Father
 Has ta'en the legateship from our cousin Pole--
 Was that well done? and poor Pole pines of it,
 As I do, to the death. I am but a woman,
 I have no power.--Ah, weak and meek old man,
 Seven-fold dishonour'd even in the sight
 Of thine own sectaries--No, no. No pardon!
 Why that was false: there is the right hand still
 Beckons me hence.
 Sir, you were burnt for heresy, not for treason,
 Remember that! 'twas I and Bonner did it,
 And Pole; we are three to one--Have you found mercy there,
 Grant it me here: and see, he smiles and goes,
 Gentle as in life.
 
 ALICE.             Madam, who goes? King Philip?
 
 MARY. No, Philip comes and goes, but never goes.
 Women, when I am dead,
 Open my heart, and there you will find written
 Two names, Philip and Calais; open his,--
 So that he have one,--
 You will find Philip only, policy, policy,--
 Ay, worse than that--not one hour true to me!
 Foul maggots crawling in a fester'd vice!
 Adulterous to the very heart of Hell.
 Hast thou a knife?
 
 ALICE.             Ay, Madam, but o' God's mercy--
 
 MARY. Fool, think'st thou I would peril mine own soul
 By slaughter of the body? I could not, girl,
 Not this way--callous with a constant stripe,
 Unwoundable. The knife!
 
 ALICE.                  Take heed, take heed!
 The blade is keen as death.
 
 MARY.                       This Philip shall not
 Stare in upon me in my haggardness;
 Old, miserable, diseased,
 Incapable of children. Come thou down.
               [_Cuts out the picture and throws it down_.
 Lie there. (_Wails_) O God, I have kill'd my Philip!
 
 ALICE.                                               No,
 Madam, you have but cut the canvas out;
 We can replace it.
 
 MARY.              All is well then; rest--
 I will to rest; he said, I must have rest.
                      [_Cries of_ 'ELIZABETH' _in the street_.
 A cry! What's that? Elizabeth? revolt?
 A new Northumberland, another Wyatt?
 I'll fight it on the threshold of the grave.
 
 LADY CLARENCE. Madam, your royal sister comes to see you.
 
 MARY. I will not see her.
 Who knows if Boleyn's daughter be my sister?
 I will see none except the priest. Your arm.
                                [_To_ LADY CLARENCE.
 O Saint of Aragon, with that sweet worn smile
 Among thy patient wrinkles--Help me hence.
                                               [_Exeunt_.
 
     _The_ PRIEST _passes. Enter_ ELIZABETH _and_ SIR WILLIAM CECIL.
 
 ELIZABETH. Good counsel yours--
                                No one in waiting? still,
 As if the chamberlain were Death himself!
 The room she sleeps in--is not this the way?
 No, that way there are voices. Am I too late?
 Cecil ... God guide me lest I lose the way.
                                   [_Exit_ ELIZABETH.
 
 CECIL. Many points weather'd, many perilous ones,
 At last a harbour opens; but therein
 Sunk rocks--they need fine steering--much it is
 To be nor mad, nor bigot--have a mind--
 Nor let Priests' talk, or dream of worlds to be,
 Miscolour things about her--sudden touches
 For him, or him--sunk rocks; no passionate faith--
 But--if let be--balance and compromise;
 Brave, wary, sane to the heart of her--a Tudor
 School'd by the shadow of death--a Boleyn, too,
 Glancing across the Tudor--not so well.
 
     _Enter_ ALICE.
 
 How is the good Queen now?
 
 ALICE.                     Away from Philip.
 Back in her childhood--prattling to her mother
 Of her betrothal to the Emperor Charles,
 And childlike--jealous of him again--and once
 She thank'd her father sweetly for his book
 Against that godless German. Ah, those days
 Were happy. It was never merry world
 In England, since the Bible came among us.
 
 CECIL. And who says that?
 
 ALICE. It is a saying among the Catholics.
 
 CECIL. It never will be merry world in England,
 Till all men have their Bible, rich and poor.
 
 ALICE. The Queen is dying, or you dare not say it.
 
     _Enter_ ELIZABETH.
 
 ELIZABETH. The Queen is dead.
 
 CECIL. Then here she stands! my homage.
 
 ELIZABETH. She knew me, and acknowledged me her heir,
 Pray'd me to pay her debts, and keep the Faith:
 Then claspt the cross, and pass'd away in peace.
 I left her lying still and beautiful,
 More beautiful than in life. Why would you vex yourself,
 Poor sister? Sir, I swear I have no heart
 To be your Queen. To reign is restless fence,
 Tierce, quart, and trickery. Peace is with the dead.
 Her life was winter, for her spring was nipt:
 And she loved much: pray God she be forgiven.
 
 CECIL. Peace with the dead, who never were at peace!
 Yet she loved one so much--I needs must say--
 That never English monarch dying left
 England so little.
 
 ELIZABETH. But with Cecil's aid
 And others, if our person be secured
 From traitor stabs--we will make England great.
 
     _Enter_ PAGET, _and other_ LORDS OF THE COUNCIL,
     SIR RALPH BAGENHALL, _etc_.
 
 LORDS. God save Elizabeth, the Queen of England!
 
 BAGENHALL. God save the Crown! the Papacy is no more.
 
 PAGET (_aside_).
 Are we so sure of that?
 
 ACCLAMATION.            God save the Queen!
 
 
 END OF QUEEN MARY.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 HAROLD: A DRAMA.
 
 
 
 TO HIS EXCELLENCY THE RIGHT HON. LORD LYTTON, VICEROY AND
 GOVERNOR-GENERAL OF INDIA.
 
 My Dear Lord Lytton,--After old-world records--such as the Bayeux
 tapestry and the Roman de Rou,--Edward Freeman's History of the Norman
 Conquest, and your father's Historical Romance treating of the same
 times, have been mainly helpful to me in writing this Drama. Your
 father dedicated his 'Harold' to my father's brother; allow me to
 dedicate my 'Harold' to yourself.
 
 A. TENNYSON.
 
 
 
 SHOW-DAY AT BATTLE ABBEY, 1876.
 
 A garden here--May breath and bloom of spring--
 The cuckoo yonder from an English elm
 Crying 'with my false egg I overwhelm
 The native nest:' and fancy hears the ring
 Of harness, and that deathful arrow sing,
 And Saxon battleaxe clang on Norman helm.
 Here rose the dragon-banner of our realm:
 Here fought, here fell, our Norman-slander'd king.
 O Garden blossoming out of English blood!
 O strange hate-healer Time! We stroll and stare
 Where might made right eight hundred years ago;
 Might, right? ay good, so all things make for good--
 But he and he, if soul be soul, are where
 Each stands full face with all he did below.
 
 
 
 _DRAMATIS PERSONAE_
 
 KING EDWARD THE CONFESSOR.
 STIGAND, _created Archbishop of Canterbury by the Antipope Benedict_.
 ALDRED, _Archbishop of York_.
 THE NORMAN BISHOP OF LONDON.
 HAROLD, _Earl of Wessex, afterwards King of England, Son of Godwin_
 TOSTIG, _Earl of Northumbria, Son of Godwin_
 GURTH, _Earl of East Anglia, Son of Godwin_
 LEOFWIN, _Earl of Kent and Essex, Son of Godwin_
 WULFNOTH
 COUNT WILLIAM OF NORMANDY.
 WILLIAM RUFUS.
 WILLIAM MALET, _a Norman Noble_.[1]
 EDWIN, _Earl of Mercia, Son of Alfgar of Mercia_
 MORCAR, _Earl of Northumbria after Tostig, Son of Alfgar of Mercia_
 GAMEL, _a Northumbrian Thane_.
 GUY, _Count of Ponthieu_.
 ROLF, _a Ponthieu Fisherman_.
 HUGH MARGOT, _a Norman Monk_.
 OSGOD _and_ ATHELRIC, _Canons from Waltham_.
 THE QUEEN, _Edward the Confessor's Wife, Daughter of Godwin_.
 ALDWYTH, _Daughter of Alfgar and Widow of Griffyth, King of Wales_.
 EDITH, _Ward of King Edward_.
 Courtiers, Earls and Thanes, Men-at-Arms, Canons of Waltham,
 Fishermen, etc.
 
 
 [Footnote 1: ... quidam partim Normannus et Anglus
 Compater Heraldi. (_Guy of Amiens_, 587.)]
 
 
 
 HAROLD
 
 
 
 
 ACT I.
 
 
 SCENE I.--LONDON. THE KING'S PALACE.
 
     (_A comet seen through the open window_.)
 
 ALDWYTH, GAMEL, COURTIERS _talking together_.
 
 
 FIRST COURTIER. Lo! there once more--this is the seventh night!
 Yon grimly-glaring, treble-brandish'd scourge Of England!
 
 SECOND COURTIER. Horrible!
 
 FIRST COURTIER.            Look you, there's a star
 That dances in it as mad with agony!
 
 THIRD COURTIER. Ay, like a spirit in Hell who skips and flies
 To right and left, and cannot scape the flame.
 
 SECOND COURTIER. Steam'd upward from the undescendable
 Abysm.
 
 FIRST COURTIER. Or floated downward from the throne
 Of God Almighty.
 
 ALDWYTH.         Gamel, son of Orm,
 What thinkest thou this means?
 
 GAMEL.                         War, my dear lady!
 
 ALDWYTH. Doth this affright thee?
 
 GAMEL.                            Mightily, my dear lady!
 
 ALDWYTH. Stand by me then, and look upon my face,
 Not on the comet.
 
     _Enter_ MORCAR.
 
                   Brother! why so pale?
 
 MORCAR. It glares in heaven, it flares upon the Thames,
 The people are as thick as bees below,
 They hum like bees,--they cannot speak--for awe;
 Look to the skies, then to the river, strike
 Their hearts, and hold their babies up to it.
 I think that they would Molochize them too,
 To have the heavens clear.
 
 ALDWYTH. They fright not me.
 
     _Enter_ LEOFWIN, _after him_ GURTH.
 
 Ask thou Lord Leofwin what he thinks of this!
 
 MORCAR. Lord Leofwin, dost thou believe, that these
 Three rods of blood-red fire up yonder mean
 The doom of England and the wrath of Heaven?
 
 BISHOP OF LONDON (_passing_).
 Did ye not cast with bestial violence
 Our holy Norman bishops down from all
 Their thrones in England? I alone remain.
 Why should not Heaven be wroth?
 
 LEOFWIN. With us, or thee?
 
 BISHOP OF LONDON. Did ye not outlaw your archbishop Robert,
 Robert of Jumieges--well-nigh murder him too?
 Is there no reason for the wrath of Heaven?
 
 LEOFWIN. Why then the wrath of Heaven hath three tails,
 The devil only one.
 
                        [_Exit_ BISHOP OF LONDON.
 
     _Enter_ ARCHBISHOP STIGAND.
 
 Ask _our_ Archbishop.
 Stigand should know the purposes of Heaven.
 
 STIGAND. Not I. I cannot read the face of heaven;
 Perhaps our vines will grow the better for it.
 
 LEOFWIN (_laughing_).
 He can but read the king's face on his coins.
 
 STIGAND. Ay, ay, young lord, _there_ the king's face is power.
 
 GURTH. O father, mock not at a public fear,
 But tell us, is this pendent hell in heaven
 A harm to England?
 
 STIGAND.           Ask it of King Edward!
 And he may tell thee, _I_ am a harm to England.
 Old uncanonical Stigand--ask of _me_
 Who had my pallium from an Antipope!
 Not he the man--for in our windy world
 What's up is faith, what's down is heresy.
 Our friends, the Normans, holp to shake his chair.
 I have a Norman fever on me, son,
 And cannot answer sanely.... What it means?
 Ask our broad Earl.
                        [_Pointing to_ HAROLD, _who enters_.
 
 HAROLD (_seeing_ GAMEL).
                     Hail, Gamel, son of Orm!
 Albeit no rolling stone, my good friend Gamel,
 Thou hast rounded since we met. Thy life at home
 Is easier than mine here. Look! am I not
 Work-wan, flesh-fallen?
 
 GAMEL.                  Art thou sick, good Earl?
 
 HAROLD. Sick as an autumn swallow for a voyage,
 Sick for an idle week of hawk and hound
 Beyond the seas--a change! When camest thou hither?
 
 GAMEL. To-day, good Earl.
 
 HAROLD.                   Is the North quiet, Gamel?
 
 GAMEL. Nay, there be murmurs, for thy brother breaks us
 With over-taxing--quiet, ay, as yet--
 Nothing as yet.
 
 HAROLD.         Stand by him, mine old friend,
 Thou art a great voice in Northumberland!
 Advise him: speak him sweetly, he will hear thee.
 He is passionate but honest. Stand thou by him!
 More talk of this to-morrow, if yon weird sign
 Not blast us in our dreams.--Well, father Stigand--
                         [_To_ STIGAND, _who advances to him_.
 
 STIGAND (_pointing to the comet_).
 War there, my son? is that the doom of England?
 
 HAROLD. Why not the doom of all the world as well?
 For all the world sees it as well as England.
 These meteors came and went before our day,
 Not harming any: it threatens us no more
 Than French or Norman. War? the worst that follows
 Things that seem jerk'd out of the common rut
 Of Nature is the hot religious fool,
 Who, seeing war in heaven, for heaven's credit
 Makes it on earth: but look, where Edward draws
 A faint foot hither, leaning upon Tostig.
 He hath learnt to love our Tostig much of late.
 
 LEOFWIN. And _he_ hath learnt, despite the tiger in him,
 To sleek and supple himself to the king's hand.
 
 GURTH. I trust the kingly touch that cures the evil
 May serve to charm the tiger out of him.
 
 LEOFWIN. He hath as much of cat as tiger in him.
 Our Tostig loves the hand and not the man.
 
 HAROLD. Nay! Better die than lie!
 
     _Enter_ KING, QUEEN, _and_ TOSTIG.
 
 EDWARD. In heaven signs!
 Signs upon earth! signs everywhere! your Priests
 Gross, worldly, simoniacal, unlearn'd!
 They scarce can read their Psalter; and your churches
 Uncouth, unhandsome, while in Normanland
 God speaks thro' abler voices, as He dwells
 In statelier shrines. I say not this, as being
 Half Norman-blooded, nor as some have held,
 Because I love the Norman better--no,
 But dreading God's revenge upon this realm
 For narrowness and coldness: and I say it
 For the last time perchance, before I go
 To find the sweet refreshment of the Saints.
 I have lived a life of utter purity:
 I have builded the great church of Holy Peter:
 I have wrought miracles--to God the glory--
 And miracles will in my name be wrought
 Hereafter.--I have fought the fight and go--
 I see the flashing of the gates of pearl--
 And it is well with me, tho' some of you
 Have scorn'd me--ay--but after I am gone
 Woe, woe to England! I have had a vision;
 The seven sleepers in the cave at Ephesus
 Have turn'd from right to left.
 
 HAROLD.                         My most dear Master,
 What matters? let them turn from left to right
 And sleep again.
 
 TOSTIG.          Too hardy with thy king!
 A life of prayer and fasting well may see
 Deeper into the mysteries of heaven
 Than thou, good brother.
 
 ALDWYTH (_aside_).       Sees he into thine,
 That thou wouldst have his promise for the crown?
 
 EDWARD. Tostig says true; my son, thou art too hard,
 Not stagger'd by this ominous earth and heaven:
 But heaven and earth are threads of the same loom,
 Play into one another, and weave the web
 That may confound thee yet.
 
 HAROLD.                     Nay, I trust not,
 For I have served thee long and honestly.
 
 EDWARD. I know it, son; I am not thankless: thou
 Hast broken all my foes, lighten'd for me
 The weight of this poor crown, and left me time
 And peace for prayer to gain a better one.
 Twelve years of service! England loves thee for it.
 Thou art the man to rule her!
 
 ALDWYTH (_aside_).            So, not Tostig!
 
 HAROLD. And after those twelve years a boon, my king,
 Respite, a holiday: thyself wast wont
 To love the chase: thy leave to set my feet
 On board, and hunt and hawk beyond the seas!
 
 EDWARD. What, with this flaming horror overhead?
 
 HAROLD. Well, when it passes then.
 
 EDWARD.                            Ay if it pass.
 Go not to Normandy--go not to Normandy.
 
 HAROLD. And wherefore not, my king, to Normandy?
 Is not my brother Wulfnoth hostage there
 For my dead father's loyalty to thee?
 I pray thee, let me hence and bring him home.
 
 EDWARD. Not thee, my son: some other messenger.
 
 HAROLD. And why not me, my lord, to Normandy?
 Is not the Norman Count thy friend and mine?
 
 EDWARD. I pray thee, do not go to Normandy.
 
 HAROLD. Because my father drove the Normans out
 Of England?--That was many a summer gone--
 Forgotten and forgiven by them and thee.
 
 EDWARD. Harold, I will not yield thee leave to go.
 
 HAROLD. Why then to Flanders. I will hawk and hunt
 In Flanders.
 
 EDWARD.      Be there not fair woods and fields
 In England? Wilful, wilful. Go--the Saints
 Pilot and prosper all thy wandering out
 And homeward. Tostig, I am faint again.
 Son Harold, I will in and pray for thee.
 
     [_Exit, leaning on_ TOSTIG, _and followed by_
     STIGAND, MORCAR, _and_ COURTIERS.
 
 HAROLD. What lies upon the mind of our good king
 That he should harp this way on Normandy?
 
 QUEEN. Brother, the king is wiser than he seems;
 And Tostig knows it; Tostig loves the king.
 
 HAROLD. And love should know; and--be the
 king so wise,--
 Then Tostig too were wiser than he seems.
 I love the man but not his phantasies.
 
     _Re-enter_ TOSTIG.
 
 Well, brother,
 When didst thou hear from thy Northumbria?
 
 TOSTIG. When did I hear aught but this '_When_' from thee?
 Leave me alone, brother, with my Northumbria:
 She is _my_ mistress, let _me_ look to her!
 The King hath made me Earl; make me not fool!
 Nor make the King a fool, who made me Earl!
 
 HAROLD. No, Tostig--lest I make myself a fool
 Who made the King who made thee, make thee Earl.
 
 TOSTIG. Why chafe me then? Thou knowest I soon go wild.
 
 GURTH. Come, come! as yet thou art not gone so wild
 But thou canst hear the best and wisest of us.
 
 HAROLD. So says old Gurth, not I: yet hear! thine earldom,
 Tostig, hath been a kingdom. Their old crown
 Is yet a force among them, a sun set
 But leaving light enough for Alfgar's house
 To strike thee down by--nay, this ghastly glare
 May heat their fancies.
 
 TOSTIG.                 My most worthy brother,
 Thou art the quietest man in all the world--
 Ay, ay and wise in peace and great in war--
 Pray God the people choose thee for their king!
 But all the powers of the house of Godwin
 Are not enframed in thee.
 
 HAROLD.                   Thank the Saints, no!
 But thou hast drain'd them shallow by thy tolls,
 And thou art ever here about the King:
 Thine absence well may seem a want of care.
 Cling to their love; for, now the sons of Godwin
 Sit topmost in the field of England, envy,
 Like the rough bear beneath the tree, good brother,
 Waits till the man let go.
 
 TOSTIG.                    Good counsel truly!
 I heard from my Northumbria yesterday.
 
 HAROLD. How goes it then with thy Northumbria?
 Well?
 
 TOSTIG. And wouldst thou that it went aught else than well?
 
 HAROLD. I would it went as well as with mine earldom,
 Leofwin's and Gurth's.
 
 TOSTIG.                Ye govern milder men.
 
 GURTH. We have made them milder by just government.
 
 TOSTIG. Ay, ever give yourselves your own good word.
 
 LEOFWIN. An honest gift, by all the Saints, if giver
 
 And taker be but honest! but they bribe
 Each other, and so often, an honest world
 Will not believe them.
 
 HAROLD.                I may tell thee, Tostig,
 I heard from thy Northumberland to-day.
 
 TOSTIG. From spies of thine to spy my nakedness
 In my poor North!
 
 HAROLD.           There is a movement there,
 A blind one--nothing yet.
 
 TOSTIG.                   Crush it at once
 With all the power I have!--I must--I will!--
 Crush it half-born! Fool still? or wisdom there,
 My wise head-shaking Harold?
 
 HAROLD.                       Make not thou
 The nothing something. Wisdom when in power
 And wisest, should not frown as Power, but smile
 As kindness, watching all, till the true _must_
 Shall make her strike as Power: but when to strike--
 O Tostig, O dear brother--If they prance,
 Rein in, not lash them, lest they rear and run
 And break both neck and axle.
 
 TOSTIG.                       Good again!
 Good counsel tho' scarce needed. Pour not water
 In the full vessel running out at top
 To swamp the house.
 
 LEOFWIN.            Nor thou be a wild thing
 Out of the waste, to turn and bite the hand
 Would help thee from the trap.
 
 TOSTIG.                        Thou playest in tune.
 
 LEOFWIN. To the deaf adder thee, that wilt not dance
 However wisely charm'd.
 
 TOSTIG.                 No more, no more!
 
 GURTH. I likewise cry 'no more.' Unwholesome talk
 For Godwin's house! Leofwin, thou hast a tongue!
 Tostig, thou look'st as thou wouldst spring upon him.
 St. Olaf, not while I am by! Come, come,
 Join hands, let brethren dwell in unity;
 Let kith and kin stand close as our shield-wall,
 Who breaks us then? I say, thou hast a tongue,
 And Tostig is not stout enough to bear it.
 Vex him not, Leofwin.
 
 TOSTIG.               No, I am not vext,--
 Altho' ye seek to vex me, one and all.
 I have to make report of my good earldom
 To the good king who gave it--not to you--
 Not any of you.--I am not vext at all.
 
 HAROLD. The king? the king is ever at his prayers;
 In all that handles matter of the state
 I am the king.
 
 TOSTIG.        That shall thou never be
 If I can thwart thee.
 
 HAROLD.               Brother, brother!
 
 TOSTIG.                                 Away!
 
                  [_Exit_ TOSTIG.
 
 QUEEN. Spite of this grisly star ye three must gall
 Poor Tostig.
 
 LEOFWIN.     Tostig, sister, galls himself;
 He cannot smell a rose but pricks his nose
 Against the thorn, and rails against the rose.
 
 QUEEN. I am the only rose of all the stock
 That never thorn'd him; Edward loves him, so
 Ye hate him. Harold always hated him.
 Why--how they fought when boys--and, Holy Mary!
 How Harold used to beat him!
 
 HAROLD.                      Why, boys will fight.
 Leofwin would often fight me, and I beat him.
 Even old Gurth would fight. I had much ado
 To hold mine own against old Gurth. Old Gurth,
 We fought like great states for grave cause; but
 Tostig--
 On a sudden--at a something--for a nothing--
 The boy would fist me hard, and when we fought
 I conquer'd, and he loved me none the less,
 Till thou wouldst get him all apart, and tell him
 That where he was but worsted, he was wrong'd.
 Ah! thou hast taught the king to spoil him too;
 Now the spoilt child sways both. Take heed, take heed;
 Thou art the Queen; ye are boy and girl no more:
 Side not with Tostig in any violence,
 Lest thou be sideways guilty of the violence.
 
 QUEEN. Come fall not foul on me. I leave thee, brother.
 
 HAROLD. Nay, my good sister--
 
     [_Exeunt_ QUEEN, HAROLD, GURTH, _and_ LEOFWIN.
 
 ALDWYTH.                     Gamel, son of Orm,
 What thinkest thou this means?    [_Pointing to the comet_.
 
 GAMEL.                         War, my dear lady,
 War, waste, plague, famine, all malignities.
 
 ALDWYTH. It means the fall of Tostig from his earldom.
 
 GAMEL. That were too small a matter for a comet!
 
 ALDWYTH. It means the lifting of the house of Alfgar.
 
 GAMEL. Too small! a comet would not show for that!
 
 ALDWYTH. Not small for thee, if thou canst compass it.
 
 GAMEL. Thy love?
 
 ALDWYTH. As much as I can give thee, man;
 This Tostig is, or like to be, a tyrant;
 Stir up thy people: oust him!
 
 GAMEL.                        And thy love?
 
 ALDWYTH. As much as thou canst bear.
 
 GAMEL.                               I can bear all,
 And not be giddy.
 
 ALDWYTH.          No more now: to-morrow.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--IN THE GARDEN. THE KING'S HOUSE NEAR LONDON. SUNSET.
 
 
 EDITH. Mad for thy mate, passionate nightingale....
 I love thee for it--ay, but stay a moment;
 _He_ can but stay a moment: he is going.
 I fain would hear him coming!... near me ... near.
 Somewhere--To draw him nearer with a charm
 Like thine to thine.
                         (_Singing_.)
 
     Love is come with a song and a smile,
     Welcome Love with a smile and a song:
     Love can stay but a little while.
     Why cannot he stay? They call him away:
     Ye do him wrong, ye do him wrong;
     Love will stay for a whole life long.
 
         _Enter_ HAROLD.
 
 HAROLD. The nightingales in Havering-at-the-Bower
 Sang out their loves so loud, that Edward's prayers
 Were deafen'd and he pray'd them dumb, and thus
 I dumb thee too, my wingless nightingale!
                                     [_Kissing her_.
 
 EDITH. Thou art my music! Would their wings were mine
 To follow thee to Flanders! Must thou go?
 
 HAROLD. Not must, but will. It is but for one moon.
 
 EDITH. Leaving so many foes in Edward's hall
 To league against thy weal. The Lady Aldwyth
 Was here to-day, and when she touch'd on thee,
 She stammer'd in her hate; I am sure she hates thee,
 Pants for thy blood.
 
 HAROLD.              Well, I have given her cause--
 I fear no woman.
 
 EDITH.                Hate not one who felt
 Some pity for thy hater! I am sure
 Her morning wanted sunlight, she so praised
 The convent and lone life--within the pale--
 Beyond the passion. Nay--she held with Edward,
 At least methought she held with holy Edward,
 That marriage was half sin.
 
 HAROLD.                     A lesson worth
 Finger and thumb--thus (_snaps his fingers_). And my answer to it--
 See here--an interwoven H and E!
 Take thou this ring; I will demand his ward
 From Edward when I come again. Ay, would she?
 She to shut up my blossom in the dark!
 Thou art _my_ nun, thy cloister in mine arms.
 
 EDITH (_taking the ring_).
 Yea, but Earl Tostig--
 
 HAROLD.               That's a truer fear!
 For if the North take fire, I should be back;
 I shall be, soon enough.
 
 EDITH.                   Ay, but last night
 An evil dream that ever came and went--
 
 HAROLD. A gnat that vext thy pillow! Had I been by,
 I would have spoil'd his horn. My girl, what was it?
 
 EDITH. Oh! that thou wert not going!
 For so methought it was our marriage-morn,
 And while we stood together, a dead man
 Rose from behind the altar, tore away
 My marriage ring, and rent my bridal veil;
 And then I turn'd, and saw the church all fill'd
 With dead men upright from their graves, and all
 The dead men made at thee to murder thee,
 But thou didst back thyself against a pillar,
 And strike among them with thy battle-axe--
 There, what a dream!
 
 HAROLD.              Well, well--a dream--no more!
 
 EDITH. Did not Heaven speak to men in dreams of old?
 
 HAROLD. Ay--well--of old. I tell thee what, my child;
 Thou hast misread this merry dream of thine,
 Taken the rifted pillars of the wood
 For smooth stone columns of the sanctuary,
 The shadows of a hundred fat dead deer
 For dead men's ghosts. True, that the battle-axe
 Was out of place; it should have been the bow.--
 Come, thou shalt dream no more such dreams; I swear it,
 By mine own eyes--and these two sapphires--these
 Twin rubies, that are amulets against all
 The kisses of all kind of womankind
 In Flanders, till the sea shall roll me back
 To tumble at thy feet.
 
 EDITH.                 That would but shame me,
 Rather than make me vain. The sea may roll
 Sand, shingle, shore-weed, not the living rock
 Which guards the land.
 
 HAROLD.                Except it be a soft one,
 And undereaten to the fall. Mine amulet ...
 This last ... upon thine eyelids, to shut in
 A happier dream. Sleep, sleep, and thou shalt see
 My grayhounds fleeting like a beam of light,
 And hear my peregrine and her bells in heaven;
 And other bells on earth, which yet are heaven's;
 Guess what they be.
 
 EDITH.              He cannot guess who knows.
 Farewell, my king.
 
 HAROLD.            Not yet, but then--my queen.
                                [_Exeunt_.
     _Enter_ ALDWYTH _from the thicket_.
 
 ALDWYTH. The kiss that charms thine eyelids into sleep,
 Will hold mine waking. Hate him? I could love him
 More, tenfold, than this fearful child can do;
 Griffyth I hated: why not hate the foe
 Of England? Griffyth when I saw him flee,
 Chased deer-like up his mountains, all the blood
 That should have only pulsed for Griffyth, beat
 For his pursuer. I love him or think I love him.
 If he were King of England, I his queen,
 I might be sure of it. Nay, I do love him.--
 She must be cloister'd somehow, lest the king
 Should yield his ward to Harold's will. What harm?
 She hath but blood enough to live, not love.--
 When Harold goes and Tostig, shall I play
 The craftier Tostig with him? fawn upon him?
 Chime in with all? 'O thou more saint than king!'
 And that were true enough. 'O blessed relics!'
 'O Holy Peter!' If he found me thus,
 Harold might hate me; he is broad and honest,
 Breathing an easy gladness ... not like Aldwyth ...
 For which I strangely love him. Should not England
 Love Aldwyth, if she stay the feuds that part
 The sons of Godwin from the sons of Alfgar
 By such a marrying? Courage, noble Aldwyth!
 Let all thy people bless thee!
                                Our wild Tostig,
 Edward hath made him Earl: he would be king:--
 The dog that snapt the shadow, dropt the bone.--
 I trust he may do well, this Gamel, whom
 I play upon, that he may play the note
 Whereat the dog shall howl and run, and Harold
 Hear the king's music, all alone with him,
 Pronounced his heir of England.
 I see the goal and half the way to it.--
 Peace-lover is our Harold for the sake
 Of England's wholeness--so--to shake the North
 With earthquake and disruption--some division--
 Then fling mine own fair person in the gap
 A sacrifice to Harold, a peace-offering,
 A scape-goat marriage--all the sins of both
 The houses on mine head--then a fair life
 And bless the Queen of England.
 
 MORCAR (_coming from the thicket_).
                                 Art thou assured
 By this, that Harold loves but Edith?
 
 ALDWYTH.                              Morcar!
 Why creep'st thou like a timorous beast of prey
 Out of the bush by night?
 
 MORCAR.                   I follow'd thee.
 
 ALDWYTH. Follow my lead, and I will make thee earl.
 
 MORCAR. What lead then?
 
 ALDWYTH.                Thou shalt flash it secretly
 Among the good Northumbrian folk, that I--
 That Harold loves me--yea, and presently
 That I and Harold are betroth'd--and last--
 Perchance that Harold wrongs me; tho' I would not
 That it should come to that.
 
 MORCAR.                      I will both flash
 And thunder for thee.
 
 ALDWYTH.              I said 'secretly;'
 It is the flash that murders, the poor thunder
 Never harm'd head.
 
 MORCAR.            But thunder may bring down
 That which the flash hath stricken.
 
 ALDWYTH.                            Down with Tostig!
 That first of all--And when doth Harold go?
 
 MORCAR. To-morrow--first to Bosham, then to Flanders.
 
 ALDWYTH. Not to come back till Tostig shall have shown
 And redden'd with his people's blood the teeth
 That shall be broken by us--yea, and thou
 Chair'd in his place. Good-night, and dream thyself
 Their chosen Earl.
                       [_Exit_ ALDWYTH.
 
 MORCAR.            Earl first, and after that
 Who knows I may not dream myself their king!
 
 
 
 
 ACT II.
 
 
 SCENE I.--SEASHORE. PONTHIEU. NIGHT.
 
 HAROLD _and his_ MEN, _wrecked_.
 
 
 HAROLD. Friends, in that last inhospitable plunge
 Our boat hath burst her ribs; but ours are whole;
 I have but bark'd my hands.
 
 ATTENDANT.                  I dug mine into
 My old fast friend the shore, and clinging thus
 Felt the remorseless outdraught of the deep
 Haul like a great strong fellow at my legs,
 And then I rose and ran. The blast that came
 So suddenly hath fallen as suddenly--
 Put thou the comet and this blast together--
 
 HAROLD. Put thou thyself and mother-wit together.
 Be not a fool!
 
     _Enter_ FISHERMEN _with torches_, HAROLD _going
     up to one of them_, ROLF.
 
                Wicked sea-will-o'-the-wisp!
 Wolf of the shore! dog, with thy lying lights
 Thou hast betray'd us on these rocks of thine!
 
 ROLF. Ay, but thou liest as loud as the black herring-pond behind
 thee. We be fishermen; I came to see after my nets.
 
 HAROLD. To drag us into them. Fishermen? devils!
 Who, while ye fish for men with your false fires,
 Let the great Devil fish for your own souls.
 
 ROLF. Nay then, we be liker the blessed Apostles; _they_ were fishers
 of men, Father Jean says.
 
 HAROLD. I had liefer that the fish had swallowed me,
 Like Jonah, than have known there were such devils.
 What's to be done?
                       [_To his_ MEN--_goes apart with them_.
 
 FISHERMAN. Rolf, what fish did swallow Jonah?
 
 ROLF. A whale!
 
 FISHERMAN. Then a whale to a whelk we have swallowed the King of
 England. I saw him over there. Look thee, Rolf, when I was down in the
 fever, _she_ was down with the hunger, and thou didst stand by her and
 give her thy crabs, and set her up again, till now, by the patient
 Saints, she's as crabb'd as ever.
 
 ROLF. And I'll give her my crabs again, when thou art down again.
 
 FISHERMAN. I thank thee, Rolf. Run thou to Count Guy; he is hard at
 hand. Tell him what hath crept into our creel, and he will fee thee as
 freely as he will wrench this outlander's ransom out of him--and why
 not? for what right had he to get himself wrecked on another man's
 land?
 
 ROLF. Thou art the human-heartedest, Christian-charitiest of all
 crab-catchers. Share and share alike!
                                          [_Exit_.
 
 HAROLD (_to_ FISHERMAN).
 Fellow, dost thou catch crabs?
 
 FISHERMAN. As few as I may in a wind, and less than I would in a calm.
 Ay!
 
 HAROLD. I have a mind that thou shalt catch no more.
 
 FISHERMAN. How?
 
 HAROLD. I have a mind to brain thee with mine axe.
 
 FISHERMAN. Ay, do, do, and our great Count-crab will make his nippers
 meet in thine heart; he'll sweat it out of thee, he'll sweat it out of
 thee. Look, he's here! He'll speak for himself! Hold thine own, if
 thou canst!
 
     _Enter_ GUY, COUNT OF PONTHIEU.
 
 HAROLD. Guy, Count of Ponthieu?
 
 GUY.                            Harold, Earl of Wessex!
 
 HAROLD. Thy villains with their lying lights have wreck'd us!
 
 GUY. Art thou not Earl of Wessex?
 
 HAROLD.                           In mine earldom
 A man may hang gold bracelets on a bush,
 And leave them for a year, and coming back
 Find them again.
 
 GUY.             Thou art a mighty man
 In thine own earldom!
 
 HAROLD.               Were such murderous liars
 In Wessex--if I caught them, they should hang
 Cliff-gibbeted for sea-marks; our sea-mew
 Winging their only wail!
 
 GUY.                     Ay, but my men
 Hold that the shipwreckt are accursed of God;--
 What hinders me to hold with mine own men?
 
 HAROLD. The Christian manhood of the man who reigns!
 
 GUY. Ay, rave thy worst, but in our oubliettes
 Thou shalt or rot or ransom. Hale him hence!
     [_To one of his_ ATTENDANTS.
 Fly thou to William; tell him we have Harold.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--BAYEUX. PALACE.
 
 COUNT WILLIAM _and_ WILLIAM MALET.
 
 
 WILLIAM. We hold our Saxon woodcock in the springe,
 But he begins to flutter. As I think
 He was thine host in England when I went
 To visit Edward.
 
 MALET.           Yea, and there, my lord,
 To make allowance for their rougher fashions,
 I found him all a noble host should be.
 
 WILLIAM. Thou art his friend: thou know'st my claim on England
 Thro' Edward's promise: we have him in the toils.
 And it were well, if thou shouldst let him feel,
 How dense a fold of danger nets him round,
 So that he bristle himself against my will.
 
 MALET. What would I do, my lord, if I were you?
 
 WILLIAM. What wouldst thou do?
 
 MALET.                         My lord, he is thy guest.
 
 WILLIAM. Nay, by the splendour of God, no guest of mine.
 He came not to see me, had past me by
 To hunt and hawk elsewhere, save for the fate
 Which hunted _him_ when that un-Saxon blast,
 And bolts of thunder moulded in high heaven
 To serve the Norman purpose, drave and crack'd
 His boat on Ponthieu beach; where our friend Guy
 Had wrung his ransom from him by the rack,
 But that I slept between and purchased him,
 Translating his captivity from Guy
 To mine own hearth at Bayeux, where he sits
 My ransom'd prisoner.
 
 MALET.                Well, if not with gold,
 With golden deeds and iron strokes that brought
 Thy war with Brittany to a goodlier close
 Than else had been, he paid his ransom back.
 
 WILLIAM. So that henceforth they are not like to league
 With Harold against _me_.
 
 MALET.                    A marvel, how
 He from the liquid sands of Coesnon
 Haled thy shore-swallow'd, armour'd Normans up
 To fight for thee again!
 
 WILLIAM.                 Perchance against
 Their saver, save thou save him from himself.
 
 MALET. But I should let him home again, my lord.
 
 WILLIAM. Simple! let fly the bird within the hand,
 To catch the bird again within the bush!
 No.
 Smooth thou my way, before he clash with me;
 I want his voice in England for the crown,
 I want thy voice with him to bring him round;
 And being brave he must be subtly cow'd,
 And being truthful wrought upon to swear
 Vows that he dare not break. England our own
 Thro' Harold's help, he shall be my dear friend
 As well as thine, and thou thyself shalt have
 Large lordship there of lands and territory.
 
 MALET. I knew thy purpose; he and Wulfnoth never
 Have met, except in public; shall they meet
 In private? I have often talk'd with Wulfnoth,
 And stuff'd the boy with fears that these may act
 On Harold when they meet.
 
 WILLIAM.                  Then let them meet!
 
 MALET. I can but love this noble, honest Harold.
 
 WILLIAM. Love him! why not? thine is a loving office,
 I have commission'd thee to save the man:
 Help the good ship, showing the sunken rock,
 Or he is wreckt for ever.
 
     _Enter_ WILLIAM RUFUS.
 
 WILLIAM RUFUS.            Father.
 
 WILLIAM.                          Well, boy.
 
 WILLIAM RUFUS. They have taken away the toy thou gavest me,
 The Norman knight.
 
 WILLIAM.           Why, boy?
 
 WILLIAM RUFUS.                Because I broke
 The horse's leg--it was mine own to break;
 I like to have my toys, and break them too.
 
 WILLIAM. Well, thou shalt have another Norman knight!
 
 WILLIAM RUFUS. And may I break his legs?
 
 WILLIAM.                                 Yea,--get thee gone!
 
 WILLIAM RUFUS. I'll tell them I have had my way with thee.
                                                       [_Exit_.
 
 MALET. I never knew thee check thy will for ought
 Save for the prattling of thy little ones.
 
 WILLIAM. Who shall be kings of England. I am heir
 Of England by the promise of her king.
 
 MALET. But there the great Assembly choose their king,
 The choice of England is the voice of England.
 
 WILLIAM. I will be king of England by the laws,
 The choice, and voice of England.
 
 MALET.                            Can that be?
 
 WILLIAM. The voice of any people is the sword
 That guards them, or the sword that beats them down.
 Here comes the would-be what I will be ... king-like ...
 Tho' scarce at ease; for, save our meshes break,
 More kinglike he than like to prove a king.
 
     _Enter_ HAROLD, _musing, with his eyes on the ground_.
 
 He sees me not--and yet he dreams of me.
 Earl, wilt thou fly my falcons this fair day?
 They are of the best, strong-wing'd against the wind.
 
 HAROLD (_looking up suddenly, having caught but the last word_).
 _Which_ way does it blow?
 
 WILLIAM.                  Blowing for England, ha?
 Not yet. Thou hast not learnt thy quarters here.
 The winds so cross and jostle among these towers.
 
 HAROLD. Count of the Normans, thou hast ransom'd us,
 Maintain'd, and entertain'd us royally!
 
 WILLIAM. And thou for us hast fought as loyally,
 Which binds us friendship-fast for ever!
 
 HAROLD.                                  Good!
 But lest we turn the scale of courtesy
 By too much pressure on it, I would fain,
 Since thou hast promised Wulfnoth home with us,
 Be home again with Wulfnoth.
 
 WILLIAM. Stay--as yet
 Thou hast but seen how Norman hands can strike,
 But walk'd our Norman field, scarce touch'd or tasted
 The splendours of our Court.
 
 HAROLD.                      I am in no mood:
 I should be as the shadow of a cloud
 Crossing your light.
 
 WILLIAM.             Nay, rest a week or two,
 And we will fill thee full of Norman sun,
 And send thee back among thine island mists
 With laughter.
 
 HAROLD.        Count, I thank thee, but had rather
 Breathe the free wind from off our Saxon downs,
 Tho' charged with all the wet of all the west.
 
 WILLIAM. Why if thou wilt, so let it be--thou shalt.
 That were a graceless hospitality
 To chain the free guest to the banquet-board;
 To-morrow we will ride with thee to Harfleur,
 And see thee shipt, and pray in thy behalf
 For happier homeward winds than that which crack'd
 Thy bark at Ponthieu,--yet to us, in faith,
 A happy one--whereby we came to know
 Thy valour and thy value, noble earl.
 Ay, and perchance a happy one for thee,
 Provided--I will go with thee to-morrow--
 Nay--but there be conditions, easy ones,
 So thou, fair friend, will take them easily.
 
     _Enter_ PAGE.
 
 PAGE. My lord, there is a post from over seas
 With news for thee.    [_Exit_ PAGE.
 
 WILLIAM. Come, Malet, let us hear!
 
                    [_Exeunt_ COUNT WILLIAM _and_ MALET.
 
 HAROLD. Conditions? What conditions? pay him back
 His ransom? 'easy '--that were easy--nay--
 No money-lover he! What said the King?
 'I pray you do not go to Normandy.'
 And fate hath blown me hither, bound me too
 With bitter obligation to the Count--
 Have I not fought it out? What did he mean?
 There lodged a gleaming grimness in his eyes,
 Gave his shorn smile the lie. The walls oppress me,
 And yon huge keep that hinders half the heaven.
 Free air! free field!
                [_Moves to go out. A_ MAN-AT-ARMS _follows him_.
 
 HAROLD (_to the_ MAN-AT-ARMS).
 I need thee not. Why dost thou follow me?
 
 MAN-AT-ARMS. I have the Count's commands to follow thee.
 
 HAROLD. What then? Am I in danger in this court?
 
 MAN-AT-ARMS. I cannot tell. I have the Count's commands.
 
 HAROLD. Stand out of earshot then, and keep me still
 In eyeshot.
 
 MAN-AT-ARMS. Yea, lord Harold.    [_Withdraws_.
 
 HAROLD.                        And arm'd men
 Ever keep watch beside my chamber door,
 And if I walk within the lonely wood,
 There is an arm'd man ever glides behind!
 
     _Enter_ MALET.
 
 Why am I follow'd, haunted, harass'd, watch'd?
 See yonder!    [_Pointing to the_ MAN-AT-ARMS.
 
 MALET.      'Tis the good Count's care for thee!
 The Normans love thee not, nor thou the Normans,
 Or--so they deem.
 
 HAROLD.           But wherefore is the wind,
 Which way soever the vane-arrow swing,
 Not ever fair for England? Why but now
 He said (thou heardst him) that I must not hence
 Save on conditions.
 
 MALET.              So in truth he said.
 
 HAROLD. Malet, thy mother was an Englishwoman;
 There somewhere beats an English pulse in thee!
 
 MALET. Well--for my mother's sake I love your England,
 But for my father I love Normandy.
 
 HAROLD. Speak for thy mother's sake, and tell me true.
 
 MALET. Then for my mother's sake, and England's sake
 That suffers in the daily want of thee,
 Obey the Count's conditions, my good friend.
 
 HAROLD. How, Malet, if they be not honourable!
 
 MALET. Seem to obey them.
 
 HAROLD.                   Better die than lie!
 
 MALET. Choose therefore whether thou wilt have thy conscience
 White as a maiden's hand, or whether England
 Be shatter'd into fragments.
 
 HAROLD.                      News from England?
 
 MALET. Morcar and Edwin have stirr'd up the Thanes
 Against thy brother Tostig's governance;
 And all the North of Humber is one storm.
 
 HAROLD. I should be there, Malet, I should be there!
 
 MALET. And Tostig in his own hall on suspicion
 Hath massacred the Thane that was his guest,
 Gamel, the son of Orm: and there be more
 As villainously slain.
 
 HAROLD.                The wolf! the beast!
 Ill news for guests, ha, Malet! More? What more?
 What do they say? did Edward know of this?
 
 MALET. They say, his wife was knowing and abetting.
 
 HAROLD. They say, his wife!--To marry and have no husband
 Makes the wife fool. My God, I should be there.
 I'll hack my way to the sea.
 
 MALET.                       Thou canst not, Harold;
 Our Duke is all between thee and the sea,
 Our Duke is all about thee like a God;
 All passes block'd. Obey him, speak him fair,
 For he is only debonair to those
 That follow where he leads, but stark as death
 To those that cross him.--Look thou, here is Wulfnoth!
 I leave thee to thy talk with him alone;
 How wan, poor lad! how sick and sad for home!
                                          [_Exit_ MALET.
 
 HAROLD (_muttering_).
 Go not to Normandy--go not to Normandy!
 
     _Enter_ WULFNOTH.
 
 Poor brother! still a hostage!
 
 WULFNOTH.                      Yea, and I
 Shall see the dewy kiss of dawn no more
 Make blush the maiden-white of our tall cliffs,
 Nor mark the sea-bird rouse himself and hover
 Above the windy ripple, and fill the sky
 With free sea-laughter--never--save indeed
 Thou canst make yield this iron-mooded Duke
 To let me go.
 
 HAROLD.       Why, brother, so he will;
 But on conditions. Canst thou guess at them?
 
 WULFNOTH. Draw nearer,--I was in the corridor,
 I saw him coming with his brother Odo
 The Bayeux bishop, and I hid myself.
 
 HAROLD. They did thee wrong who made thee hostage; thou
 Wast ever fearful.
 
 WULFNOTH.          And he spoke--I heard him--
 'This Harold is not of the royal blood,
 Can have no right to the crown,' and Odo said,
 'Thine is the right, for thine the might; he is here,
 And yonder is thy keep.'
 
 HAROLD.                  No, Wulfnoth, no.
 
 WULFNOTH. And William laugh'd and swore that might was right,
 Far as he knew in this poor world of ours--
 'Marry, the Saints must go 'along with us,
 And, brother, we will find a way,' said he--
 Yea, yea, he would be king of England.
 
 HAROLD. Never!
 
 WULFNOTH.      Yea, but thou must not this way answer _him_.
 
 HAROLD. Is it not better still to speak the truth?
 
 WULFNOTH. Not here, or thou wilt never hence nor I:
 For in the racing toward this golden goal
 He turns not right or left, but tramples flat
 Whatever thwarts him; hast thou never heard
 His savagery at Alencon,--the town
 Hung out raw hides along their walls, and cried
 'Work for the tanner.'
 
 HAROLD.                That had anger'd _me_
 Had I been William.
 
 WULFNOTH.           Nay, but he had prisoners,
 He tore their eyes out, sliced their hands away,
 And flung them streaming o'er the battlements
 Upon the heads of those who walk'd within--
 O speak him fair, Harold, for thine own sake.
 
 HAROLD. Your Welshman says, 'The Truth against the World,'
 Much more the truth against myself.
 
 WULFNOTH.                           Thyself?
 But for my sake, oh brother! oh! for my sake!
 
 HAROLD. Poor Wulfnoth! do they not entreat thee well?
 
 WULFNOTH. I see the blackness of my dungeon loom
 Across their lamps of revel, and beyond
 The merriest murmurs of their banquet clank
 The shackles that will bind me to the wall.
 
 HAROLD. Too fearful still!
 
 WULFNOTH. Oh no, no--speak him fair!
 Call it to temporize; and not to lie;
 Harold, I do not counsel thee to lie.
 The man that hath to foil a murderous aim
 May, surely, play with words.
 
 HAROLD. Words are the man.
 Not ev'n for thy sake, brother, would I lie.
 
 WULFNOTH. Then for thine Edith?
 
 HAROLD. There thou prick'st me deep.
 
 WULFNOTH. And for our Mother England?
 
 HAROLD. Deeper still.
 
 WULFNOTH. And deeper still the deep-down oubliette,
 Down thirty feet below the smiling day--
 In blackness--dogs' food thrown upon thy head.
 And over thee the suns arise and set,
 And the lark sings, the sweet stars come and go,
 And men are at their markets, in their fields,
 And woo their loves and have forgotten thee;
 And thou art upright in thy living grave,
 Where there is barely room to shift thy side,
 And all thine England hath forgotten thee;
 And he our lazy-pious Norman King,
 With all his Normans round him once again,
 Counts his old beads, and hath forgotten thee.
 
 HAROLD. Thou art of my blood, and so methinks, my boy,
 Thy fears infect me beyond reason. Peace!
 
 WULFNOTH. And then our fiery Tostig, while thy hands
 Are palsied here, if his Northumbrians rise
 And hurl him from them,--I have heard the Normans
 Count upon this confusion--may he not make
 A league with William, so to bring him back?
 
 HAROLD. That lies within the shadow of the chance.
 
 WULFNOTH. And like a river in flood thro' a burst dam
 Descends the ruthless Norman--our good King
 Kneels mumbling some old bone--our helpless folk
 Are wash'd away, wailing, in their own blood--
 
 HAROLD. Wailing! not warring? Boy, thou hast forgotten
 That thou art English.
 
 WULFNOTH.              Then our modest women--
 I know the Norman license--thine own Edith--
 
 HAROLD. No more! I will not hear thee--William comes.
 
 WULFNOTH. I dare not well be seen in talk with thee.
 Make thou not mention that I spake with thee.
                         [_Moves away to the back of the stage_.
 
     _Enter_ WILLIAM, MALET, _and_ OFFICER.
 
 OFFICER. We have the man that rail'd against thy birth.
 
 WILLIAM. Tear out his tongue.
 
 OFFICER. He shall not rail again.
 He said that he should see confusion fall
 On thee and on thine house.
 
 WILLIAM. Tear out his eyes, And plunge him into prison.
 
 OFFICER. It shall be done.
                               [_Exit_ OFFICER.
 
 WILLIAM. Look not amazed, fair earl! Better leave undone
 Than do by halves--tongueless and eyeless, prison'd--
 
 HAROLD. Better methinks have slain the man at once!
 
 WILLIAM. We have respect for man's immortal soul,
 We seldom take man's life, except in war;
 It frights the traitor more to maim and blind.
 
 HAROLD. In mine own land I should have scorn'd the man,
 Or lash'd his rascal back, and let him go.
 
 WILLIAM. And let him go? To slander thee again!
 Yet in thine own land in thy father's day
 They blinded my young kinsman, Alfred--ay,
 Some said it was thy father's deed.
 
 HAROLD. They lied.
 
 WILLIAM. But thou and he--whom at thy word, for thou
 Art known a speaker of the truth, I free
 From this foul charge--
 
 HAROLD. Nay, nay, he freed himself
 By oath and compurgation from the charge.
 The king, the lords, the people clear'd him of it.
 
 WILLIAM. But thou and he drove our good Normans out
 From England, and this rankles in us yet.
 Archbishop Robert hardly scaped with life.
 
 HAROLD. Archbishop Robert! Robert the Archbishop!
 Robert of Jumieges, he that--
 
 MALET.                       Quiet! quiet!
 
 HAROLD. Count! if there sat within the Norman chair
 A ruler all for England--one who fill'd
 All offices, all bishopricks with English--
 We could not move from Dover to the Humber
 Saving thro' Norman bishopricks--I say
 Ye would applaud that Norman who should drive
 The stranger to the fiends!
 
 WILLIAM. Why, that is reason!
 Warrior thou art, and mighty wise withal!
 Ay, ay, but many among our Norman lords
 Hate thee for this, and press upon me--saying
 God and the sea have given thee to our hands--
 To plunge thee into life-long prison here:--
 Yet I hold out against them, as I may,
 Yea--would hold out, yea, tho' they should revolt--
 For thou hast done the battle in my cause;
 I am thy fastest friend in Normandy.
 
 HAROLD. I am doubly bound to thee ... if this be so.
 
 WILLIAM. And I would bind thee more, and would myself
 Be bounden to thee more.
 
 HAROLD. Then let me hence With Wulfnoth to King Edward.
 
 WILLIAM. So we will. We hear he hath not long to live.
 
 HAROLD. It may be.
 
 WILLIAM. Why then the heir of England, who is he?
 
 HAROLD. The Atheling is nearest to the throne.
 
 WILLIAM. But sickly, slight, half-witted and a child,
 Will England have him king?
 
 HAROLD.                     It may be, no.
 
 WILLIAM. And hath King Edward not pronounced his heir?
 
 HAROLD. Not that I know.
 
 WILLIAM. When he was here in Normandy,
 He loved us and we him, because we found him.
 A Norman of the Normans.
 
 HAROLD.                  So did we.
 
 WILLIAM. A gentle, gracious, pure and saintly man!
 And grateful to the hand that shielded him,
 He promised that if ever he were king
 In England, he would give his kingly voice
 To me as his successor. Knowest thou this?
 
 HAROLD. I learn it now.
 
 WILLIAM.                Thou knowest I am his cousin,
 And that my wife descends from Alfred?
 
 HAROLD.                                Ay.
 
 WILLIAM. Who hath a better claim then to the crown
 So that ye will not crown the Atheling?
 
 HAROLD. None that I know ... if that but hung upon
 King Edward's will.
 
 WILLIAM. Wilt thou uphold my claim?
 
 MALET (_aside to_ HAROLD).
 Be careful of thine answer, my good friend.
 
 WULFNOTH (_aside to_ HAROLD).
 Oh! Harold, for my sake and for thine own!
 
 HAROLD. Ay ... if the king have not revoked his promise.
 
 WILLIAM. But hath he done it then?
 
 HAROLD. Not that I know.
 
 WILLIAM. Good, good, and thou wilt help me to the crown?
 
 HAROLD. Ay ... if the Witan will consent to this.
 
 WILLIAM. Thou art the mightiest voice in England, man,
 Thy voice will lead the Witan--shall I have it?
 
 WULFNOTH (_aside to_ HAROLD).
 Oh! Harold, if thou love thine Edith, ay.
 
 HAROLD. Ay, if--
 
 MALET (_aside to_ HAROLD).
 Thine 'ifs' will sear thine eyes out--ay.
 
 WILLIAM. I ask thee, wilt thou help me to the crown?
 And I will make thee my great Earl of Earls,
 Foremost in England and in Normandy;
 Thou shalt be verily king--all but the name--
 For I shall most sojourn in Normandy;
 And thou be my vice-king in England. Speak.
 
 WULFNOTH (_aside to_ HAROLD).
 Ay, brother--for the sake of England--ay.
 
 HAROLD. My lord--
 
 MALET (_aside to_ HAROLD).
                  Take heed now.
 
 HAROLD.                         Ay.
 
 WILLIAM.                            I am content,
 For thou art truthful, and thy word thy bond.
 To-morrow will we ride with thee to Harfleur.
                                       [_Exit_ WILLIAM.
 
 MALET. Harold, I am thy friend, one life with thee,
 And even as I should bless thee saving mine,
 I thank thee now for having saved thyself.
                                       [_Exit_ MALET.
 
 HAROLD. For having lost myself to save myself,
 Said 'ay' when I meant 'no,' lied like a lad
 That dreads the pendent scourge, said 'ay' for 'no'!
 Ay! No!--he hath not bound me by an oath--
 Is 'ay' an oath? is 'ay' strong as an oath?
 Or is it the same sin to break my word
 As break mine oath? He call'd my word my bond!
 He is a liar who knows I am a liar,
 And makes believe that he believes my word--
 The crime be on his head--not bounden--no.
 
     [_Suddenly doors are flung open, discovering in an
     inner hall_ COUNT WILLIAM _in his state robes,
     seated upon his throne, between two_ BISHOPS,
     ODO OP BAYEUX _being one: in the centre of
     the hall an ark covered with cloth of gold;
     and on either side of it the_ NORMAN BARONS.
 
     _Enter a_ JAILOR _before_ WILLIAM'S _throne_.
 
 WILLIAM (_to_ JAILOR).
 Knave, hast thou let thy prisoner scape?
 
 JAILOR.                                  Sir Count,
 He had but one foot, he must have hopt away,
 Yea, some familiar spirit must have help'd him.
 
 WILLIAM. Woe knave to thy familiar and to thee!
 Give me thy keys.    [_They fall clashing_.
 Nay let them lie. Stand there and wait my will.
 
                            [_The_ JAILOR _stands aside_.
 
 WILLIAM (_to_ HAROLD).
 Hast thou such trustless jailors in thy North?
 
 HAROLD. We have few prisoners in mine earldom there,
 So less chance for false keepers.
 
 WILLIAM.                          We have heard
 Of thy just, mild, and equal governance;
 Honour to thee! thou art perfect in all honour!
 Thy naked word thy bond! confirm it now
 Before our gather'd Norman baronage,
 For they will not believe thee--as I believe.
         [_Descends from his throne and stands by the ark_.
 Let all men here bear witness of our bond!
         [_Beckons to_ HAROLD, _who advances_.
 
     _Enter_ MALET _behind him_.
 
 Lay thou thy hand upon this golden pall!
 Behold the jewel of St. Pancratius
 Woven into the gold. Swear thou on this!
 
 HAROLD. What should I swear? Why should I swear on this?
 
 WILLIAM (_savagely_).
 Swear thou to help me to the crown of England.
 
 MALET (_whispering_ HAROLD).
 My friend, thou hast gone too far to palter now.
 
 WULFNOTH (_whispering_ HAROLD).
 Swear thou to-day, to-morrow is thine own.
 
 HAROLD. I swear to help thee to the crown of England ...
 According as King Edward promises.
 
 WILLIAM. Thou must swear absolutely, noble Earl.
 
 MALET (_whispering_).
 Delay is death to thee, ruin to England.
 
 WULFNOTH (_whispering_).
 Swear, dearest brother, I beseech thee, swear!
 
 HAROLD (_putting his hand on the jewel_).
 I swear to help thee to the crown of England.
 
 WILLIAM. Thanks, truthful Earl; I did not doubt thy word,
 But that my barons might believe thy word,
 And that the Holy Saints of Normandy
 When thou art home in England, with thine own,
 Might strengthen thee in keeping of thy word,
 I made thee swear.--Show him by whom he hath sworn.
 
     [_The two_ BISHOPS _advance, and raise the cloth of gold.
     The bodies and bones of Saints are seen lying in the ark_.
 
 The holy bones of all the Canonised
 From all the holiest shrines in Normandy!
 
 HAROLD. Horrible!    [_They let the cloth fall again_.
 
 WILLIAM. Ay, for thou hast sworn an oath
 Which, if not kept, would make the hard earth rive
 To the very Devil's horns, the bright sky cleave
 To the very feet of God, and send her hosts
 Of injured Saints to scatter sparks of plague
 Thro' all your cities, blast your infants, dash
 The torch of war among your standing corn,
 Dabble your hearths with your own blood.--Enough!
 Thou wilt not break it! I, the Count--the King--
 Thy friend--am grateful for thine honest oath,
 Not coming fiercely like a conqueror, now,
 But softly as a bridegroom to his own.
 For I shall rule according to your laws,
 And make your ever-jarring Earldoms move
 To music and in order--Angle, Jute,
 Dane, Saxon, Norman, help to build a throne
 Out-towering hers of France.... The wind is fair
 For England now.... To-night we will be merry.
 To-morrow will I ride with thee to Harfleur.
 
        [_Exeunt_ WILLIAM _and all the_ NORMAN BARONS, _etc_.
 
 HAROLD. To-night we will be merry--and to-morrow--
 Juggler and bastard--bastard--he hates that most--
 William the tanner's bastard! Would he heard me!
 O God, that I were in some wide, waste field
 With nothing but my battle-axe and him
 To spatter his brains! Why let earth rive, gulf in
 These cursed Normans--yea and mine own self.
 Cleave heaven, and send thy saints that I may say
 Ev'n to their faces, 'If ye side with William
 Ye are not noble.' How their pointed fingers
 Glared at me! Am I Harold, Harold, son
 Of our great Godwin? Lo! I touch mine arms,
 My limbs--they are not mine--they are a liar's--
 I mean to be a liar--I am not bound--
 Stigand shall give me absolution for it--
 Did the chest move? did it move? I am utter craven!
 O Wulfnoth, Wulfnoth, brother, thou hast betray'd me!
 
 WULFNOTH. Forgive me, brother, I will live here and die.
 
     _Enter_ PAGE.
 
 PAGE. My lord! the Duke awaits thee at the banquet.
 
 HAROLD. Where they eat dead men's flesh, and drink their blood.
 
 PAGE. My lord--
 
 HAROLD.        I know your Norman cookery is so spiced,
 It masks all this.
 
 PAGE.              My lord! thou art white as death.
 
 HAROLD. With looking on the dead. Am I so white?
 Thy Duke will seem the darker. Hence, I follow.
 
                                          [_Exeunt_.
 
 
 
 
 ACT III.
 
 
 SCENE I.--THE KING'S PALACE. LONDON.
 
 KING EDWARD _dying on a couch, and by him standing the_ QUEEN, HAROLD,
 ARCHBISHOP STIGAND, GURTH, LEOFWIN, ARCHBISHOP ALDRED, ALDWYTH, _and_
 EDITH.
 
 
 STIGAND. Sleeping or dying there? If this be death,
 Then our great Council wait to crown thee King--
 Come hither, I have a power;    [_To_ HAROLD.
 They call me near, for I am close to thee
 And England--I, old shrivell'd Stigand, I,
 Dry as an old wood-fungus on a dead tree,
 I have a power!
 See here this little key about my neck!
 There lies a treasure buried down in Ely:
 If e'er the Norman grow too hard for thee,
 Ask me for this at thy most need, son Harold,
 At thy most need--not sooner.
 
 HAROLD.                       So I will.
 
 STIGAND. Red gold--a hundred purses--yea, and more!
 If thou canst make a wholesome use of these
 To chink against the Norman, I do believe
 My old crook'd spine would bud out two young wings
 To fly to heaven straight with.
 
 HAROLD.                         Thank thee, father!
 Thou art English, Edward too is English now,
 He hath clean repented of his Normanism.
 
 STIGAND. Ay, as the libertine repents who cannot
 Make done undone, when thro' his dying sense
 Shrills 'lost thro' thee.' They have built their castles here;
 Our priories are Norman; the Norman adder
 Hath bitten us; we are poison'd: our dear England
 Is demi-Norman. He!--
                   [_Pointing to_ KING EDWARD, _sleeping_.
 
 HAROLD.              I would I were
 As holy and as passionless as he!
 That I might rest as calmly! Look at him--
 The rosy face, and long down-silvering beard,
 The brows unwrinkled as a summer mere.--
 
 STIGAND. A summer mere with sudden wreckful gusts
 From a side-gorge. Passionless? How he flamed
 When Tostig's anger'd earldom flung him, nay,
 He fain had calcined all Northumbria
 To one black ash, but that thy patriot passion
 Siding with our great Council against Tostig,
 Out-passion'd his! Holy? ay, ay, forsooth,
 A conscience for his own soul, not his realm;
 A twilight conscience lighted thro' a chink;
 Thine by the sun; nay, by some sun to be,
 When all the world hath learnt to speak the truth,
 And lying were self-murder by that state
 Which was the exception.
 
 HAROLD.                  That sun may God speed!
 
 STIGAND. Come, Harold, shake the cloud off!
 
 HAROLD.                                     Can I, father?
 Our Tostig parted cursing me and England;
 Our sister hates us for his banishment;
 He hath gone to kindle Norway against England,
 And Wulfnoth is alone in Normandy.
 For when I rode with William down to Harfleur,
 'Wulfnoth is sick,' he said; 'he cannot follow;'
 Then with that friendly-fiendly smile of his,
 'We have learnt to love him, let him a little longer
 Remain a hostage for the loyalty
 Of Godwin's house.' As far as touches Wulfnoth
 I that so prized plain word and naked truth
 Have sinn'd against it--all in vain.
 
 LEOFWIN.                             Good brother,
 By all the truths that ever priest hath preach'd,
 Of all the lies that ever men have lied,
 Thine is the pardonablest.
 
 HAROLD.                    May be so!
 I think it so, I think I am a fool
 To think it can be otherwise than so.
 
 STIGAND. Tut, tut, I have absolved thee: dost thou scorn me,
 Because I had my Canterbury pallium,
 From one whom they dispoped?
 
 HAROLD.                      No, Stigand, no!
 
 STIGAND. Is naked truth actable in true life?
 I have heard a saying of thy father Godwin,
 That, were a man of state nakedly true,
 Men would but take him for the craftier liar.
 
 LEOFWIN. Be men less delicate than the Devil himself?
 I thought that naked Truth would shame the Devil,
 The Devil is so modest.
 
 GURTH.                  He never said it!
 
 LEOFWIN. Be thou not stupid-honest, brother Gurth!
 
 HAROLD. Better to be a liar's dog, and hold
 My master honest, than believe that lying
 And ruling men are fatal twins that cannot
 Move one without the other. Edward wakes!--
 Dazed--he hath seen a vision.
 
 EDWARD.                       The green tree!
 Then a great Angel past along the highest
 Crying 'the doom of England,' and at once
 He stood beside me, in his grasp a sword
 Of lightnings, wherewithal he cleft the tree
 From off the bearing trunk, and hurl'd it from him
 Three fields away, and then he dash'd and drench'd,
 He dyed, he soak'd the trunk with human blood,
 And brought the sunder'd tree again, and set it
 Straight on the trunk, that thus baptized in blood
 Grew ever high and higher, beyond my seeing,
 And shot out sidelong boughs across the deep
 That dropt themselves, and rooted in far isles
 Beyond my seeing: and the great Angel rose
 And past again along the highest crying
 'The doom of England!'--Tostig, raise my head!
                                   [_Falls back senseless_.
 
 HAROLD (_raising him_).
 Let Harold serve for Tostig!
 
 _QUEEN_.                     Harold served
 Tostig so ill, he cannot serve for Tostig!
 Ay, raise his head, for thou hast laid it low!
 The sickness of our saintly king, for whom
 My prayers go up as fast as my tears fall,
 I well believe, hath mainly drawn itself
 From lack of Tostig--thou hast banish'd him.
 
 HAROLD. Nay--but the council, and the king himself.
 
 QUEEN. Thou hatest him, hatest him.
 
 HAROLD (_coldly_).
                                     Ay--Stigand, unriddle
 This vision, canst thou?
 
 STIGAND.                 Dotage!
 
 EDWARD (_starting up_).
                                  It is finish'd.
 I have built the Lord a house--the Lord hath dwelt
 In darkness. I have built the Lord a house--
 Palms, flowers, pomegranates, golden cherubim
 With twenty-cubit wings from wall to wall--
 I have built the Lord a house--sing, Asaph! clash
 The cymbal, Heman! blow the trumpet, priest!
 Fall, cloud, and fill the house--lo! my two pillars,
 Jachin and Boaz!--    [_Seeing_ HAROLD _and_ GURTH.
 Harold, Gurth,--where am I?
 Where is the charter of our Westminster?
 
 STIGAND. It lies beside thee, king, upon thy bed.
 
 EDWARD. Sign, sign at once--take, sign it, Stigand, Aldred!
 Sign it, my good son Harold, Gurth, and Leofwin,
 Sign it, my queen!
 
 ALL.               We have sign'd it.
 
 EDWARD.                               It is finish'd!
 The kingliest Abbey in all Christian lands,
 The lordliest, loftiest minster ever built
 To Holy Peter in our English isle!
 Let me be buried there, and all our kings,
 And all our just and wise and holy men
 That shall be born hereafter. It is finish'd!
 Hast thou had absolution for thine oath?    [_To_ HAROLD.
 
 HAROLD. Stigand hath given me absolution for it.
 
 EDWARD. Stigand is not canonical enough
 To save thee from the wrath of Norman Saints.
 
 STIGAND. Norman enough! Be there no Saints of England
 To help us from their brethren yonder?
 
 EDWARD.                                Prelate,
 The Saints are one, but those of Normanland
 Are mightier than our own. Ask it of Aldred.
                                        [_To_ HAROLD.
 
 ALDRED. It shall be granted him, my king; for he
 Who vows a vow to strangle his own mother
 Is guiltier keeping this, than breaking it.
 
 EDWARD. O friends, I shall not overlive the day.
 
 STIGAND. Why then the throne is empty. Who inherits?
 For tho' we be not bound by the king's voice
 In making of a king, yet the king's voice
 Is much toward his making. Who inherits?
 Edgar the Atheling?
 
 EDWARD.             No, no, but Harold.
 I love him: he hath served me: none but he
 Can rule all England. Yet the curse is on him
 For swearing falsely by those blessed bones;
 He did not mean to keep his vow.
 
 HAROLD.                          Not mean
 To make our England Norman.
 
 EDWARD.                     There spake Godwin,
 Who hated all the Normans; but their Saints
 Have heard thee, Harold.
 
 EDITH.                   Oh! my lord, my king!
 He knew not whom he sware by.
 
 EDWARD.                       Yea, I know
 He knew not, but those heavenly ears have heard,
 Their curse is on him; wilt thou bring another,
 Edith, upon his head?
 
 EDITH.                No, no, not I.
 
 EDWARD. Why then, thou must not wed him.
 
 HAROLD.                                  Wherefore, wherefore?
 
 EDWARD. O son, when thou didst tell me of thine oath,
 I sorrow'd for my random promise given
 To yon fox-lion. I did not dream then
 I should be king.--My son, the Saints are virgins;
 They love the white rose of virginity,
 The cold, white lily blowing in her cell:
 I have been myself a virgin; and I sware
 To consecrate my virgin here to heaven--
 The silent, cloister'd, solitary life,
 A life of life-long prayer against the curse
 That lies on thee and England.
 
 HAROLD.                        No, no, no.
 
 EDWARD. Treble denial of the tongue of flesh,
 Like Peter's when he fell, and thou wilt have
 To wail for it like Peter. O my son!
 Are all oaths to be broken then, all promises
 Made in our agony for help from heaven?
 Son, there is one who loves thee: and a wife,
 What matters who, so she be serviceable
 In all obedience, as mine own hath been:
 God bless thee, wedded daughter.
                   [_Laying his hand on the_ QUEEN'S _head_.
 
 QUEEN.                           Bless thou too
 That brother whom I love beyond the rest,
 My banish'd Tostig.
 
 EDWARD.             All the sweet Saints bless him!
 Spare and forbear him, Harold, if he comes!
 And let him pass unscathed; he loves me, Harold!
 Be kindly to the Normans left among us,
 Who follow'd me for love! and dear son, swear
 When thou art king, to see my solemn vow
 Accomplish'd.
 
 HAROLD.       Nay, dear lord, for I have sworn
 Not to swear falsely twice.
 
 EDWARD.                     Thou wilt not swear?
 
 HAROLD. I cannot.
 
 EDWARD.           Then on thee remains the curse,
 Harold, if thou embrace her: and on thee,
 Edith, if thou abide it,--
 
     [_The_ KING _swoons;_ EDITH _falls and kneels by the couch_.
 
 STIGAND.                  He hath swoon'd!
 Death?... no, as yet a breath.
 
 HAROLD.                        Look up! look up!
 Edith!
 
 ALDRED. Confuse her not; she hath begun
 Her life-long prayer for thee.
 
 ALDWYTH.                       O noble Harold,
 I would thou couldst have sworn.
 
 HAROLD.                          For thine own pleasure?
 
 ALDWYTH. No, but to please our dying king, and those
 Who make thy good their own--all England, Earl.
 
 ALDRED. _I_ would thou couldst have sworn. Our holy king
 Hath given his virgin lamb to Holy Church
 To save thee from the curse.
 
 HAROLD.                      Alas! poor man,
 _His_ promise brought it on me.
 
 ALDRED.                         O good son!
 That knowledge made him all the carefuller
 To find a means whereby the curse might glance
 From thee and England.
 
 HAROLD.                Father, we so loved--
 
 ALDRED. The more the love, the mightier is the prayer;
 The more the love, the more acceptable
 The sacrifice of both your loves to heaven.
 No sacrifice to heaven, no help from heaven;
 That runs thro' all the faiths of all the world.
 And sacrifice there must be, for the king
 Is holy, and hath talk'd with God, and seen
 A shadowing horror; there are signs in heaven--
 
 HAROLD. Your comet came and went.
 
 ALDRED. And signs on earth!
 Knowest thou Senlac hill?
 
 HAROLD. I know all Sussex;
 A good entrenchment for a perilous hour!
 
 ALDRED. Pray God that come not suddenly! There is one
 Who passing by that hill three nights ago--
 He shook so that he scarce could out with it--
 Heard, heard--
 
 HAROLD.       The wind in his hair?
 
 ALDRED.                             A ghostly horn
 Blowing continually, and faint battle-hymns,
 And cries, and clashes, and the groans of men;
 And dreadful shadows strove upon the hill,
 And dreadful lights crept up from out the marsh--
 Corpse-candles gliding over nameless graves--
 
 HAROLD. At Senlac?
 
 ALDRED.            Senlac.
 
 EDWARD (_waking_).
                            Senlac! Sanguelac,
 The Lake of Blood!
 
 STIGAND.           This lightning before death
 Plays on the word,--and Normanizes too!
 
 HAROLD. Hush, father, hush!
 
 EDWARD.                     Thou uncanonical fool,
 Wilt _thou_ play with the thunder? North and South
 Thunder together, showers of blood are blown
 Before a never-ending blast, and hiss
 Against the blaze they cannot quench--a lake,
 A sea of blood--we are drown'd in blood--for God
 Has fill'd the quiver, and Death has drawn the bow--
 Sanguelac! Sanguelac! the arrow! the arrow!    [_Dies_.
 
 STIGAND. It is the arrow of death in his own heart--
 And our great Council wait to crown thee King.
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--IN THE GARDEN. THE KING'S HOUSE NEAR LONDON.
 
 
 EDITH. Crown'd, crown'd and lost, crown'd King--and lost to me!
 
            (_Singing_.)
 
     Two young lovers in winter weather,
       None to guide them,
     Walk'd at night on the misty heather;
     Night, as black as a raven's feather;
     Both were lost and found together,
       None beside them.
 
 That is the burthen of it--lost and found
 Together in the cruel river Swale
 A hundred years ago; and there's another,
 
       Lost, lost, the light of day,
 
 To which the lover answers lovingly
 
       'I am beside thee.'
     Lost, lost, we have lost the way.
       'Love, I will guide thee.'
     Whither, O whither? into the river,
     Where we two may be lost together,
     And lost for ever? 'Oh! never, oh! never,
     Tho' we be lost and be found together.'
 
 Some think they loved within the pale forbidden
 By Holy Church: but who shall say? the truth
 Was lost in that fierce North, where _they_ were lost,
 Where all good things are lost, where Tostig lost
 The good hearts of his people. It is Harold!
 
     _Enter_ HAROLD.
 
 Harold the King!
 
 HAROLD.          Call me not King, but Harold.
 
 EDITH. Nay, thou art King!
 
 HAROLD.                    Thine, thine, or King or churl!
 My girl, thou hast been weeping: turn not thou
 Thy face away, but rather let me be
 King of the moment to thee, and command
 That kiss my due when subject, which will make
 My kingship kinglier to me than to reign
 King of the world without it.
 
 EDITH.                        Ask me not,
 Lest I should yield it, and the second curse
 Descend upon thine head, and thou be only
 King of the moment over England.
 
 HAROLD.                          Edith,
 Tho' somewhat less a king to my true self
 Than ere they crown'd me one, for I have lost
 Somewhat of upright stature thro' mine oath,
 Yet thee I would not lose, and sell not thou
 Our living passion for a dead man's dream;
 Stigand believed he knew not what he spake.
 Oh God! I cannot help it, but at times
 They seem to me too narrow, all the faiths
 Of this grown world of ours, whose baby eye
 Saw them sufficient. Fool and wise, I fear
 This curse, and scorn it. But a little light!--
 And on it falls the shadow of the priest;
 Heaven yield us more! for better, Woden, all
 Our cancell'd warrior-gods, our grim Walhalla,
 Eternal war, than that the Saints at peace
 The Holiest of our Holiest one should be
 This William's fellow-tricksters;--better die
 Than credit this, for death is death, or else
 Lifts us beyond the lie. Kiss me--thou art not
 A holy sister yet, my girl, to fear
 There might be more than brother in my kiss,
 And more than sister in thine own.
 
 EDITH.                             I dare not.
 
 HAROLD. Scared by the church--'Love for a whole life long'
 When was that sung?
 
 EDITH.              Here to the nightingales.
 
 HAROLD. Their anthems of no church, how sweet they are!
 Nor kingly priest, nor priestly king to cross
 Their billings ere they nest.
 
 EDITH.                        They are but of spring,
 They fly the winter change--not so with us--
 No wings to come and go.
 
 HAROLD.                  But wing'd souls flying
 Beyond all change and in the eternal distance
 To settle on the Truth.
 
 EDITH.                  They are not so true,
 They change their mates.
 
 HAROLD.                  Do they? I did not know it.
 
 EDITH. They say thou art to wed the Lady Aldwyth.
 
 HAROLD. They say, they say.
 
 EDITH.                      If this be politic,
 And well for thee and England--and for her--
 Care not for me who love thee.
 
 GURTH (_calling_).             Harold, Harold!
 
 HAROLD. The voice of Gurth! (_Enter_ GURTH.)
                             Good even, my good brother!
 
 GURTH. Good even, gentle Edith.
 
 EDITH.                          Good even, Gurth.
 
 GURTH. Ill news hath come! Our hapless brother, Tostig--
 He, and the giant King of Norway, Harold
 Hardrada--Scotland, Ireland, Iceland, Orkney,
 Are landed North of Humber, and in a field
 So packt with carnage that the dykes and brooks
 Were bridged and damm'd with dead, have overthrown
 Morcar and Edwin.
 
 HAROLD.           Well then, we must fight.
 How blows the wind?
 
 GURTH.              Against St. Valery
 And William.
 
 HAROLD.      Well then, we will to the North.
 
 GURTH. Ay, but worse news: this William sent to Rome,
 Swearing thou swarest falsely by his Saints:
 The Pope and that Archdeacon Hildebrand
 His master, heard him, and have sent him back
 A holy gonfanon, and a blessed hair
 Of Peter, and all France, all Burgundy,
 Poitou, all Christendom is raised against thee;
 He hath cursed thee, and all those who fight for thee,
 And given thy realm of England to the bastard.
 
 HAROLD. Ha! ha!
 
 EDITH. Oh! laugh not!... Strange and ghastly in the gloom
 And shadowing of this double thunder-cloud
 That lours on England--laughter!
 
 HAROLD. No, not strange!
 This was old human laughter in old Rome
 Before a Pope was born, when that which reign'd
 Call'd itself God.--A kindly rendering
 Of 'Render unto Caesar.' ... The Good Shepherd!
 Take this, and render that.
 
 GURTH.                      They have taken York.
 
 HAROLD. The Lord was God and came as man--the Pope
 Is man and comes as God.--York taken?
 
 GURTH.                                Yea,
 Tostig hath taken York!
 
 HAROLD.                 To York then. Edith,
 Hadst thou been braver, I had better braved
 All--but I love thee and thou me--and that
 Remains beyond all chances and all churches,
 And that thou knowest.
 
 EDITH.                 Ay, but take back thy ring.
 It burns my hand--a curse to thee and me.
 I dare not wear it.
             [_Proffers_ HAROLD _the ring, which he takes_.
 
 HAROLD.             But I dare. God with thee!
 
                           [_Exeunt_ HAROLD _and_ GURTH.
 
 EDITH. The King hath cursed him, if he marry me;
 The Pope hath cursed him, marry me or no!
 God help me! I know nothing--can but pray
 For Harold--pray, pray, pray--no help but prayer,
 A breath that fleets beyond this iron world,
 And touches Him that made it.
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV.
 
 
 SCENE I.--IN NORTHUMBRIA.
 
 ARCHBISHOP ALDRED, MORCAR, EDWIN, _and_ FORCES. _Enter_ HAROLD.
 _The standard of the golden Dragon of Wessex preceding him_.
 
 
 HAROLD. What! are thy people sullen from defeat?
 Our Wessex dragon flies beyond the Humber,
 No voice to greet it.
 
 EDWIN.                Let not our great king
 Believe us sullen--only shamed to the quick
 Before the king--as having been so bruised
 By Harold, king of Norway; but our help
 Is Harold, king of England. Pardon us, thou!
 Our silence is our reverence for the king!
 
 HAROLD. Earl of the Mercians! if the truth be gall,
 Cram me not thou with honey, when our good hive
 Needs every sting to save it.
 
 VOICES.                       Aldwyth! Aldwyth!
 
 HAROLD. Why cry thy people on thy sister's name?
 
 MORCAR. She hath won upon our people thro' her beauty,
 And pleasantness among them.
 
 VOICES. Aldwyth, Aldwyth!
 
 HAROLD. They shout as they would have her for a queen.
 
 MORCAR. She hath followed with our host, and suffer'd all.
 
 HAROLD. What would ye, men?
 
 VOICE. Our old Northumbrian crown,
 And kings of our own choosing.
 
 HAROLD.                        Your old crown
 Were little help without our Saxon carles
 Against Hardrada.
 
 VOICE.            Little! we are Danes,
 Who conquer'd what we walk on, our own field.
 
 HAROLD. They have been plotting here!    [_Aside_.
 
 VOICE.                                He calls us little!
 
 HAROLD. The kingdoms of this world began with little,
 A hill, a fort, a city--that reach'd a hand
 Down to the field beneath it, 'Be thou mine,
 Then to the next, 'Thou also!' If the field
 Cried out 'I am mine own;' another hill
 Or fort, or city, took it, and the first
 Fell, and the next became an Empire.
 
 VOICE.                               Yet
 Thou art but a West Saxon: _we_ are Danes!
 
 HAROLD. My mother is a Dane, and I am English;
 There is a pleasant fable in old books,
 Ye take a stick, and break it; bind a score
 All in one faggot, snap it over knee,
 Ye cannot.
 
 VOICE.     Hear King Harold! he says true!
 
 HAROLD. Would ye be Norsemen?
 
 VOICES.                       No!
 
 HAROLD.                           Or Norman?
 
 VOICES.                                      No!
 
 HAROLD. Snap not the faggot-band then.
 
 VOICE.                                 That is true!
 
 VOICE. Ay, but thou art not kingly, only grandson
 To Wulfnoth, a poor cow-herd.
 
 HAROLD.                       This old Wulfnoth
 Would take me on his knees and tell me tales
 Of Alfred and of Athelstan the Great
 Who drove you Danes; and yet he held that Dane,
 Jute, Angle, Saxon, were or should be all
 One England, for this cow-herd, like my father,
 Who shook the Norman scoundrels off the throne,
 Had in him kingly thoughts--a king of men,
 Not made but born, like the great king of all,
 A light among the oxen.
 
 VOICE.                  That is true!
 
 VOICE. Ay, and I love him now, for mine own father
 Was great, and cobbled.
 
 VOICE.                  Thou art Tostig's brother,
 Who wastes the land.
 
 HAROLD.              This brother comes to save
 Your land from waste; I saved it once before,
 For when your people banish'd Tostig hence,
 And Edward would have sent a host against you,
 Then I, who loved my brother, bad the king
 Who doted on him, sanction your decree
 Of Tostig's banishment, and choice of Morcar,
 To help the realm from scattering.
 
 VOICE.                             King! thy brother,
 If one may dare to speak the truth, was wrong'd.
 Wild was he, born so: but the plots against him
 Had madden'd tamer men.
 
 MORCAR.                 Thou art one of those
 Who brake into Lord Tostig's treasure-house
 And slew two hundred of his following,
 And now, when Tostig hath come back with power,
 Are frighted back to Tostig.
 
 OLD THANE.                   Ugh! Plots and feuds!
 This is my ninetieth birthday. Can ye not
 Be brethren? Godwin still at feud with Alfgar,
 And Alfgar hates King Harold. Plots and feuds!
 This is my ninetieth birthday!
 
 HAROLD.                        Old man, Harold
 Hates nothing; not _his_ fault, if our two houses
 Be less than brothers.
 
 VOICES.                Aldwyth, Harold, Aldwyth!
 
 HAROLD. Again! Morcar! Edwin! What do they mean?
 
 EDWIN. So the good king would deign to lend an ear
 Not overscornful, we might chance--perchance--
 To guess their meaning.
 
 MORCAR.                 Thine own meaning, Harold,
 To make all England one, to close all feuds,
 Mixing our bloods, that thence a king may rise
 Half-Godwin and half-Alfgar, one to rule
 All England beyond question, beyond quarrel.
 
 HAROLD. Who sow'd this fancy here among the people?
 
 MORCAR. Who knows what sows itself among the people?
 A goodly flower at times.
 
 HAROLD.                   The Queen of Wales?
 Why, Morcar, it is all but duty in her
 To hate me; I have heard she hates me.
 
 MORCAR.                                No!
 For I can swear to that, but cannot swear
 That these will follow thee against the Norsemen,
 If thou deny them this.
 
 HAROLD.                 Morcar and Edwin,
 When will you cease to plot against my house?
 
 EDWIN. The king can scarcely dream that we, who know
 His prowess in the mountains of the West,
 Should care to plot against him in the North.
 
 MORCAR. Who dares arraign us, king, of such a plot?
 
 HAROLD. Ye heard one witness even now.
 
 MORCAR.                                The craven!
 There is a faction risen again for Tostig,
 Since Tostig came with Norway--fright not love.
 
 HAROLD. Morcar and Edwin, will ye, if I yield,
 Follow against the Norseman?
 
 MORCAR.                      Surely, surely!
 
 HAROLD. Morcar and Edwin, will ye upon oath,
 Help us against the Norman?
 
 MORCAR.                     With good will;
 Yea, take the Sacrament upon it, king.
 
 HAROLD. Where is thy sister?
 
 MORCAR.                      Somewhere hard at hand.
 Call and she comes.
 
     [_One goes out, then enter_ ALDWYTH.
 
 HAROLD.             I doubt not but thou knowest
 Why thou art summon'd.
 
 ALDWYTH.               Why?--I stay with these,
 Lest thy fierce Tostig spy me out alone,
 And flay me all alive.
 
 HAROLD.                Canst thou love one
 Who did discrown thine husband, unqueen thee?
 Didst thou not love thine husband?
 
 ALDWYTH.                           Oh! my lord,
 The nimble, wild, red, wiry, savage king--
 That was, my lord, a match of policy.
 
 HAROLD.                               Was it?
 I knew him brave: he loved his land: he fain
 Had made her great: his finger on her harp
 (I heard him more than once) had in it Wales,
 Her floods, her woods, her hills: had I been his,
 I had been all Welsh.
 
 ALDWYTH.              Oh, ay--all Welsh--and yet
 I saw thee drive him up his hills--and women
 Cling to the conquer'd, if they love, the more;
 If not, they cannot hate the conqueror.
 We never--oh! good Morcar, speak for us,
 His conqueror conquer'd Aldwyth.
 
 HAROLD.                          Goodly news!
 
 MORCAR. Doubt it not thou! Since Griffith's
 head was sent
 To Edward, she hath said it.
 
 HAROLD.                      I had rather
 She would have loved her husband. Aldwyth, Aldwyth,
 Canst thou love me, thou knowing where I love?
 
 ALDWYTH. I can, my lord, for mine own sake, for thine,
 For England, for thy poor white dove, who flutters
 Between thee and the porch, but then would find
 Her nest within the cloister, and be still.
 
 HAROLD. Canst thou love one, who cannot love again?
 
 ALDWYTH. Full hope have I that love will answer love.
 
 HAROLD. Then in the name of the great God, so be it!
 Come, Aldred, join our hands before the hosts,
 That all may see.
 
     [ALDRED _joins the hands of_ HAROLD _and_ ALDWYTH
     _and blesses them_.
 
 VOICES.           Harold, Harold and Aldwyth!
 
 HAROLD. Set forth our golden Dragon, let him flap
 The wings that beat down Wales!
 Advance our Standard of the Warrior,
 Dark among gems and gold; and thou, brave banner,
 Blaze like a night of fatal stars on those
 Who read their doom and die.
 Where lie the Norsemen? on the Derwent? ay
 At Stamford-bridge.
 Morcar, collect thy men; Edwin, my friend--
 Thou lingerest.--Gurth,--
 Last night King Edward came to me in dreams--
 The rosy face and long down-silvering beard--
 He told me I should conquer:--
 I am no woman to put faith in dreams.
     (To his army.)
 Last night King Edward came to me in dreams,
 And told me we should conquer.
 
 VOICES.                        Forward! Forward!
 Harold and Holy Cross!
 
 ALDWYTH.               The day is won!
 
 
 
 SCENE II.--A PLAIN. BEFORE THE BATTLE OF STAMFORD-BRIDGE.
 
 HAROLD _and his_ GUARD.
 
 
 HAROLD. Who is it comes this way? Tostig?
 (_Enter_ TOSTIG _with a small force_.)    O brother,
 What art thou doing here?
 
 TOSTIG.                   I am foraging
 For Norway's army.
 
 HAROLD.            I could take and slay thee.
 Thou art in arms against us.
 
 TOSTIG.                      Take and slay me,
 For Edward loved me.
 
 HAROLD.              Edward bad me spare thee.
 
 TOSTIG. I hate King Edward, for he join'd with thee
 To drive me outlaw'd. Take and slay me, I say,
 Or I shall count thee fool.
 
 HAROLD.                     Take thee, or free thee,
 Free thee or slay thee, Norway will have war;
 No man would strike with Tostig, save for Norway.
 Thou art nothing in thine England, save for Norway,
 Who loves not thee but war. What dost thou here,
 Trampling thy mother's bosom into blood?
 
 TOSTIG. She hath wean'd me from it with such bitterness.
 I come for mine own Earldom, my Northumbria;
 Thou hast given it to the enemy of our house.
 
 HAROLD. Northumbria threw thee off, she will not have thee,
 Thou hast misused her: and, O crowning crime!
 Hast murder'd thine own guest, the son of Orm,
 Gamel, at thine own hearth.
 
 TOSTIG.                     The slow, fat fool!
 He drawl'd and prated so, I smote him suddenly,
 I knew not what I did. He held with Morcar.--
 I hate myself for all things that I do.
 
 HAROLD. And Morcar holds with us. Come back with him.
 Know what thou dost; and we may find for thee,
 So thou be chasten'd by thy banishment,
 Some easier earldom.
 
 TOSTIG.              What for Norway then?
 He looks for land among us, he and his.
 
 HAROLD. Seven feet of English land, or something more,
 Seeing he is a giant.
 
 TOSTIG.               That is noble!
 That sounds of Godwin.
 
 HAROLD.                Come thou back, and be
 Once more a son of Godwin.
 
 TOSTIG (_turns away_).     O brother, brother,
 O Harold--
 
 HAROLD (_laying his hand on_ TOSTIG'S _shoulder_).
           Nay then, come thou back to us!
 
 TOSTIG (_after a pause turning to him_).  Never
 shall any man say that I, that Tostig
 Conjured the mightier Harold from his North
 To do the battle for me here in England,
 Then left him for the meaner! thee!--
 Thou hast no passion for the House of Godwin--
 Thou hast but cared to make thyself a king--
 Thou hast sold me for a cry.--
 Thou gavest thy voice against me in the Council--
 I hate thee, and despise thee, and defy thee.
 Farewell for ever!
                       [_Exit_.
 
 HAROLD. On to Stamford-bridge!
 
 
 
 SCENE III.
 
 
 AFTER THE BATTLE OF STAMFORD-BRIDGE. BANQUET.
 
 HAROLD _and_ ALDWYTH. GURTH, LEOFWIN, MORCAR, EDWIN,
 _and other_ EARLS _and_ THANES.
 
 
 VOICES. Hail! Harold! Aldwyth! hail, bridegroom and bride!
 
 ALDWYTH (_talking with_ HAROLD).
 Answer them thou!
 Is this our marriage-banquet? Would the wines
 Of wedding had been dash'd into the cups
 Of victory, and our marriage and thy glory
 Been drunk together! these poor hands but sew,
 Spin, broider--would that they were man's to have held
 The battle-axe by thee!
 
 HAROLD.                 There _was_ a moment
 When being forced aloof from all my guard,
 And striking at Hardrada and his madmen
 I had wish'd for any weapon.
 
 ALDWYTH.                     Why art thou sad?
 
 HAROLD. I have lost the boy who play'd at ball with me,
 With whom I fought another fight than this
 Of Stamford-bridge.
 
 ALDWYTH.            Ay! ay! thy victories
 Over our own poor Wales, when at thy side
 He conquer'd with thee.
 
 HAROLD.                 No--the childish fist
 That cannot strike again.
 
 ALDWYTH.                  Thou art too kindly.
 Why didst thou let so many Norsemen hence?
 Thy fierce forekings had clench'd their pirate hides
 To the bleak church doors, like kites upon a barn.
 
 HAROLD. Is there so great a need to tell thee why?
 
 ALDWYTH. Yea, am I not thy wife?
 
 VOICES.                          Hail, Harold, Aldwyth!
 Bridegroom and bride!
 
 ALDWYTH. Answer them!    [_To_ HAROLD.
 
 HAROLD (_to all_).    Earls and Thanes!
 Full thanks for your fair greeting of my bride!
 Earls, Thanes, and all our countrymen! the day,
 Our day beside the Derwent will not shine
 Less than a star among the goldenest hours
 Of Alfred, or of Edward his great son,
 Or Athelstan, or English Ironside
 Who fought with Knut, or Knut who coming Dane
 Died English. Every man about his king
 Fought like a king; the king like his own man,
 No better; one for all, and all for one,
 One soul! and therefore have we shatter'd back
 The hugest wave from Norseland ever yet
 Surged on us, and our battle-axes broken
 The Raven's wing, and dumb'd his carrion croak
 From the gray sea for ever. Many are gone--
 Drink to the dead who died for us, the living
 Who fought and would have died, but happier lived,
 If happier be to live; they both have life
 In the large mouth of England, till _her_ voice
 Die with the world. Hail--hail!
 
 MORCAR. May all invaders perish like Hardrada!
 All traitors fail like Tostig.     [_All drink but_ HAROLD.
 
 ALDWYTH.                       Thy cup's full!
 
 HAROLD. I saw the hand of Tostig cover it.
 Our dear, dead, traitor-brother, Tostig, him
 Reverently we buried. Friends, had I been here,
 Without too large self-lauding I must hold
 The sequel had been other than his league
 With Norway, and this battle. Peace be with him!
 He was not of the worst. If there be those
 At banquet in this hall, and hearing me--
 For there be those I fear who prick'd the lion
 To make him spring, that sight of Danish blood
 Might serve an end not English--peace with them
 Likewise, if they can be at peace with what
 God gave us to divide us from the wolf!
 
 ALDWYTH (_aside to_ HAROLD).
 Make not our Morcar sullen: it is not wise.
 
 HAROLD. Hail to the living who fought, the dead who fell!
 
 VOICES. Hail, hail!
 
 FIRST THANE. How ran that answer which King Harold gave
 To his dead namesake, when he ask'd for England?
 
 LEOFWIN. 'Seven feet of English earth, or something more,
 Seeing he is a giant!'
 
 FIRST THANE.           Then for the bastard
 Six feet and nothing more!
 
 LEOFWIN.                   Ay, but belike
 Thou hast not learnt his measure.
 
 FIRST THANE.                      By St. Edmund
 I over-measure him. Sound sleep to the man
 Here by dead Norway without dream or dawn!
 
 SECOND THANE. What is he bragging still that he will come
 To thrust our Harold's throne from under him?
 My nurse would tell me of a molehill crying
 To a mountain 'Stand aside and room for me!'
 
 FIRST THANE. Let him come! let him come.
 Here's to him, sink or swim!    [_Drinks_.
 
 SECOND THANE.                God sink him!
 
 FIRST THANE. Cannot hands which had the strength
 To shove that stranded iceberg off our shores,
 And send the shatter'd North again to sea,
 Scuttle his cockle-shell? What's Brunanburg
 To Stamford-bridge? a war-crash, and so hard,
 So loud, that, by St. Dunstan, old St. Thor--
 By God, we thought him dead--but our old Thor
 Heard his own thunder again, and woke and came
 Among us again, and mark'd the sons of those
 Who made this Britain England, break the North:
 
     Mark'd how the war-axe swang,
     Heard how the war-horn sang,
     Mark'd how the spear-head sprang,
     Heard how the shield-wall rang,
     Iron on iron clang,
     Anvil on hammer bang--
 
 SECOND THANE. Hammer on anvil, hammer on anvil. Old dog,
 Thou art drunk, old dog!
 
 FIRST THANE.             Too drunk to fight with thee!
 
 SECOND THANE. Fight thou with thine own double, not with me,
 Keep that for Norman William!
 
 FIRST THANE.                  Down with William!
 
 THIRD THANE. The washerwoman's brat!
 
 FOURTH THANE.                        The tanner's bastard!
 
 FIFTH THANE.
 The Falaise byblow!
 
     [_Enter a_ THANE, _from Pevensey, spattered with mud_.
 
 HAROLD.             Ay, but what late guest,
 As haggard as a fast of forty days,
 And caked and plaster'd with a hundred mires,
 Hath stumbled on our cups?
 
 THANE _from Pevensey_.     My lord the King!
 William the Norman, for the wind had changed--
 
 HAROLD. I felt it in the middle of that fierce fight
 At Stamford-bridge. William hath landed, ha?
 
 THANE _from Pevensey_.  Landed at Pevensey--I am from Pevensey--
 Hath wasted all the land at Pevensey--
 Hath harried mine own cattle--God confound him!
 I have ridden night and day from Pevensey--
 A thousand ships--a hundred thousand men--
 Thousands of horses, like as many lions
 Neighing and roaring as they leapt to land--
 
 HAROLD. How oft in coming hast thou broken bread?
 
 THANE _from Pevensey_.
 Some thrice, or so.
 
 HAROLD.             Bring not thy hollowness
 On our full feast. Famine is fear, were it but
 Of being starved. Sit down, sit down, and eat,
 And, when again red-blooded, speak again;
 (_Aside_.) The men that guarded England to the South
 Were scatter'd to the harvest.... No power mine
 To hold their force together.... Many are fallen
 At Stamford-bridge ... the people stupid-sure
 Sleep like their swine ... in South and North at once
 I could not be.
      (_Aloud_.) Gurth, Leofwin, Morcar, Edwin!
 (_Pointing to the revellers_.)
 The curse of England! these are drown'd in wassail,
 And cannot see the world but thro' their wines!
 Leave them! and thee too, Aldwyth, must I leave--
 Harsh is the news! hard is our honeymoon!
 Thy pardon.    (_Turning round to his_ ATTENDANTS.)
             Break the banquet up ... Ye four!
 And thou, my carrier-pigeon of black news,
 Cram thy crop full, but come when thou art call'd.
 
                                       [_Exit_ HAROLD.
 
 
 
 
 ACT V.
 
 
 SCENE I.--A TENT ON A MOUND, FROM WHICH CAN BE SEEN THE FIELD OF
 SENLAC.
 
 HAROLD, _sitting; by him standing_ HUGH MARGOT _the Monk_, GURTH,
 LEOFWIN,
 
 
 HAROLD. Refer my cause, my crown to Rome!... The wolf
 Mudded the brook and predetermined all.
 Monk,
 Thou hast said thy say, and had my constant 'No'
 For all but instant battle. I hear no more.
 
 MARGOT. Hear me again--for the last time. Arise,
 Scatter thy people home, descend the hill,
 Lay hands of full allegiance in thy Lord's
 And crave his mercy, for the Holy Father
 Hath given this realm of England to the Norman.
 
 HAROLD. Then for the last time, monk, I ask again
 When had the Lateran and the Holy Father
 To do with England's choice of her own king?
 
 MARGOT. Earl, the first Christian Caesar drew to the East
 To leave the Pope dominion in the West
 He gave him all the kingdoms of the West.
 
 HAROLD. So!--did he?--Earl--I have a mind to play
 The William with thine eyesight and thy tongue.
 Earl--ay--thou art but a messenger of William.
 I am weary--go: make me not wroth with thee!
 
 MARGOT. Mock-king, I am the messenger of God,
 His Norman Daniel! Mene, Mene, Tekel!
 Is thy wrath Hell, that I should spare to cry,
 Yon heaven is wroth with _thee?_ Hear me again!
 Our Saints have moved the Church that moves the world,
 And all the Heavens and very God: they heard--
 They know King Edward's promise and thine--thine.
 
 HAROLD. Should they not know free England crowns herself?
 Not know that he nor I had power to promise?
 Not know that Edward cancell'd his own promise?
 And for my part therein--Back to that juggler,
                                         [_Rising_.
 Tell him the saints are nobler than he dreams,
 Tell him that God is nobler than the Saints,
 And tell him we stand arm'd on Senlac Hill,
 And bide the doom of God.
 
 MARGOT.                   Hear it thro' me.
 The realm for which thou art forsworn is cursed,
 The babe enwomb'd and at the breast is cursed,
 The corpse thou whelmest with thine earth is cursed,
 The soul who fighteth on thy side is cursed,
 The seed thou sowest in thy field is cursed,
 The steer wherewith thou plowest thy field is cursed,
 The fowl that fleeth o'er thy field is cursed,
 And thou, usurper, liar--
 
 HAROLD.                  Out, beast monk!
     [_Lifting his hand to strike him_. GURTH _stops the blow_.
 I ever hated monks.
 
 MARGOT.             I am but a voice
 Among you: murder, martyr me if ye will--
 
 HAROLD. Thanks, Gurth! The simple, silent, selfless man
 Is worth a world of tonguesters. (_To_ MARGOT.) Get thee gone!
 He means the thing he says. See him out safe!
 
 LEOFWIN. He hath blown himself as red as fire with curses.
 An honest fool! Follow me, honest fool,
 But if thou blurt thy curse among our folk,
 I know not--I may give that egg-bald head
 The tap that silences.
 
 HAROLD.                See him out safe.
                             [_Exeunt_ LEOFWIN _and_ MARGOT.
 
 GURTH. Thou hast lost thine even temper, brother Harold!
 
 HAROLD. Gurth, when I past by Waltham, my foundation
 For men who serve the neighbour, not themselves,
 I cast me down prone, praying; and, when I rose,
 They told me that the Holy Rood had lean'd
 And bow'd above me; whether that which held it
 Had weaken'd, and the Rood itself were bound
 To that necessity which binds us down;
 Whether it bow'd at all but in their fancy;
 Or if it bow'd, whether it symbol'd ruin
 Or glory, who shall tell? but they were sad,
 And somewhat sadden'd me.
 
 GURTH.                    Yet if a fear,
 Or shadow of a fear, lest the strange Saints
 By whom thou swarest, should have power to balk
 Thy puissance in this fight with him, who made
 And heard thee swear--brother--_I_ have not sworn--
 If the king fall, may not the kingdom fall?
 But if I fall, I fall, and thou art king;
 And, if I win, I win, and thou art king;
 Draw thou to London, there make strength to breast
 Whatever chance, but leave this day to me.
 
 LEOFWIN (_entering_). And waste the land about thee as thou goest,
 And be thy hand as winter on the field,
 To leave the foe no forage.
 
 HAROLD.                     Noble Gurth!
 Best son of Godwin! If I fall, I fall--
 The doom of God! How should the people fight
 When the king flies? And, Leofwin, art thou mad?
 How should the King of England waste the fields
 Of England, his own people?--No glance yet
 Of the Northumbrian helmet on the heath?
 
 LEOFWIN. No, but a shoal of wives upon the heath,
 And someone saw thy willy-nilly nun
 Vying a tress against our golden fern.
 
 HAROLD. Vying a tear with our cold dews, a sigh
 With these low-moaning heavens. Let her be fetch'd.
 We have parted from our wife without reproach,
 Tho' we have dived thro' all her practices;
 And that is well.
 
 LEOFWIN.          I saw her even now:
 She hath not left us.
 
 HAROLD.               Nought of Morcar then?
 
 GURTH. Nor seen, nor heard; thine, William's or his own
 As wind blows, or tide flows: belike he watches,
 If this war-storm in one of its rough rolls
 Wash up that old crown of Northumberland.
 
 HAROLD. I married her for Morcar--a sin against
 The truth of love. Evil for good, it seems,
 Is oft as childless of the good as evil
 For evil.
 
 LEOFWIN.  Good for good hath borne at times
 A bastard false as William.
 
 HAROLD.                     Ay, if Wisdom
 Pair'd not with Good. But I am somewhat worn,
 A snatch of sleep were like the peace of God.
 Gurth, Leofwin, go once more about the hill--
 What did the dead man call it--Sanguelac,
 The lake of blood?
 
 LEOFWIN.           A lake that dips in William
 As well as Harold.
 
 HAROLD.            Like enough. I have seen
 The trenches dug, the palisades uprear'd
 And wattled thick with ash and willow-wands;
 Yea, wrought at them myself. Go round once more;
 See all be sound and whole. No Norman horse
 Can shatter England, standing shield by shield;
 Tell that again to all.
 
 GURTH.                  I will, good brother.
 
 HAROLD. Our guardsman hath but toil'd his hand and foot,
 I hand, foot, heart and head. Some wine!
     (_One pours wine into a goblet which he hands to_ HAROLD.)
                                          Too much!
 What? we must use our battle-axe to-day.
 Our guardsmen have slept well, since we came in?
 
 LEOFWIN. Ay, slept and snored. Your second-sighted man
 That scared the dying conscience of the king,
 Misheard their snores for groans. They are up again
 And chanting that old song of Brunanburg
 Where England conquer'd.
 
 HAROLD.                  That is well. The Norman,
 What is he doing?
 
 LEOFWIN.          Praying for Normandy;
 Our scouts have heard the tinkle of their bells.
 
 HAROLD. And our old songs are prayers for England too!
 But by all Saints--
 
 LEOFWIN.           Barring the Norman!
 
 HAROLD.                                Nay,
 Were the great trumpet blowing doomsday dawn,
 I needs must rest. Call when the Norman moves--
 
                             [_Exeunt all, but_ HAROLD.
 
 No horse--thousands of horses--our shield wall--
 Wall--break it not--break not--break--    [_Sleeps_.
 
 VISION OF EDWARD. Son Harold, I thy king, who came before
 To tell thee thou shouldst win at Stamford-bridge,
 Come yet once more, from where I am at peace,
 Because I loved thee in my mortal day,
 To tell thee them shalt die on Senlac hill--
 Sanguelac!
 
 VISION OF WULFNOTH. O brother, from my ghastly oubliette
 I send my voice across the narrow seas--
 No more, no more, dear brother, nevermore--
 Sanguelac!
 
 VISION OF TOSTIG. O brother, most unbrotherlike to me,
 Thou gavest thy voice against me in my life,
 I give my voice against thee from the grave--
 Sanguelac!
 
 VISION OF NORMAN SAINTS. O hapless Harold!
 King but for an hour!
 Thou swarest falsely by our blessed bones,
 We give our voice against thee out of heaven!
 Sanguelac! Sanguelac! The arrow! the arrow!
 
 HAROLD (_starting up, battle-axe in hand_.) Away!
 My battle-axe against your voices. Peace!
 The king's last word--'the arrow!' I shall die--
 I die for England then, who lived for England--
 What nobler? men must die.
 I cannot fall into a falser world--
 I have done no man wrong. Tostig, poor brother,
 Art _thou_ so anger'd?
 Fain had I kept thine earldom in thy hands
 Save for thy wild and violent will that wrench'd
 All hearts of freemen from thee. I could do
 No other than this way advise the king
 Against the race of Godwin. Is it possible
 That mortal men should bear their earthly heats
 Into yon bloodless world, and threaten us thence
 Unschool'd of Death? Thus then thou art revenged--
 I left our England naked to the South
 To meet thee in the North. The Norseman's raid
 Hath helpt the Norman, and the race of Godwin
 Hath ruin'd Godwin. No--our waking thoughts
 Suffer a stormless shipwreck in the pools
 Of sullen slumber, and arise again
 Disjointed: only dreams--where mine own self
 Takes part against myself! Why? for a spark
 Of self-disdain born in me when I sware
 Falsely to him, the falser Norman, over
 His gilded ark of mummy-saints, by whom
 I knew not that I sware,--not for myself--
 For England--yet not wholly--
 
     _Enter_ EDITH.
 
                              Edith, Edith,
 Get thou into thy cloister as the king
 Will'd it: be safe: the perjury-mongering Count
 Hath made too good an use of Holy Church
 To break her close! There the great God of truth
 Fill all thine hours with peace!--A lying devil
 Hath haunted me--mine oath--my wife--I fain
 Had made my marriage not a lie; I could not:
 Thou art my bride! and thou in after years
 Praying perchance for this poor soul of mine
 In cold, white cells beneath an icy moon--
 This memory to thee!--and this to England,
 My legacy of war against the Pope
 From child to child, from Pope to Pope, from age to age,
 Till the sea wash her level with her shores,
 Or till the Pope be Christ's.
 
     _Enter_ ALDWYTH.
 
 ALDWYTH (_to_ EDITH).         Away from him!
 
 EDITH. I will.... I have not spoken to the king
 One word; and one I must. Farewell!    [_Going_.
 
 HAROLD.                             Not yet.
 Stay.
 
 EDITH. To what use?
 
 HAROLD.             The king commands thee, woman!
     (_To_ ALDWYTH.)
 Have thy two brethren sent their forces in?
 
 ALDWYTH. Nay, I fear not.
 
 HAROLD.                   Then there's no force in thee!
 Thou didst possess thyself of Edward's ear
 To part me from the woman that I loved!
 Thou didst arouse the fierce Northumbrians!
 Thou hast been false to England and to me!--
 As ... in some sort ... I have been false to thee.
 Leave me. No more--Pardon on both sides--Go!
 
 ALDWYTH. Alas, my lord, I loved thee.
 
 HAROLD (_bitterly_).                  With a love
 Passing thy love for Griffyth! wherefore now
 Obey my first and last commandment. Go!
 
 ALDWYTH. O Harold! husband! Shall we meet again?
 
 HAROLD. After the battle--after the battle. Go.
 
 ALDWYTH. I go. (_Aside_.) That I could stab her standing there!
                                                   [_Exit_ ALDWYTH.
 
 EDITH. Alas, my lord, she loved thee.
 
 HAROLD.                               Never! never!
 
 EDITH. I saw it in her eyes!
 
 HAROLD.                      I see it in thine.
 And not on thee--nor England--fall God's doom!
 
 EDITH. On _thee?_ on me. And thou art England! Alfred
 Was England. Ethelred was nothing. England
 Is but her king, and thou art Harold!
 
 HAROLD.                               Edith,
 The sign in heaven--the sudden blast at sea--
 My fatal oath--the dead Saints--the dark dreams--
 The Pope's Anathema--the Holy Rood
 That bow'd to me at Waltham--Edith, if
 I, the last English King of England--
 
 EDITH.                               No,
 First of a line that coming from the people,
 And chosen by the people--
 
 HAROLD.                   And fighting for
 And dying for the people--
 
 EDITH.                    Living! living!
 
 HAROLD. Yea so, good cheer! thou art Harold, I am Edith!
 Look not thus wan!
 
 EDITH.             What matters how I look?
 Have we not broken Wales and Norseland? slain,
 Whose life was all one battle, incarnate war,
 Their giant-king, a mightier man-in-arms
 Than William.
 
 HAROLD.       Ay, my girl, no tricks in him--
 No bastard he! when all was lost, he yell'd,
 And bit his shield, and dash'd it on the ground,
 And swaying his two-handed sword about him,
 Two deaths at every swing, ran in upon us
 And died so, and I loved him as I hate
 This liar who made me liar. If Hate can kill,
 And Loathing wield a Saxon battle-axe--
 
 EDITH. Waste not thy might before the battle!
 
 HAROLD.                                       No,
 And thou must hence. Stigand will see thee safe,
 And so--Farewell.    [_He is going, but turns back_.
 The ring thou darest not wear.
 I have had it fashion'd, see, to meet my hand.
           [HAROLD _shows the ring which is on his finger_.
 
 Farewell!    [_He is going, but turns back again_.
 I am dead as Death this day to ought of earth's
 Save William's death or mine.
 
 EDITH.                        Thy death!--to-day!
 Is it not thy birthday?
 
 HAROLD.                 Ay, that happy day!
 A birthday welcome! happy days and many!
 One--this!    [_They embrace_.
 Look, I will bear thy blessing into the battle
 And front the doom of God.
 
 NORMAN CRIES (_heard in the distance_).
                            Ha Rou! Ha Rou!
 
     _Enter_ GURTH.
 
 GURTH. The Norman moves!
 
 HAROLD.                  Harold and Holy Cross!
 
                            [_Exeunt_ HAROLD _and_ GURTH.
 
     _Enter_ STIGAND.
 
 STIGAND. Our Church in arms--the lamb the lion--not
 Spear into pruning-hook--the counter way--
 Cowl, helm; and crozier, battle-axe. Abbot Alfwig,
 Leofric, and all the monks of Peterboro'
 Strike for the king; but I, old wretch, old Stigand,
 With hands too limp to brandish iron--and yet
 I have a power--would Harold ask me for it--
 I have a power.
 
 EDITH.          What power, holy father?
 
 STIGAND. Power now from Harold to command thee hence
 And see thee safe from Senlac.
 
 EDITH.                         I remain!
 
 STIGAND. Yea, so will I, daughter, until I find
 Which way the battle balance. I can see it
 From where we stand: and, live or die, I would
 I were among them!
 
 CANONS _from Waltham (singing without)_.
 
     Salva patriam
     Sancte Pater,
     Salva Fili,
     Salva Spiritus,
     Salva patriam,
       Sancta Mater.[1]
 
   [Footnote 1: The _a_ throughout these Latin hymns should be
   sounded broad, as in 'father.']
 
 EDITH. Are those the blessed angels quiring, father?
 
 STIGAND. No, daughter, but the canons out of Waltham,
 The king's foundation, that have follow'd him.
 
 EDITH. O God of battles, make their wall of shields
 Firm as thy cliffs, strengthen their palisades!
 What is that whirring sound?
 
 STIGAND.                     The Norman arrow!
 
 EDITH. Look out upon the battle--is he safe?
 
 STIGAND. The king of England stands between his banners.
 He glitters on the crowning of the hill.
 God save King Harold!
 
 EDITH.               --chosen by his people
 And fighting for his people!
 
 STIGAND.                     There is one
 Come as Goliath came of yore--he flings
 His brand in air and catches it again,
 He is chanting some old warsong.
 
 EDITH.                           And no David
 To meet him?
 
 STIGAND.     Ay, there springs a Saxon on him,
 Falls--and another falls.
 
 EDITH.                    Have mercy on us!
 
 STIGAND. Lo! our good Gurth hath smitten him to the death.
 
 EDITH. So perish all the enemies of Harold!
 
 CANONS (_singing_).
 
     Hostis in Angliam
       Ruit praedator,
     Illorum, Domine,
       Scutum scindatur!
     Hostis per Angliae
       Plagas bacchatur;
       Casa crematur,
       Pastor fugatur
       Grex trucidatur--
 
 STIGAND. Illos trucida, Domine.
 
 EDITH.                          Ay, good father.
 
 CANONS (_singing_).
 
     Illorum scelera
       Poena sequatur!
 
 ENGLISH CRIES. Harold and Holy Cross! Out! out!
 
 STIGAND.                                        Our javelins
 Answer their arrows. All the Norman foot
 Are storming up the hill. The range of knights
 Sit, each a statue on his horse, and wait.
 
 ENGLISH CRIES. Harold and God Almighty!
 
 NORMAN CRIES.                           Ha Rou! Ha Rou!
 
 CANONS (_singing_).
 
     Eques cum pedite
       Praepediatur!
     Illorum in lacrymas
       Cruor fundatur!
     Pereant, pereant,
       Anglia precatur.
 
 STIGAND. Look, daughter, look.
 
 EDITH.                         Nay, father, look for me!
 
 STIGAND. Our axes lighten with a single flash
 About the summit of the hill, and heads
 And arms are sliver'd off and splinter'd by
 Their lightning--and they fly--the Norman flies.
 
 EDITH. Stigand, O father, have we won the day?
 
 STIGAND. No, daughter, no--they fall behind the horse--
 Their horse are thronging to the barricades;
 I see the gonfanon of Holy Peter
 Floating above their helmets--ha! he is down!
 
 EDITH. He down! Who down?
 
 STIGAND.                  The Norman Count is down.
 
 EDITH. So perish all the enemies of England!
 
 STIGAND. No, no, he hath risen again--he bares his face--
 Shouts something--he points onward--all their horse
 Swallow the hill locust-like, swarming up.
 
 EDITH. O God of battles, make his battle-axe keen
 As thine own sharp-dividing justice, heavy
 As thine own bolts that fall on crimeful heads
 Charged with the weight of heaven wherefrom they fall!
 
 CANONS (_singing_).
 
     Jacta tonitrua
       Deus bellator!
     Surgas e tenebris,
       Sis vindicator!
     Fulmina, fulmina
       Deus vastator!
 
 EDITH. O God of battles, they are three to one,
 Make thou one man as three to roll them down!
 
 CANONS (_singing_).
 
     Equus cum equite
       Dejiciatur!
     Acies, Acies
       Prona sternatur!
     Illorum lanceas
       Frange Creator!
 
 STIGAND. Yea, yea, for how their lances snap and shiver
 Against the shifting blaze of Harold's axe!
 War-woodman of old Woden, how he fells
 The mortal copse of faces! There! And there!
 The horse and horseman cannot meet the shield,
 The blow that brains the horseman cleaves the horse,
 The horse and horseman roll along the hill,
 They fly once more, they fly, the Norman flies!
 
     Equus cum equite
       Praecipitatur.
 
 EDITH. O God, the God of truth hath heard my cry.
 Follow them, follow them, drive them to the sea!
 
     Illorum scelera
       Poena sequatur!
 
 STIGAND. Truth! no; a lie; a trick, a Norman trick!
 They turn on the pursuer, horse against foot,
 They murder all that follow.
 
 EDITH.                       Have mercy on us!
 
 STIGAND. Hot-headed fools--to burst the wall of shields!
 They have broken the commandment of the king!
 
 EDITH. His oath was broken--O holy Norman Saints,
 Ye that are now of heaven, and see beyond
 Your Norman shrines, pardon it, pardon it,
 That he forsware himself for all he loved,
 Me, me and all! Look out upon the battle!
 
 STIGAND. They thunder again upon the barricades.
 My sight is eagle, but the strife so thick--
 This is the hottest of it: hold, ash! hold, willow!
 
 ENGLISH CRIES. Out, out!
 
 NORMAN CRIES.            Ha Rou!
 
 STIGAND. Ha! Gurth hath leapt upon him
 And slain him: he hath fallen.
 
 EDITH.                         And I am heard.
 Glory to God in the Highest! fallen, fallen!
 
 STIGAND. No, no, his horse--he mounts another--wields
 His war-club, dashes it on Gurth, and Gurth,
 Our noble Gurth, is down!
 
 EDITH.                    Have mercy on us!
 
 STIGAND. And Leofwin is down!
 
 EDITH.                        Have mercy on us!
 O Thou that knowest, let not my strong prayer
 Be weaken'd in thy sight, because I love
 The husband of another!
 
 NORMAN CRIES.           Ha Rou! Ha Rou!
 
 EDITH. I do not hear our English war-cry.
 
 STIGAND.                                  No.
 
 EDITH. Look out upon the battle--is he safe?
 
 STIGAND. He stands between the banners with the dead
 So piled about him he can hardly move.
 
 EDITH (_takes up the war-cry_).
 Out! out!
 
 NORMAN CRIES. Ha Rou!
 
 EDITH (_cries out_).  Harold and Holy Cross!
 
 NORMAN CRIES. Ha Rou! Ha Rou!
 
 EDITH.                        What is that whirring sound?
 
 STIGAND. The Norman sends his arrows up to Heaven,
 They fall on those within the palisade!
 
 EDITH. Look out upon the hill--is Harold there?
 
 STIGAND. Sanguelac--Sanguelac--the arrow--the arrow!--away!
 
 
 
 SCENE II--FIELD OF THE DEAD. NIGHT.
 
 ALDWYTH _and_ EDITH.
 
 
 ALDWYTH. O Edith, art thou here? O Harold, Harold--
 Our Harold--we shall never see him more.
 
 EDITH. For there was more than sister in my kiss,
 And so the saints were wroth. I cannot love them,
 For they are Norman saints--and yet I should--
 They are so much holier than their harlot's son
 With whom they play'd their game against the king!
 
 ALDWYTH, The king is slain, the kingdom over-thrown!
 
 EDITH. No matter!
 
 ALDWYTH.          How no matter, Harold slain?--
 I cannot find his body. O help me thou!
 O Edith, if I ever wrought against thee,
 Forgive me thou, and help me here!
 
 EDITH.                             No matter!
 
 ALDWYTH. Not help me, nor forgive me?
 
 EDITH.                                So thou saidest.
 
 ALDWYTH. I say it now, forgive me!
 
 EDITH.                             Cross me not!
 I am seeking one who wedded me in secret.
 Whisper! God's angels only know it. Ha!
 What art thou doing here among the dead?
 They are stripping the dead bodies naked yonder,
 And thou art come to rob them of their rings!
 
 ALDWYTH. O Edith, Edith, I have lost both crown
 And husband.
 
 EDITH.       So have I.
 
 ALDWYTH.                I tell thee, girl,
 I am seeking my dead Harold.
 
 EDITH.                       And I mine!
 The Holy Father strangled him with a hair
 Of Peter, and his brother Tostig helpt;
 The wicked sister clapt her hands and laugh'd;
 Then all the dead fell on him.
 
 ALDWYTH.                       Edith, Edith--
 
 EDITH. What was he like, this husband? like to thee?
 Call not for help from me. I knew him not.
 He lies not here: not close beside the standard.
 Here fell the truest, manliest hearts of England.
 Go further hence and find him.
 
 ALDWYTH.                       She is crazed!
 
 EDITH. That doth not matter either. Lower the light.
 He must be here.
 
     _Enter two_ CANONS, OSGOD _and_ ATHELRIC, _with
     torches. They turn over the dead bodies and
     examine them as they pass_.
 
 OSGOD.           I think that this is Thurkill.
 
 ATHELRIC. More likely Godric.
 
 OSGOD.                       I am sure this body
 Is Alfwig, the king's uncle.
 
 ATHELRIC.                    So it is!
 No, no--brave Gurth, one gash from brow to knee!
 
 OSGOD. And here is Leofwin.
 
 EDITH.                      And here is _He!_
 
 ALDWYTH. Harold? Oh no--nay, if it were--my God,
 They have so maim'd and murder'd all his face
 There is no man can swear to him.
 
 EDITH.                            But one woman!
 Look you, we never mean to part again.
 I have found him, I am happy.
 Was there not someone ask'd me for forgiveness?
 I yield it freely, being the true wife
 Of this dead King, who never bore revenge.
 
     _Enter_ COUNT WILLIAM _and_ WILLIAM MALET.
 
 WILLIAM. Who be these women? And what body is this?
 
 EDITH. Harold, thy better!
 
 WILLIAM.                   Ay, and what art thou?
 
 EDITH. His wife!
 
 MALET.           Not true, my girl, here is the Queen!
                                       [_Pointing out_ ALDWYTH.
 
 WILLIAM (_to_ ALDWYTH).
 Wast thou his Queen?
 
 ALDWYTH.             I was the Queen of Wales.
 
 WILLIAM. Why then of England. Madam, fear us not.
 (_To_ MALET.) Knowest thou this other?
 
 MALET.                                 When I visited England,
 Some held she was his wife in secret--some--
 Well--some believed she was his paramour.
 
 EDITH. Norman, thou liest! liars all of you,
 Your Saints and all! I am his wife! and she--
 For look, our marriage ring!
                [_She draws it off the finger of_ HAROLD.
                              I lost it somehow--
 I lost it, playing with it when I was wild.
 _That_ bred the doubt! but I am wiser now ...
 I am too wise.... Will none among you all
 Bear me true witness--only for this once--
 That I have found it here again?    [_She puts it on_.
                                  And thou,
 Thy wife am I for ever and evermore.
                          [_Falls on the body and dies_.
 
 WILLIAM. Death!--and enough of death for this one day,
 The day of St. Calixtus, and the day,
 My day when I was born.
 
 MALET.                  And this dead king's
 Who, king or not, hath kinglike fought and fallen,
 His birthday, too. It seems but yestereven
 I held it with him in his English halls,
 His day, with all his rooftree ringing 'Harold,'
 Before he fell into the snare of Guy;
 When all men counted Harold would be king,
 And Harold was most happy.
 
 WILLIAM.                   Thou art half English
 Take them away!
 Malet, I vow to build a church to God
 Here on the hill of battle; let our high altar
 Stand where their standard fell ... where these two lie.
 Take them away, I do not love to see them.
 Pluck the dead woman off the dead man, Malet!
 
 MALET. Faster than ivy. Must I hack her arms off?
 How shall I part them?
 
 WILLIAM.               Leave them. Let them be!
 Bury him and his paramour together.
 He that was false in oath to me, it seems
 Was false to his own wife. We will not give him
 A Christian burial: yet he was a warrior,
 And wise, yea truthful, till that blighted vow
 Which God avenged to-day.
 Wrap them together in a purple cloak
 And lay them both upon the waste sea-shore
 At Hastings, there to guard the land for which
 He did forswear himself--a warrior--ay,
 And but that Holy Peter fought for us,
 And that the false Northumbrian held aloof,
 And save for that chance arrow which the Saints
 Sharpen'd and sent against him--who can tell?--
 Three horses had I slain beneath me: twice
 I thought that all was lost. Since I knew battle,
 And that was from my boyhood, never yet--
 No, by the splendour of God--have I fought men
 Like Harold and his brethren, and his guard
 Of English. Every man about his king
 Fell where he stood. They loved him: and, pray God
 My Normans may but move as true with me
 To the door of death. Of one self-stock at first,
 Make them again one people--Norman, English;
 And English, Norman; we should have a hand
 To grasp the world with, and a foot to stamp it ...
 Flat. Praise the Saints, It is over. No more blood!
 I am king of England, so they thwart me not,
 And I will rule according to their laws.
 (_To_ ALDWYTH.) Madam, we will entreat thee with all honour.
 
 ALDWYTH. My punishment is more than I can bear.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
